    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☑ ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d)
OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the Fiscal Year Ended December 31, 2019
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d)
OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the Transition Period from            to           
 Commission
File NumberRegistrant,
State of Incorporation,
Address and Telephone Number  I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.
 1-3526 The Southern Company  58-0690070
(A Delaware Corporation)
30 Ivan Allen Jr. Boulevard, N.W.
Atlanta, Georgia 30308
(404) 506-5000
 1-3164 Alabama Power Company  63-0004250
(An Alabama Corporation)
600 North 18th Street
Birmingham, Alabama 35203
(205) 257-1000
 1-6468 Georgia Power Company  58-0257110
(A Georgia Corporation)
241 Ralph McGill Boulevard, N.E.
Atlanta, Georgia 30308
(404) 506-6526
 001-11229 Mississippi Power Company  64-0205820
(A Mississippi Corporation)
2992 West Beach Boulevard
Gulfport, Mississippi 39501
(228) 864-1211
 001-37803 Southern Power Company  58-2598670
(A Delaware Corporation)
30 Ivan Allen Jr. Boulevard, N.W.
Atlanta, Georgia 30308
(404) 506-5000
 1-14174 Southern Company Gas  58-2210952
(A Georgia Corporation)
Ten Peachtree Place, N.E.
Atlanta, Georgia 30309
(404) 584-4000
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Registrant Title of Each ClassTrading
Symbol(s)Name of Each Exchange
on Which Registered
The Southern Company Common Stock, par value $5 per share SONew York Stock Exchange
(NYSE)
The Southern Company Series 2015A 6.25% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2075 SOJA NYSE
The Southern Company Series 2016A 5.25% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2076 SOJB NYSE
The Southern Company Series 2017B 5.25% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2077 SOJC NYSE
The Southern Company 2019 Series A Corporate Units SOLN NYSE
The Southern Company Series 2020A 4.95% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2080 SOJD NYSE
Alabama Power Company 5.00% Series Class A Preferred Stock ALP PR Q NYSE
Georgia Power Company Series 2017A 5.00% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2077 GPJA NYSE
Southern Power Company Series 2016A 1.000% Senior Notes due 2022 SO/22B NYSE
Southern Power Company Series 2016B 1.850% Senior Notes due 2026 SO/26A NYSE
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:(*) 
Registrant Title of Each Class
Alabama Power CompanyPreferred stock, cumulative, $100 par value:
 4.20% Series
 4.52% Series
 4.60% Series
 4.64% Series
 4.72% Series
 4.92% Series
(*)At December 31, 2019
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Registrant Yes No
The Southern Company X  
Alabama Power Company X  
Georgia Power Company X  
Mississippi Power Company X
Southern Power Company X
Southern Company Gas X
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ¨ No x
(Response applicable to all registrants.)
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants (1) have filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrants were required to file such
reports), and (2) have been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes x No ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants have submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrants were
required to submit such files). Yes x No ¨
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of "large accelerated filer," "accelerated filer," "smaller
reporting company," and "emerging growth company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
RegistrantLarge
Accelerated
FilerAccelerated
FilerNon-
accelerated
FilerSmaller
Reporting
CompanyEmerging
Growth
Company
The Southern Company X   
Alabama Power Company  X
Georgia Power Company  X
Mississippi Power Company  X
Southern Power Company  X
Southern Company Gas  X
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ☐ No x
(Response applicable to all registrants.)
Aggregate market value of The Southern Company's common stock held by non-affiliates of The Southern Company at June 28,
2019: $57.8 billion. All of the common stock of the other registrants is held by The Southern Company. A description of each
registrant's common stock follows:
Registrant  Description of
Common Stock  Shares Outstanding at
January 31, 2020
The Southern Company  Par Value $5 Per Share  1,054,228,409
Alabama Power Company  Par Value $40 Per Share  30,537,500
Georgia Power Company  Without Par Value  9,261,500
Mississippi Power Company  Without Par Value  1,121,000
Southern Power Company  Par Value $0.01 Per Share  1,000
Southern Company Gas  Par Value $0.01 Per Share  100
Documents incorporated by reference: specified portions of The Southern Company's Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A
relating to the 2020 Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference into PART III. In addition, specified portions of
Alabama Power Company's Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A relating to its 2020 Annual Meeting of Shareholders are
incorporated by reference into PART III.
Each of Georgia Power Company, Mississippi Power Company, Southern Power Company, and Southern Company Gas meets the
conditions set forth in General Instructions I(1)(a) and (b) of Form 10-K and is therefore filing this Form 10-K with the reduced
disclosure format specified in General Instructions I(2)(b), (c), and (d) of Form 10-K.
This combined Form 10-K is separately filed by The Southern Company, Alabama Power Company, Georgia Power Company,
Mississippi Power Company, Southern Power Company, and Southern Company Gas. Information contained herein relating to any
individual registrant is filed by such registrant on its own behalf. Each registrant makes no representation as to information relating
to the other registrants.
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Table of Contents
  Page
 PART I
Item 1 Business I-1
 The Southern Company System I-2
 Construction Programs I-8
 Financing Programs I-9
 Fuel Supply I-9
 Territory Served by the Southern Company System I-10
 Competition I-11
 Seasonality I-13
 Regulation I-13
 Rate Matters I-14
 Employee Relations I-16
Item 1A Risk Factors I-17
Item 1B Unresolved Staff Comments I-29
Item 2 Properties I-30
Item 3 Legal Proceedings I-38
Item 4 Mine Safety Disclosures I-38
 Information about Our Executive Officers – Southern Company I-39
 Information about Our Executive Officers – Alabama Power I-41
 PART II
Item 5 Market for Registrants' Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities II-1
Item 6 Selected Financial Data II-2
Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations II-15
Item 7A Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk II-15
Item 8 Financial Statements and Supplementary Data II-122
Item 9 Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure II-329
Item 9A Controls and Procedures II-329
Item 9B Other Information II-329
 PART III
Item 10 Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance III-1
Item 11 Executive Compensation III-1
Item 12 Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder MattersIII-1
Item 13 Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence III-1
Item 14 Principal Accountant Fees and Services III-2
 PART IV
Item 15 Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules IV-1
Item 16 Form 10-K Summary IV-1
 Signatures
i
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
When used in this Form 10-K, the following terms will have the meanings indicated.
Term Meaning
2013 ARP Alternate Rate Plan approved by the Georgia PSC in 2013 for Georgia Power for the years 2014
through 2016 and subsequently extended through 2019
2019 ARP Alternate Rate Plan approved by the Georgia PSC in 2019 for Georgia Power for the years 2020
through 2022
AFUDC Allowance for funds used during construction
Alabama Power Alabama Power Company
AMEA Alabama Municipal Electric Authority
Amended and Restated Loan
Guarantee AgreementLoan guarantee agreement entered into by Georgia Power with the DOE in 2014, as amended and
restated on March 22, 2019, under which the proceeds of borrowings may be used to reimburse
Georgia Power for Eligible Project Costs incurred in connection with its construction of Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4
AOCI Accumulated other comprehensive income
ARO Asset retirement obligation
ASC Accounting Standards Codification
ASU Accounting Standards Update
Atlanta Gas Light Atlanta Gas Light Company, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
Atlantic Coast Pipeline Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC, a joint venture to construct and operate a natural gas pipeline in which
Southern Company Gas has a 5% ownership interest
Bcf Billion cubic feet
Bechtel Bechtel Power Corporation, the primary contractor for the remaining construction activities for Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4
Bechtel Agreement The October 23, 2017 construction completion agreement between the Vogtle Owners and Bechtel
CCN Certificate of convenience and necessity
CCR Coal combustion residuals
CCR Rule Disposal of Coal Combustion Residuals from Electric Utilities final rule published by the EPA in
2015
Chattanooga Gas Chattanooga Gas Company, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
Clean Air Act Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990
CO2 Carbon dioxide
COD Commercial operation date
Contractor Settlement
AgreementThe December 31, 2015 agreement between Westinghouse and the Vogtle Owners resolving disputes
between the Vogtle Owners and the EPC Contractor under the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement
Cooperative Energy Electric cooperative in Mississippi
CPCN Certificate of public convenience and necessity
CPP Clean Power Plan, the final action published by the EPA in 2015 that established guidelines for
states to develop plans to meet EPA-mandated CO2 emission rates or emission reduction goals for
existing electric generating units
CWIP Construction work in progress
Dalton City of Dalton, Georgia, an incorporated municipality in the State of Georgia, acting by and through
its Board of Water, Light, and Sinking Fund Commissioners
Dalton Pipeline A pipeline facility in Georgia in which Southern Company Gas has a 50% undivided ownership
interest
DOE U.S. Department of Energy
DSGP Diamond State Generation Partners
Duke Energy Florida Duke Energy Florida, LLC
ECO Plan Mississippi Power's environmental compliance overview plan
ii
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
(continued)
Term Meaning
Eligible Project Costs Certain costs of construction relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 that are eligible for financing
under the loan guarantee program established under Title XVII of the Energy Policy Act of 2005
EMC Electric membership corporation
EPA U.S. Environmental Protection Agency
EPC Contractor Westinghouse and its affiliate, WECTEC Global Project Services Inc.; the former engineering,
procurement, and construction contractor for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
FASB Financial Accounting Standards Board
FERC Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
FFB Federal Financing Bank
Fitch Fitch Ratings, Inc.
GAAP U.S. generally accepted accounting principles
Georgia Power Georgia Power Company
Georgia Power Tax Reform
Settlement AgreementA settlement agreement between Georgia Power and the staff of the Georgia PSC regarding the retail
rate impact of the Tax Reform Legislation, as approved by the Georgia PSC in April 2018
GHG Greenhouse gas
GRAM Atlanta Gas Light's Georgia Rate Adjustment Mechanism
Guarantee Settlement
AgreementThe June 9, 2017 settlement agreement between the Vogtle Owners and Toshiba related to certain
payment obligations of the EPC Contractor guaranteed by Toshiba
Gulf Power Gulf Power Company, until January 1, 2019 a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company
Heating Degree Days A measure of weather, calculated when the average daily temperatures are less than 65 degrees
Fahrenheit
Heating Season The period from November through March when Southern Company Gas' natural gas usage and
operating revenues are generally higher
HLBV Hypothetical liquidation at book value
IBEW International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers
IGCC Integrated coal gasification combined cycle, the technology originally approved for Mississippi
Power's Kemper County energy facility (Plant Ratcliffe)
IIC Intercompany Interchange Contract
Illinois Commission Illinois Commerce Commission
Internal Revenue Code Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended
IPP Independent power producer
IRP Integrated resource plan
IRS Internal Revenue Service
ITAAC Inspections, Tests, Analyses, and Acceptance Criteria, standards established by the NRC
ITC Investment tax credit
JEA Jacksonville Electric Authority
KW Kilowatt
KWH Kilowatt-hour
LIBOR London Interbank Offered Rate
LIFO Last-in, first-out
LNG Liquefied natural gas
LOCOM Lower of weighted average cost or current market price
LTSA Long-term service agreement
Marketers Marketers selling retail natural gas in Georgia and certificated by the Georgia PSC
MEAG Power Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia
iii
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
(continued)
Term Meaning
Merger The merger, effective July 1, 2016, of a wholly-owned, direct subsidiary of Southern Company with
and into Southern Company Gas, with Southern Company Gas continuing as the surviving
corporation
MGP Manufactured gas plant
Mississippi Power Mississippi Power Company
mmBtu Million British thermal units
Moody's Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
MPUS Mississippi Public Utilities Staff
MRA Municipal and Rural Associations
MW Megawatt
MWH Megawatt hour
natural gas distribution
utilitiesSouthern Company Gas' natural gas distribution utilities (Nicor Gas, Atlanta Gas Light, Virginia
Natural Gas, Elizabethtown Gas, Florida City Gas, Chattanooga Gas, and Elkton Gas through June
30, 2018) (Nicor Gas, Atlanta Gas Light, Virginia Natural Gas, and Chattanooga Gas after July 29,
2018)
NCCR Georgia Power's Nuclear Construction Cost Recovery
NDR Alabama Power's Natural Disaster Reserve
NextEra Energy NextEra Energy, Inc.
Nicor Gas Northern Illinois Gas Company, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
NOX Nitrogen oxide
NRC U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission
NYMEX New York Mercantile Exchange, Inc.
NYSE New York Stock Exchange
OCI Other comprehensive income
OPC Oglethorpe Power Corporation (an Electric Membership Corporation)
OTC Over-the-counter
PennEast Pipeline PennEast Pipeline Company, LLC, a joint venture to construct and operate a natural gas pipeline in
which Southern Company Gas has a 20% ownership interest
PEP Mississippi Power's Performance Evaluation Plan
Pivotal Home Solutions Nicor Energy Services Company, until June 4, 2018 a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern
Company Gas, doing business as Pivotal Home Solutions
Pivotal LNG Pivotal LNG, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
Pivotal Utility Holdings Pivotal Utility Holdings, Inc., until July 29, 2018 a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company
Gas, doing business as Elizabethtown Gas (until July 1, 2018), Elkton Gas (until July 1, 2018), and
Florida City Gas (until July 29, 2018)
PowerSecure PowerSecure, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company
PowerSouth PowerSouth Energy Cooperative
PPA Power purchase agreements, as well as, for Southern Power, contracts for differences that provide
the owner of a renewable facility a certain fixed price for the electricity sold to the grid
PRP Pipeline Replacement Program, an Atlanta Gas Light infrastructure program through 2013
PSC Public Service Commission
PTC Production tax credit
Rate CNP Alabama Power's Rate Certificated New Plant, consisting of Rate CNP New Plant, Rate CNP
Compliance, and Rate CNP PPA
Rate ECR Alabama Power's Rate Energy Cost Recovery
Rate NDR Alabama Power's Rate Natural Disaster Reserve
Rate RSE Alabama Power's Rate Stabilization and Equalization
iv
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
(continued)
Term Meaning
Registrants Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company,
and Southern Company Gas
ROE Return on equity
RUS Rural Utilities Service
S&P S&P Global Ratings, a division of S&P Global Inc.
SCS Southern Company Services, Inc. (the Southern Company system service company and a wholly-
owned subsidiary of Southern Company)
SEC U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
SEGCO Southern Electric Generating Company, 50% owned by each of Alabama Power and Georgia Power
SEPA Southeastern Power Administration
Sequent Sequent Energy Management, L.P., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
SERC Southeastern Electric Reliability Corporation
SNG Southern Natural Gas Company, L.L.C., a pipeline system in which Southern Company Gas has a
50% ownership interest
SO2 Sulfur dioxide
Southern Company The Southern Company
Southern Company Gas Southern Company Gas and its subsidiaries
Southern Company Gas
Capital Southern Company Gas Capital Corporation, a 100%-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas
DispositionsSouthern Company Gas' disposition of Pivotal Home Solutions, Pivotal Utility Holdings' disposition
of Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, and NUI Corporation's disposition of Pivotal Utility
Holdings, which primarily consisted of Florida City Gas
Southern Company power
poolThe operating arrangement whereby the integrated generating resources of the traditional electric
operating companies and Southern Power (excluding subsidiaries) are subject to joint commitment
and dispatch in order to serve their combined load obligations
Southern Company system Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, Southern
Company Gas, SEGCO, Southern Nuclear, SCS, Southern Linc, PowerSecure, and other
subsidiaries
Southern Holdings Southern Company Holdings, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company
Southern Linc Southern Communications Services, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company, doing
business as Southern Linc
Southern Nuclear Southern Nuclear Operating Company, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company
Southern Power Southern Power Company and its subsidiaries
SouthStar SouthStar Energy Services, LLC, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
SP Solar SP Solar Holdings I, LP, a limited partnership indirectly owning substantially all of Southern
Power's solar facilities, in which Southern Power has a 67% ownership interest
SP Wind SP Wind Holdings II, LLC, a holding company owning a portfolio of eight operating wind facilities,
in which Southern Power is the controlling partner in a tax equity arrangement
SRR Mississippi Power's System Restoration Rider, a tariff for retail property damage reserve
Subsidiary Registrants Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas
Tax Reform Legislation The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, which became effective on January 1, 2018
Toshiba Toshiba Corporation, the parent company of Westinghouse
Toshiba Guarantee Certain payment obligations of the EPC Contractor guaranteed by Toshiba
traditional electric operating
companiesAlabama Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, and Mississippi Power through December 31, 2018;
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power as of January 1, 2019
Triton Triton Container Investments, LLC, an investment of Southern Company Gas through May 29, 2019
VCM Vogtle Construction Monitoring
v
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
(continued)
Term Meaning
VIE Variable interest entity
Virginia Commission Virginia State Corporation Commission
Virginia Natural Gas Virginia Natural Gas, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement Agreement entered into with the EPC Contractor in 2008 by Georgia Power, acting for itself and as
agent for the Vogtle Owners, and rejected in bankruptcy in July 2017, pursuant to which the EPC
Contractor agreed to design, engineer, procure, construct, and test Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
Vogtle Owners Georgia Power, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, MEAG Power, and Dalton
Vogtle Services AgreementThe June 2017 services agreement between the Vogtle Owners and the EPC Contractor, as amended
and restated in July 2017, for the EPC Contractor to transition construction management of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to Southern Nuclear and to provide ongoing design, engineering, and
procurement services to Southern Nuclear
WACOG Weighted average cost of gas
Westinghouse Westinghouse Electric Company LLC
Xcel Xcel Energy Inc.
vi
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
This Annual Report on Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements include, among other things,
statements concerning regulated rates, the strategic goals for the business, customer and sales growth, economic conditions, fuel
and environmental cost recovery and other rate actions, projected equity ratios, current and proposed environmental regulations and
related compliance plans and estimated expenditures, pending or potential litigation matters, access to sources of capital,
projections for the qualified pension plans, postretirement benefit plans, and nuclear decommissioning trust fund contributions,
financing activities, completion dates and costs of construction projects, matters related to the abandonment of the Kemper IGCC,
completion of announced acquisitions and dispositions, filings with state and federal regulatory authorities, federal and state
income tax benefits, estimated sales and purchases under power sale and purchase agreements, and estimated construction plans
and expenditures. In some cases, forward-looking statements can be identified by terminology such as "may," "will," "could,"
"would," "should," "expects," "plans," "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "projects," "predicts," "potential," or "continue" or the
negative of these terms or other similar terminology. There are various factors that could cause actual results to differ materially
from those suggested by the forward-looking statements; accordingly, there can be no assurance that such indicated results will be
realized. These factors include:
• the impact of recent and future federal and state regulatory changes, including tax, environmental, and other laws and
regulations to which Southern Company and its subsidiaries are subject, as well as changes in application of existing laws
and regulations;
• the extent and timing of costs and legal requirements related to CCR;
• current and future litigation or regulatory investigations, proceedings, or inquiries, including litigation and other disputes
related to the Kemper County energy facility;
• the effects, extent, and timing of the entry of additional competition in the markets in which Southern Company's
subsidiaries operate, including from the development and deployment of alternative energy sources;
• variations in demand for electricity and natural gas;
• available sources and costs of natural gas and other fuels;
• the ability to complete necessary or desirable pipeline expansion or infrastructure projects, limits on pipeline capacity, and
operational interruptions to natural gas distribution and transmission activities;
• transmission constraints;
• effects of inflation;
• the ability to control costs and avoid cost and schedule overruns during the development, construction, and operation of
facilities or other projects, including Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which includes components based on new technology that
only within the last few years began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale, and including changes in
labor costs, availability, and productivity; challenges with management of contractors or vendors; subcontractor
performance; adverse weather conditions; shortages, delays, increased costs, or inconsistent quality of equipment, materials,
and labor; contractor or supplier delay; delays due to judicial or regulatory action; nonperformance under construction,
operating, or other agreements; operational readiness, including specialized operator training and required site safety
programs; engineering or design problems; design and other licensing-based compliance matters, including, for nuclear
units, the timely submittal by Southern Nuclear of the ITAAC documentation for each unit and the related reviews and
approvals by the NRC necessary to support NRC authorization to load fuel; challenges with start-up activities, including
major equipment failure, system integration, or regional transmission upgrades; and/or operational performance;
• the ability to overcome or mitigate the current challenges at Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, as described in Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein, that could impact the cost and schedule
for the project;
• legal proceedings and regulatory approvals and actions related to construction projects, such as Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
and pipeline projects, including PSC approvals and FERC and NRC actions;
• under certain specified circumstances, a decision by holders of more than 10% of the ownership interests of Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 not to proceed with construction and the ability of other Vogtle Owners to tender a portion of their ownership
interests to Georgia Power following certain construction cost increases;
• in the event Georgia Power becomes obligated to provide funding to MEAG Power with respect to the portion of MEAG
Power's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 involving JEA, any inability of Georgia Power to receive repayment
of such funding;
vii
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
(continued)
• the ability to construct facilities in accordance with the requirements of permits and licenses (including satisfaction of NRC
requirements), to satisfy any environmental performance standards and the requirements of tax credits and other incentives,
and to integrate facilities into the Southern Company system upon completion of construction;
• investment performance of the employee and retiree benefit plans and nuclear decommissioning trust funds;
• advances in technology;
• performance of counterparties under ongoing renewable energy partnerships and development agreements;
• state and federal rate regulations and the impact of pending and future rate cases and negotiations, including rate actions
relating to ROE, equity ratios, additional generating capacity, and fuel and other cost recovery mechanisms;
• the ability to successfully operate the electric utilities' generating, transmission, and distribution facilities and Southern
Company Gas' natural gas distribution and storage facilities and the successful performance of necessary corporate
functions;
• the inherent risks involved in operating and constructing nuclear generating facilities;
• the inherent risks involved in transporting and storing natural gas;
• the performance of projects undertaken by the non-utility businesses and the success of efforts to invest in and develop new
opportunities;
• internal restructuring or other restructuring options that may be pursued;
• potential business strategies, including acquisitions or dispositions of assets or businesses, including the pending disposition
by Southern Company Gas of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline, which cannot be assured to be
completed or beneficial to Southern Company or its subsidiaries;
• the ability of counterparties of Southern Company and its subsidiaries to make payments as and when due and to perform as
required;
• the ability to obtain new short- and long-term contracts with wholesale customers;
• the direct or indirect effect on the Southern Company system's business resulting from cyber intrusion or physical attack and
the threat of physical attacks;
• interest rate fluctuations and financial market conditions and the results of financing efforts;
• access to capital markets and other financing sources;
• changes in Southern Company's and any of its subsidiaries' credit ratings;
• changes in the method of determining LIBOR or the replacement of LIBOR with an alternative reference rate;
• the ability of Southern Company's electric utilities to obtain additional generating capacity (or sell excess generating
capacity) at competitive prices;
• catastrophic events such as fires, earthquakes, explosions, floods, tornadoes, hurricanes and other storms, droughts,
pandemic health events, or other similar occurrences;
• the direct or indirect effects on the Southern Company system's business resulting from incidents affecting the U.S. electric
grid, natural gas pipeline infrastructure, or operation of generating or storage resources;
• impairments of goodwill or long-lived assets;
• the effect of accounting pronouncements issued periodically by standard-setting bodies; and
• other factors discussed elsewhere herein and in other reports filed by the Registrants from time to time with the SEC.
The Registrants expressly disclaim any obligation to update any forward-looking statements.
viii
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
PART I
Item 1.BUSINESS
Southern Company was incorporated under the laws of Delaware on November 9, 1945. Southern Company owns all of the
outstanding common stock of Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power, each of which is an operating public utility
company. These traditional electric operating companies supply electric service in the states of Alabama, Georgia, and Mississippi.
More particular information relating to each of the traditional electric operating companies is as follows:
Alabama Power is a corporation organized under the laws of the State of Alabama on November 10, 1927, by the consolidation
of a predecessor Alabama Power Company, Gulf Electric Company, and Houston Power Company. The predecessor Alabama
Power Company had been in continuous existence since its incorporation in 1906.
Georgia Power was incorporated under the laws of the State of Georgia on June 26, 1930.
Mississippi Power was incorporated under the laws of the State of Mississippi on July 12, 1972 and effective December 21,
1972, by the merger into it of the predecessor Mississippi Power Company, succeeded to the business and properties of the latter
company. The predecessor Mississippi Power Company was incorporated under the laws of the State of Maine on November 24,
1924.
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed its sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy for an aggregate cash purchase price
of approximately $5.8 billion (less $1.3 billion of indebtedness assumed). Gulf Power is an electric utility serving retail customers
in the northwestern portion of Florida. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company" in Item 8 herein for
additional information.
In addition, Southern Company owns all of the common stock of Southern Power Company, which is also an operating public
utility company. The term "Southern Power" when used herein refers to Southern Power Company and its subsidiaries, while the
term "Southern Power Company" when used herein refers only to the Southern Power parent company. Southern Power develops,
constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including renewable energy projects, and sells electricity at
market-based rates in the wholesale market. Southern Power Company is a corporation organized under the laws of Delaware on
January 8, 2001. See "The Southern Company System – Southern Power" herein and Note 15 to the financial statements in Item 8
herein for additional information, including Southern Power's recent acquisitions and dispositions.
Southern Company acquired all of the common stock of Southern Company Gas in July 2016. Southern Company Gas is an energy
services holding company whose primary business is the distribution of natural gas in four states - Illinois, Georgia, Virginia, and
Tennessee - through the natural gas distribution utilities. Southern Company Gas is also involved in several other businesses that
are complementary to the distribution of natural gas. Southern Company Gas was incorporated under the laws of the State of
Georgia on November 27, 1995 for the primary purpose of becoming the holding company for Atlanta Gas Light, which was
founded in 1856. See "The Southern Company System – Southern Company Gas" herein and Note 15 to the financial statements in
Item 8 herein for additional information, including Southern Company Gas' recent and pending dispositions.
Southern Company also owns all of the outstanding common stock or membership interests of SCS, Southern Linc, Southern
Holdings, Southern Nuclear, PowerSecure, and other direct and indirect subsidiaries. SCS, the system service company, has
contracted with Southern Company, each traditional electric operating company, Southern Power, Southern Company Gas,
Southern Nuclear, SEGCO, and other subsidiaries to furnish, at direct or allocated cost and upon request, the following services:
general executive and advisory, general and design engineering, operations, purchasing, accounting, finance, treasury, legal, tax,
information technology, marketing, auditing, insurance and pension administration, human resources, systems and procedures,
digital wireless communications, cellular tower space, and other services with respect to business and operations, construction
management, and Southern Company power pool transactions. Southern Linc provides digital wireless communications for use by
Southern Company and its subsidiary companies and also markets these services to the public and provides fiber optics services
within the Southeast. Southern Holdings is an intermediate holding company subsidiary, primarily for Southern Company's
leveraged lease and other investments. Southern Nuclear operates and provides services to the Southern Company system's nuclear
power plants and is currently managing construction of and developing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which are co-owned by Georgia
Power. PowerSecure provides energy solutions to electric utilities and their customers in the areas of distributed generation, energy
storage and renewables, and energy efficiency.
Segment information for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas is included in Note 16 to the financial statements in Item
8 herein.
The Registrants' Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, and any
amendments to those reports are made available on Southern Company's website, free of charge, as soon as reasonably
I-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
practicable after such material is electronically filed with or furnished to the SEC. Southern Company's internet address is
www.southerncompany.com.
The Southern Company System
Traditional Electric Operating Companies
The traditional electric operating companies are vertically integrated utilities that own generation, transmission, and distribution
facilities. See PROPERTIES in Item 2 herein for additional information on the traditional electric operating companies' generating
facilities. Each company's transmission facilities are connected to the respective company's own generating plants and other sources
of power (including certain generating plants owned by Southern Power) and are interconnected with the transmission facilities of
the other traditional electric operating companies and SEGCO. For information on the State of Georgia's integrated transmission
system, see "Territory Served by the Southern Company System – Traditional Electric Operating Companies and Southern Power"
herein.
Agreements in effect with principal neighboring utility systems provide for capacity and energy transactions that may be entered
into from time to time for reasons related to reliability or economics. Additionally, the traditional electric operating companies have
entered into various reliability agreements with certain neighboring utilities, each of which provides for the establishment and
periodic review of principles and procedures for planning and operation of generation and transmission facilities, maintenance
schedules, load retention programs, emergency operations, and other matters affecting the reliability of bulk power supply. The
traditional electric operating companies have joined with other utilities in the Southeast to form the SERC to augment further the
reliability and adequacy of bulk power supply. Through the SERC, the traditional electric operating companies are represented at
the North American Electric Reliability Corporation.
The utility assets of the traditional electric operating companies and certain utility assets of Southern Power Company are operated
as a single integrated electric system, or Southern Company power pool, pursuant to the IIC. Activities under the IIC are
administered by SCS, which acts as agent for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power Company. The
fundamental purpose of the Southern Company power pool is to provide for the coordinated operation of the electric facilities in an
effort to achieve the maximum possible economies consistent with the highest practicable reliability of service. Subject to service
requirements and other operating limitations, system resources are committed and controlled through the application of centralized
economic dispatch. Under the IIC, each traditional electric operating company and Southern Power Company retains its lowest cost
energy resources for the benefit of its own customers and delivers any excess energy to the Southern Company power pool for use
in serving customers of other traditional electric operating companies or Southern Power Company or for sale by the Southern
Company power pool to third parties. The IIC provides for the recovery of specified costs associated with the affiliated operations
thereunder, as well as the proportionate sharing of costs and revenues resulting from Southern Company power pool transactions
with third parties. In connection with the sale of Gulf Power, an appendix was added to the IIC setting forth terms and conditions
governing Gulf Power's continued participation in the IIC for a defined transition period that, subject to certain potential
adjustments, is scheduled to end on January 1, 2024.
Southern Power and Southern Linc have secured from the traditional electric operating companies certain services which are
furnished in compliance with FERC regulations.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power each have agreements with Southern Nuclear to operate the Southern Company system's
existing nuclear plants, Plants Farley, Hatch, and Vogtle. In addition, Georgia Power has an agreement with Southern Nuclear to
develop, license, construct, and operate Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See "Regulation – Nuclear Regulation" herein for additional
information.
Southern Power
Southern Power develops, constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including renewable energy projects,
and sells electricity at market-based rates (under authority from the FERC) in the wholesale market. Southern Power seeks
opportunities to execute its strategy to create value through various transactions including acquisitions, dispositions, and sales of
partnership interests, development and construction of new generating facilities, and entry into PPAs primarily with investor-owned
utilities, IPPs, municipalities, electric cooperatives, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial customers.
Southern Power's business activities are not subject to traditional state regulation like the traditional electric operating companies,
but the majority of its business activities are subject to regulation by the FERC. Southern Power has attempted to insulate itself
from significant fuel supply, fuel transportation, and electric transmission risks by generally making such risks the responsibility of
the counterparties to its PPAs. However, Southern Power's future earnings will depend on the parameters of the wholesale market
and the efficient operation of its wholesale generating assets, as well as Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy and
to develop and construct generating facilities. For additional information on
I-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Southern Power's business activities, see MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – OVERVIEW – "Business
Activities" in Item 7 herein.
Southern Power Company directly owns and manages generation assets primarily in the Southeast, which are included in the
Southern Company power pool, and has various subsidiaries, which were created to own and operate natural gas and renewable
generation facilities either wholly or in partnership with various third parties. At December 31, 2019, Southern Power's generation
fleet, which is owned in part with various partners, totaled 11,527 MWs of nameplate capacity in commercial operation (including
4,147 MWs of nameplate capacity owned by its subsidiaries and excluding Plant Mankato, which was sold to a subsidiary of Xcel
on January 17, 2020). In addition, Southern Power Company has other subsidiaries that are pursuing additional natural gas
generation and other renewable generation development opportunities. The generation assets of Southern Power subsidiaries are not
included in the Southern Company power pool. See "Traditional Electric Operating Companies" herein for additional information
on the Southern Company power pool.
During 2019, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in a 115-MW biomass facility located in Nacogdoches
County, Texas to Austin Energy.
A majority of Southern Power's partnerships in renewable facilities allow for the sharing of cash distributions and tax benefits at
differing percentages, with Southern Power being the controlling member and thus consolidating the assets and operations of the
partnerships. At December 31, 2019, Southern Power has four tax-equity partnership arrangements where the tax-equity investors
receive substantially all of the tax benefits from the facilities, including ITCs and PTCs. In addition, Southern Power holds
controlling interests in eight partnerships in solar facilities through SP Solar. For seven of these solar partnerships, Southern Power
and its 33% partner, Global Atlantic, are entitled to 51% of all cash distributions and the respective partner that holds the Class B
membership interests is entitled to 49% of all cash distributions. For the Desert Stateline partnership, Southern Power and Global
Atlantic are entitled to 66% of all cash distributions and the Class B member is entitled to 34% of all cash distributions. In addition,
Southern Power and Global Atlantic are entitled to substantially all of the federal tax benefits with respect to these eight partnership
entities. Finally, for the Roserock partnership, Southern Power is entitled to 51% of all cash distributions and substantially all of the
federal tax benefits, with the Class B member entitled to 49% of all cash distributions.
See PROPERTIES in Item 2 herein and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" in Item 8 herein for additional
information regarding Southern Power's acquisitions, dispositions, construction, and development projects.
Southern Power calculates an investment coverage ratio for its generating assets, including those owned with various partners,
based on the ratio of investment under contract to total investment using the respective generation facilities' net book value (or
expected in-service value for facilities under construction) as the investment amount. With the inclusion of investments associated
with the wind facilities currently under construction, as well as other capacity and energy contracts, and excluding Plant Mankato,
which was sold on January 17, 2020, Southern Power's average investment coverage ratio at December 31, 2019 was 93% through
2024 and 90% through 2029, with an average remaining contract duration of approximately 14 years.
Southern Power's electricity sales from natural gas generating facilities are primarily through long-term PPAs that consist of two
types of agreements. The first type, referred to as a unit or block sale, is a customer purchase from a dedicated plant unit where all
or a portion of the generation from that unit is reserved for that customer. Southern Power typically has the ability to serve the unit
or block sale customer from an alternate resource. The second type, referred to as requirements service, provides that Southern
Power serves the customer's capacity and energy requirements from a combination of the customer's own generating units and from
Southern Power resources not dedicated to serve unit or block sales. Southern Power has rights to purchase power provided by the
requirements customers' resources when economically viable. Capacity charges that form part of the PPA payments are designed to
recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance costs based on dollars-per-kilowatt year and to provide a return on
investment.
Southern Power's electricity sales from solar and wind (renewable) generating facilities are also primarily through long-term PPAs;
however, these solar and wind PPAs do not have a capacity charge and customers either purchase the energy output of a dedicated
renewable facility through an energy charge or provide Southern Power a certain fixed price for the electricity sold to the grid. As a
result, Southern Power's ability to recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance expenses is dependent upon the level of
energy generated from these facilities, which can be impacted by weather conditions, equipment performance, transmission
constraints, and other factors. Generally, under the renewable generation PPAs, the purchasing party retains the right to keep or
resell the renewable energy credits.
I-3
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
The following tables set forth Southern Power's PPAs as of December 31, 2019:
Natural Gas Block Sales PPAs
Facility/Source Counterparty MWs(1) Contract Term
Addison Units 1 and 3 Georgia Power 297  through May 2030
Addison Unit 2 MEAG Power 149  through April 2029
Addison Unit 4 Georgia Energy Cooperative 146  through May 2030
Cleveland County Unit 1North Carolina EMC (NCEMC)180 through Dec. 2036
Cleveland County Unit 2 NCEMC 183  through Dec. 2036
Cleveland County Unit 3 North Carolina Municipal Power Agency 1 183  through Dec. 2031
Dahlberg Units 1, 3, and 5 Cobb EMC 224  through Dec. 2027
Dahlberg Units 2, 6, 8, and 10 Georgia Power 298  through May 2025
Dahlberg Units 7 and 9 Eleven EMCs in Georgia(2)65-132  Jan. 2025 - Dec 2034
Dahlberg Unit 4 Georgia Power 74  through May 2030
Franklin Unit 1 Duke Energy Florida 434  through May 2021
Franklin Unit 1 Century Aluminum 16  through Dec. 2020
Franklin Unit 2 Morgan Stanley Capital Group 250  through Dec. 2025
Franklin Unit 2 Jackson EMC 60-65  through Dec. 2035
Franklin Unit 2 GreyStone Power Corporation 35  through Dec. 2035
Franklin Unit 2 Cobb EMC 100  through Dec. 2027
Franklin Unit 3 Morgan Stanley Capital Group 200-300  through Dec. 2033
Franklin Unit 3 Dalton 70  through Dec. 2027
Harris Unit 1 Georgia Power(3)640  through May 2030
Harris Unit 2 AMEA(4)25  through Dec. 2025
Harris Unit 2 PowerSouth Energy Cooperative 200  June 2020 – Feb. 2023
Mankato(5)Northern States Power Company 375  through Jan 2020
Mankato(5)Northern States Power Company 345  through Jan 2020
NCEMC PPA(6)EnergyUnited 100  through Dec. 2021
Rowan CT Unit 1 North Carolina Municipal Power Agency 1 150  through Dec. 2030
Rowan CT Units 2 and 3 EnergyUnited 100  Jan. 2022 – Dec. 2023
Rowan CT Unit 3 EnergyUnited 113  through Dec. 2023
Rowan CC Unit 4 EnergyUnited 67-239  through Dec. 2025
Block Sales PPAs (continued)
Facility/Source Counterparty MWs(1) Contract Term
Rowan CC Unit 4 Macquarie 150  through Nov. 2020
Rowan CC Unit 4 Duke Energy Progress, LLC 228-415  Jan. 2020 – Dec. 2025
Wansley Unit 6 Dalton 30  Jan. 2020 – Dec. 2020
Wansley Unit 6 Century Aluminum 158  through Dec. 2020
Wansley Unit 6 Eleven EMCs in Georgia(2)133-375  Jan. 2025 - Dec. 2034
(1) The MWs and related facility units may change due to unit rating changes or assignment of units to contracts.
(2) PPA block sales to current requirement services PP A counterparties.
(3) Geor gia Power will be served by Plant Harris Unit 2 through May 2020.
(4) AMEA  will be served by Plant Franklin Unit 1 through May 2020.
(5) On January 17, 2020, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Mankato. See Note 15 to the financial statements
under " Southern Power  – Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants " in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(6) Represents sale of power purchased from NCEMC under a PP A.
I-4
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Natural Gas Requirements Services PPAs
Counterparty  MWs(1)Contract Term
Nine EMCs in Georgia  292-330 through Dec. 2024
Sawnee EMC  267-549 through Dec. 2027
Cobb EMC  0-61 through Dec. 2027
Flint EMC  138-158 through Dec. 2024
Dalton  45-73 through Dec. 2027
EnergyUnited  75-280 through Dec. 2025
City of Blountstown, Florida  10 through April 2022
(1) Represents forecasted incremental capacity needs over the contract term.
Fuel Cell PPAs
Facility/Source Counterparty  MWs(1)  Contract Term
Red Lion and Brookside (DSGP)Delmarva Power & Light  28  through Dec. 2034
(1) MWs shown are for 100% of the PP A, which is based on demonstrated capacity of the facility .
Battery Storage PPAs
Facility/Source Counterparty  MWs(1)  Contract Term
Milliken Southern California Edison Company  2  through Dec. 2026
(1) MWs shown are for 100% of the PP A, which is based on demonstrated capacity of the facility .
Solar/Wind PPAs
Facility Counterparty MWs(1)Contract Term
Solar(2) 
Adobe Southern California Edison Company 20through June 2034
Apex Nevada Power Company 20through Dec. 2037
Boulder 1 Nevada Power Company 100through Dec. 2036
Butler Georgia Power 100through Dec. 2046
Butler Solar Farm Georgia Power 20through Feb. 2036
Calipatria San Diego Gas & Electric Company 20through Feb. 2036
Campo Verde San Diego Gas & Electric Company 139through Oct. 2033
Cimarron Tri-State Generation and Transmission Association, Inc. 30through Dec. 2035
Decatur County Georgia Power 19through Dec. 2035
Decatur Parkway Georgia Power 80through Dec. 2040
Desert Stateline Southern California Edison Company 300through Sept. 2036
East Pecos Austin Energy 119through April 2032
Garland A Southern California Edison Company 20through Sept. 2036
Garland Southern California Edison Company 180through Oct. 2031
Gaskell West 1 Southern California Edison Company 20through March 2038
Granville Duke Energy Progress, LLC 3through Oct. 2032
Henrietta Pacific Gas & Electric Company(3)100through Sept. 2036
Imperial Valley San Diego Gas & Electric Company 150through Nov. 2039
Lamesa City of Garland, Texas 102through April 2032
Lost Hills Blackwell 99% to Pacific Gas & Electric Company(3) and 1% to City
of Roseville, California32through Dec. 2043
Macho Springs El Paso Electric Company 50through May 2034
Morelos Pacific Gas & Electric Company(3)15through Feb. 2036
I-5
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Solar/Wind PPAs (continued)
Facility Counterparty MWs(1)Contract Term
Solar(2)  
North Star Pacific Gas & Electric Company(3)60through June 2035
Pawpaw Georgia Power 30through March 2046
Roserock Austin Energy 157through Nov. 2036
Rutherford Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC 75through Dec. 2031
Sandhills Cobb EMC 111through Oct. 2041
Sandhills Flint EMC 15through Oct. 2041
Sandhills Sawnee EMC 15through Oct. 2041
Sandhills Middle Georgia and Irwin EMC 2through Oct. 2041
Spectrum Nevada Power Company 30through Dec. 2038
Tranquillity Southern California Edison Company 204through Nov. 2034
Wind(4)  
Bethel Google Inc. 225through Jan. 2029
Cactus Flats General Mills, Inc. 98through July 2033
Cactus Flats General Motors Company 50through July 2030
Grant Plains Oklahoma Municipal Power Authority 41through Dec. 2039
Grant Plains Steelcase Inc. 25through Dec. 2028
Grant Plains Allianz Risk Transfer (Bermuda) Ltd. 81-122through March 2027
Grant Wind East Texas Electric Cooperative 50through April 2036
Grant Wind Northeast Texas Electric Cooperative 50through April 2036
Grant Wind Western Farmers Electric Cooperative 50through April 2036
Kay Wind Westar Energy Inc. 200through Dec. 2035
Kay Wind Grand River Dam Authority 99through Dec. 2035
Passadumkeag Western Massachusetts Electric Company 40through June 2031
Reading(5)Royal Caribbean Cruises Ltd. 200April 2020 – March 2032
Salt Fork Wind City of Garland, Texas 150through Nov. 2030
Salt Fork Wind Salesforce.com, Inc. 24through Nov. 2028
Skookumchuck(5)Puget Sound Energy, Inc. 136second quarter 2020 – 2039
Tyler Bluff Wind The Proctor & Gamble Company 96through Dec. 2028
Wake Wind Equinix Enterprises, Inc. 100through Oct. 2028
Wake Wind Owens Corning 125through Oct. 2028
Wildhorse Mountain Arkansas Electric Cooperative Corporation 100through Sept. 2039
(1) MWs shown are for 100% of the PP A, which is based on demonstrated capacity of the facility .
(2) Southern Power owns a 67% equity interest in SP  Solar (a limited partnership indirectly owning all of Southern Power's solar facilities, except
the Roserock and Gaskell West facilities). SP  Solar is the 51% majority owner of Boulder 1, Garland, Henrietta, Imperial Valley , Lost Hills
Blackwell, North Star , and Tranquillity; the 66% majority owner of Desert Stateline; and the sole owner of the remaining SP  Solar facilities.
Southern Power is the 51% majority owner of Roserock and also the controlling partner in a tax equity partnership owning Gaskell West. All
of these entities are consolidated subsidiaries of Southern Power .
(3) See Note 1 to the financial statements under " Revenues  – Concentration of Revenue " in Item 8 herein for additional information on Pacific
Gas & Electric Company's bankruptcy filing.
(4) Southern Power is the controlling member in SP  Wind (a tax equity entity owning all of Southern Power's wind facilities, except Cactus Flats,
Wildhorse Mountain, and the two projects under construction, Reading and Skookumchuck). SP  Wind is the 90.1% majority owner of Wake
Wind and owns 100% of the remaining SP  Wind facilities. Southern Power owns 100% of Reading and Skookumchuck and is the controlling
partner in tax equity partnerships owning Cactus Flats and Wildhorse Mountain. All of these entities are consolidated subsidiaries of Southern
Power .
(5) Subject to commercial operation.
For the year ended December 31, 2019, approximately 9.0% of Southern Power's revenues were derived from Georgia Power.
Southern Power actively pursues replacement PPAs prior to the expiration of its current PPAs and anticipates that the revenues
attributable to one customer may be replaced by revenues from a new customer; however, the expiration of any of Southern
I-6
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Power's current PPAs without the successful remarketing of a replacement PPA could have a material negative impact on Southern
Power's earnings but is not expected to have a material impact on Southern Company's earnings.
Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas is an energy services holding company whose primary business is the distribution of natural gas through
the natural gas distribution utilities. Southern Company Gas is also involved in several other businesses that are complementary to
the distribution of natural gas, including gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services. Southern
Company Gas also has an "all other" non-reportable segment that includes segments below the quantitative threshold for separate
disclosure, including the storage and fuels operations, Pivotal LNG, and other subsidiaries that fall below the quantitative threshold
for separate disclosure. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline"
in Item 8 herein for information regarding Southern Company Gas' pending disposition of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic
Coast Pipeline.
Gas distribution operations, the largest segment of Southern Company Gas' business, operates, constructs, and maintains
approximately 75,585 miles of natural gas pipelines and 14 storage facilities, with total capacity of 157 Bcf, to provide natural gas
to residential, commercial, and industrial customers. Gas distribution operations serves approximately 4.3 million customers across
four states.
Gas pipeline investments primarily consists of joint ventures in natural gas pipeline investments including a 50% interest in SNG,
two significant pipeline construction projects, and a 50% joint ownership interest in the Dalton Pipeline. These natural gas pipelines
enable the provision of diverse sources of natural gas supplies to the customers of Southern Company Gas. SNG, the largest natural
gas pipeline investment, is the owner of a 7,000-mile pipeline connecting natural gas supply basins in Texas, Louisiana,
Mississippi, and Alabama to markets in Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, Florida, Georgia, South Carolina, and Tennessee. For
additional information on Southern Company Gas's pipeline projects, see MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS –
"Southern Company Gas – Pipeline Construction Projects" in Item 7 herein and Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed
Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline" in Item 8 herein.
Wholesale gas services consists of Sequent and engages in natural gas storage and gas pipeline arbitrage and provides natural gas
asset management and related logistical services to most of the natural gas distribution utilities as well as non-affiliate companies.
Gas marketing services is comprised of SouthStar, which serves approximately 631,000 natural gas commodity customers, markets
gas to residential, commercial, and industrial customers, and offers energy-related products that provide natural gas price stability
and utility bill management in competitive markets or markets that provide for customer choice.
Other Businesses
PowerSecure, which was acquired by Southern Company in 2016, provides energy solutions to electric utilities and their customers
in the areas of distributed generation, energy storage and renewables, and energy efficiency.
Southern Holdings is an intermediate holding subsidiary, primarily for Southern Company's leveraged lease and other investments.
Southern Linc provides digital wireless communications for use by Southern Company and its subsidiary companies and also
markets these services to the public. Southern Linc delivers multiple wireless communication options including push to talk,
cellular service, text messaging, wireless internet access, and wireless data. Its system covers approximately 127,000 square miles
in the Southeast. Southern Linc also provides fiber optics services within the Southeast through its subsidiary, Southern Telecom,
Inc.
I-7
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Construction Programs
The subsidiary companies of Southern Company are engaged in continuous construction programs to accommodate existing and
estimated future loads on their respective systems. For estimated construction and environmental expenditures for the periods 2020
through 2024, see MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY –
"Capital Requirements" and "Contractual Obligations" in Item 7 herein. The Southern Company system's construction program
consists of capital investment and capital expenditures to comply with environmental laws and regulations. In 2020, the
construction program is expected to be apportioned approximately as follows:
 Southern
Company
      system(a)(b)(c)Alabama Power(a)
(c)Georgia
Power(a)Mississippi Power
 (in billions)
New generation $ 2.3$ 0.5$ 1.8$ —
Environmental compliance(d)0.2 0.1 0.1 —
Generation maintenance 0.9 0.4 0.5 0.1
Transmission 1.0 0.4 0.5 0.1
Distribution 1.3 0.5 0.8 0.1
Nuclear fuel 0.3 0.1 0.2 —
General plant 0.6 0.3 0.3 —
 6.5 2.1 4.1 0.3
Southern Power(e)0.3
Southern Company Gas(f)1.8
Other subsidiaries 0.2
Total(a)$ 8.7$ 2.1$ 4.1$ 0.3
(a)Totals may not add due to rounding.
(b)Includes the Subsidiary Registrants, as well as the other subsidiaries. See "Other Businesses" herein for additional information.
(c)Includes approximately $0.5 billion contingent upon approval by the Alabama PSC related to Alabama Power's September 6, 2019 CCN filing. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Alabama Power – Petition for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity" in Item 7 herein for additional
information.
(d)Reflects cost estimates for environmental laws and regulations. These estimated expenditures do not include any potential compliance costs associated with
pending regulation of CO2 emissions from fossil fuel-fired electric generating units or costs associated with closure and monitoring of ash ponds and landfills
in accordance with the CCR Rule and the related state rules. See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
– "Environmental Matters" and FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements" and "Contractual Obligations" in Item 7 herein for
additional information.
(e)Does not include approximately $0.5 billion for planned expenditures for plant acquisitions and placeholder growth, which may vary materially due to market
opportunities and Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy.
(f)Includes costs for ongoing capital projects associated with infrastructure improvement programs for certain natural gas distribution utilities that have been
previously approved by their applicable state regulatory agencies. See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS
POTENTIAL – "Construction Programs – Southern Company Gas" in Item 7 herein for additional information.
The construction programs are subject to periodic review and revision, and actual construction costs may vary from these estimates
because of numerous factors. These factors include: changes in business conditions; changes in load projections; changes in
environmental laws and regulations; the outcome of any legal challenges to environmental rules; changes in electric generating
plants, including unit retirements and replacements and adding or changing fuel sources at existing electric generating units, to
meet regulatory requirements; changes in FERC rules and regulations; state regulatory agency approvals; changes in the expected
environmental compliance program; changes in legislation; the cost and efficiency of construction labor, equipment, and materials;
project scope and design changes; abnormal weather; delays in construction due to judicial or regulatory action; storm impacts; and
the cost of capital. In addition, there can be no assurance that costs related to capital expenditures will be fully recovered.
Additionally, Southern Power's planned expenditures for plant acquisitions may vary due to market opportunities and Southern
Power's ability to execute its growth strategy.
The construction program of Georgia Power also includes Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which includes components based on new
technology that only within the last few years began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale and which may be
subject to additional revised cost estimates during construction. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power –
Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein for additional information regarding Georgia Power's construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4.
I-8
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Also see MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters"
in Item 7 herein for additional information with respect to certain existing and proposed environmental requirements and
PROPERTIES – "Electric – Jointly-Owned Facilities" and – "Natural Gas – Jointly-Owned Properties" in Item 2 herein and Note 5
to the financial statements under "Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information concerning Alabama
Power's, Georgia Power's, and Mississippi Power's joint ownership of certain generating units and related facilities with certain
non-affiliated utilities and Southern Company Gas' joint ownership of a pipeline facility.
Financing Programs
See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY in Item 7 herein and
Note 8 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for information concerning financing programs.
Fuel Supply
Electric
The traditional electric operating companies' and SEGCO's supply of electricity is primarily fueled by natural gas and coal.
Southern Power's supply of electricity is primarily fueled by natural gas. See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS
– RESULTS OF OPERATION – "Southern Company – Electricity Business – Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses" and
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – RESULTS OF OPERATION under "Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses"
for each of the traditional electric operating companies in Item 7 herein for information regarding the electricity generated and the
average cost of fuel in cents per net KWH generated for the years 2018 and 2019.
The traditional electric operating companies have agreements in place from which they expect to receive substantially all of their
2020 coal burn requirements. These agreements have terms ranging between one and four years. Fuel procurement specifications,
emission allowances, environmental control systems, and fuel changes have allowed the traditional electric operating companies to
remain within limits set by applicable environmental regulations. As new environmental regulations are proposed that impact the
utilization of coal, the traditional electric operating companies' fuel mix will be monitored to help ensure that the traditional electric
operating companies remain in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Additionally, Southern Company and the
traditional electric operating companies will continue to evaluate the need to purchase additional emissions allowances, the timing
of capital expenditures for environmental control equipment, and potential unit retirements and replacements. See
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters" in Item 7
herein for additional information on environmental matters.
SCS, acting on behalf of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power Company, has agreements in place for the
natural gas burn requirements of the Southern Company system. For 2020, SCS has contracted for 530 Bcf of natural gas supply
under agreements with remaining terms up to 14 years. In addition to natural gas supply, SCS has contracts in place for both firm
natural gas transportation and storage. Management believes these contracts provide sufficient natural gas supplies, transportation,
and storage to ensure normal operations of the Southern Company system's natural gas generating units.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power have multiple contracts covering their nuclear fuel needs for uranium, conversion services,
enrichment services, and fuel fabrication with remaining terms ranging from one to 14 years. Management believes suppliers have
sufficient nuclear fuel production capability to permit the normal operation of the Southern Company system's nuclear generating
units.
Changes in fuel prices to the traditional electric operating companies are generally reflected in fuel adjustment clauses contained in
rate schedules. See "Rate Matters – Rate Structure and Cost Recovery Plans" herein for additional information. Southern Power's
natural gas PPAs generally provide that the counterparty is responsible for substantially all of the cost of fuel.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power have contracts with the United States, acting through the DOE, that provide for the permanent
disposal of spent nuclear fuel. The DOE failed to begin disposing of spent fuel in 1998, as required by the contracts, and Alabama
Power and Georgia Power have pursued and are pursuing legal remedies against the government for breach of contract. See Note 3
to the financial statements under "Nuclear Fuel Disposal Costs" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Natural Gas
Advances in natural gas drilling in shale producing regions of the United States have resulted in historically high supplies of natural
gas and low prices for natural gas. Procurement plans for natural gas supply and transportation to serve regulated utility customers
are reviewed and approved by the regulatory agencies in the states where Southern Company Gas operates. Southern Company Gas
purchases natural gas supplies in the open market by contracting with producers and marketers and, for the natural gas distribution
utilities except Nicor Gas, from its wholly-owned subsidiary, Sequent, under asset management agreements approved by the
applicable state regulatory agency. Southern Company Gas also contracts for transportation and
I-9
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
storage services from interstate pipelines that are regulated by the FERC. When firm pipeline services are temporarily not needed,
Southern Company Gas may release the services in the secondary market under FERC-approved capacity release provisions or
utilize asset management arrangements, thereby reducing the net cost of natural gas charged to customers for most of the natural
gas distribution utilities. Peak-use requirements are met through utilization of company-owned storage facilities, pipeline
transportation capacity, purchased storage services, peaking facilities, and other supply sources, arranged by either transportation
customers or Southern Company Gas.
Territory Served by the Southern Company System
Traditional Electric Operating Companies and Southern Power
The territory in which the traditional electric operating companies provide retail electric service comprises most of the states of
Alabama and Georgia, together with southeastern Mississippi. In this territory there are non-affiliated electric distribution systems
that obtain some or all of their power requirements either directly or indirectly from the traditional electric operating companies. As
of December 31, 2019, the territory had an area of approximately 116,000 square miles and an estimated population of
approximately 16 million. Southern Power sells wholesale electricity at market-based rates across various U.S. utility markets,
primarily to investor-owned utilities, IPPs, municipalities, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial
customers.
Alabama Power is engaged, within the State of Alabama, in the generation, transmission, distribution, and purchase of electricity
and the sale of electric service, at retail in approximately 400 cities and towns (including Anniston, Birmingham, Gadsden, Mobile,
Montgomery, and Tuscaloosa), as well as in rural areas, and at wholesale to 11 municipally-owned electric distribution systems, all
of which are served indirectly through sales to AMEA, and two rural distributing cooperative associations. The sales contract with
AMEA is scheduled to expire on December 31, 2025. Alabama Power owns coal reserves near its Plant Gorgas site and uses the
output of coal from the reserves in its generating plants. In addition, Alabama Power sells, and cooperates with dealers in
promoting the sale of, electric appliances and products and also markets and sells outdoor lighting services.
Georgia Power is engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution, and purchase of electricity and the sale of electric service
within the State of Georgia, at retail in over 530 cities and towns (including Athens, Atlanta, Augusta, Columbus, Macon, Rome,
and Savannah), as well as in rural areas, and at wholesale to OPC, MEAG Power, Dalton, various EMCs, and non-affiliated
utilities. Georgia Power also markets and sells outdoor lighting services and other customer-focused utility services.
Mississippi Power is engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution, and purchase of electricity and the sale of electric
service within 23 counties in southeastern Mississippi, at retail in 123 communities (including Biloxi, Gulfport, Hattiesburg,
Laurel, Meridian, and Pascagoula), as well as in rural areas, and at wholesale to one municipality, six rural electric distribution
cooperative associations, and one generating and transmitting cooperative.
For information relating to KWH sales by customer classification for the traditional electric operating companies, see
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – RESULTS OF OPERATIONS in Item 7 herein. For information relating to
the number of retail customers served by customer classification for the traditional electric operating companies, see SELECTED
FINANCIAL DATA of Southern Company and each traditional electric operating company in Item 6 herein. Also, for information
relating to the sources of revenues for Southern Company, each traditional electric operating company, and Southern Power, see
Item 7 herein and Note 1 to the financial statements under "Revenues – Traditional Electric Operating Companies" and " –
Southern Power" and Note 4 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein.
As of December 31, 2019, there were approximately 62 electric cooperative distribution systems operating in the territories in
which the traditional electric operating companies provide electric service at retail or wholesale.
One of these organizations, PowerSouth, is a generating and transmitting cooperative selling power to several distributing
cooperatives, municipal systems, and other customers in south Alabama. As of December 31, 2019, PowerSouth owned generating
units with approximately 2,100 MWs of nameplate capacity, including an undivided 8.16% ownership interest in Alabama Power's
Plant Miller Units 1 and 2. See PROPERTIES – "Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein and Note 5 to the financial statements
under "Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for details of Alabama Power's joint-ownership with PowerSouth of a portion
of Plant Miller. Alabama Power has system supply agreements with PowerSouth to provide 200 MWs of year-round capacity
service through January 31, 2024 and 200 MWs of winter-only capacity service through December 31, 2023. In August 2019,
Alabama Power agreed to provide PowerSouth an additional 100 MWs of year-round capacity service from November 1, 2020
through February 28, 2023, with the option to extend through May 31, 2023.
Alabama Power has entered into a separate agreement with PowerSouth involving interconnection between their systems. The
delivery of capacity and energy from PowerSouth to certain distributing cooperatives in the service territory of Alabama Power is
governed by the Southern Company/PowerSouth Network Transmission Service Agreement. The rates for this service to
PowerSouth are on file with the FERC.
I-10
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
OPC is an EMC owned by its 38 retail electric distribution cooperatives, which provide retail electric service to customers in
Georgia. OPC provides wholesale electric power to its members through its generation assets, some of which are jointly owned
with Georgia Power, and power purchased from other suppliers. OPC and the 38 retail electric distribution cooperatives are
members of Georgia Transmission Corporation, an EMC (GTC), which provides transmission services to its members and third
parties. See PROPERTIES – "Electric – Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein and Note 5 to the financial statements under
"Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information regarding Georgia Power's jointly-owned facilities.
Mississippi Power has an interchange agreement with Cooperative Energy, a generating and transmitting cooperative, pursuant to
which various services are provided.
As of December 31, 2019, there were approximately 72 municipally-owned electric distribution systems operating in the territory
in which the traditional electric operating companies provide electric service at retail or wholesale.
As of December 31, 2019, 48 municipally-owned electric distribution systems and one county-owned system received their
requirements through MEAG Power, which was established by a Georgia state statute in 1975. MEAG Power serves these
requirements from self-owned generation facilities, some of which are jointly-owned with Georgia Power, and purchases from
other resources. MEAG Power also has a pseudo scheduling and services agreement with Georgia Power. Dalton serves its
requirements from self-owned generation facilities, some of which are jointly-owned with Georgia Power, and through purchases
from Southern Power through a service agreement. See PROPERTIES – "Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein and Note 5 to
the financial statements under "Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Georgia Power has entered into substantially similar agreements with GTC, MEAG Power, and Dalton providing for the
establishment of an integrated transmission system to carry the power and energy of all parties. The agreements require an
investment by each party in the integrated transmission system in proportion to its respective share of the aggregate system load.
See PROPERTIES – "Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein for additional information.
Southern Power has PPAs with Georgia Power, investor-owned utilities, IPPs, municipalities, electric cooperatives, and other load-
serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial customers. See "The Southern Company System – Southern Power" herein
and MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Southern Power's Power Sales
Agreements" in Item 7 herein for additional information.
SCS, acting on behalf of the traditional electric operating companies, also has a contract with SEPA providing for the use of the
traditional electric operating companies' facilities at government expense to deliver to certain cooperatives and municipalities,
entitled by federal statute to preference in the purchase of power from SEPA, quantities of power equivalent to the amounts of
power allocated to them by SEPA from certain U.S. government hydroelectric projects.
Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas is engaged in the distribution of natural gas in four states through the natural gas distribution utilities. The
natural gas distribution utilities construct, manage, and maintain intrastate natural gas pipelines and distribution facilities. Details of
the natural gas distribution utilities at December 31, 2019 are as follows:
Utility State Number of customers Approximate miles of pipe
(in thousands)
Nicor Gas Illinois 2,245 34,346
Atlanta Gas Light Georgia 1,661 33,844
Virginia Natural Gas Virginia 303 5,719
Chattanooga Gas Tennessee 68 1,676
Total 4,277 75,585
For information relating to the sources of revenue for Southern Company Gas, see Item 7 herein and Note 1 to the financial
statements under "Revenues – Southern Company Gas" and Note 4 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein.
Competition
Electric
The electric utility industry in the U.S. is continuing to evolve as a result of regulatory and competitive factors. The competition for
retail energy sales among competing suppliers of energy is influenced by various factors, including price, availability, technological
advancements, service, and reliability. These factors are, in turn, affected by, among other influences, regulatory, political, and
environmental considerations, taxation, and supply.
I-11
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
The retail service rights of all electric suppliers in the State of Georgia are regulated by the Territorial Electric Service Act of 1973.
Pursuant to standards set forth in this Act, the Georgia PSC has assigned substantially all of the land area in the state to a supplier.
Notwithstanding such assignments, this Act provides that any new customer locating outside of 1973 municipal limits and having a
connected load of at least 900 KWs may exercise a one-time choice for the life of the premises to receive electric service from the
supplier of its choice.
Pursuant to the 1956 Utility Act, the Mississippi PSC issued "Grandfather Certificates" of public convenience and necessity to
Mississippi Power and to six distribution rural cooperatives operating in southeastern Mississippi, then served in whole or in part
by Mississippi Power, authorizing them to distribute electricity in certain specified geographically described areas of the state. The
six cooperatives serve approximately 325,000 retail customers in a certificated area of approximately 10,300 square miles. In areas
included in a "Grandfather Certificate," the utility holding such certificate may extend or maintain its electric system subject to
certain regulatory approvals; extensions of facilities by such utility, or extensions of facilities into that area by other utilities, may
not be made unless the Mississippi PSC grants a CPCN. Areas included in a CPCN that are subsequently annexed to municipalities
may continue to be served by the holder of the CPCN, irrespective of whether it has a franchise in the annexing municipality. On
the other hand, the holder of the municipal franchise may not extend service into such newly annexed area without authorization by
the Mississippi PSC.
Generally, the traditional electric operating companies have experienced, and expect to continue to experience, competition in their
respective retail service territories in varying degrees from the development and deployment of alternative energy sources such as
self-generation (as described below) and distributed generation technologies, as well as other factors.
Southern Power competes with investor-owned utilities, IPPs, and others for wholesale energy sales across various U.S. utility
markets. The needs of these markets are driven by the demands of end users and the generation available. Southern Power's success
in wholesale energy sales is influenced by various factors including reliability and availability of Southern Power's plants,
availability of transmission to serve the demand, price, and Southern Power's ability to contain costs.
As of December 31, 2019, Alabama Power had cogeneration contracts in effect with six industrial customers. Under the terms of
these contracts, Alabama Power purchases excess energy generated by such companies. During 2019, Alabama Power purchased
approximately 123 million KWHs from such companies at a cost of $3 million.
As of December 31, 2019, Georgia Power had contracts in effect to purchase generation from 33 small IPPs. During 2019, Georgia
Power purchased 2.7 billion KWHs from such companies at a cost of $176 million. Georgia Power also has PPAs for electricity
with six cogeneration facilities. Payments are subject to reductions for failure to meet minimum capacity output. During 2019,
Georgia Power purchased 390 million KWHs at a cost of $31 million from these facilities.
As of December 31, 2019, Mississippi Power had a cogeneration agreement in effect with one of its industrial customers. Under the
terms of this contract, Mississippi Power purchases any excess generation. During 2019, Mississippi Power did not make any such
purchases.
Natural Gas
Southern Company Gas' natural gas distribution utilities do not compete with other distributors of natural gas in their exclusive
franchise territories but face competition from other energy products. Their principal competitors are electric utilities and fuel oil
and propane providers serving the residential, commercial, and industrial markets in their service areas for customers who are
considering switching to or from a natural gas appliance.
Competition for heating as well as general household and small commercial energy needs generally occurs at the initial installation
phase when the customer or builder makes decisions as to which types of equipment to install. Customers generally use the chosen
energy source for the life of the equipment.
Customer demand for natural gas could be affected by numerous factors, including:
•changes in the availability or price of natural gas and other forms of energy;
•general economic conditions;
•energy conservation, including state-supported energy efficiency programs;
•legislation and regulations;
•the cost and capability to convert from natural gas to alternative energy products; and
•technological changes resulting in displacement or replacement of natural gas appliances.
The natural gas-related programs generally emphasize natural gas as the fuel of choice for customers and seek to expand the use of
natural gas through a variety of promotional activities. In addition, Southern Company Gas partners with third-party entities to
market the benefits of natural gas appliances.
The availability and affordability of natural gas have provided cost advantages and further opportunity for growth of the businesses.
I-12
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Seasonality
The demand for electric power and natural gas supply is affected by seasonal differences in the weather. While the electric power
sales of some electric utilities peak in the summer, others peak in the winter. In the aggregate, during normal weather conditions,
the Southern Company system's electric power sales peak during both the summer and winter. In most of the areas Southern
Company Gas serves, natural gas demand peaks during the winter. As a result, the overall operating results of the Registrants in the
future may fluctuate substantially on a seasonal basis. In addition, the Subsidiary Registrants have historically sold less power and
natural gas when weather conditions are milder.
Regulation
States
The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities are subject to the jurisdiction of their
respective state PSCs or applicable state regulatory agencies. These regulatory bodies have broad powers of supervision and
regulation over public utilities operating in the respective states, including their rates, service regulations, sales of securities (except
for the Mississippi PSC), and, in the cases of the Georgia PSC and the Mississippi PSC, in part, retail service territories. See
"Territory Served by the Southern Company System" and "Rate Matters" herein for additional information.
Federal Power Act
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power Company and certain of its generation subsidiaries, and SEGCO are
all public utilities engaged in wholesale sales of energy in interstate commerce and, therefore, are subject to the rate, financial, and
accounting jurisdiction of the FERC under the Federal Power Act. The FERC must approve certain financings and allows an "at
cost standard" for services rendered by system service companies such as SCS and Southern Nuclear. The FERC is also authorized
to establish regional reliability organizations which enforce reliability standards, address impediments to the construction of
transmission, and prohibit manipulative energy trading practices.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power are also subject to the provisions of the Federal Power Act or the earlier Federal Water Power
Act applicable to licensees with respect to their hydroelectric developments. As of December 31, 2019, among the hydroelectric
projects subject to licensing by the FERC are 14 existing Alabama Power generating stations having an aggregate installed capacity
of 1,670,000 KWs and 17 existing Georgia Power generating stations and one generating station partially owned by Georgia Power,
with a combined aggregate installed capacity of 1,101,402 KWs.
In 2013, the FERC issued a new 30-year license to Alabama Power for Alabama Power's seven hydroelectric developments on the
Coosa River (Weiss, Henry, Logan Martin, Lay, Mitchell, Jordan, and Bouldin). Alabama Power filed a petition requesting
rehearing of the FERC order granting the relicense seeking revisions to several conditions of the license. In 2016, the FERC issued
an order granting in part and denying in part Alabama Power's rehearing request. American Rivers and Alabama Rivers Alliance
also filed multiple appeals of the FERC's 2013 order for the new 30-year license and, in July 2018, the U.S. Court of Appeals for
the District of Columbia Circuit vacated the order and remanded the proceeding to the FERC. Alabama Power continues to operate
the Coosa River developments under annual licenses issued by the FERC. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
In 2019, Alabama Power continued the process of developing an application to relicense the Harris Dam project on the Tallapoosa
River, which is expected to be filed with the FERC by November 30, 2021. The current Harris Dam project license will expire on
November 30, 2023.
In May 2018, Georgia Power filed an application to relicense the Wallace Dam project on the Oconee River. The current Wallace
Dam project license will expire on June 1, 2020. In July 2018, Georgia Power filed a Notice of Intent to relicense the Lloyd Shoals
project on the Ocmulgee River. The application to relicense the Lloyd Shoals project is expected to be filed with the FERC by
December 31, 2021. The current Lloyd Shoals project license will expire on December 31, 2023. In December 2018, Georgia
Power filed applications to surrender the Langdale and Riverview hydroelectric projects on the Chattahoochee River upon their
license expirations on December 31, 2023. Both projects together represent 1,520 KWs of Georgia Power's hydro fleet capacity.
Georgia Power and OPC also have a license, expiring in 2026, for the Rocky Mountain project, a pure pumped storage facility of
903,000 KW installed capacity. See PROPERTIES – "Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein for additional information.
Licenses for all projects, excluding those discussed above, expire in the years 2034-2066 in the case of Alabama Power's projects
and in the years 2035-2044 in the case of Georgia Power's projects.
Upon or after the expiration of each license, the U.S. Government, by act of Congress, may take over the project or the FERC may
relicense the project either to the original licensee or to a new licensee. In the event of takeover or relicensing to another, the
original licensee is to be compensated in accordance with the provisions of the Federal Power Act, such compensation to
I-13
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
reflect the net investment of the licensee in the project, not in excess of the fair value of the property, plus reasonable damages to
other property of the licensee resulting from the severance therefrom of the property. The FERC may grant relicenses subject to
certain requirements that could result in additional costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Nuclear Regulation
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Southern Nuclear are subject to regulation by the NRC. The NRC is responsible for licensing
and regulating nuclear facilities and materials and for conducting research in support of the licensing and regulatory process, as
mandated by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended; the Energy Reorganization Act of 1974, as amended; and the Nuclear
Nonproliferation Act of 1978, as amended; and in accordance with the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, as amended,
and other applicable statutes. These responsibilities also include protecting public health and safety, protecting the environment,
protecting and safeguarding nuclear materials and nuclear power plants in the interest of national security, and assuring conformity
with antitrust laws.
The NRC licenses for Georgia Power's Plant Hatch Units 1 and 2 expire in 2034 and 2038, respectively. The NRC licenses for
Alabama Power's Plant Farley Units 1 and 2 expire in 2037 and 2041, respectively. The NRC licenses for Plant Vogtle Units 1 and
2 expire in 2047 and 2049, respectively.
In 2012, the NRC issued combined construction and operating licenses (COLs) for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Receipt of the COLs
allowed full construction to begin. See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS
POTENTIAL – "Construction Programs – Nuclear Construction" in Item 7 herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
See Notes 3 and 6 to the financial statements under "Nuclear Insurance" and "Nuclear Decommissioning," respectively, in Item 8
herein for information on nuclear insurance and nuclear decommissioning costs.
Environmental Laws and Regulations
See "Construction Programs" herein, MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
– "Environmental Matters" in Item 7 herein, and Note 3 to the financial statements under "Environmental Remediation" and Note 6
to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for information concerning environmental laws and regulations impacting the
Registrants.
Rate Matters
Rate Structure and Cost Recovery Plans
Electric
The rates and service regulations of the traditional electric operating companies are uniform for each class of service throughout
their respective retail service territories. Rates for residential electric service are generally of the block type based upon KWHs used
and include minimum charges. Residential and other rates contain separate customer charges. Rates for commercial service are
presently of the block type and, for large customers, the billing demand is generally used to determine capacity and minimum bill
charges. These large customers' rates are generally based upon usage by the customer and include rates with special features to
encourage off-peak usage. Additionally, Alabama Power and Mississippi Power are generally allowed by their respective state
PSCs to negotiate the terms and cost of service to large customers. Such terms and cost of service, however, are subject to final
state PSC approval.
The traditional electric operating companies recover certain costs through a variety of forward-looking, cost-based rate
mechanisms. Fuel and net purchased energy costs are recovered through specific fuel cost recovery provisions. These fuel cost
recovery provisions are adjusted to reflect increases or decreases in such costs as needed or on schedules as required by the
respective PSCs. Approved compliance, storm damage, and certain other costs are recovered at Alabama Power and Mississippi
Power through specific cost recovery mechanisms approved by their respective PSCs. Certain similar costs at Georgia Power are
recovered through various base rate tariffs as approved by the Georgia PSC. Costs not recovered through specific cost recovery
mechanisms are recovered at Alabama Power and Mississippi Power through annual, formulaic cost recovery proceedings and at
Georgia Power through periodic base rate proceedings.
See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters" in Item 7
herein and Note 2 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for a discussion of rate matters and certain cost recovery mechanisms.
Also, see "Integrated Resource Planning" herein for additional information.
I-14
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power Company and certain of its generation subsidiaries are authorized
by the FERC to sell power to non-affiliates, including short-term opportunity sales, at market-based prices. Specific FERC approval
must be obtained with respect to a market-based contract with an affiliate.
Mississippi Power serves long-term contracts with rural electric cooperative associations and municipalities located in southeastern
Mississippi under cost-based electric tariffs, which are subject to regulation by the FERC. The contracts with these wholesale
customers represented 15.7% of Mississippi Power's total operating revenues in 2019 and are generally subject to 10-year rolling
cancellation notices. Historically, these wholesale customers have acted as a group and any changes in contractual relationships for
one customer are likely to be followed by the other wholesale customers.
Natural Gas
Southern Company Gas' natural gas distribution utilities are subject to regulation and oversight by their respective state regulatory
agencies. Rates charged to these customers vary according to customer class (residential, commercial, or industrial) and rate
jurisdiction. These agencies approve rates designed to provide each natural gas distribution utility the opportunity to generate
revenues to recover all prudently-incurred costs, including a return on rate base sufficient to pay interest on debt, and provide a
reasonable return.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, which operates in a deregulated environment in which Marketers rather than a traditional
utility sell natural gas to end-use customers and earns revenue by charging rates to its customers based primarily on monthly fixed
charges that are set by the Georgia PSC, the earnings of the natural gas distribution utilities can be affected by customer
consumption patterns that are largely a function of weather conditions and price levels for natural gas.
The natural gas distribution utilities, excluding Atlanta Gas Light, are authorized to use natural gas cost recovery mechanisms that
adjust rates to reflect changes in the wholesale cost of natural gas and ensure recovery of all costs prudently incurred in purchasing
natural gas for customers. In addition to natural gas cost recovery mechanisms, the natural gas distribution utilities have other cost
recovery mechanisms, such as regulatory riders, which vary by utility but allow recovery of certain costs, such as those related to
infrastructure replacement programs as well as environmental remediation and energy efficiency plans.
See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters –
Southern Company Gas" in Item 7 herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" in Item 8 herein
for a discussion of rate matters and certain cost recovery mechanisms.
Integrated Resource Planning
Each of the traditional electric operating companies continually evaluates its electric generating resources in order to ensure that it
maintains a cost-effective and reliable mix of resources to meet the existing and future demand requirements of its customers. See
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters" in Item 7
herein for a discussion of existing and potential environmental regulations that may impact the future generating resource needs of
the traditional electric operating companies.
Alabama Power
Triennially, Alabama Power provides an IRP report to the Alabama PSC. This report overviews Alabama Power's resource planning
process and contains information that serves as the foundation for certain decisions affecting Alabama Power's portfolio of supply-
side and demand-side resources. The IRP report facilitates Alabama Power's ability to provide reliable and cost-effective electric
service to customers, while accounting for the risks and uncertainties inherent in planning for resources sufficient to meet expected
customer demand. Under State of Alabama law, a CCN must be obtained from the Alabama PSC before Alabama Power constructs
any new generating facility, unless such construction is deemed an ordinary extension in the usual course of business. See Note 2 to
the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Petition for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity" in Item 8 herein for
additional information.
Georgia Power
Triennially, Georgia Power must file an IRP with the Georgia PSC that specifies how it intends to meet the future electric service
needs of its customers through a combination of demand-side and supply-side resources. The Georgia PSC, under state law, must
certify any new demand-side or supply-side resources for Georgia Power to receive cost recovery. Once certified, the lesser of
actual or certified construction costs and purchased power costs is recoverable through rates. Certified costs may be excluded from
recovery only on the basis of fraud, concealment, failure to disclose a material fact, imprudence, or criminal misconduct. See Note
2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Rate Plans" and " – Integrated Resource Plan." Also see Note 2 under and
"Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein for additional information on the Georgia Nuclear Energy Financing Act
and the Georgia PSC certification of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which allow Georgia Power to recover certain financing costs for
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
I-15
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Mississippi Power
In November 2019, the Mississippi PSC established the Integrated Resource Planning and Reporting Rule (IRP Rule), which is
intended to allow electric utilities the flexibility to formulate long-term plans to best meet the needs of their customers through a
combination of demand-side and supply-side resources and considering transmission needs. The IRP Rule establishes reporting
requirements that include the filing of an IRP on a three-year cycle, with supply-side updates midway through the three-year cycle,
and an annual report on energy delivery improvements. The IRP filing is not intended to supplant or replace the Mississippi PSC's
existing regulatory processes for petition and approval of CCNs for new generating resources. Mississippi Power will file its first
triennial IRP in compliance with the IRP Rule in April 2021.
In February 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved a settlement agreement related to cost recovery for the Kemper County energy
facility, pursuant to which Mississippi Power filed a Reserve Margin Plan (RMP) in August 2018, which it updated on December
31, 2019. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time. For additional information, see Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Mississippi Power – Reserve Margin Plan" in Item 8 herein.
Employee Relations
The Southern Company system had a total of 27,943 employees on its payroll at December 31, 2019.
 Employees at
December 31, 2019
Alabama Power 6,324
Georgia Power 6,938
Mississippi Power 1,030
PowerSecure 910
SCS 3,697
Southern Company Gas 4,446
Southern Nuclear 3,940
Southern Power 460
Other 198
Total 27,943
The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities have separate agreements with local unions of
the IBEW and the Utilities Workers Union of America generally covering wages, working conditions, and procedures for handling
grievances and arbitration. These agreements apply with certain exceptions to operating, maintenance, and construction employees.
Alabama Power has agreements with the IBEW in effect through August 14, 2025. Upon notice given at least 60 days prior to that
date, negotiations may be initiated with respect to agreement terms to be effective after such date.
Georgia Power has an agreement with the IBEW covering wages and working conditions, which is in effect through June 30, 2021.
Mississippi Power has an agreement with the IBEW covering wages and working conditions, which is in effect through May 1,
2024.
Southern Nuclear has a five-year agreement with the IBEW covering certain employees at Plants Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1
and 2, which is in effect through June 30, 2021. A five-year agreement between Southern Nuclear and the IBEW representing
certain employees at Plant Farley is in effect through August 15, 2024. Upon notice given at least 60 days prior to that date,
negotiations may be initiated with respect to agreement terms to be effective after such date.
The agreements also make the terms of the pension plans for the companies discussed above subject to collective bargaining with
the unions at either a five-year or a 10-year cycle, depending upon union and company actions.
The natural gas distribution utilities have separate agreements with different local unions of the IBEW covering wages, benefits,
working conditions, and procedures for handling grievances and arbitration. Nicor Gas' agreement with the IBEW is effective
through February 29, 2020 and negotiations on a new agreement commenced on January 9, 2020. Virginia Natural Gas' agreement
with the IBEW is effective through May 15, 2020. Notice has been given to Virginia Natural Gas by the IBEW of their intent to
negotiate changes to the agreement prior to the expiration date. A new IBEW local union was certified at Atlanta Gas Light in April
2018 and negotiations for a new agreement are ongoing.
I-16
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Item 1A. RISK FACTORS
In addition to the other information in this Form 10-K, including MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS –
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL in Item 7, and other documents filed by Southern Company and/or its subsidiaries
with the SEC from time to time, the following factors should be carefully considered in evaluating Southern Company and
its subsidiaries. Such factors could affect actual results and cause results to differ materially from those expressed in any
forward-looking statements made by, or on behalf of, Southern Company and/or its subsidiaries.
UTILITY REGULATORY, LEGISLATIVE, AND LITIGATION RISKS
Southern Company and its subsidiaries are subject to substantial federal, state, and local governmental regulation,
including with respect to rates. Compliance with current and future regulatory requirements and procurement of necessary
approvals, permits, and certificates may result in substantial costs to Southern Company and its subsidiaries.
Laws and regulations govern the terms and conditions of the services the Southern Company system offers, protection of critical
electric infrastructure assets, transmission planning, reliability, pipeline safety, interaction with wholesale markets, and
relationships with affiliates, among other matters. The Registrants' businesses are subject to regulatory regimes which could result
in substantial monetary penalties if a Registrant is found to be noncompliant.
The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities seek to recover their costs, including
compliance costs (including a reasonable return on invested capital), through their retail rates, which must be approved by the
applicable state PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency. Such regulators, in a future rate proceeding, may alter the timing
or amount of certain costs for which recovery is allowed or modify the current authorized rate of return. Rate refunds may also be
required. Additionally, the rates charged to wholesale customers by the traditional electric operating companies and by Southern
Power and the rates charged to natural gas transportation customers by Southern Company Gas' pipeline investments and for some
of its storage assets must be approved by the FERC. These wholesale rates could be affected by changes to Southern Power's and
the traditional electric operating companies' ability to conduct business pursuant to FERC market-based rate authority.
A small percentage of transmission revenues are collected through wholesale electric tariffs but the majority are collected through
retail rates. FERC rules pertaining to regional transmission planning and cost allocation, which are intended to spur the
development of new transmission infrastructure to promote the integration of renewable resources as well as facilitate competition
in the wholesale market by providing more choices to wholesale customers, present challenges to transmission planning and the
wholesale market structure.
The impact of any future revision or changes in interpretations of existing regulations or the adoption of new laws and regulations
applicable to Southern Company or any of its subsidiaries is uncertain. Changes in regulation, the imposition of additional
regulations, changes in enforcement practices of regulators, or penalties imposed for noncompliance with existing laws or
regulations could influence the operating environment of Southern Company and its subsidiaries and may result in substantial costs
or otherwise negatively affect their results of operations.
The Southern Company system's costs of compliance with environmental laws and satisfying related AROs are significant
and could negatively impact the net income, cash flows, and financial condition of the Registrants.
The Southern Company system's operations are regulated by state and federal environmental agencies through a variety of laws and
regulations governing air, water, land, and other natural resources. Compliance with existing environmental requirements involves
significant capital and operating costs including the settlement of AROs, a major portion of which is expected to be recovered
through retail and wholesale rates. There is no assurance, however, that all such costs will be recovered. The Registrants expect
future compliance expenditures will continue to be significant.
The EPA has adopted and is implementing regulations governing air quality under the Clean Air Act and water quality under the
Clean Water Act, including regulations governing cooling water intake structures and effluent guidelines for steam electric
generating plants. The EPA has also adopted regulations governing the disposal of CCR, including coal ash and gypsum, in landfills
and surface impoundments at active generating power plants. The cost estimates for AROs related to the disposal of CCR are based
on information using various assumptions related to closure and post-closure costs, timing of future cash outlays, inflation and
discount rates, and the potential methods for complying with the CCR Rule. The traditional electric operating companies will
continue to periodically update their ARO cost estimates.
Additionally, environmental laws and regulations covering the handling and disposal of waste and release of hazardous substances
could require the Southern Company system to incur substantial costs to clean up affected sites, including certain current and
former operating sites, and locations subject to contractual obligations.
Litigation over environmental issues and claims of various types, including property damage, personal injury, and citizen
enforcement of environmental requirements has occurred throughout the U.S. This litigation has included claims for damages
I-17
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
alleged to have been caused by CO2 and other emissions, CCR, releases of regulated substances, and alleged exposure to regulated
substances, and/or requests for injunctive relief in connection with such matters.
Compliance with any new or revised environmental laws or regulations could affect many areas of operations for the Southern
Company system. The Southern Company system's ultimate environmental compliance strategy and future environmental
expenditures will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of requirements, the availability and cost of
any deployed control technology, fuel prices, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal challenges. Compliance costs may
result from the installation of additional environmental controls, closure and monitoring of CCR facilities, unit retirements, or
changing fuel sources for certain existing units, as well as related upgrades to the Southern Company system's transmission and
distribution (electric and natural gas) systems. Environmental compliance spending over the next several years may differ
materially from the amounts estimated and could affect results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition if such costs
cannot continue to be recovered on a timely basis. Further, increased costs that are recovered through regulated rates could
contribute to reduced demand for electricity and natural gas, which could negatively affect results of operations, cash flows, and/or
financial condition. Additionally, many commercial and industrial customers may also be affected by existing and future
environmental requirements, which for some may have the potential to affect their demand for electricity or natural gas.
The Southern Company system may be exposed to regulatory and financial risks related to the impact of GHG legislation,
regulation, and emission reduction goals.
Costs associated with GHG legislation, regulation, and emission reduction goals could be significant. Additional GHG policies,
including legislation, may emerge in the future requiring the United States to transition to a lower GHG emitting economy.
However, the ultimate impact will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of requirements, low
natural gas prices, the development, deployment, and advancement of relevant energy technologies, the ability to recover costs
through existing ratemaking provisions, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal challenges.
Because natural gas is a fossil fuel with lower carbon content relative to other fossil fuels, future GHG constraints, including, but
not limited to, the imposition of a carbon tax, may create additional demand for natural gas, both for production of electricity and
direct use in homes and businesses. Future GHG constraints designed to minimize emissions from natural gas could likewise result
in increased costs to the Southern Company system and affect the demand for natural gas as well as the prices charged to customers
and the competitive position of natural gas.
In April 2018, Southern Company established an intermediate goal of a 50% reduction in carbon emissions from 2007 levels by
2030 and a long-term goal of low- to no-carbon operations by 2050. The Southern Company system's ability to achieve these goals
depends on many external factors, including supportive national energy policies, low natural gas prices, and the development,
deployment, and advancement of relevant energy technologies. The Southern Company system expects to continue cost-effectively
growing its renewable energy portfolio, optimizing technology advancements to modernize its transmission and distribution
systems, increasing the use of natural gas for generation, completing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, investing in energy efficiency, and
continuing research and development efforts focused on technologies to lower GHG emissions. The Southern Company system is
also evaluating methods of removing carbon from the atmosphere.
See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters –
Global Climate Issues" in Item 7 herein for additional information.
OPERATIONAL RISKS
The financial performance of Southern Company and its subsidiaries may be adversely affected if the subsidiaries are
unable to successfully operate their facilities or perform certain corporate functions.
The financial performance of Southern Company and its subsidiaries depends on the successful operation of the electric generation,
transmission, and distribution facilities, natural gas distribution and storage facilities, and distributed generation storage
technologies and the successful performance of necessary corporate functions. There are many risks that could affect these
operations and performance of corporate functions, including operator error or failure of equipment or processes, accidents,
operating limitations that may be imposed by environmental or other regulatory requirements or in connection with joint owner
arrangements, labor disputes, physical attacks, fuel or material supply interruptions and/or shortages, transmission disruption or
capacity constraints, including with respect to the Southern Company system's and third parties' transmission, storage, and
transportation facilities, compliance with mandatory reliability standards, including mandatory cyber security standards,
implementation of new technologies, information technology (IT) system failures, cyber intrusions, environmental events, such as
spills or releases, and catastrophic events such as fires, earthquakes, explosions, floods, tornadoes, hurricanes and other storms,
droughts, pandemic health events, or other similar occurrences.
I-18
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
A decrease or elimination of revenues from the electric generation, transmission, or distribution facilities or natural gas distribution
or storage facilities or an increase in the cost of operating the facilities would reduce the net income and cash flows and could
adversely impact the financial condition of the affected Registrant.
Operation of nuclear facilities involves inherent risks, including environmental, safety, health, regulatory, natural disasters,
cyber intrusions or physical attacks, and financial risks, that could result in fines or the closure of the nuclear units owned
by Alabama Power or Georgia Power and which may present potential exposures in excess of insurance coverage.
Alabama Power owns, and contracts for the operation of, two nuclear units and Georgia Power holds undivided interests in, and
contracts for the operation of, four existing nuclear units. The six existing units are operated by Southern Nuclear and represented
approximately 25% and 26% of the total KWHs generated by Alabama Power and Georgia Power, respectively, in the year ended
December 31, 2019. In addition, Southern Nuclear, on behalf of Georgia Power and the other Vogtle Owners, is managing the
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Nuclear facilities are subject to environmental, safety, health, operational, and financial
risks such as:
•the potential harmful effects on the environment and human health and safety resulting from a release of radioactive
materials;
•uncertainties with respect to the ability to dispose of spent nuclear fuel and the need for longer term on-site storage;
•uncertainties with respect to the technological and financial aspects of decommissioning nuclear plants at the end of
licensed lives and the ability to maintain and anticipate adequate capital reserves for decommissioning;
•limitations on the amounts and types of insurance commercially available to cover losses that might arise in connection
with any nuclear operations; and
•significant capital expenditures relating to maintenance, operation, security, and repair of these facilities.
Damages, decommissioning, or other costs could exceed the amount of decommissioning trusts or external insurance coverage,
including statutorily required nuclear incident insurance.
The NRC has broad authority under federal law to impose licensing and safety-related requirements for the operation of nuclear
facilities. In the event of non-compliance, the NRC has the authority to impose fines and/or shut down any unit, depending upon its
assessment of the severity of the situation, until compliance is achieved. NRC orders or regulations related to increased security
measures and any future NRC safety requirements could require Alabama Power and Georgia Power to make substantial operating
and capital expenditures at their nuclear plants. In addition, if a serious nuclear incident were to occur, it could result in substantial
costs to Alabama Power or Georgia Power and Southern Company. A major incident at a nuclear facility anywhere in the world
could cause the NRC to delay or prohibit construction of new nuclear units or require additional safety measures at new and
existing units. Moreover, a major incident at any nuclear facility in the U.S., including facilities owned and operated by third
parties, could require Alabama Power and Georgia Power to make material contributory payments.
In addition, actual or potential threats of cyber intrusions or physical attacks could result in increased nuclear licensing or
compliance costs that are difficult to predict.
Transporting and storing natural gas involves risks that may result in accidents and other operating risks and costs.
Southern Company Gas' natural gas distribution and storage activities involve a variety of inherent hazards and operating risks,
such as leaks, accidents, explosions, and mechanical problems, which could result in serious injury, loss of life, significant damage
to property, environmental pollution, and impairment of its operations. The location of pipelines and storage facilities near
populated areas could increase the level of damage resulting from these risks. Additionally, these pipeline and storage facilities are
subject to various state and other regulatory requirements. Failure to comply with these requirements could result in substantial
monetary penalties or potential early retirement of storage facilities, which could trigger an associated impairment. The occurrence
of any of these events not fully covered by insurance or otherwise could adversely affect Southern Company Gas' and Southern
Company's financial condition and results of operations.
Physical attacks, both threatened and actual, could impact the ability of the Subsidiary Registrants to operate and could
adversely affect financial results and liquidity.
The Subsidiary Registrants face the risk of physical attacks, both threatened and actual, against their respective generation and
storage facilities and the transmission and distribution infrastructure used to transport energy, which could negatively impact their
ability to generate, transport, and deliver power, or otherwise operate their respective facilities, or, with respect to Southern
Company Gas, its ability to distribute or store natural gas, or otherwise operate its facilities, in the most efficient manner or at all.
In addition, physical attacks against third-party providers could have a similar effect on the Southern Company system.
Despite the implementation of robust security measures, all assets are potentially vulnerable to disability, failures, or unauthorized
access due to human error, natural disasters, technological failure, or internal or external physical attacks. If assets
I-19
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
were to fail, be physically damaged, or be breached and were not restored in a timely manner, the affected Subsidiary Registrant
may be unable to fulfill critical business functions. Moreover, the amount and scope of insurance maintained against losses
resulting from any such events or physical security breaches may not be sufficient to cover losses or otherwise adequately
compensate for any disruptions to business that could result.
These events could harm the reputation of and negatively affect the financial results of the Registrants through lost revenues and
costs to repair damage, if such costs cannot be recovered.
An information security incident, including a cybersecurity breach, or the failure of one or more key IT systems, networks,
or processes could impact the ability of the Registrants to operate and could adversely affect financial results and liquidity.
Information security risks have generally increased in recent years as a result of the proliferation of new technology and increased
sophistication and frequency of cyber attacks and data security breaches. The Subsidiary Registrants operate in highly regulated
industries that require the continued operation of sophisticated IT systems and network infrastructure, which are part of
interconnected distribution systems. Because of the critical nature of the infrastructure, increased connectivity to the internet, and
technology systems' inherent vulnerability to disability or failures due to hacking, viruses, acts of war or terrorism, or other types of
data security breaches, the Southern Company system faces a heightened risk of cyberattack. Parties that wish to disrupt the U.S.
bulk power system or Southern Company system operations could view these computer systems, software, or networks as
targets. The Registrants and their third-party vendors have been subject, and will likely continue to be subject, to attempts to gain
unauthorized access to their IT systems and confidential data or to attempts to disrupt utility operations. As a result, Southern
Company and its subsidiaries face on-going threats to their assets, including assets deemed critical infrastructure, where databases
and systems have been, and will likely continue to be, subject to advanced computer viruses or other malicious codes, unauthorized
access attempts, phishing, and other cyber attacks. While there have been immaterial incidents of phishing and attempted financial
fraud across the Southern Company system, there has been no material impact on business or operations from these attacks.
However, the Registrants cannot guarantee that security efforts will prevent breaches, operational incidents, or other breakdowns of
IT systems and network infrastructure and cannot provide any assurance that such incidents will not have a material adverse effect
in the future.
In addition, in the ordinary course of business, Southern Company and its subsidiaries collect and retain sensitive information,
including personally identifiable information about customers, employees, and stockholders, and other confidential information. In
some cases, administration of certain functions may be outsourced to third-party service providers that could also be targets of
cyber attacks.
Despite the implementation of robust security measures, all assets are potentially vulnerable to internal or external cyber attacks,
which may inhibit the affected Registrant's ability to fulfill critical business functions and compromise sensitive and other data.
Any cyber breach or theft, damage, or improper disclosure of sensitive electronic data may also subject the affected Registrant to
penalties and claims from regulators or other third parties. Moreover, the amount and scope of insurance may not be sufficient to
cover losses or otherwise adequately compensate for any disruptions to business that could result. In addition, as cybercriminals
become more sophisticated, the cost of proactive defensive measures may increase.
These events could negatively affect the financial results of the Registrants through lost revenues, costs to recover and repair
damage, costs associated with governmental actions in response to such attacks, and litigation costs if such costs cannot be
recovered through insurance or otherwise.
The Southern Company system may not be able to obtain adequate natural gas, fuel supplies, and other resources required
to operate the traditional electric operating companies' and Southern Power's electric generating plants or serve Southern
Company Gas' natural gas customers.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power purchase fuel from a number of suppliers. The traditional electric
operating companies and Southern Power also need adequate access to water, which is drawn from nearby sources, to aid in the
production of electricity and, once it is used, returned to its source. Disruption in the delivery of fuel, including disruptions as a
result of, among other things, transportation delays, weather, labor relations, force majeure events, or environmental regulations
affecting fuel suppliers, or the availability of water, could limit the ability of the traditional electric operating companies and
Southern Power to operate certain facilities, which could result in higher fuel and operating costs and potentially reduce the net
income of the affected traditional electric operating company or Southern Power and Southern Company.
Natural gas supplies can be subject to disruption in the event production or distribution is curtailed, such as in the event of a
hurricane or a pipeline failure. The Southern Company system also relies on natural gas pipelines and other storage and
transportation facilities owned and operated by third parties to deliver natural gas to wholesale markets and to its distribution
I-20
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
systems. The availability of shale gas and potential regulations affecting its accessibility may have a material impact on the supply
and cost of natural gas. Disruption in natural gas supplies could limit the ability to fulfill contractual obligations.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power have become more dependent on natural gas for a majority of
their electric generating capacity and expect to continue to increase such dependence. In many instances, the cost of purchased
power is influenced by natural gas prices. Historically, natural gas prices have been more volatile than prices of other fuels. In
recent years, domestic natural gas prices have been depressed by robust supplies, including production from shale gas. These
market conditions, together with additional regulation of coal-fired generating units, have increased the traditional electric
operating companies' reliance on natural gas-fired generating units.
The traditional electric operating companies are also dependent on coal for a portion of their electric generating capacity. The
traditional electric operating companies depend on coal supply contracts, and the counterparties to these agreements may not fulfill
their obligations to supply coal because of financial or technical problems. In addition, the suppliers may not be required to supply
coal under certain circumstances, such as in the event of a natural disaster. If the traditional electric operating companies are unable
to obtain their contracted coal requirements, they may be required to purchase their coal requirements at higher prices, which may
not be recoverable through rates.
The revenues of Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Power depend in part on
sales under PPAs. The failure of a PPA counterparty to perform its obligations, the failure of a Southern Company
subsidiary to satisfy minimum requirements under the PPAs, or the failure to renew the PPAs or successfully remarket the
related generating capacity could have a negative impact on the net income and cash flows of the affected traditional
electric operating company or Southern Power and/or of Southern Company.
Most of Southern Power's generating capacity has been sold to purchasers under PPAs. Southern Power's top three customers,
Georgia Power, Southern California Edison, and Morgan Stanley Capital Group accounted for 9.0%, 6.8%, and 4.9%, respectively,
of Southern Power's total revenues for the year ended December 31, 2019. The traditional electric operating companies have
entered into PPAs with non-affiliated parties.
The revenues related to PPAs are dependent on the continued performance by the purchasers of their obligations. The failure of a
purchaser to perform its obligations, including as a result of a general default or bankruptcy, could have a negative impact on the
net income and cash flows of the affected traditional electric operating company or Southern Power and of Southern Company.
Although the credit evaluations undertaken and contractual protections implemented by Southern Power and the traditional electric
operating companies take into account the possibility of default by a purchaser, actual exposure to a default by a purchaser may be
greater than predicted or specified in the applicable contract. See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Revenues –
Concentration of Revenue" in Item 8 herein for additional information on the potential impacts of Pacific Gas & Electric
Company's bankruptcy filing.
Additionally, neither Southern Power nor any traditional electric operating company can predict whether the PPAs will be renewed
at the end of their respective terms or on what terms any renewals may be made. The failure of a Southern Company subsidiary to
satisfy minimum operational or availability requirements under these PPAs, including PPAs related to fuel cell technology, could
result in payment of damages or termination of the PPAs.
The asset management arrangements between Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services and its customers, including
the natural gas distribution utilities, may not be renewed or may be renewed at lower levels, which could have a significant
impact on Southern Company Gas' financial results.
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services currently manages the storage and transportation assets of the natural gas
distribution utilities (except Nicor Gas) as well as certain non-affiliated customers. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services
has a concentration of credit risk for services it provides to its counterparties, which is generally concentrated in 20 of its
counterparties.
The profits earned from the management of affiliate assets are shared with the respective affiliate's customers (and for Atlanta Gas
Light with the Georgia PSC's Universal Service Fund), except for Chattanooga Gas where wholesale gas services are provided
under annual fixed-fee agreements. These asset management agreements are subject to regulatory approval and such agreements
may not be renewed or may be renewed with less favorable terms.
The financial results of Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services could be significantly impacted if any of its agreements
with its affiliated or non-affiliated customers are not renewed or are amended or renewed with less favorable terms. Sustained low
natural gas prices could reduce the demand for these types of asset management arrangements.
I-21
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Increased competition from other companies that supply energy or generation and storage technologies could negatively
impact Southern Company's and its subsidiaries' revenues, results of operations, and financial condition.
A key element of the business models of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power is that generating power
at central station power plants achieves economies of scale and produces power at a competitive cost. Advances in technology or
changes in laws or regulations could reduce the cost of distributed generation storage technologies or other alternative methods of
producing power to a level that is competitive with that of most central station power electric production or result in smaller-scale,
more fuel efficient, and/or more cost effective distributed generation that allows for increased self-generation by customers.
Broader use of distributed generation by retail energy customers may also result from customers' changing perceptions of the merits
of utilizing existing generation technology or tax or other economic incentives. Additionally, a state PSC or legislature may modify
certain aspects of the traditional electric operating companies' business as a result of these advances in technology.
It is also possible that rapid advances in central station power generation technology could reduce the value of the current electric
generating facilities owned by the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power. Changes in technology could also
alter the channels through which electric customers buy or utilize power, which could reduce the revenues or increase the expenses
of Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, or Southern Power.
Southern Company Gas' business is dependent on natural gas prices remaining competitive as compared to other forms of energy.
Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services segment also is affected by competition from other energy marketers providing
similar services in Southern Company Gas' unregulated service territories, most notably in Illinois and Georgia. Southern Company
Gas' wholesale gas services competes for sales with national and regional full-service energy providers, energy merchants and
producers, and pipelines based on the ability to aggregate competitively-priced commodities with transportation and storage
capacity. Southern Company Gas competes with natural gas facilities in the Gulf Coast region of the U.S., as the majority of the
existing and proposed high deliverability salt-dome natural gas storage facilities in North America are located in the Gulf Coast
region.
If new technologies become cost competitive and achieve sufficient scale, the market share of the Subsidiary Registrants could be
eroded, and the value of their respective electric generating facilities or natural gas distribution and storage facilities could be
reduced. Additionally, Southern Company Gas' market share could be reduced if Southern Company Gas cannot remain price
competitive in its unregulated markets. If state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies fail to adjust rates to reflect the
impact of any changes in loads, increasing self-generation, and the growth of distributed generation, the financial condition, results
of operations, and cash flows of Southern Company and the affected traditional electric operating company or Southern Company
Gas could be materially adversely affected.
Failure to attract and retain an appropriately qualified workforce could negatively impact Southern Company's and its
subsidiaries' results of operations.
Events such as an aging workforce without appropriate replacements, mismatch of skill sets to future needs, or unavailability of
contract resources may lead to operating challenges such as lack of resources, loss of knowledge, and a lengthy time period
associated with skill development, including with the workforce needs associated with major construction projects and ongoing
operations. The Southern Company system's costs, including costs for contractors to replace employees, productivity costs, and
safety costs, may rise. Failure to hire and adequately obtain replacement employees, including the ability to transfer significant
internal historical knowledge and expertise to the new employees, or the future availability and cost of contract labor may adversely
affect Southern Company and its subsidiaries' ability to manage and operate their businesses.
As a result of the increased demand for skilled linemen in California and the Northeast, portions of the Southern Company system
experienced higher than normal turnover in 2019. The Southern Company system is diligently working to attract and train qualified
linemen.
If Southern Company and its subsidiaries are unable to successfully attract and retain an appropriately qualified workforce, results
of operations could be negatively impacted.
CONSTRUCTION RISKS
The Registrants have incurred and may incur additional costs or delays in the construction of new plants or other facilities
and may not be able to recover their investments. Also, existing facilities of the Subsidiary Registrants require ongoing
expenditures, including those to meet AROs and other environmental standards and goals.
General
The businesses of the Registrants require substantial expenditures for investments in new facilities and, for the traditional electric
operating companies, capital improvements to transmission, distribution, and generation facilities, for Southern Power, capital
improvements to generation facilities, and, for Southern Company Gas, capital improvements to natural gas distribution
I-22
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
and storage facilities. These expenditures also include those to settle AROs and meet environmental standards and goals. The
traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power are in the process of constructing new generating facilities and adding
environmental modifications to certain existing generating facilities. The traditional electric operating companies also are in the
process of closing ash ponds to comply with the CCR Rule and, where applicable, state CCR rules. Southern Company Gas is
replacing certain pipelines in its natural gas distribution system and is involved in two new gas pipeline construction projects. The
Southern Company system intends to continue its strategy of developing and constructing new electric generating facilities,
expanding and improving the electric transmission and electric and natural gas distribution systems, and undertaking projects to
comply with environmental laws and regulations. These projects are long term in nature and in some cases may include the
development and construction of facilities with designs that have not been finalized or previously constructed. The completion of
these types of projects without delays or significant cost overruns is subject to substantial risks that have occurred or may occur,
including:
•shortages, delays, increased costs, or inconsistent quality of equipment, materials, and labor;
•challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, or vendors;
•work stoppages;
•contractor or supplier delay;
•nonperformance under construction, operating, or other agreements;
•delays in or failure to receive necessary permits, approvals, tax credits, and other regulatory authorizations;
•challenges with start-up activities (including major equipment failure, system integration, or regional transmission
upgrades) and/or operational performance;
•operational readiness, including specialized operator training and required site safety programs;
•impacts of new and existing laws and regulations, including environmental laws and regulations;
•the outcome of any legal challenges to projects, including legal challenges to regulatory approvals;
•failure to construct in accordance with permits and licenses (including satisfaction of NRC requirements);
•failure to satisfy any environmental performance standards and the requirements of tax credits and other incentives;
•continued public and policymaker support for projects;
•adverse weather conditions or natural disasters;
•engineering or design problems;
•design and other licensing-based compliance matters;
•environmental and geological conditions;
•delays or increased costs to interconnect facilities to transmission grids; and
•increased financing costs as a result of changes in market interest rates or as a result of project delays.
If a Subsidiary Registrant is unable to complete the development or construction of a project or decides to delay or cancel
construction of a project, it may not be able to recover its investment in that project and may incur substantial cancellation
payments under equipment purchase orders or construction contracts, as well as other costs associated with the closure and/or
abandonment of the construction project.
In addition, partnership and joint ownership agreements may provide partners or co-owners with certain decision-making authority
in connection with projects under construction, including rights to cause the cancellation of a construction project under certain
circumstances. Any failure by a partner or co-owner to perform its obligations under the applicable agreements could have a
material negative impact on the applicable project under construction. Certain Southern Company Gas pipeline development
projects involve separate joint venture participants that own a majority of the project, Southern Power participates in partnership
agreements with respect to a majority of its renewable energy projects, Georgia Power jointly owns Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 with
other co-owners, and Mississippi Power jointly owns Plant Daniel with Gulf Power. See Note 5 to the financial statements under
"Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information regarding jointly-owned facilities.
If construction projects are not completed according to specification, a Registrant may incur liabilities and suffer reduced plant
efficiency, higher operating costs, and reduced net income. Furthermore, construction delays associated with renewable projects
could result in the loss of otherwise available tax credits and incentives.
Even if a construction project (including a joint venture construction project) is completed, the total costs may be higher than
estimated and may not be recoverable through regulated rates, if applicable. In addition, construction delays and contractor
performance shortfalls can result in the loss of revenues and may, in turn, adversely affect the net income and financial position of
the affected Registrant. The largest construction project currently underway in the Southern Company system is Plant Vogtle Units
3 and 4. Southern Company and Georgia Power recorded a pre-tax estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in
2018 to reflect Georgia Power's revised estimate to complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See Note 2 to
the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein for information regarding Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4. Also see Note 3 to the financial statements under "Other Matters – Southern Company
I-23
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Gas – Gas Pipeline Projects" for information regarding the construction delays and the associated cost increases for Southern
Company Gas' pipeline construction projects and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed
Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline" in Item 8 herein for information regarding the proposed sale of Southern
Company Gas' interests in Atlantic Coast Pipeline.
Once facilities become operational, ongoing capital expenditures are required to maintain reliable levels of operation. Significant
portions of the traditional electric operating companies' existing facilities were constructed many years ago. Older equipment, even
if maintained in accordance with good engineering practices, may require significant expenditures to maintain efficiency, to comply
with changing environmental requirements, to provide safe and reliable operations, and/or to meet related retirement obligations.
Southern Company Gas' significant investments in pipelines and pipeline development projects involve financial and
execution risks.
Southern Company Gas has made significant investments in existing pipelines and pipeline development projects. Many of the
existing pipelines are, and, when completed, the pipeline development projects will be, operated by third parties. If one of these
agents fails to perform in a proper manner, the value of the investment could decline and Southern Company Gas could lose part or
all of its investment. In addition, Southern Company Gas is required to fulfill capital obligations to pipeline joint ventures or, as
necessary, guarantee the obligations of such joint venture.
With respect to certain pipeline development projects, Southern Company Gas will rely on its joint venture partners for
construction management and will not exercise direct control over the process. All of the pipeline development projects are
dependent on contractors for the successful and timely completion of the projects. Further, the development of pipeline projects
involves numerous regulatory, environmental, construction, safety, political, and legal uncertainties and may require the
expenditure of significant amounts of capital. These projects may not be completed on schedule, at the budgeted cost, or at all.
There may be cost overruns and construction difficulties that cause Southern Company Gas' capital expenditures to exceed its
initial expectations, which may impact the earnings of the joint venture partnerships. Moreover, Southern Company Gas' income
will not increase immediately upon the expenditure of funds on a pipeline project. Pipeline construction occurs over an extended
period of time and Southern Company Gas will not receive material increases in income until the project is placed in service.
At December 31, 2019, Southern Company Gas was involved in two gas pipeline development projects, the Atlantic Coast Pipeline
project and the PennEast Pipeline project. See Note 3 to the financial statements under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas –
Gas Pipeline Projects" in Item 8 herein for information regarding these projects and Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline" in Item 8 herein for information regarding
the proposed sale of Southern Company Gas' interests in Atlantic Coast Pipeline.
FINANCIAL, ECONOMIC, AND MARKET RISKS
The electric generation and energy marketing operations of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern
Power and the natural gas operations of Southern Company Gas are subject to risks, many of which are beyond their
control, including changes in energy prices and fuel costs, which may reduce revenues and increase costs.
The generation, energy marketing, and natural gas operations of the Southern Company system are subject to changes in energy
prices and fuel costs, which could increase the cost of producing power, decrease the amount received from the sale of energy,
and/or make electric generating facilities less competitive. The market prices for these commodities may fluctuate significantly
over relatively short periods of time. Among the factors that could influence energy prices and fuel costs are:
•prevailing market prices for coal, natural gas, uranium, fuel oil, and other fuels, as applicable, used in the generation
facilities of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power and, in the case of natural gas, distributed by
Southern Company Gas, including associated transportation costs, and supplies of such commodities;
•demand for energy and the extent of additional supplies of energy available from current or new competitors;
•liquidity in the general wholesale electricity and natural gas markets;
•weather conditions impacting demand for electricity and natural gas;
•seasonality;
•transmission or transportation constraints, disruptions, or inefficiencies;
•availability of competitively priced alternative energy sources;
•forced or unscheduled plant outages for the Southern Company system, its competitors, or third party providers;
•the financial condition of market participants;
•the economy in the Southern Company system's service territory, the nation, and worldwide, including the impact of
economic conditions on demand for electricity and the demand for fuels, including natural gas;
•natural disasters, wars, embargos, physical or cyber attacks, and other catastrophic events; and
•federal, state, and foreign energy and environmental regulation and legislation.
I-24
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
These factors could increase the expenses and/or reduce the revenues of the Registrants. For the traditional electric operating
companies and Southern Company Gas' regulated gas distribution operations, such impacts may not be fully recoverable through
rates.
Historically, the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas from time to time have experienced
underrecovered fuel and/or purchased gas cost balances and may experience such balances in the future. While the traditional
electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas are generally authorized to recover fuel and/or purchased gas costs
through cost recovery clauses, recovery may be denied if costs are deemed to be imprudently incurred and there may be delays in
the authorization of such recovery. These factors could negatively impact the cash flows of the affected traditional electric
operating company or Southern Company Gas and of Southern Company.
The Registrants are subject to risks associated with a changing economic environment, customer behaviors, including
increased energy conservation, and adoption patterns of technologies by the customers of the Subsidiary Registrants.
The consumption and use of energy are linked to economic activity. This relationship is affected over time by changes in the
economy, customer behaviors, and technologies. Any economic downturn could negatively impact customer growth and usage per
customer, thus reducing the sales of energy and revenues. Additionally, any economic downturn or disruption of financial markets,
both nationally and internationally, could negatively affect the financial stability of customers and counterparties of the Subsidiary
Registrants.
Outside of economic disruptions, changes in customer behaviors in response to energy efficiency programs, changing conditions
and preferences, or changes in the adoption of technologies could affect the relationship of economic activity to the consumption of
energy. For example, some cities in the United States recently banned the use of natural gas in new construction.
Both federal and state programs exist to influence how customers use energy, and several of the traditional electric operating
companies and Southern Company Gas have PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency mandates to promote energy
efficiency. Conservation programs could impact the financial results of the Registrants in different ways. For example, if any
traditional electric operating company or Southern Company Gas is required to invest in conservation measures that result in
reduced sales from effective conservation, regulatory lag in adjusting rates for the impact of these measures could have a negative
financial impact on such traditional electric operating company or Southern Company Gas and Southern Company. Customers
could also voluntarily reduce their consumption of energy in response to decreases in their disposable income, increases in energy
prices, or individual conservation efforts.
In addition, the adoption of technology by customers can have both positive and negative impacts on sales. Many new technologies
utilize less energy than in the past. However, electric and natural gas technologies such as electric and natural gas vehicles can
create additional demand. The Southern Company system uses best available methods and experience to incorporate the effects of
changes in customer behavior, state and federal programs, PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency mandates, and
technology, but the Southern Company system's planning processes may not estimate and incorporate these effects.
All of the factors discussed above could adversely affect a Registrant's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
The operating results of the Registrants are affected by weather conditions and may fluctuate on a seasonal basis. In
addition, catastrophic events could result in substantial damage to or limit the operation of the properties of a Subsidiary
Registrant and could negatively impact results of operation, financial condition, and liquidity.
Electric power and natural gas supply are generally seasonal businesses. In the aggregate, during normal weather conditions, the
Southern Company system's electric power sales peak during both the summer and winter. Additionally, Southern Power has
variability in its revenues from renewable generation facilities due to seasonal weather patterns primarily from wind and sun. In
most of the areas Southern Company Gas serves, natural gas demand peaks during the winter. In addition, the Subsidiary
Registrants have historically sold less power and natural gas when weather conditions are milder. Unusually mild weather in the
future could reduce the revenues, net income, and available cash of the affected Registrant.
Volatile or significant weather events could result in substantial damage to the transmission and distribution lines of the traditional
electric operating companies, the generating facilities of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power, and the
natural gas distribution and storage facilities of Southern Company Gas. The Subsidiary Registrants have significant investments in
the Atlantic and Gulf Coast regions and Southern Power and Southern Company Gas have investments in various states which
could be subject to severe weather and natural disasters, including hurricanes and wildfires. Further, severe drought conditions can
reduce the availability of water and restrict or prevent the operation of certain generating facilities.
In the event a traditional electric operating company or Southern Company Gas experiences any of these weather events or any
natural disaster or other catastrophic event, recovery of costs in excess of reserves and insurance coverage is subject to the
I-25
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
approval of its state PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency. Historically, the traditional electric operating companies from
time to time have experienced deficits in their storm cost recovery reserve balances and may experience such deficits in the future.
Any denial by the applicable state PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency or delay in recovery of any portion of such costs
could have a material negative impact on a traditional electric operating company's or Southern Company Gas' and on Southern
Company's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
In addition, damages resulting from significant weather events within the service territory of any traditional electric operating
company or Southern Company Gas or affecting Southern Power's customers may result in the loss of customers and reduced
demand for energy for extended periods and may impact customers' ability to perform under existing PPAs. See Note 1 to the
financial statements under "Revenues – Concentration of Revenue" in Item 8 herein for additional information on Pacific Gas &
Electric Company's bankruptcy filing. Any significant loss of customers or reduction in demand for energy could have a material
negative impact on a Registrant's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
Acquisitions, dispositions, or other strategic ventures or investments may not result in anticipated benefits and may present
risks not originally contemplated, which may have a material adverse effect on the liquidity, results of operations, and
financial condition of Southern Company and its subsidiaries.
Southern Company and its subsidiaries have made significant acquisitions and investments in the past, as well as dispositions, and
may in the future make additional acquisitions, dispositions, or other strategic ventures or investments, including the pending
disposition by Southern Company Gas of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline, which cannot be assured to be
completed or beneficial to Southern Company or its subsidiaries. Southern Company and its subsidiaries continually seek
opportunities to create value through various transactions, including acquisitions or sales of assets. Specifically, Southern Power
continually seeks opportunities to execute its strategy to create value through various transactions, including acquisitions,
dispositions, and sales of partnership interests, development and construction of new generating facilities, and entry into PPAs
primarily with investor-owned utilities, IPPs, municipalities, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial
customers.
Southern Company and its subsidiaries may face significant competition for transactional opportunities and anticipated transactions
may not be completed on acceptable terms or at all. In addition, these transactions are intended to, but may not, result in the
generation of cash or income, the realization of savings, the creation of efficiencies, or the reduction of risk. These transactions may
also affect the liquidity, results of operations, and financial condition of Southern Company and its subsidiaries.
These transactions also involve risks, including:
•they may not result in an increase in income or provide adequate or expected funds or return on capital or other anticipated
benefits;
•they may result in Southern Company or its subsidiaries entering into new or additional lines of business, which may have
new or different business or operational risks;
•they may not be successfully integrated into the acquiring company's operations and/or internal control processes;
•the due diligence conducted prior to a transaction may not uncover situations that could result in financial or legal
exposure or may not appropriately evaluate the likelihood or quantify the exposure from identified risks;
•they may result in decreased earnings, revenues, or cash flow;
•they may involve retained obligations in connection with transitional agreements or deferred payments related to
dispositions that subject Southern Company or its subsidiaries to additional risk;
•Southern Company or the applicable subsidiary may not be able to achieve the expected financial benefits from the use of
funds generated by any dispositions;
•expected benefits of a transaction may be dependent on the cooperation, performance, or credit risk of a counterparty; or
•for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas, costs associated with such investments that
were expected to be recovered through regulated rates may not be recoverable.
Southern Company and Southern Company Gas are holding companies and Southern Power owns many of its assets
indirectly through subsidiaries. Each of these companies is dependent on cash flows from their respective subsidiaries to
meet their ongoing and future financial obligations, including making interest and principal payments on outstanding
indebtedness and, for Southern Company, to pay dividends on its common stock.
Southern Company and Southern Company Gas are holding companies and, as such, they have no operations of their own.
Substantially all of Southern Company's and Southern Company Gas' and many of Southern Power's respective consolidated assets
are held by subsidiaries. Southern Company's, Southern Company Gas' and, to a certain extent, Southern Power's ability to meet
their respective financial obligations, including making interest and principal payments on outstanding indebtedness, and, for
Southern Company, to pay dividends on its common stock, is dependent on the net income and cash flows of their
I-26
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
respective subsidiaries and the ability of those subsidiaries to pay upstream dividends or to repay borrowed funds. Prior to funding
Southern Company, Southern Company Gas, or Southern Power, the respective subsidiaries have financial obligations and, with
respect to Southern Company and Southern Company Gas, regulatory restrictions that must be satisfied, including among others,
debt service and preferred stock dividends. In addition, Southern Company, Southern Company Gas, and Southern Power may
provide capital contributions or debt financing to subsidiaries under certain circumstances, which would reduce the funds available
to meet their respective financial obligations, including making interest and principal payments on outstanding indebtedness, and to
pay dividends on Southern Company's common stock.
A downgrade in the credit ratings of any of the Registrants, Southern Company Gas Capital, or Nicor Gas could negatively
affect their ability to access capital at reasonable costs and/or could require posting of collateral or replacing certain
indebtedness.
There are a number of factors that rating agencies evaluate to arrive at credit ratings for the Registrants, Southern Company Gas
Capital, and Nicor Gas, including capital structure, regulatory environment, the ability to cover liquidity requirements, and other
commitments for capital. The Registrants, Southern Company Gas Capital, and Nicor Gas could experience a downgrade in their
ratings if any rating agency concludes that the level of business or financial risk of the industry or the applicable company has
deteriorated. Changes in ratings methodologies by the agencies could also have a negative impact on credit ratings. If one or more
rating agencies downgrade any Registrant, Southern Company Gas Capital, or Nicor Gas borrowing costs likely would increase,
including automatic increases in interest rates under applicable term loans and credit facilities, the pool of investors and funding
sources would likely decrease, and, particularly for any downgrade to below investment grade, significant collateral requirements
may be triggered in a number of contracts. Any credit rating downgrades could require altering the mix of debt financing currently
used, and could require the issuance of secured indebtedness and/or indebtedness with additional restrictive covenants binding the
applicable company.
Uncertainty in demand for energy can result in lower earnings or higher costs. If demand for energy falls short of
expectations, it could result in potentially stranded assets. If demand for energy exceeds expectations, it could result in
increased costs for purchasing capacity in the open market or building additional electric generation and transmission
facilities or natural gas distribution and storage facilities.
Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Power each engage in a long-term planning process
to estimate the optimal mix and timing of new generation assets required to serve future load obligations. Southern Company Gas
engages in a long-term planning process to estimate the optimal mix and timing of building new pipelines and storage facilities,
replacing existing pipelines, rewatering storage facilities, and entering new markets and/or expanding in existing markets. These
planning processes must look many years into the future in order to accommodate the long lead times associated with the
permitting and construction of new generation and associated transmission facilities and natural gas distribution and storage
facilities. Inherent risk exists in predicting demand as future loads are dependent on many uncertain factors, including economic
conditions, customer usage patterns, efficiency programs, and customer technology adoption. Because regulators may not permit
the traditional electric operating companies or Southern Company Gas' regulated operating companies to adjust rates to recover the
costs of new generation and associated transmission assets and/or new pipelines and related infrastructure in a timely manner or at
all, these subsidiaries may not be able to fully recover these costs or may have exposure to regulatory lag associated with the time
between the incurrence of costs and the recovery in customers' rates. In addition, under Southern Power's model of selling capacity
and energy at negotiated market-based rates under long-term PPAs, Southern Power might not be able to fully execute its business
plan if market prices drop below original forecasts. Southern Power and/or the traditional electric operating companies may not be
able to extend existing PPAs or find new buyers for existing generation assets as existing PPAs expire, or they may be forced to
market these assets at prices lower than originally intended. These situations could have negative impacts on net income and cash
flows for the affected Registrant.
The traditional electric operating companies are currently obligated to supply power to retail customers and wholesale customers
under long-term PPAs. Southern Power is currently obligated to supply power to wholesale customers under long-term PPAs. At
peak times, the demand for power required to meet this obligation could exceed the Southern Company system's available
generation capacity. Market or competitive forces may require that the traditional electric operating companies purchase capacity
on the open market or build additional generation and transmission facilities and that Southern Power purchase energy or capacity
on the open market. Because regulators may not permit the traditional electric operating companies to pass all of these purchase or
construction costs on to their customers, the traditional electric operating companies may not be able to recover some or all of these
costs or may have exposure to regulatory lag associated with the time between the incurrence of costs of purchased or constructed
capacity and the traditional electric operating companies' recovery in customers' rates. Under Southern Power's long-term fixed
price PPAs, Southern Power may not be able to recover all of these costs. These situations could have negative impacts on net
income and cash flows for the affected Registrant.
I-27
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
The businesses of the Registrants, SEGCO, and Nicor Gas are dependent on their ability to successfully access funds
through capital markets and financial institutions. The inability of any of the Registrants, SEGCO, or Nicor Gas to access
funds may limit its ability to execute its business plan by impacting its ability to fund capital investments or acquisitions
that it may otherwise rely on to achieve future earnings and cash flows.
The Registrants, SEGCO, and Nicor Gas rely on access to both short-term money markets and longer-term capital markets as a
significant source of liquidity for capital requirements not satisfied by the cash flow from their respective operations. If any of the
Registrants, SEGCO, or Nicor Gas is not able to access capital at competitive rates or on favorable terms, its ability to implement
its business plan will be limited by impacting its ability to fund capital investments or acquisitions that it may otherwise rely on to
achieve future earnings and cash flows. In addition, the Registrants, SEGCO, and Nicor Gas rely on committed bank lending
agreements as back-up liquidity which allows them to access low cost money markets. Each of the Registrants, SEGCO, and Nicor
Gas believes that it will maintain sufficient access to these financial markets based upon current credit ratings. However, certain
events or market disruptions may increase the cost of borrowing or adversely affect the ability to raise capital through the issuance
of securities or other borrowing arrangements or the ability to secure committed bank lending agreements used as back-up sources
of capital. Such disruptions could include an economic downturn or uncertainty; bankruptcy or financial distress at an unrelated
energy company, financial institution, or sovereign entity; capital markets volatility and disruption, either nationally or
internationally; changes in tax policy; volatility in market prices for electricity and natural gas; actual or threatened cyber or
physical attacks on the Southern Company system's facilities or unrelated energy companies' facilities; war or threat of war; or the
overall health of the utility and financial institution industries.
Additionally, due to a portion of the Registrants' indebtedness bearing interest at fluctuating rates based on LIBOR or other
benchmark rates, the potential phasing out of these rates may adversely affect the costs of financing. The discontinuation, reform,
or replacement of LIBOR or any other benchmark rates may have an unpredictable impact on contractual relationships in the credit
markets or cause disruption to the broader financial markets and could result in adverse consequences to the return on, value of, and
market for the Registrants' securities and other instruments whose returns are linked to any such benchmark.
Failure to comply with debt covenants or conditions could adversely affect the ability of the Registrants, SEGCO, Southern
Company Gas Capital, or Nicor Gas to execute future borrowings.
The debt and credit agreements of the Registrants, SEGCO, Southern Company Gas Capital, and Nicor Gas contain various
financial and other covenants. Georgia Power's loan guarantee agreement with the DOE contains additional covenants, events of
default, and mandatory prepayment events relating to the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Failure to meet those
covenants beyond applicable grace periods could result in accelerated due dates and/or termination of the agreements, which would
negatively affect the applicable company's financial condition and liquidity.
Volatility in the securities markets, interest rates, and other factors could substantially increase defined benefit pension and
other postretirement plan costs and the funding available for nuclear decommissioning.
The costs of providing pension and other postretirement benefit plans are dependent on a number of factors, such as the rates of
return on plan assets, discount rates, the level of interest rates used to measure the required minimum funding levels of the plan,
changes in actuarial assumptions, government regulations, and/or life expectancy, and the frequency and amount of the Southern
Company system's required or voluntary contributions made to the plans. Changes in actuarial assumptions and differences
between the assumptions and actual values, as well as a significant decline in the value of investments that fund the pension and
other postretirement plans, if not offset or mitigated by a decline in plan liabilities, could increase pension and other postretirement
expense, and the Southern Company system could be required from time to time to fund the pension plans with significant amounts
of cash. Such cash funding obligations could have a material impact on liquidity by reducing cash flows and could negatively affect
results of operations. See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – ACCOUNTING POLICIES – "Application of
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates – Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits" in Item 7 herein and Note 11 to the
financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information regarding the defined benefit pension and other postretirement
plans. Additionally, Alabama Power and Georgia Power each hold significant assets in their nuclear decommissioning trusts to
satisfy obligations to decommission their nuclear plants. The rate of return on assets held in those trusts can significantly impact
both the funding available for decommissioning and the funding requirements for the trusts. See Note 6 to the financial statements
under "Nuclear Decommissioning" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
The Registrants are subject to risks associated with their ability to obtain adequate insurance at acceptable costs.
The financial condition of some insurance companies, actual or threatened physical or cyber attacks, and natural disasters, among
other things, could have disruptive effects on insurance markets. The availability of insurance may decrease, and the insurance that
the Registrants are able to obtain may have higher deductibles, higher premiums, and more restrictive policy terms. Further, the
insurance policies may not cover all of the potential exposures or the actual amount of loss incurred.
I-28
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Any losses not covered by insurance, or any increases in the cost of applicable insurance, could adversely affect the results of
operations, cash flows, or financial condition of the affected Registrant.
The use of derivative contracts by Southern Company and its subsidiaries in the normal course of business could result in
financial losses that negatively impact the net income of the Registrants or in reported net income volatility.
Southern Company and its subsidiaries use derivative instruments, such as swaps, options, futures, and forwards, to manage their
commodity and interest rate exposures and, to a lesser extent, manage foreign currency exchange rate exposure and engage in
limited trading activities. The Registrants could recognize financial losses as a result of volatility in the market values of these
contracts or if a counterparty fails to perform. These risks are managed through risk management policies, limits, and procedures,
which might not work as planned and cannot entirely eliminate the risks associated with these activities. In addition, derivative
contracts entered into for hedging purposes might not offset the underlying exposure being hedged as expected, resulting in
financial losses. In the absence of actively quoted market prices and pricing information from external sources, the valuation of
these financial instruments can involve management's judgment or use of estimates. The factors used in the valuation of these
instruments become more difficult to predict and the calculations become less reliable further into the future. As a result, changes in
the underlying assumptions or use of alternative valuation methods could affect the reported fair value of these contracts.
In addition, Southern Company Gas utilizes derivative instruments to lock in economic value in wholesale gas services, which may
not qualify as, or may not be designated as, hedges for accounting purposes. The difference in accounting treatment for the
underlying position and the financial instrument used to hedge the value of the contract can cause volatility in reported net income
of Southern Company and Southern Company Gas while the positions are open due to mark-to-market accounting.
See Notes 13 and 14 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Future impairments of goodwill or long-lived assets could have a material adverse effect on the Registrants' results of
operations.
Goodwill is assessed for impairment at least annually and more frequently if events or circumstances occur that would more likely
than not reduce the fair value of a reporting unit below its carrying value and long-lived assets are assessed for impairment
whenever events or circumstances indicate that an asset's carrying amount may not be recoverable. In connection with the
completion of the Merger, the application of the acquisition method of accounting was pushed down to Southern Company Gas.
The excess of the purchase price over the fair values of Southern Company Gas' assets and liabilities was recorded as goodwill.
This resulted in a significant increase in the goodwill recorded on Southern Company's and Southern Company Gas' consolidated
balance sheets. At December 31, 2019, goodwill was $5.3 billion and $5.0 billion for Southern Company and Southern Company
Gas, respectively.
In addition, Southern Company and its subsidiaries have long-lived assets recorded on their balance sheets. To the extent the value
of goodwill or long-lived assets become impaired, the affected Registrant may be required to incur impairment charges that could
have a material impact on their results of operations. For example, Southern Company Gas has two natural gas storage facilities
located in California and Texas, which could be impacted by ongoing changes in the U.S. natural gas storage market. Recent sales
of natural gas storage facilities have resulted in losses for the sellers and may imply an impact on future rates and/or asset
values. Sustained diminished natural gas storage values could trigger impairment of either of these natural gas storage facilities. See
Note 3 to the financial statements under "Other Matters" in Item 8 herein for information regarding certain impairment charges at
Southern Company and Southern Company Gas.
Item 1B.UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS.
None.
I-29
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Item 2. PROPERTIES
Electric
Electric Properties
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and SEGCO, at December 31, 2019, owned and/or operated 30
hydroelectric generating stations, 24 fossil fuel generating stations, three nuclear generating stations, 13 combined
cycle/cogeneration stations, 42 solar facilities, 10 wind facilities, one fuel cell facility, and one battery storage facility. The amounts
of capacity for each company at December 31, 2019 are shown in the table below. The traditional electric operating companies
have certain jointly-owned generating stations. For these facilities, the nameplate capacity shown represents the Registrant's portion
of total plant capacity, with ownership percentages provided if less than 100%.
Generating Station/Ownership Percentage LocationNameplate
Capacity(a)
  (KWs)
FOSSIL STEAM   
Gadsden Gadsden, AL 120,000
Barry Mobile, AL 1,300,000
Greene County (60%) Demopolis, AL 300,000
Gaston Unit 5 Wilsonville, AL 880,000
Miller (95.92%) Birmingham, AL 2,532,288
Alabama Power Total  5,132,288
Bowen Cartersville, GA 3,160,000
Scherer (8.4% of Units 1 and 2 and 75% of Unit 3) Macon, GA 750,924
Wansley (53.5%) Carrollton, GA 925,550
Yates Newnan, GA 700,000
Georgia Power Total  5,536,474
Daniel (50%) Pascagoula, MS 500,000
Greene County (40%) Demopolis, AL 200,000
Watson Gulfport, MS 750,000
Mississippi Power Total  1,450,000
Gaston Units 1-4 Wilsonville, AL  
SEGCO Total  1,000,000(b) 
Total Fossil Steam  13,118,762
NUCLEAR STEAM   
Farley Dothan, AL  
Alabama Power Total  1,720,000
Hatch (50.1%) Baxley, GA 899,612
Vogtle Units 1 and 2 (45.7%) Augusta, GA 1,060,240
Georgia Power Total  1,959,852
Total Nuclear Steam  3,679,852
I-30
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Generating Station/Ownership Percentage LocationNameplate
Capacity(a)
COMBUSTION TURBINES   
Greene County Demopolis, AL  
Alabama Power Total  720,000
Boulevard Savannah, GA 19,700
McDonough Unit 3 Atlanta, GA 78,800
McIntosh Units 1 through 8 Effingham County, GA 640,000
McManus Brunswick, GA 481,700
Robins Warner Robins, GA 158,400
Wansley (53.5%) Carrollton, GA 26,322
Wilson Augusta, GA 354,100
Georgia Power Total  1,759,022
Sweatt Meridian, MS 39,400
Watson Gulfport, MS 39,360
Mississippi Power Total  78,760
Addison Thomaston, GA 668,800
Cleveland County Cleveland County, NC 720,000
Dahlberg Jackson County, GA 756,000
Rowan Salisbury, NC 455,250
Southern Power Total  2,600,050
Gaston (SEGCO) Wilsonville, AL 19,680(b) 
Total Combustion Turbines  5,177,512
COGENERATION   
Washington County Washington County, AL 123,428
Lowndes County Burkeville, AL 104,800
Theodore Theodore, AL 236,418
Alabama Power Total  464,646
Chevron Cogenerating Station Pascagoula, MS 147,292(c) 
Mississippi Power Total  147,292
Total Cogeneration  611,938
COMBINED CYCLE   
Barry Mobile, AL  
Alabama Power Total  1,070,424
McIntosh Units 10 and 11 Effingham County, GA 1,318,920
McDonough-Atkinson Units 4 through 6 Atlanta, GA 2,520,000
Georgia Power Total  3,838,920
Daniel Pascagoula, MS 1,070,424
Ratcliffe Kemper County, MS 769,898
Mississippi Power Total  1,840,322
Franklin Smiths, AL 1,857,820
Harris Autaugaville, AL 1,318,920
Mankato Mankato, MN 720,000(d) 
Rowan Salisbury, NC 530,550
Wansley Units 6 and 7 Carrollton, GA 1,073,000
Southern Power Total  5,500,290
Total Combined Cycle  12,249,956
I-31
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Generating Station/Ownership Percentage LocationNameplate
Capacity(a)
HYDROELECTRIC FACILITIES   
Bankhead Holt, AL 53,985
Bouldin Wetumpka, AL 225,000
Harris Wedowee, AL 132,000
Henry Ohatchee, AL 72,900
Holt Holt, AL 46,944
Jordan Wetumpka, AL 100,000
Lay Clanton, AL 177,000
Lewis Smith Jasper, AL 157,500
Logan Martin Vincent, AL 135,000
Martin Dadeville, AL 182,000
Mitchell Verbena, AL 170,000
Thurlow Tallassee, AL 81,000
Weiss Leesburg, AL 87,750
Yates Tallassee, AL 47,000
Alabama Power Total  1,668,079
Bartletts Ferry Columbus, GA 173,000
Burton Clayton, GA 6,120
Flint River Albany, GA 5,400
Goat Rock Columbus, GA 38,600
Lloyd Shoals Jackson, GA 14,400
Morgan Falls Atlanta, GA 16,800
Nacoochee Lakemont, GA 4,800
North Highlands Columbus, GA 29,600
Oliver Dam Columbus, GA 60,000
Rocky Mountain (25.4%) Rome, GA 229,362(e) 
Sinclair Dam Milledgeville, GA 45,000
Tallulah Falls Clayton, GA 72,000
Terrora Clayton, GA 16,000
Tugalo Clayton, GA 45,000
Wallace Dam Eatonton, GA 321,300
Yonah Toccoa, GA 22,500
Georgia Power Total  1,099,882
Total Hydroelectric Facilities  2,767,961
I-32
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Generating Station/Ownership Percentage LocationNameplate
Capacity(a)
RENEWABLE SOURCES:   
SOLAR FACILITIES   
Fort Rucker Calhoun County, AL 10,560
Anniston Army Depot Dale County, AL 7,380
Alabama Power Total  17,940
Fort Benning Columbus, GA 30,005
Fort Gordon Augusta, GA 30,000
Fort Stewart Fort Stewart, GA 30,000
Kings Bay Camden County, GA 30,161
Dalton Dalton, GA 6,508
Marine Corps Logistics Base Albany, GA 31,161
6 Other Plants Various Georgia locations 11,171
Georgia Power Total  169,006
Adobe Kern County, CA 20,000
Apex North Las Vegas, NV 20,000
Boulder I Clark County, NV 100,000
Butler Taylor County, GA 104,000
Butler Solar Farm Taylor County, GA 22,000
Calipatria Imperial County, CA 20,000
Campo Verde Imperial County, CA 147,420
Cimarron Springer, NM 30,640
Decatur County Decatur County, GA 20,000
Decatur Parkway Decatur County, GA 84,000
Desert Stateline San Bernadino County, CA 299,900
East Pecos Pecos County, TX 120,000
Garland Kern County, CA 205,290
Gaskell West I Kern County, CA 20,000
Granville Oxford, NC 2,500
Henrietta Kings County, CA 102,000
Imperial Valley Imperial County, CA 163,200
Lamesa Dawson County, TX 102,000
Lost Hills - Blackwell Kern County, CA 32,000
Macho Springs Luna County, NM 55,000
Morelos del Sol Kern County, CA 15,000
North Star Fresno County, CA 61,600
Pawpaw Taylor County, GA 30,480
Roserock Pecos County, TX 160,000
Rutherford Rutherford County, NC 74,800
Sandhills Taylor County, GA 148,000
Spectrum Clark County, NV 30,240
Tranquillity Fresno County, CA 205,300
Southern Power Total  2,395,370(f) 
Total Solar  2,582,316
I-33
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Generating Station/Ownership Percentage LocationNameplate
Capacity(a)
WIND FACILITIES   
Bethel Castro County, TX 276,000
Cactus Flats Concho County, TX 148,350
Grant Plains Grant County, OK 147,200
Grant Wind Grant County, OK 151,800
Kay Wind Kay County, OK 299,000
Passadumkeag Penobscot County, ME 42,900
Salt Fork Donley & Gray Counties TX 174,000
Tyler Bluff Cooke County, TX 125,580
Wake Wind Crosby & Floyd Counties, TX 257,250
Wildhorse Mountain Pushmataha County, OK 100,000
Southern Power Total  1,722,080(g) 
FUEL CELL FACILITY   
Redlion and Brookside (DSGP) New Castle and Newark, DE 27,500(h) 
Southern Power Total  27,500
BATTERY STORAGE FACILITY   
Milliken Orange County, CA 2,000(i) 
Southern Power Total  2,000
Total Alabama Power Generating Capacity  10,793,377
Total Georgia Power Generating Capacity  14,363,156
Total Mississippi Power Generating Capacity  3,516,374
Total Southern Power Generating Capacity  12,247,290
Total Generating Capacity  41,939,877
(a)See "Jointly-Owned Facilities" and "Titles to Property" herein and Note 5 to the financial statements under "Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for
additional information.
(b)Alabama Power and Georgia Power each own 50% of the outstanding common stock of SEGCO, an operating public utility company. Alabama Power and
Georgia Power are each entitled to one-half of SEGCO's capacity and energy. Alabama Power acts as SEGCO's agent in the operation of SEGCO's units and
furnishes fuel to SEGCO for its units. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "SEGCO" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(c)Generation is dedicated to a single industrial customer. See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FINANCIAL CONDITION AND
LIQUIDITY – "Credit Rating Risk" in Item 7 herein.
(d)On January 17, 2020, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interest in Plant Mankato to a subsidiary of Xcel. See Note 15 to the financial statements
under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(e)Operated by OPC.
(f)Southern Power owns a 67% equity interest in SP Solar (a limited partnership indirectly owning all of Southern Power's solar facilities, except the Roserock and
Gaskell West facilities). SP Solar is the 51% majority owner of Boulder 1, Garland, Henrietta, Imperial Valley, Lost Hills Blackwell, North Star, and
Tranquillity; the 66% majority owner of Desert Stateline; and the sole owner of the remaining SP Solar facilities. Southern Power is the 51% majority owner of
Roserock and also the controlling partner in a tax equity partnership owning Gaskell West. All of these entities are consolidated subsidiaries of Southern Power
and the capacity shown in the table is 100% of the nameplate capacity for the respective facility.
(g)Southern Power is the controlling member in SP Wind (a tax equity entity owning all of Southern Power's wind facilities, except Cactus Flats and Wildhorse
Mountain). SP Wind is the 90.1% majority owner of Wake Wind and owns 100% of the remaining SP Wind facilities. Southern Power is the controlling partner
in tax equity partnerships owning Cactus Flats and Wildhorse Mountain. All of these entities are consolidated subsidiaries of Southern Power and the capacity
shown in the table is 100% of the nameplate capacity for the respective facility.
(h)Southern Power has two noncontrolling interest partners that own approximately 10 MWs of the facility.
(i)Southern Power has an equity method investment in the facility as the Class B member.
Except as discussed below under "Titles to Property," the principal plants and other important units of the traditional electric
operating companies, Southern Power, and SEGCO are owned in fee by the respective companies. It is the opinion of management
of each such company that its operating properties are adequately maintained and are substantially in good operating condition, and
suitable for their intended purpose.
Mississippi Power owns a 79-mile length of 500-kilovolt transmission line which is leased to Entergy Gulf States Louisiana, LLC.
The line extends from Plant Daniel to the Louisiana state line. Entergy Gulf States Louisiana, LLC is paying a use fee through 2024
covering all expenses and the amortization of the original cost. At December 31, 2019, the unamortized portion was approximately
$10 million.
I-34
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Mississippi Power owns a lignite mine and equipment that were intended to provide fuel for the Kemper IGCC. Mississippi Power
also has mineral reserves located around the Kemper County energy facility. Liberty Fuels Company, LLC, the operator of the
mine, has a legal obligation to perform mine reclamation and Mississippi Power has a contractual obligation to fund all reclamation
activities. As a result of the abandonment of the Kemper IGCC, final mine reclamation began in 2018 and is expected to be
substantially completed in 2020, with monitoring expected to continue through 2027. See Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility – Lignite Mine and CO2 Pipeline Facilities" in Item 8 herein for additional
information.
In December 2019, Mississippi Power updated its proposed RMP, originally filed in August 2018, which identified alternatives that,
if implemented, could impact Mississippi Power's generating stations, including Plant Greene County, which is jointly owned with
Alabama Power. See BUSINESS in Item 1 herein under "Rate Matters – Integrated Resource Planning – Mississippi Power" and
Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power – Reserve Margin Plan" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
In conjunction with Southern Company's sale of Gulf Power, NextEra Energy held back $75 million of the purchase price pending
Mississippi Power and Gulf Power negotiating a mutually acceptable revised operating agreement for Plant Daniel. In addition,
Mississippi Power and Gulf Power committed to seek a restructuring of their 50% undivided ownership interests in Plant Daniel
such that each of them would, after the restructuring, own 100% of a generating unit. On January 15, 2019, Gulf Power provided
notice to Mississippi Power that Gulf Power will retire its share of the generating capacity of Plant Daniel on January 15,
2024. Mississippi Power has the option to purchase Gulf Power's ownership interest for $1 on January 15, 2024, provided that
Mississippi Power exercises the option no later than 120 days prior to that date. Mississippi Power is assessing the potential
operational and economic effects of Gulf Power's notice. The ultimate outcome of these matters remains subject to completion of
Mississippi Power's evaluations and applicable regulatory approvals, including by the FERC and the Mississippi PSC, and cannot
be determined at this time. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company" in Item 8 herein for information
regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
In 2019, the maximum demand on the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power Company, and SEGCO was
34,209,000 KWs and occurred on August 13, 2019. The all-time maximum demand of 38,777,000 KWs on the traditional electric
operating companies (including Gulf Power), Southern Power Company, and SEGCO occurred on August 22, 2007. These amounts
exclude demand served by capacity retained by MEAG Power, OPC, and SEPA. The reserve margin for the traditional electric
operating companies, Southern Power Company, and SEGCO in 2019 was 28.1%. See SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA in Item 6
herein for additional information.
Jointly-Owned Facilities
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power at December 31, 2019 had undivided interests in certain generating plants
and other related facilities with non-affiliated parties. The percentages of ownership of the total plant or facility are as follows:
  Percentage Ownership   
 Total
CapacityAlabama
Power  Power
South  Geor gia
Power  Mississippi
Power  OPC  MEAG
Power  Dalton  Gulf
Power
 (MWs)          
Plant Miller Units 1
and 2 1,320 91.8% 8.2% —% —% —% —% —% —%
Plant Hatch 1,796 —  —  50.1  —  30.0  17.7  2.2  —
Plant Vogtle Units 1
and 2 2,320 —  —  45.7  —  30.0  22.7  1.6  —
Plant Scherer Units 1
and 2 1,636 —  —  8.4  —  60.0  30.2  1.4  —
Plant Scherer Unit 3 818 —  —  75.0  —  —  —  —  25.0
Plant Wansley 1,779 —  —  53.5  —  30.0  15.1  1.4  —
Rocky Mountain 903 —  —  25.4  —  74.6  —  —  —
Plant Daniel Units 1
and 2 1,000 —  —  —  50.0  —  —  —  50.0
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power have contracted to operate and maintain the respective units in which each
has an interest (other than Rocky Mountain) as agent for the joint owners. Southern Nuclear operates and provides services to
Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's nuclear plants.
In addition, Georgia Power has commitments, in the form of capacity purchases, regarding a portion of a 5% interest in the original
cost of Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 owned by MEAG Power that are in effect until the later of the retirement of the plant or the latest
stated maturity date of MEAG Power's bonds issued to finance such ownership interest. The payments for capacity
I-35
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
are required whether or not any capacity is available. Portions of the capacity payments made to MEAG Power for its Plant Vogtle
Units 1 and 2 investment relate to costs in excess of Georgia Power's allowed investment for ratemaking purposes. The present
value of these portions at the time of the disallowance was written off. Generally, the cost of such capacity is included in purchased
power from non-affiliates in Georgia Power's statements of income in Item 8 herein. Also see Note 3 to the financial statements
under "Commitments" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Construction continues on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which are jointly owned by the Vogtle Owners (with each owner holding the
same undivided ownership interest as shown in the table above with respect to Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2). See Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein.
Titles to Property
The traditional electric operating companies', Southern Power's, and SEGCO's interests in the principal plants and other important
units of the respective companies are owned in fee by such companies, subject to the following major encumbrances: (1) liens
pursuant to the assumption of debt obligations by Mississippi Power in connection with the acquisition of Plant Daniel Units 3 and
4, (2) a leasehold interest granted by Mississippi Power's largest retail customer, Chevron Products Company (Chevron), at the
Chevron refinery, on which five combustion turbines of Mississippi Power are located, (3) liens pursuant to agreements with
Chevron on Mississippi Power's co-generation assets located at the Chevron refinery, and (4) liens associated with Georgia Power's
reimbursement obligations to the DOE under its loan guarantee, which are secured by a first priority lien on (a) Georgia Power's
45.7% undivided ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 and (b) Georgia Power's rights and obligations under the
principal contracts relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Assets Subject to Lien" and
Note 8 to the financial statements under "Secured Debt" and "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" in Item 8
herein for additional information. The traditional electric operating companies own the fee interests in certain of their principal
plants as tenants in common. See "Jointly-Owned Facilities" herein and Note 5 to the financial statements under "Joint Ownership
Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information. Properties such as electric transmission and distribution lines, steam
heating mains, and gas pipelines are constructed principally on rights-of-way, which are maintained under franchise or are held by
easement only. A substantial portion of lands submerged by reservoirs is held under flood right easements. In addition, certain of
the renewable generating facilities occupy or use real property that is not owned, primarily through various leases, easements,
rights-of-way, permits, or licenses from private landowners or governmental entities.
Natural Gas
Southern Company Gas considers its properties to be adequately maintained, substantially in good operating condition, and suitable
for their intended purpose. The following provides the location and general character of the materially important properties that are
used by the segments of Southern Company Gas. Substantially all of Nicor Gas' properties are subject to the lien of the indenture
securing its first mortgage bonds. See Note 8 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Distribution and Transmission Mains
Southern Company Gas' distribution systems transport natural gas from its pipeline suppliers to customers in its service areas.
These systems consist primarily of distribution and transmission mains, compressor stations, peak shaving/storage plants, service
lines, meters, and regulators. At December 31, 2019, Southern Company Gas' gas distribution operations segment owned
approximately 75,585 miles of underground distribution and transmission mains, which are located on easements or rights-of-way
that generally provide for perpetual use.
Storage Assets
Gas Distribution Operations
Southern Company Gas owns and operates eight underground natural gas storage fields in Illinois with a total working capacity of
approximately 150 Bcf, approximately 135 Bcf of which is usually cycled on an annual basis. This system is designed to meet
about 50% of the estimated peak-day deliveries and approximately 40% of the normal winter deliveries in Illinois. This level of
storage capability provides Nicor Gas with supply flexibility, improves the reliability of deliveries, and helps mitigate the risk
associated with seasonal price movements.
Southern Company Gas also has four LNG plants located in Georgia and Tennessee with total LNG storage capacity of
approximately 7.0 Bcf. In addition, Southern Company Gas owns two propane storage facilities in Virginia, each with storage
capacity of approximately 0.3 Bcf. The LNG plants and propane storage facility are used by Southern Company Gas' gas
distribution operations segment to supplement natural gas supply during peak usage periods.
I-36
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
All Other
Southern Company Gas subsidiaries own three high-deliverability natural gas storage and hub facilities that are included in the all
other segment. Jefferson Island Storage & Hub, LLC operates a storage facility in Louisiana consisting of two salt dome gas
storage caverns. See Note 3 to the financial statements under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas – Natural Gas Storage
Facilities" in Item 8 herein for additional information on a related impairment charge recorded in 2019. Golden Triangle Storage,
Inc. operates a storage facility in Texas consisting of two salt dome caverns. Central Valley Gas Storage, LLC operates a depleted
field storage facility in California. In addition, Southern Company Gas has a LNG facility in Alabama that produces LNG for
Pivotal LNG to support its business of selling LNG as a substitute fuel in various markets. See Notes 3, 7, and 15 to the financial
statements under "Southern Company Gas – Gas Pipeline Projects," "Southern Company Gas – Equity Method Investments," and
"Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline," respectively, in Item 8 herein for additional
information.
Jointly-Owned Properties
Southern Company Gas' gas pipeline investments segment has a 50% undivided ownership interest in a 115-mile pipeline facility in
northwest Georgia that was placed in service in 2017. Southern Company Gas also has an agreement to lease its 50% undivided
ownership in the pipeline facility. See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for
additional information.
I-37
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Item 3.LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
See Note 3 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for descriptions of legal and administrative proceedings discussed therein.
Item 4.MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
I-38
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
INFORMATION ABOUT OUR EXECUTIVE OFFICERS – SOUTHERN COMPANY
(Identification of executive officers of Southern Company is inserted in Part I in accordance with Regulation S-K, Item 401) The
ages of the officers set forth below are as of December 31, 2019.
Thomas A. Fanning
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
Age 62
First elected in 2003. Chairman and Chief Executive Officer since December 2010 and President since August 2010.
Andrew W. Evans
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Age 53
First elected in 2016. Executive Vice President since July 2016 and Chief Financial Officer since June 2018. Previously served as
Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of Southern Company Gas' Board of Directors from January 2016 through June 2018,
President of Southern Company Gas from May 2015 through June 2018, Chief Operating Officer of Southern Company Gas from
May 2015 through December 2015, and Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Southern Company Gas from May
2006 through May 2015.
W. Paul Bowers
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of Georgia Power
Age 63
First elected in 2001. Chief Executive Officer, President, and Director of Georgia Power since January 2011. Chairman of Georgia
Power's Board of Directors since May 2014.
Stanley W. Connally, Jr.
Executive Vice President of SCS
Age 50
First elected in 2012. Executive Vice President for Operations of SCS since June 2018. Previously served as President, Chief
Executive Officer, and Director of Gulf Power from July 2012 through December 2018 and Chairman of Gulf Power's Board of
Directors from July 2015 through December 2018.
Mark A. Crosswhite
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of Alabama Power
Age 57
First elected in 2011. President, Chief Executive Officer, and Director of Alabama Power since March 2014. Chairman of Alabama
Power's Board of Directors since May 2014.
Kimberly S. Greene
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Company Gas
Age 53
First elected in 2013. Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Company Gas since June 2018. Director of
Southern Company Gas since July 2016. Previously served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of Southern
Company from March 2014 through June 2018.
James Y. Kerr II
Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer, and Chief Compliance Officer
Age 55
First elected in 2014. Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer (formerly known as General Counsel), and Chief Compliance
Officer since March 2014.
Stephen E. Kuczynski
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Nuclear
Age 57
First elected in 2011. Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Nuclear since July 2011.
Mark S. Lantrip
Executive Vice President
Age 65
First elected in 2014. Executive Vice President since February 2019. Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of SCS
since March 2014 and Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Power since March 2018. Previously served as President
of Southern Power from March 2018 to May 2019.
I-39
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Anthony L. Wilson
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Mississippi Power
Age 55
First elected in 2015. President of Mississippi Power since October 2015 and Chief Executive Officer and Director since January
2016. Chairman of Mississippi Power's Board of Directors since August 2016. Previously served as Executive Vice President of
Mississippi Power from May 2015 to October 2015 and Executive Vice President of Georgia Power from January 2012 to May
2015.
Christopher C. Womack
Executive Vice President
Age 61
First elected in 2008. Executive Vice President and President of External Affairs since January 2009.
The officers of Southern Company were elected at the first meeting of the directors following the last annual meeting of
stockholders held on May 22, 2019, for a term of one year or until their successors are elected and have qualified.
I-40
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
INFORMATION ABOUT OUR EXECUTIVE OFFICERS – ALABAMA POWER
(Identification of executive officers of Alabama Power is inserted in Part I in accordance with Regulation S-K, Item 401.) The ages
of the officers set forth below are as of December 31, 2019.
Mark A. Crosswhite
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
Age 57
First elected in 2014. President, Chief Executive Officer, and Director since March 1, 2014. Chairman since May 2014.
Greg J. Barker
Executive Vice President
Age 56
First elected in 2016. Executive Vice President for Customer Services since February 2016. Previously served as Senior Vice
President of Marketing and Economic Development from April 2012 to February 2016.
Philip C. Raymond
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
Age 60
First elected in 2010. Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer since August 2010.
Zeke W. Smith
Executive Vice President
Age 60
First elected in 2010. Executive Vice President of External Affairs since November 2010.
James P. Heilbron
Senior Vice President and Senior Production Officer
Age 48
First elected in 2013. Senior Vice President and Senior Production Officer of Alabama Power since March 2013 and Senior Vice
President and Senior Production Officer – West of SCS and Senior Production Officer of Mississippi Power since October 2018.
R. Scott Moore
Senior Vice President
Age 52
First elected in 2017. Senior Vice President of Power Delivery since May 2017. Previously served as Vice President of
Transmission from August 2012 to May 2017.
The officers of Alabama Power were elected at the meeting of the directors held on April 26, 2019 for a term of one year or until
their successors are elected and have qualified.
I-41
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
PART II
Item 5.MARKET FOR REGISTRANTS' COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
(a)(1) The common stock of Southern Company is listed and traded on the NYSE under the ticker symbol SO. The common stock
is also traded on regional exchanges across the U.S.
There is no market for the other Registrants' common stock, all of which is owned by Southern Company.
(a)(2) Number of Southern Company's common stockholders of record at January 31, 2020: 110,780
Southern Company has paid dividends on its common stock since 1948. Dividends paid per share of common stock were $2.46 in
2019 and $2.38 in 2018. In January 2020, Southern Company declared a quarterly dividend of 62 cents per share. Dividends on
Southern Company's common stock are payable at the discretion of Southern Company's Board of Directors and depend upon
earnings, financial condition, and other factors. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Dividend Restrictions" in Item 8
herein for additional information.
Each of the other Registrants have one common stockholder, Southern Company.
(a)(3) Securities authorized for issuance under equity compensation plans.
See Part III, Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.
(b) Use of Proceeds
Not applicable.
(c) Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
None.
II-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Item 6.SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
 Page
Southern Company II-3
Alabama Power II-6
Georgia Power II-8
Mississippi Power II-10
Southern Power II-12
Southern Company Gas II-13
II-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019(d)2018 2017 2016(e)2015
Operating Revenues (in millions) $ 21,419$ 23,495$ 23,031$ 19,896$ 17,489
Total Assets (in millions) $ 118,700$ 116,914$ 111,005$ 109,697$ 78,318
Gross Property Additions (in millions) $ 7,814$ 8,205$ 5,984$ 7,624$ 6,169
Return on Average Common Equity (percent)(a)18.15 9.11 3.44 10.80 11.68
Cash Dividends Paid Per Share of
 Common Stock $ 2.4600$ 2.3800$ 2.3000$ 2.2225$ 2.1525
Consolidated Net Income Attributable to
   Southern Company (in millions)(a)$ 4,739$ 2,226$ 842$ 2,448$ 2,367
Earnings Per Share —   
Basic $ 4.53$ 2.18$ 0.84$ 2.57$ 2.60
Diluted 4.50 2.17 0.84 2.55 2.59
Capitalization (in millions):   
Common stockholders' equity $ 27,505$ 24,723$ 24,167$ 24,758$ 20,592
Preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries and
   noncontrolling interests(b)4,254 4,316 1,361 1,854 1,390
Redeemable preferred stock of subsidiaries 291 291 324 118 118
Redeemable noncontrolling interests — — — 164 43
Long-term debt(c)41,798 40,736 44,462 42,629 24,688
Total (excluding amounts due within one year)(c)$ 73,848$ 70,066$ 70,314$ 69,523$ 46,831
Capitalization Ratios (percent):   
Common stockholders' equity 37.2 35.3 34.4 35.6 44.0
Preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries and
   noncontrolling interests(b)5.8 6.2 1.9 2.7 3.0
Redeemable preferred stock of subsidiaries 0.4 0.4 0.5 0.2 0.3
Redeemable noncontrolling interests — — — 0.2 0.1
Long-term debt(c)56.6 58.1 63.2 61.3 52.6
Total (excluding amounts due within one year)(c)100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Other Common Stock Data:   
Book value per share $ 26.11$ 23.91$ 23.99$ 25.00$ 22.59
Market price per share:   
High $ 64.26$ 49.43$ 53.51$ 54.64$ 53.16
Low 43.26 42.38 46.71 46.00 41.40
Close (year-end) 63.70 43.92 48.09 49.19 46.79
Market-to-book ratio (year-end) (percent) 243.9 183.7 200.5 196.8 207.2
Price-earnings ratio (year-end) (times) 14.1 20.1 57.3 19.1 18.0
Dividends paid (in millions) $ 2,570$ 2,425$ 2,300$ 2,104$ 1,959
Dividend yield (year-end) (percent) 3.9 5.4 4.8 4.5 4.6
Dividend payout ratio (percent) 54.2 108.9 273.2 86.0 82.7
Shares outstanding (in thousands):   
Average 1,046,023 1,020,247 1,000,336 951,332 910,024
Year-end 1,053,251 1,033,788 1,007,603 990,394 911,721
Stockholders of record (year-end) 111,252 116,135 120,803 126,338 131,771
(a)Southern Company recorded a $2.6 billion pre-tax ($1.4 billion after tax) gain associated with the sale of Gulf Power in 2019. Georgia Power recorded a pre-tax
estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the second quarter 2018 to reflect its revised estimate to complete construction and start-up of
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In addition, pre-tax charges of $3.4 billion ($2.4 billion after tax) were recorded by Mississippi Power related to the suspension of
the Kemper IGCC in 2017. Earnings in all periods presented were impacted by losses related to the Kemper IGCC. See Notes 2 and 15 to the financial
statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(b)See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Renewable Facility Interests" in Item 8 herein for additional information on 2018
changes in noncontrolling interests.
(c)Amounts related to Gulf Power were reclassified to liabilities held for sale at December 31, 2018. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(d)The 2019 selected financial and operating data excludes Gulf Power, which was sold effective January 1, 2019. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(e)The 2016 selected financial and operating data includes the operations of Southern Company Gas from the date of the Merger, July 1, 2016, through
December 31, 2016.
II-3
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019 (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019(a) 2018 2017  2016(b)2015
Operating Revenues (in millions):      
Residential $ 6,012 $ 6,608$ 6,515 $ 6,614$ 6,383
Commercial 4,936 5,266 5,439 5,394 5,317
Industrial 3,021 3,224 3,262 3,171 3,172
Other 115 124 114 55 115
Total retail 14,084 15,222 15,330 15,234 14,987
Wholesale 2,152 2,516 2,426 1,926 1,798
Total revenues from sales of electricity 16,236 17,738 17,756 17,160 16,785
Natural gas revenues 3,792 3,854 3,791 1,596 —
Other revenues 1,391 1,903 1,484 1,140 704
Total $ 21,419 $ 23,495$ 23,031 $ 19,896$ 17,489
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):      
Residential 48,528 54,590 50,536 53,337 52,121
Commercial 49,101 53,451 52,340 53,733 53,525
Industrial 50,106 53,341 52,785 52,792 53,941
Other 726 799 846 883 897
Total retail 148,461 162,181 156,507 160,745 160,484
Wholesale sales 48,027 49,963 49,034 37,043 30,505
Total 196,488 212,144 205,541 197,788 190,989
Average Revenue Per Kilowatt-Hour (cents):      
Residential 12.39 12.10 12.89 12.40 12.25
Commercial 10.05 9.85 10.39 10.04 9.93
Industrial 6.03 6.04 6.18 6.01 5.88
Total retail 9.49 9.39 9.80 9.48 9.34
Wholesale 4.48 5.04 4.95 5.20 5.89
Total sales 8.26 8.36 8.64 8.68 8.79
Average Annual Kilowatt-Hour      
Use Per Residential Customer 12,135 12,514 11,618 12,387 13,318
Average Annual Revenue      
Per Residential Customer $ 1,503 $ 1,555$ 1,498 $ 1,541$ 1,630
Plant Nameplate Capacity      
Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 41,940 45,824 46,936 46,291 44,223
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):      
Winter 30,022 36,429 31,956 32,272 36,794
Summer 34,209 34,841 34,874 35,781 36,195
System Reserve Margin (at peak) (percent) 28.1 29.8 30.8 34.2 33.2
Annual Load Factor (percent) 60.3 61.2 61.4 61.5 59.9
Plant Availability (percent):      
Fossil-steam 83.8 81.4 84.5 86.4 86.1
Nuclear 92.5 94.0 94.7 93.3 93.5
(a)The 2019 selected financial and operating data excludes Gulf Power, which was sold effective January 1, 2019. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(b)The 2016 selected financial and operating data includes the operations of Southern Company Gas from the date of the Merger, July 1, 2016, through
December 31, 2016.
II-4
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019 (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019(a) 2018 2017  2016(b)2015
Source of Energy Supply (percent):      
Gas 47.0 43.0 42.6 41.9 42.8
Coal 20.3 25.7 26.5 30.2 32.2
Nuclear 14.7 13.8 14.5 14.6 15.3
Hydro 3.2 2.9 2.1 2.1 2.6
Other 5.9 5.4 5.3 2.3 0.8
Purchased power 8.9 9.2 9.0 8.9 6.3
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Gas Sales Volumes (mmBtu in millions):      
Firm 737 791 729 296 —
Interruptible 106 109 109 53 —
Total 843 900 838 349 —
Traditional Electric Operating Company
   Customers (year-end) (in thousands):      
Residential 3,688 4,053 4,011 3,970 3,928
Commercial 549 603 599 595 590
Industrial 17 17 18 17 17
Other 12 12 12 11 11
Total electric customers 4,266 4,685 4,640 4,593 4,546
Gas distribution operations customers 4,277 4,248 4,623 4,586 —
Total utility customers 8,543 8,933 9,263 9,179 4,546
Employees (year-end) 27,943 30,286 31,344 32,015 26,703
(a)The 2019 selected financial and operating data excludes Gulf Power, which was sold effective January 1, 2019. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(b)The 2016 selected financial and operating data includes the operations of Southern Company Gas from the date of the Merger, July 1, 2016, through
December 31, 2016.
II-5
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018 2017 2016  2015
Operating Revenues (in millions) $ 6,125 $ 6,032$ 6,039$ 5,889 $ 5,768
Net Income After Dividends
on Preferred and Preference Stock (in millions)$ 1,070 $ 930$ 848$ 822 $ 785
Cash Dividends on Common Stock (in millions)$ 844 $ 801$ 714$ 765 $ 571
Return on Average Common Equity (percent) 13.03 13.00 12.89 13.34 13.37
Total Assets (in millions) $ 29,152 $ 26,730$ 23,864$ 22,516 $ 21,721
Gross Property Additions (in millions) $ 1,862 $ 2,273$ 1,949$ 1,338 $ 1,492
Capitalization (in millions):      
Common stockholder's equity $ 8,955 $ 7,477$ 6,829$ 6,323 $ 5,992
Preference stock — — — 196 196
Redeemable preferred stock 291 291 291 85 85
Long-term debt 8,270 7,923 7,628 6,535 6,654
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) $ 17,516 $ 15,691$ 14,748$ 13,139 $ 12,927
Capitalization Ratios (percent):      
Common stockholder's equity 51.1 47.7 46.3 48.1 46.4
Preference stock — — — 1.5 1.5
Redeemable preferred stock 1.7 1.9 2.0 0.7 0.7
Long-term debt 47.2 50.4 51.7 49.7 51.4
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Customers (year-end):      
Residential 1,280,955 1,273,526 1,268,271 1,262,752 1,253,875
Commercial 200,349 200,032 199,840 199,146 197,920
Industrial 6,173 6,158 6,171 6,090 6,056
Other 758 760 766 762 757
Total 1,488,235 1,480,476 1,475,048 1,468,750 1,458,608
Employees (year-end) 6,324 6,650 6,613 6,805 6,986
II-6
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019 (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018 2017  2016 2015
Operating Revenues (in millions):      
Residential $ 2,449 $ 2,335$ 2,302 $ 2,322$ 2,207
Commercial 1,635 1,578 1,649 1,627 1,564
Industrial 1,393 1,428 1,477 1,416 1,436
Other 24 26 30 (43) 27
Total retail 5,501 5,367 5,458 5,322 5,234
Wholesale — non-affiliates 258 279 276 283 241
Wholesale — affiliates 81 119 97 69 84
Total revenues from sales of electricity 5,840 5,765 5,831 5,674 5,559
Other revenues 285 267 208 215 209
Total $ 6,125 $ 6,032$ 6,039 $ 5,889$ 5,768
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):      
Residential 18,264 18,626 17,219 18,343 18,082
Commercial 13,567 13,868 13,606 14,091 14,102
Industrial 22,148 23,006 22,687 22,310 23,380
Other 173 187 198 208 201
Total retail 54,152 55,687 53,710 54,952 55,765
Wholesale — non-affiliates 5,057 5,018 5,415 5,744 3,567
Wholesale — affiliates 3,530 4,565 4,166 3,177 4,515
Total 62,739 65,270 63,291 63,873 63,847
Average Revenue Per Kilowatt-Hour (cents):      
Residential 13.41 12.54 13.37 12.66 12.21
Commercial 12.05 11.38 12.12 11.55 11.09
Industrial 6.29 6.21 6.51 6.35 6.14
Total retail 10.16 9.64 10.16 9.68 9.39
Wholesale 3.95 4.15 3.89 3.95 4.02
Total sales 9.31 8.83 9.21 8.88 8.71
Residential Average Annual
Kilowatt-Hour Use Per Customer 14,290 14,660 13,601 14,568 14,454
Residential Average Annual
Revenue Per Customer $ 1,916 $ 1,878$ 1,819 $ 1,844$ 1,764
Plant Nameplate Capacity
Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 10,793 11,815 11,797 11,797 11,797
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):      
Winter 10,104 11,744 10,513 10,282 12,162
Summer 11,211 10,652 10,711 10,932 11,292
Annual Load Factor (percent) 60.8 60.1 63.5 63.5 58.4
Plant Availability (percent):      
Fossil-steam 85.9 81.6 82.8 83.0 81.5
Nuclear 91.0 91.6 97.6 88.0 92.1
Source of Energy Supply (percent):      
Coal 38.7 43.8 44.8 47.1 49.1
Nuclear 21.3 20.5 22.2 20.3 21.3
Gas 18.5 17.2 18.1 17.1 14.6
Hydro 7.3 6.7 5.4 4.8 5.6
Purchased power —      
From non-affiliates 6.0 5.4 4.6 4.8 4.4
From affiliates 8.2 6.4 4.9 5.9 5.0
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
II-7
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019 2018  2017  2016 2015
Operating Revenues (in millions) $ 8,408$ 8,420 $ 8,310 $ 8,383$ 8,326
Net Income After Dividends
on Preferred and Preference Stock (in millions)(*)$ 1,720$ 793 $ 1,414 $ 1,330$ 1,260
Cash Dividends on Common Stock (in millions) $ 1,576$ 1,396 $ 1,281 $ 1,305$ 1,034
Return on Average Common Equity (percent)(*)11.71 6.04 12.15 12.05 11.92
Total Assets (in millions) $ 44,541$ 40,365 $ 36,779 $ 34,835$ 32,865
Gross Property Additions (in millions) $ 3,659$ 3,176 $ 1,080 $ 2,314$ 2,332
Capitalization (in millions):     
Common stockholder's equity $ 15,065$ 14,323 $ 11,931 $ 11,356$ 10,719
Preferred and preference stock — — — 266 266
Long-term debt 10,791 9,364 11,073 10,225 9,616
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) $ 25,856$ 23,687 $ 23,004 $ 21,847$ 20,601
Capitalization Ratios (percent):     
Common stockholder's equity 58.3 60.5 51.9 52.0 52.0
Preferred and preference stock — — — 1.2 1.3
Long-term debt 41.7 39.5 48.1 46.8 46.7
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Customers (year-end):     
Residential 2,253,188 2,220,240 2,185,782 2,155,945 2,127,658
Commercial 315,328 312,474 308,939 305,488 302,891
Industrial 10,622 10,571 10,644 10,537 10,429
Other 9,819 9,838 9,766 9,585 9,261
Total 2,588,957 2,553,123 2,515,131 2,481,555 2,450,239
Employees (year-end) 6,938 6,967 6,986 7,527 7,989
(*)Georgia Power recorded a pre-tax estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the second quarter 2018 to reflect its revised estimate to
complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
II-8
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019 (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018 2017  2016 2015
Operating Revenues (in millions):     
Residential $ 3,287 $ 3,301$ 3,236 $ 3,318$ 3,240
Commercial 3,014 3,023 3,092 3,077 3,094
Industrial 1,326 1,344 1,321 1,291 1,305
Other 80 84 89 86 88
Total retail 7,707 7,752 7,738 7,772 7,727
Wholesale — non-affiliates 129 163 163 175 215
Wholesale — affiliates 11 24 26 42 20
Total revenues from sales of electricity 7,847 7,939 7,927 7,989 7,962
Other revenues 561 481 383 394 364
Total $ 8,408 $ 8,420$ 8,310 $ 8,383$ 8,326
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):     
Residential 28,201 28,331 26,144 27,585 26,649
Commercial 32,818 32,958 32,155 32,932 32,719
Industrial 23,163 23,655 23,518 23,746 23,805
Other 518 549 584 610 632
Total retail 84,700 85,493 82,401 84,873 83,805
Wholesale — non-affiliates 2,646 3,140 3,277 3,415 3,501
Wholesale — affiliates 335 526 800 1,398 552
Total 87,681 89,159 86,478 89,686 87,858
Average Revenue Per Kilowatt-Hour (cents):     
Residential 11.66 11.65 12.38 12.03 12.16
Commercial 9.18 9.17 9.62 9.34 9.46
Industrial 5.72 5.68 5.62 5.44 5.48
Total retail 9.10 9.07 9.39 9.16 9.22
Wholesale 4.70 5.10 4.64 4.51 5.80
Total sales 8.95 8.90 9.17 8.91 9.06
Residential Average Annual
Kilowatt-Hour Use Per Customer 12,600 12,849 12,028 12,864 12,582
Residential Average Annual
Revenue Per Customer $ 1,469 $ 1,555$ 1,489 $ 1,557$ 1,529
Plant Nameplate Capacity
Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 14,363 15,308 15,274 15,274 15,455
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):     
Winter 14,394 15,372 13,894 14,527 15,735
Summer 16,572 15,748 16,002 16,244 16,104
Annual Load Factor (percent) 60.8 64.5 61.1 61.9 61.9
Plant Availability (percent):     
Fossil-steam 81.0 81.5 85.0 87.4 85.6
Nuclear 93.1 95.0 93.5 95.6 94.1
Source of Energy Supply (percent):     
Gas 32.3 29.1 28.6 28.2 28.3
Nuclear 17.4 17.6 17.8 17.6 17.6
Coal 16.4 21.1 22.4 26.4 24.5
Hydro 1.8 1.9 1.0 1.1 1.6
Other 0.3 0.3 0.3 — —
Purchased power —     
From non-affiliates 11.3 7.3 7.8 6.7 5.0
From affiliates 20.5 22.7 22.1 20.0 23.0
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
II-9
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019
Mississippi Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018  2017 2016 2015
Operating Revenues (in millions) $ 1,264 $ 1,265 $ 1,187$ 1,163$ 1,138
Net Income (Loss) After Dividends
on Preferred Stock (in millions)(a)(b)$ 139 $ 235 $ (2,590)$ (50)$ (8)
Return on Average Common Equity (percent)(a)
(b) 8.54 15.83 (120.43) (1.87) (0.34)
Total Assets (in millions) $ 5,035 $ 4,886 $ 4,866$ 8,235$ 7,840
Gross Property Additions (in millions) $ 197 $ 206 $ 536$ 946$ 972
Capitalization (in millions):      
Common stockholder's equity $ 1,652 $ 1,609 $ 1,358$ 2,943$ 2,359
Redeemable preferred stock — — 33 33 33
Long-term debt 1,308 1,539 1,097 2,424 1,886
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) $ 2,960 $ 3,148 $ 2,488$ 5,400$ 4,278
Capitalization Ratios (percent):      
Common stockholder's equity 55.8 51.1 54.6 54.5 55.1
Redeemable preferred stock — — 1.3 0.6 0.8
Long-term debt 44.2 48.9 44.1 44.9 44.1
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Customers (year-end):      
Residential 154,205 153,423 153,115 153,172 153,158
Commercial 33,552 33,968 33,992 33,783 33,663
Industrial 444 445 452 451 467
Other 189 188 173 175 175
Total 188,390 188,024 187,732 187,581 187,463
Employees (year-end) 1,030 1,053 1,242 1,484 1,478
(a)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, Mississippi Power recorded an income tax expense (benefit) of $(35) million and $372 million in 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
(b)Pre-tax charges of $3.4 billion ($2.4 billion after tax) were recorded by Mississippi Power related to the suspension of the Kemper IGCC in 2017. Earnings in
all periods presented were impacted by losses related to the Kemper IGCC.
II-10
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019 (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018 2017  2016 2015
Operating Revenues (in millions):      
Residential $ 276 $ 273$ 257 $ 260$ 238
Commercial 287 286 285 279 256
Industrial 302 321 321 313 287
Other 12 9 (9) 7 (5)
Total retail 877 889 854 859 776
Wholesale — non-affiliates 237 263 259 261 270
Wholesale — affiliates 132 91 56 26 76
Total revenues from sales of electricity 1,246 1,243 1,169 1,146 1,122
Other revenues 18 22 18 17 16
Total $ 1,264 $ 1,265$ 1,187 $ 1,163$ 1,138
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):      
Residential 2,062 2,113 1,944 2,051 2,025
Commercial 2,715 2,797 2,764 2,842 2,806
Industrial 4,795 4,924 4,841 4,906 4,958
Other 36 37 39 39 40
Total retail 9,608 9,871 9,588 9,838 9,829
Wholesale — non-affiliates 3,967 3,980 3,672 3,920 3,852
Wholesale — affiliates 4,758 2,584 2,024 1,108 2,807
Total 18,333 16,435 15,284 14,866 16,488
Average Revenue Per Kilowatt-Hour (cents):      
Residential 13.39 12.92 13.22 12.68 11.75
Commercial 10.57 10.23 10.31 9.82 9.12
Industrial 6.30 6.52 6.63 6.38 5.79
Total retail 9.13 9.01 8.91 8.73 7.90
Wholesale 4.23 5.39 5.53 5.71 5.20
Total sales 6.80 7.56 7.65 7.71 6.80
Residential Average Annual
Kilowatt-Hour Use Per Customer 13,391 13,768 12,692 13,383 13,242
Residential Average Annual
Revenue Per Customer $ 1,795 $ 1,780$ 1,680 $ 1,697$ 1,556
Plant Nameplate Capacity
Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 3,516 3,516 3,628 3,481 3,561
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):      
Winter 2,129 2,763 2,390 2,195 2,548
Summer 2,310 2,346 2,322 2,384 2,403
Annual Load Factor (percent) 64.6 55.8 63.1 64.0 60.6
Plant Availability Fossil-Steam (percent) 89.1 82.4 89.1 91.4 90.6
Source of Energy Supply (percent):      
Gas 91.7 87.4 90.4 86.4 82.3
Coal 5.5 6.9 7.6 8.1 16.6
Purchased power —      
From non-affiliates 2.1 3.3 (2.1) (2.0) (0.4)
From affiliates 0.7 2.4 4.1 7.5 1.5
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
II-11
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018 2017  2016 2015
Operating Revenues (in millions):      
Wholesale — non-affiliates $ 1,528 $ 1,757$ 1,671 $ 1,146$ 964
Wholesale — affiliates 398 435 392 419 417
Total revenues from sales of electricity 1,926 2,192 2,063 1,565 1,381
Other revenues 12 13 12 12 9
Total $ 1,938 $ 2,205$ 2,075 $ 1,577$ 1,390
Net Income Attributable to
   Southern Power (in millions)(a)$ 339 $ 187$ 1,071 $ 338$ 215
Cash Dividends
   on Common Stock (in millions) $ 206 $ 312$ 317 $ 272$ 131
Return on Average Common Equity (percent)(a)12.69 4.62 22.39 9.79 10.16
Total Assets (in millions) $ 14,300 $ 14,883$ 15,206 $ 15,169$ 8,905
Property, Plant, and Equipment —
   In Service (in millions) $ 13,270 $ 13,271$ 13,755 $ 12,728$ 7,275
Capitalization (in millions):      
Common stockholders' equity(b)$ 2,368 $ 2,968$ 5,138 $ 4,430$ 2,483
Noncontrolling interests(b)4,254 4,316 1,360 1,245 781
Redeemable noncontrolling interests — — — 164 43
Long-term debt 3,574 4,418 5,071 5,068 2,719
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) $ 10,196 $ 11,702$ 11,569 $ 10,907$ 6,026
Capitalization Ratios (percent):      
Common stockholders' equity(b)23.2 25.4 44.4 40.6 41.2
Noncontrolling interests(b)41.7 36.9 11.8 11.4 13.0
Redeemable noncontrolling interests — — — 1.5 0.7
Long-term debt 35.1 37.7 43.8 46.5 45.1
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):      
Wholesale — non-affiliates 36,358 37,164 35,920 23,213 18,544
Wholesale — affiliates 12,928 12,603 12,811 15,950 16,567
Total 49,286 49,767 48,731 39,163 35,111
Plant Nameplate Capacity
   Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 12,247 11,888 12,940 12,442 9,808
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):      
Winter 3,436 2,867 3,421 3,469 3,923
Summer 4,460 4,210 4,224 4,303 4,249
Annual Load Factor (percent) 49.8 52.2 49.1 50.0 49.0
Plant Availability (percent) 98.8 99.9 99.9 91.6 93.1
Source of Energy Supply (percent):      
Natural gas 69.5 68.1 67.7 79.4 89.5
Solar, Wind, and Biomass 23.7 23.6 22.8 12.1 4.3
Purchased power —      
From non-affiliates 6.1 6.6 7.8 6.8 4.7
From affiliates 0.7 1.7 1.7 1.7 1.5
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Employees (year-end)(c)460 491 541 — —
(a)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, Southern Power recorded an income tax expense (benefit) of $79 million and $(743) million in 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
(b)See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Renewable Facility Interests" in Item 8 herein for additional information on 2018
changes in noncontrolling interests.
(c)Prior to December 2017, Southern Power had no employees but was billed for employee-related costs from SCS.
II-12
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Successor(a) Predecessor(a)
 2019 2018(b)2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31,
2016  January 1,
2016 through
June 30, 2016 2015
Operating Revenues (in millions)$ 3,792$ 3,909$ 3,920$ 1,652 $ 1,905$ 3,941
Net Income Attributable to
Southern Company Gas
(in millions)(c)$ 585$ 372$ 243$ 114 $ 131$ 353
Cash Dividends on Common
Stock
(in millions) $ 471$ 468$ 443$ 126 $ 128$ 244
Return on Average Common
Equity
(percent)(c)6.47 4.23 2.68 1.74 3.31 9.05
Total Assets (in millions) $ 21,687$ 21,448$ 22,987$ 21,853 $ 14,488$ 14,754
Gross Property Additions
(in millions) $ 1,418$ 1,399$ 1,525$ 632 $ 548$ 1,027
Capitalization (in millions):        
Common stockholders' equity $ 9,506$ 8,570$ 9,022$ 9,109 $ 3,933$ 3,975
Long-term debt 5,845 5,583 5,891 5,259 3,709 3,275
Total (excluding amounts due within
one year) $ 15,351$ 14,153$ 14,913$ 14,368 $ 7,642$ 7,250
Capitalization Ratios (percent):        
Common stockholders' equity 61.9 60.6 60.5 63.4 51.5 54.8
Long-term debt 38.1 39.4 39.5 36.6 48.5 45.2
Total (excluding amounts due within
one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Service Contracts (period-end) — — 1,184,257 1,198,263 1,197,096 1,205,476
Customers (period-end)        
Gas distribution operations 4,277,219 4,247,804 4,623,249 4,586,477 4,544,489 4,557,729
Gas marketing services 630,682 697,384 773,984 655,999 630,475 654,475
Total 4,907,901 4,945,188 5,397,233 5,242,476 5,174,964 5,212,204
Employees (period-end) 4,446 4,389 5,318 5,292 5,284 5,203
(a)As a result of the Merger, pushdown accounting was applied to create a new cost basis for Southern Company Gas' assets, liabilities, and equity as of the
acquisition date. Accordingly, the successor financial statements reflect the new basis of accounting, and successor and predecessor period financial results are
presented but are not comparable.
(b)During 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the Southern Company Gas Dispositions. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company
Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(c)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, Southern Company Gas recorded income tax expense of $93 million in 2017.
II-13
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2015-2019 (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Successor(a) Predecessor(a)
 2019 2018(b)2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31,
2016  January 1,
2016 through
June 30, 2016 2015
Operating Revenues (in millions)      
Residential $ 1,737$ 1,886$ 2,100$ 899 $ 1,101 $ 2,129
Commercial 485 546 641 260 310 617
Transportation 907 944 811 269 290 526
Industrial 121 140 159 74 72 203
Other 542 393 209 150 132 466
Total $ 3,792$ 3,909$ 3,920$ 1,652 $ 1,905 $ 3,941
Heating Degree Days:      
Illinois 6,136 6,101 5,246 1,903 3,340 5,433
Georgia 2,157 2,588 1,970 727 1,448 2,204
Gas Sales Volumes
(mmBtu in millions):      
Gas distribution operations      
Firm 677 721 667 274 396 695
Interruptible 92 95 95 47 49 99
Total 769 816 762 321 445 794
Gas marketing services      
Firm:      
Georgia 33 37 32 13 21 35
Illinois 12 13 12 4 8 13
Other 15 20 18 5 7 11
Interruptible large commercial and
industrial 14 14 14 6 8 14
Total 74 84 76 28 44 73
Market share in Georgia (percent) 28.9 29.0 29.2 29.4 29.3 29.7
Wholesale gas services      
Daily physical sales (mmBtu in
millions/day) 6.4 6.7 6.4 7.2 7.6 6.8
(a)As a result of the Merger, pushdown accounting was applied to create a new cost basis for Southern Company Gas' assets, liabilities, and equity as of the
acquisition date. Accordingly, the successor financial statements reflect the new basis of accounting, and successor and predecessor period financial results are
presented but are not comparable.
(b)During 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the Southern Company Gas Dispositions. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company
Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
II-14
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Item 7.MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
Page
Combined Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Overview II-16
Results of Operations II-20
Southern Company II-20
Alabama Power II-30
Georgia Power II-34
Mississippi Power II-39
Southern Power II-43
Southern Company Gas II-47
Future Earnings Potential II-57
Accounting Policies II-90
Financial Condition and Liquidity II-100
This section generally discusses 2019 and 2018 items and year-to-year comparisons between 2019 and 2018. Discussions
of 2017 items and year-to-year comparisons between 2018 and 2017 that are not included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K can
be found in Item 7 of each Registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018, which was filed with
the SEC on February 19, 2019. The following Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations is a combined presentation; however, information contained herein relating to any individual Registrant is filed by such
Registrant on its own behalf and each Registrant makes no representation as to information related to the other Registrants.
Item 7A.QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Market Price Risk"
in Item 7 herein and Note 1 to the financial statements under "Financial Instruments" in Item 8 herein. Also see Notes 13 and 14 to
the financial statements in Item 8 herein.
II-15
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements    
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
OVERVIEW
Business Activities
Southern Company is a holding company that owns all of the common stock of three traditional electric operating companies, as
well as the parent entities of Southern Power and Southern Company Gas, and owns other direct and indirect subsidiaries. The
primary businesses of the Southern Company system are electricity sales by the traditional electric operating companies and
Southern Power and the distribution of natural gas by Southern Company Gas. Southern Company's reportable segments are the
sale of electricity by the traditional electric operating companies, the sale of electricity in the competitive wholesale market by
Southern Power, and the sale of natural gas and other complementary products and services by Southern Company Gas.
•The traditional electric operating companies – Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power – are vertically
integrated utilities providing electric service to retail customers in three Southeastern states in addition to wholesale
customers in the Southeast.
•Southern Power develops, constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including renewable energy
projects, and sells electricity at market-based rates in the wholesale market. Southern Power continually seeks
opportunities to execute its strategy to create value through various transactions including acquisitions, dispositions, and
sales of partnership interests, development and construction of new generating facilities, and entry into PPAs primarily
with investor-owned utilities, IPPs, municipalities, electric cooperatives, and other load-serving entities, as well as
commercial and industrial customers. In general, Southern Power commits to the construction or acquisition of new
generating capacity only after entering into or assuming long-term PPAs for the new facilities.
•Southern Company Gas is an energy services holding company whose primary business is the distribution of natural gas.
Southern Company Gas owns natural gas distribution utilities in four states – Illinois, Georgia, Virginia, and Tennessee –
and is also involved in several other complementary businesses. Southern Company Gas manages its business through
four reportable segments – gas distribution operations, gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, which includes
Sequent, a natural gas asset optimization company, and gas marketing services, which includes SouthStar, a provider of
energy-related products and services to natural gas markets – and one non-reportable segment, all other. See Notes 7 and
16 to the financial statements for additional information.
Many factors affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of the Southern Company system's electric service and natural gas
businesses. These factors include the ability to maintain constructive regulatory environments, to maintain and grow sales and
customers, and to effectively manage and secure timely recovery of prudently-incurred costs. These costs include those related to
projected long-term demand growth; stringent environmental standards, including CCR rules; safety; system reliability and
resilience; fuel; natural gas; restoration following major storms; and capital expenditures, including constructing new electric
generating plants and expanding and improving the electric transmission and electric and natural gas distribution systems.
The traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities have various regulatory mechanisms that address
cost recovery. Effectively operating pursuant to these regulatory mechanisms and appropriately balancing required costs and capital
expenditures with customer prices will continue to challenge the Southern Company system for the foreseeable future. See Note 2
to the financial statements for additional information.
Southern Power's future earnings will depend upon the parameters of the wholesale market and the efficient operation of its
wholesale generating assets, as well as Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy and to develop and construct
generating facilities. In addition, Southern Power's future earnings will depend upon the availability of federal and state ITCs and
PTCs on its renewable energy projects, which could be impacted by future tax legislation. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
– "Acquisitions and Dispositions," "Construction Programs," and "Income Tax Matters" herein and Notes 10 and 15 to the financial
statements for additional information.
Southern Company's other business activities include providing energy solutions to electric utilities and their customers in the areas
of distributed generation, energy storage and renewables, and energy efficiency. Other business activities also include investments
in telecommunications, leveraged lease projects, and gas storage facilities. Management continues to evaluate the contribution of
each of these activities to total shareholder return and may pursue acquisitions, dispositions, and other strategic ventures or
investments accordingly.
II-16
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Recent Developments
Southern Company
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy for an aggregate cash purchase price
of approximately $5.8 billion (less $1.3 billion of indebtedness assumed), including the final working capital adjustments. The gain
associated with the sale of Gulf Power totaled $2.6 billion pre-tax ($1.4 billion after tax).
Alabama Power
On September 6, 2019, Alabama Power filed a petition for a CCN with the Alabama PSC for authorization to procure additional
generating capacity through the turnkey construction of a new combined cycle facility and long-term contracts for the purchase of
power from others, as well as the acquisition of an existing combined cycle facility for a total capital investment of approximately
$1.1 billion. The related costs would be recovered through existing rate mechanisms. In addition, Alabama Power will pursue
approximately 200 MWs of certain demand side management and distributed energy resource programs. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Alabama Power" herein for additional information.
Georgia Power
Rate Case
On December 17, 2019, the Georgia PSC voted to approve the 2019 ARP, including estimated rate increases totaling $342 million,
$181 million, and $386 million effective January 1, 2020, January 1, 2021, and January 1, 2022, respectively. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Georgia Power – Rate Plans – 2019 ARP" herein for additional information.
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 Status
In 2009, the Georgia PSC certified construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (with electric generating capacity of approximately
1,100 MWs each). Georgia Power holds a 45.7% ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In March 2017, the EPC
Contractor filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC
approved Georgia Power's recommendation to continue construction. The current expected in-service dates remain November 2021
for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4.
In the second quarter 2018, Georgia Power revised its total project capital cost forecast to complete construction and start-up of
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to $8.4 billion (net of $1.7 billion received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and
approximately $188 million in related customer refunds), with respect to Georgia Power's ownership interest. As of December 31,
2019, approximately $140 million of the $366 million construction contingency estimate established in the second quarter 2018
was allocated to the base capital cost forecast.
As a result of the increase in the total project capital cost forecast and Georgia Power's decision not to seek rate recovery of the
increase in the base capital costs, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 were required
to vote to continue construction. In September 2018, the Vogtle Owners unanimously voted to continue construction of Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4. Following the vote to continue construction, Georgia Power entered into agreements to take certain actions which
partially mitigate potential financial exposure for the other Vogtle Owners and to provide funding with respect to a MEAG Power
wholly-owned subsidiary's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 under certain circumstances.
As part of its ongoing processes, Southern Nuclear continues to evaluate cost and schedule forecasts on a regular basis to
incorporate current information available, particularly in the areas of commodity installation, system turnovers, and workforce
statistics. In February 2020, Southern Nuclear updated its cost and schedule forecast, which did not change the projected overall
capital cost forecast and confirmed the expected in-service dates of November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4.
In March 2019, Georgia Power entered into the Amended and Restated Loan Guarantee Agreement with the DOE, under which the
proceeds of borrowings may be used to reimburse Georgia Power for Eligible Project Costs incurred in connection with its
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, up to approximately $5.130 billion. At December 31, 2019, Georgia Power had a total of
$3.8 billion of borrowings outstanding under the related multi-advance credit facilities.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Construction Programs – Nuclear Construction" herein and Note 8 to the financial
statements under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" for additional information.
II-17
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Mississippi Power
In 2019, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax and after-tax charges to income of $24 million related to the Kemper County energy
facility, which was suspended in 2017, primarily associated with the expected close out of a DOE contract related to the Kemper
County energy facility, as well as other abandonment and related closure costs and ongoing period costs, net of salvage proceeds,
for the mine and gasifier-related assets. The after-tax amount for 2019 includes an adjustment related to the tax abandonment of the
Kemper IGCC following the filing of the 2018 tax return. In December 2019, Mississippi Power transferred ownership of the CO2
pipeline to an unrelated gas pipeline company, with no resulting impact on income. Mine reclamation activities are expected to be
substantially completed in 2020 and dismantlement of the abandoned gasifier-related assets and site restoration activities are
expected to be completed in 2024. The additional pre-tax period costs associated with dismantlement and site restoration activities,
including related costs for compliance and safety, ARO accretion, and property taxes, are estimated to total $17 million in 2020,
$15 million to $16 million annually in 2021 through 2023, and $5 million in 2024. See Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility" and Note 3 to the financial statements for additional information, including
remaining contingencies related to the Kemper IGCC.
On November 26, 2019, Mississippi Power filed a base rate case (Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case) with the Mississippi
PSC. The filing includes a requested annual decrease in Mississippi Power's retail rates of $5.8 million, or 0.6%, which is driven
primarily by changes in the amortization rates of certain regulatory assets and liabilities and cost reductions, partially offset by an
increase in Mississippi Power's requested return on investment and depreciation associated with the filing of an updated
depreciation study. The revenue requirements included in the filing are based on a 53% average equity ratio and a 7.728% return on
investment. On December 10, 2019, the Mississippi PSC suspended the base rate case filing through no later than March 25, 2020.
If no further action is taken by the Mississippi PSC, the proposed rates may be effective beginning on March 26, 2020. The ultimate
outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power – 2019
Base Rate Case" for additional information.
Southern Power
During 2019, Southern Power completed construction and achieved commercial operation of the 100-MW Wildhorse Mountain
wind facility, acquired and continued construction of the 136-MW Skookumchuck wind facility, and continued construction of the
200-MW Reading wind facility. In addition, Southern Power acquired a majority interest in DSGP, an affiliate of Bloom Energy,
that owns and operates fuel cell generation facilities, for a total purchase price of approximately $167 million.
On June 13, 2019, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Nacogdoches, a 115-MW biomass facility
located in Nacogdoches County, Texas, to Austin Energy, for a purchase price of approximately $461 million, including working
capital adjustments.
On January 17, 2020, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion
unit completed in May 2019) to a subsidiary of Xcel for a purchase price of approximately $663 million, including estimated
working capital adjustments.
Southern Power calculates an investment coverage ratio for its generating assets, including those owned with various partners,
based on the ratio of investment under contract to total investment using the respective generation facilities' net book value (or
expected in-service value for facilities under construction) as the investment amount. With the inclusion of investments associated
with the wind facilities currently under construction, as well as other capacity and energy contracts, and excluding Plant Mankato,
which was sold on January 17, 2020, Southern Power's average investment coverage ratio at December 31, 2019 was 93% through
2024 and 90% through 2029, with an average remaining contract duration of approximately 14 years.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Acquisitions and Dispositions – Southern Power" and Construction Programs –
Southern Power" herein for additional information.
II-18
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas
During 2019, the natural gas distribution utilities have been involved in the following regulatory proceedings:
•On September 25, 2019, the Virginia Commission approved Virginia Natural Gas' Steps to Advance Virginia's Energy
(SAVE) program request to amend and extend the program through 2024 with estimated capital spend totaling
approximately $365 million.
•On October 2, 2019, the Illinois Commission approved a $168 million annual base rate increase for Nicor Gas, including
$65 million related to the recovery of investments under the Investing in Illinois program, which became effective October
8, 2019.
•On December 19, 2019, the Georgia PSC approved a $65 million annual base rate increase for Atlanta Gas Light, effective
January 1, 2020.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Southern Company Gas – Rate Proceedings" herein and Note 2
to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Rate Proceedings" for additional information.
Also during 2019, Southern Company Gas recorded a pre-tax impairment charge of $91 million ($69 million after tax) related to a
natural gas storage facility in Louisiana. See Note 3 to the financial statements under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas" for
additional information.
On February 7, 2020, Southern Company Gas entered into agreements with Dominion Modular LNG Holdings, Inc. and Dominion
Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC for the sale of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline, respectively, for an aggregate
purchase price of $165 million, including estimated working capital and timing adjustments. Southern Company Gas may also
receive two payments of $5 million each, contingent upon certain milestones related to Pivotal LNG being met by Dominion
Modular LNG Holdings, Inc. after the completion of the sale. Based on the terms of these pending transactions, Southern Company
Gas recorded an asset impairment charge, exclusive of the contingent payments, for Pivotal LNG of approximately $24 million
($17 million after tax) as of December 31, 2019. The completion of each transaction is subject to the satisfaction or waiver of
certain conditions, including, among other customary closing conditions, the completion of the other transaction and, for the sale of
the interest in Atlantic Coast Pipeline, the expiration or termination of any applicable waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino
Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976. The transactions are expected to be completed in the first half of 2020; however, the ultimate
outcome cannot be determined at this time. The assets and liabilities of Pivotal LNG and the interest in Atlantic Coast Pipeline are
classified as held for sale as of December 31, 2019. See Notes 3, 7, and 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company
Gas – Gas Pipeline Projects," "Southern Company Gas – Equity Method Investments," and "Southern Company Gas – Proposed
Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline," respectively, for additional information.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Acquisitions and Dispositions – Southern Company Gas" herein for information
regarding Southern Company Gas' 2018 disposition activity.
Key Performance Indicators
In striving to achieve attractive risk-adjusted returns while providing cost-effective energy to more than eight million electric and
gas utility customers collectively, the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas continue to focus on
several key performance indicators. These indicators include, but are not limited to, customer satisfaction, plant availability, electric
and natural gas system reliability, and execution of major construction projects. In addition, Southern Company and the Subsidiary
Registrants focus on earnings per share (EPS) and net income, respectively, as a key performance indicator. See RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS herein for information on the Registrants' financial performance. See RESULTS OF OPERATIONS – "Southern
Company Gas – Operating Metrics" for additional information on Southern Company Gas' operating metrics, including Heating
Degree Days, customer count, and volumes of natural gas sold.
The financial success of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas is directly tied to customer
satisfaction. Key elements of ensuring customer satisfaction include outstanding service, high reliability, and competitive prices.
The traditional electric operating companies use customer satisfaction surveys to evaluate their results and generally target the top
quartile of these surveys in measuring performance. Reliability indicators are also used to evaluate results. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Alabama Power – Rate RSE" and " – Mississippi Power – Performance
Evaluation Plan" herein for additional information on Alabama Power's Rate RSE and Mississippi Power's PEP rate plan,
respectively, both of which contain mechanisms that directly tie customer service indicators to the allowed equity return.
Southern Power continues to focus on several key performance indicators, including, but not limited to, the equivalent forced
outage rate and contract availability to evaluate operating results and help ensure its ability to meet its contractual commitments to
customers.
II-19
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Southern Company
Consolidated net income attributable to Southern Company was $4.7 billion in 2019, an increase of $2.5 billion, or 112.9%, from
the prior year. The increase was primarily due to the $2.6 billion ($1.4 billion after tax) gain on the sale of Gulf Power in 2019 and
a $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) charge in the second quarter 2018 for an estimated probable loss related to Georgia Power's
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See "Electricity Business – Estimated Loss on Plants Under Construction" herein
and Notes 2 and 15 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" and "Southern Company,"
respectively, for additional information.
Basic EPS was $4.53 in 2019 and $2.18 in 2018. Diluted EPS, which factors in additional shares related to stock-based
compensation, was $4.50 in 2019 and $2.17 in 2018. EPS for 2019 and 2018 was negatively impacted by $0.11 and $0.04 per
share, respectively, as a result of increases in the average shares outstanding. See Note 8 to the financial statements under
"Outstanding Classes of Capital Stock – Southern Company" for additional information.
Southern Company has paid dividends on its common stock since 1948. Dividends paid per share of common stock were $2.46 in
2019 and $2.38 in 2018. In January 2020, Southern Company declared a quarterly dividend of 62 cents per share. For 2019, the
dividend payout ratio was 54% compared to 109% for 2018. The decrease was due to the increase in earnings in 2019.
Discussion of Southern Company's results of operations is divided into three parts – the Southern Company system's primary
business of electricity sales, its gas business, and its other business activities.
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
Electricity business $ 3,268 $ 2,304
Gas business 585 372
Other business activities 886 (450)
Net Income $ 4,739 $ 2,226
Electricity Business
Southern Company's electric utilities generate and sell electricity to retail and wholesale customers. The results of operations
discussed below include the results of Gulf Power through December 31, 2018. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company" for additional information.
II-20
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
A condensed statement of income for the electricity business follows:
 2019Increase
(Decrease)
from 2018
 (in millions)
Electric operating revenues $ 17,095 $ (1,476)
Fuel 3,622 (1,015)
Purchased power 816 (155)
Cost of other sales 76 10
Other operations and maintenance 4,479 (156)
Depreciation and amortization 2,472 (93)
Taxes other than income taxes 1,011 (87)
Estimated loss on plants under construction 24 (1,073)
Impairment charges 3 (153)
(Gain) loss on dispositions, net (21) (21)
Total electric operating expenses 12,482 (2,743)
Operating income 4,613 1,267
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 121 (10)
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 987 (48)
Other income (expense), net 234 90
Income taxes 708 501
Net income 3,273 894
Less:  
Dividends on preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries 15 (1)
Net income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests (10) (69)
Net Income Attributable to Southern Company $ 3,268 $ 964
Electric Operating Revenues
Electric operating revenues for 2019 were $17.1 billion, reflecting a $1.5 billion decrease from 2018. Details of electric operating
revenues were as follows:
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
Retail electric — prior year $ 15,222  
Estimated change resulting from —   
Rates and pricing 581  
Sales decline (143) 
Weather 29  
Fuel and other cost recovery (392) 
Gulf Power disposition (1,213) 
Retail electric — current year 14,084  $ 15,222
Wholesale electric revenues 2,152  2,516
Other electric revenues 636  664
Other revenues 223  169
Electric operating revenues $ 17,095  $ 18,571
Percent change (7.9)% 0.2%
II-21
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Retail electric revenues decreased $1.1 billion, or 7.5%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year. The significant factors driving this
change are shown in the preceding table. The increase in rates and pricing in 2019 was primarily due to the impacts of Alabama
Power's customer bill credits issued in 2018 related to the Tax Reform Legislation, additional capital investments recovered through
Rate CNP Compliance, and lower Rate RSE customer refund in 2019 as compared to the prior year; Georgia Power's higher
contributions from commercial and industrial customers with variable demand-driven pricing, NCCR rate increase effective
January 1, 2019, and pricing effects associated with a milder winter in 2019 compared to 2018; and Mississippi Power's PEP and
ECO Plan rate increases effective for the first billing cycle of September 2018.
Electric rates for the traditional electric operating companies include provisions to adjust billings for fluctuations in fuel costs,
including the energy component of purchased power costs. Under these provisions, fuel revenues generally equal fuel expenses,
including the energy component of PPA costs, and do not affect net income. The traditional electric operating companies each have
one or more regulatory mechanisms to recover other costs such as environmental and other compliance costs, storm damage, new
plants, and PPA capacity costs.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power," "Georgia Power," and "Mississippi Power" for additional
information. Also see "Energy Sales" below for a discussion of changes in the volume of energy sold, including changes related to
sales growth (decline) and weather.
Wholesale electric revenues consist of PPAs and short-term opportunity sales. Wholesale electric revenues from PPAs (other than
solar and wind PPAs) have both capacity and energy components. Capacity revenues generally represent the greatest contribution to
net income and are designed to provide recovery of fixed costs plus a return on investment. Energy revenues will vary depending
on fuel prices, the market prices of wholesale energy compared to the Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy
within the Southern Company system's electric service territory, and the availability of the Southern Company system's generation.
Increases and decreases in energy revenues that are driven by fuel prices are accompanied by an increase or decrease in fuel costs
and do not have a significant impact on net income. Energy sales from solar and wind PPAs do not have a capacity charge and
customers either purchase the energy output of a dedicated renewable facility through an energy charge or through a fixed price
related to the energy. As a result, the ability to recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance expenses is dependent upon
the level of energy generated from these facilities, which can be impacted by weather conditions, equipment performance,
transmission constraints, and other factors. Wholesale electric revenues at Mississippi Power include FERC-regulated MRA sales
as well as market-based sales. Short-term opportunity sales are made at market-based rates that generally provide a margin above
the Southern Company system's variable cost to produce the energy.
Wholesale electric revenues from power sales were as follows:
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
Capacity and other $ 529 $ 620
Energy 1,623 1,896
Total $ 2,152 $ 2,516
In 2019, wholesale revenues decreased $364 million, or 14.5%, as compared to the prior year due to decreases of $273 million in
energy revenues and $91 million in capacity revenues. Excluding the $28 million decrease associated with the sale of Gulf Power,
energy revenues decreased $165 million at Southern Power and $80 million at the traditional electric operating companies. The
decrease at Southern Power related to a $113 million decrease primarily in non-PPA short-term sales and a decrease in the market
price of energy, as well as a $51 million decrease primarily in sales under PPAs from natural gas facilities. The decrease at the
traditional electric operating companies was primarily due to lower natural gas prices. Excluding the $26 million decrease
associated with the sale of Gulf Power, the decrease in capacity revenues was primarily related to the sales of Southern Power's
Plant Oleander and Plant Stanton Unit A (together, the Florida Plants) in December 2018 and Southern Power's Plant Nacogdoches
in June 2019. See Note 15 to the financial statements for additional information.
Other Electric Revenues
Other electric revenues decreased $28 million, or 4.2%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year. The decrease was primarily due to a
decrease of $66 million related to the sale of Gulf Power, partially offset by increases at Georgia Power of $13 million in regulated
power delivery construction and maintenance contracts and $11 million from outdoor lighting LED conversions and sales, as well
as an increase at Alabama Power of $9 million from pole attachment agreements.
II-22
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Energy Sales
Changes in revenues are influenced heavily by the change in the volume of energy sold from year to year. KWH sales for 2019 and
the percent change from the prior year were as follows:
 2019
    Adjusted(b)
 Total
KWHsTotal KWH
Percent Change Weather-Adjusted
Percent Change(a)Total KWH
Percent ChangeWeather-Adjusted
Percent Change(a)
 (in billions)    
Residential 48.5 (11.1)% (10.7)% (1.1)% (0.8)%
Commercial 49.1 (8.1) (8.6) (1.1) (1.6)
Industrial 50.1 (6.1) (6.1) (2.9) (2.9)
Other 0.8 (9.1) (9.0) (5.8) (5.7)
Total retail 148.5 (8.5) (8.4)% (1.7) (1.8)%
Wholesale 48.0 (3.9)  (2.6)
Total energy sales 196.5 (7.4)%  (1.9)%
(a)Weather-adjusted KWH sales are estimated by removing from KWH sales the effect of deviations from normal temperature conditions, based on statistical
models of the historical relationship between temperatures and energy sales. Normal temperature conditions are defined as those experienced in the applicable
service territory over a specified historical period. This metric is useful because it allows trends in historical operations to be evaluated apart from the influence
of weather conditions. Management also considers this metric in developing long-term capital and financial plans.
(b)Kilowatt-hour sales comparisons to the prior year were significantly impacted by the disposition of Gulf Power on January 1, 2019. These changes exclude Gulf
Power.
Changes in retail energy sales are generally the result of changes in electricity usage by customers, changes in weather, and changes
in the number of customers. Excluding the impact of the Gulf Power disposition on January 1, 2019, weather-adjusted retail energy
sales decreased 2.7 billion KWHs in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily due to lower customer usage. Weather-adjusted
residential usage decreases are primarily attributable to an increase in energy-efficient residential appliances and energy saving
initiatives, partially offset by customer growth. Weather-adjusted commercial usage decreases are primarily attributable to an
increase in energy saving initiatives and an ongoing migration to the electronic commerce business model. Industrial usage
decreases are a result of changes in production levels primarily in the primary metals, paper, chemicals, and textiles sectors.
See "Electric Operating Revenues" above for a discussion of significant changes in wholesale revenues related to changes in price
and KWH sales.
Other Revenues
Other revenues increased $54 million, or 32.0%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily due to increases
at Georgia Power of $20 million from unregulated sales associated with new energy conservation projects and $14 million from
unregulated power delivery construction and maintenance contracts, as well as an increase at Alabama Power of $11 million in
unregulated sales of products and services.
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
The mix of fuel sources for the generation of electricity is determined primarily by demand, the unit cost of fuel consumed, and the
availability of generating units. Additionally, the electric utilities purchase a portion of their electricity needs from the wholesale
market.
II-23
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Details of the Southern Company system's generation and purchased power were as follows:
 2019 2018(a)
Total generation (in billions of KWHs) 187 191
Total purchased power (in billions of KWHs) 18 14
Sources of generation (percent) —
Gas 52 48
Coal 22 27
Nuclear 16 16
Hydro 3 3
Other 7 6
Cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH) —
Gas 2.36 2.76
Coal 2.87 2.93
Nuclear 0.79 0.80
Average cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH) 2.20 2.46
Average cost of purchased power (in cents per net KWH)(b)5.01 5.94
(a)Excludes Gulf Power, which was sold on January 1, 2019.
(b)Average cost of purchased power includes fuel purchased by the Southern Company system for tolling agreements where power is generated by the provider.
In 2019, total fuel and purchased power expenses were $4.4 billion, a decrease of $1.2 billion, or 20.9%, as compared to the prior
year. Excluding approximately $511 million associated with the sale of Gulf Power, the decrease was primarily the result of a $575
million decrease in the average cost of fuel and purchased power and an $84 million net decrease in the volume of KWHs
generated and purchased.
Fuel and purchased power energy transactions at the traditional electric operating companies are generally offset by fuel revenues
and do not have a significant impact on net income. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters" herein for
additional information. Fuel expenses incurred under Southern Power's PPAs are generally the responsibility of the counterparties
and do not significantly impact net income.
Fuel
In 2019, fuel expense was $3.6 billion, a decrease of $1.0 billion, or 21.9%, as compared to the prior year. Excluding
approximately $309 million related to Gulf Power in 2018, the decrease was primarily due to an 18.1% decrease in the volume of
KWHs generated by coal, a 14.5% decrease in the average cost of natural gas per KWH generated, and a 2.1% decrease in the
average cost of coal per KWH generated, partially offset by a 5.0% increase in the volume of KWHs generated by natural gas.
Purchased Power
In 2019, purchased power expense was $816 million, a decrease of $155 million, or 16.0%, as compared to the prior year.
Excluding approximately $202 million associated with the sale of Gulf Power, the change was primarily due to a 9.6% increase in
the volume of KWHs purchased, partially offset by a 15.7% decrease in the average cost of KWH purchased.
Energy purchases will vary depending on demand for energy within the Southern Company system's electric service territory, the
market prices of wholesale energy as compared to the cost of the Southern Company system's generation, and the availability of the
Southern Company system's generation.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
Other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $156 million, or 3.4%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year. The decrease
reflects approximately $356 million related to Gulf Power in 2018 and $17 million related to the dispositions of Southern Power's
Florida Plants and Plant Nacogdoches, partially offset by additional accruals of $123 million to the NDR at Alabama Power, $21
million of increased transmission and distribution expenses primarily due to overhead line maintenance and vegetation
management at the traditional electric operating companies, $18 million from costs associated with unregulated sales at Georgia
Power primarily associated with new energy conservation projects and power delivery construction and maintenance contracts, and
$16 million related to an adjustment for FERC fees at Georgia Power following the conclusion of a multi-year audit of
II-24
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
headwater benefits associated with hydro facilities. See Notes 2 and 15 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate
NDR" and "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants," respectively, for additional information.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization decreased $93 million, or 3.6%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year. The decrease was primarily
due to a decrease of $191 million related to Gulf Power in 2018, partially offset by an increase in depreciation of $62 million
primarily resulting from additional plant in service and an increase in the amortization of regulatory assets of $47 million primarily
at Mississippi Power and Georgia Power. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company – Regulatory Assets and
Liabilities" and Note 5 to the financial statements under "Depreciation and Amortization" for additional information.
Taxes Other Than Income Taxes
Taxes other than income taxes decreased $87 million, or 7.9%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily due to a decrease of
$118 million related to the sale of Gulf Power, partially offset by higher property taxes of $30 million primarily at Georgia Power.
Estimated Loss on Plants Under Construction
The $1.1 billion charge in 2018 reflects Georgia Power's revised estimate to complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4. The 2019 charges of $24 million were associated with abandonment and closure activities for the mine and gasifier-
related assets of the Kemper IGCC at Mississippi Power, net of sales proceeds. See Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" and "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
Impairment Charges
In the second quarter 2018, Southern Power recorded a $119 million asset impairment charge related to the sale of the Florida
Plants and in the third quarter 2018 recorded a $36 million asset impairment charge on wind turbine equipment held for
development projects. Asset impairment charges recorded in 2019 were immaterial. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" and " – Development Projects" for additional information.
(Gain) Loss on Dispositions, Net
Gain on dispositions, net increased $21 million in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily due to Southern Power's sale of
Plant Nacogdoches in the second quarter 2019. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural
Gas and Biomass Plants" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized decreased $48 million, or 4.6%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily related
to the sale of Gulf Power.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net increased $90 million, or 62.5%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily due to a $36 million
gain arising from the Roserock solar facility litigation settlement at Southern Power in 2019, $37 million from decreased charitable
donations in 2019 at the traditional electric operating companies, $23 million of increased non-service cost-related retirement
benefits income, and $16 million of increased interest income primarily associated with a new tolling arrangement accounted for as
a sales-type lease at Mississippi Power as well as temporary cash investments, primarily at Alabama Power. These increases were
partially offset by $24 million related to the settlement of Mississippi Power's Deepwater Horizon claim in 2018 and a $14 million
gain from a joint-development wind project at Southern Power in 2018 attributable to its partner in the project. See Note 3 to the
financial statements under "General Litigation Matters – Southern Power" and "Other Matters – Mississippi Power" and Note 11 to
the financial statements under "Pension Plans" for additional information.
Income Taxes
Income taxes increased $501 million, or 242.0%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year. Excluding an income tax benefit of
approximately $20 million related to Gulf Power in 2018, income taxes increased $481 million. The increase was primarily due to
increases in pre-tax earnings, including the $1.1 billion charge in 2018 associated with Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 construction at
Georgia Power. See Notes 10 and 15 to the financial statements for additional information.
II-25
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests
Substantially all noncontrolling interests relate to renewable projects at Southern Power. Net income attributable to noncontrolling
interests decreased $69 million, or 116.9%, in 2019, as compared to the prior year. The decrease was primarily due to $92 million
of losses attributable to noncontrolling interests related to the tax equity partnerships entered into in 2018 and $14 million
attributable to a joint-development wind project in 2018, partially offset by an allocation of approximately $29 million of income to
the noncontrolling interest partner related to the Roserock solar facility litigation settlement. See Note 3 to the financial statements
under "General Litigation Matters – Southern Power" and Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" for additional
information regarding the litigation settlement and tax equity partnerships, respectively.
Gas Business
Southern Company Gas distributes natural gas through utilities in four states and is involved in several other complementary
businesses including gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services.
A condensed statement of income for the gas business follows:
 2019  Increase
(Decrease)
from 2018
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 3,792 $ (117)
Cost of natural gas 1,319 (220)
Cost of other sales — (12)
Other operations and maintenance 888 (93)
Depreciation and amortization 487 (13)
Taxes other than income taxes 213 2
Impairment charges 115 73
(Gain) loss on dispositions, net — 291
Total operating expenses 3,022 28
Operating income 770 (145)
Earnings from equity method investments 157 9
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 232 4
Other income (expense), net 20 19
Income taxes 130 (334)
Net income $ 585 $ 213
The Southern Company Gas Dispositions were completed by July 29, 2018 and represent the primary variance driver for 2019
compared to 2018. Detailed variance explanations are provided herein. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information on the Southern Company Gas Dispositions.
Seasonality of Results
During the period from November through March when natural gas usage and operating revenues are generally higher (Heating
Season), more customers are connected to Southern Company Gas' distribution systems and natural gas usage is higher in periods
of colder weather. Occasionally in the summer, operating revenues are impacted due to peak usage by power generators in response
to summer energy demands. Southern Company Gas' base operating expenses, excluding cost of natural gas, bad debt expense, and
certain incentive compensation costs, are incurred relatively equally over any given year. Thus, operating results can vary
significantly from quarter to quarter as a result of seasonality. For 2019, the percentage of operating revenues and net income
generated during the Heating Season (January through March and November through December) were 68.7% and 86.8%,
respectively. For 2018, the percentage of operating revenues and net income generated during the Heating Season were 68.7% and
96.0%, respectively.
II-26
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues in 2019 were $3.8 billion, a $117 million decrease compared to 2018. Details of operating revenues were as
follows:
 2019
 (in millions)
Operating revenues – prior year $ 3,909
Estimated change resulting from –
Infrastructure replacement programs and base rate changes 96
Gas costs and other cost recovery (89)
Wholesale gas services 150
Southern Company Gas Dispositions(*)(300)
Other 26
Operating revenues – current year $ 3,792
Percent change (3.0)%
(*)Includes a $245 million decrease related to natural gas revenues, including alternative revenue programs, and a $55 million decrease related to other revenues.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Revenues from infrastructure replacement programs and base rate changes increased in 2019 compared to the prior year primarily
due to increases of $74 million at Nicor Gas and $16 million at Atlanta Gas Light. These amounts include the natural gas
distribution utilities' continued investments recovered through infrastructure replacement programs and base rate increases as well
as customer refunds in 2018 as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information.
Revenues attributable to gas costs and other cost recovery decreased in 2019 compared to the prior year primarily due to lower
natural gas prices and decreased volumes of natural gas sold. Natural gas distribution rates include provisions to adjust billings for
fluctuations in natural gas costs. Therefore, gas costs recovered through natural gas revenues generally equal the amount expensed
in cost of natural gas and do not affect net income from the natural gas distribution utilities.
Revenues from wholesale gas services increased in 2019 primarily due to derivative gains, partially offset by decreased commercial
activity.
Other natural gas revenues increased in 2019 primarily due to increases in customers at the natural gas distribution utilities and
recovery of prior period hedge losses at gas marketing services.
Cost of Natural Gas
Excluding Atlanta Gas Light, which does not sell natural gas to end-use customers, the natural gas distribution utilities charge their
utility customers for natural gas consumed using natural gas cost recovery mechanisms set by the applicable state regulatory
agencies. Under these mechanisms, all prudently-incurred natural gas costs are passed through to customers without markup,
subject to regulatory review. The natural gas distribution utilities defer or accrue the difference between the actual cost of natural
gas and the amount of commodity revenue earned in a given period. The deferred or accrued amount is either billed or refunded to
customers prospectively through adjustments to the commodity rate. Deferred natural gas costs are reflected as regulatory assets
and accrued natural gas costs are reflected as regulatory liabilities. Therefore, gas costs recovered through natural gas revenues
generally equal the amount expensed in cost of natural gas and do not affect net income from the natural gas distribution utilities.
Cost of natural gas at the natural gas distribution utilities represented 84.5% of the total cost of natural gas for 2019.
Gas marketing services customers are charged for actual and estimated natural gas consumed. Cost of natural gas includes the cost
of fuel and associated transportation costs, lost and unaccounted for gas, adjustments to reduce the value of inventories to market
value, if applicable, and gains and losses associated with certain derivatives.
In 2019, cost of natural gas was $1.3 billion, a decrease of $220 million, or 14.3%, compared to the prior year. Excluding a $106
million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, cost of natural gas decreased by $114 million, which reflects a
14.8% decrease in natural gas prices compared to 2018.
II-27
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Cost of Other Sales
Cost of other sales related to Pivotal Home Solutions, which was sold on June 4, 2018. See Note 15 to the financial statements
under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions" for additional information.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
Other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $93 million, or 9.5%, in 2019 compared to the prior year. Excluding a $65
million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $28
million. This decrease was primarily due to $28 million of disposition-related costs incurred during 2018, a $12 million adjustment
in 2018 for the adoption of a new paid time off policy, an $11 million expense for a litigation settlement to facilitate the sale of
Pivotal Home Solutions in 2018, and a $7 million decrease in compensation and benefits costs, partially offset by a $22 million
increase in rider expenses, primarily at Nicor Gas, passed through directly to customers. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
– "Southern Company Gas – Utility Regulation and Rate Design" herein for additional information.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization decreased $13 million, or 2.6%, in 2019 compared to the prior year. Excluding a $27 million
decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, depreciation and amortization increased $14 million. This increase
was primarily due to continued infrastructure investments at the natural gas distribution utilities, partially offset by accelerated
depreciation related to assets retired in 2018. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Infrastructure
Replacement Programs and Capital Projects" for additional information.
Impairment Charges
In 2019, Southern Company Gas recorded impairment charges of $91 million related to a natural gas storage facility in Louisiana
and $24 million in contemplation of the sale of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline. In 2018, a goodwill
impairment charge of $42 million was recorded in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. See Notes 1, 3, and 15 to
the financial statements under "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets and Liabilities," "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas,"
and "Southern Company Gas," respectively, for additional information.
(Gain) Loss on Dispositions, Net
Gain on dispositions, net was $291 million in 2018 and was associated with the Southern Company Gas Dispositions. The income
tax expense on these gains included income tax expense on goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for which a deferred tax
liability had not been recorded previously.
Earnings from Equity Method Investments
Earnings from equity method investments increased $9 million, or 6.1%, in 2019 compared to the prior year and reflect higher
earnings from SNG as a result of rate increases that became effective September 2018, partially offset by a $6 million pre-tax loss
on the sale of Triton in May 2019. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional
information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net increased $19 million in 2019 compared to the prior year. This increase primarily resulted from a $23
million decrease in charitable donations in 2019.
Income Taxes
Income taxes decreased $334 million, or 72.0%, in 2019 compared to the prior year. This decrease primarily reflects a reduction of
$348 million related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, as well as $29 million in benefits associated with impairment
charges in 2019 and additional benefits from the flowback of excess deferred income taxes in 2019 primarily at Atlanta Gas Light
as previously authorized by the Georgia PSC, partially offset by $48 million of additional taxes associated with increased pre-tax
earnings at wholesale gas services.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional
information. Also see Notes 2, 3, and 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas," "Other Matters – Southern
Company Gas," and "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline," respectively, for
additional information on Atlanta Gas Light's regulatory treatment of the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation and the impairment
charges.
II-28
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Other Business Activities
Southern Company's other business activities primarily include the parent company (which does not allocate operating expenses to
business units); PowerSecure, a provider of energy solutions to electric utilities and their customers in the areas of distributed
generation, energy storage and renewables, and energy efficiency; Southern Holdings, which invests in various projects, including
leveraged lease projects; and Southern Linc, which provides digital wireless communications for use by the Southern Company
system and also markets these services to the public and provides fiber optics services within the Southeast.
A condensed statement of income for Southern Company's other business activities follows:
 2019Increase
(Decrease)
from 2018
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 532 $ (483)
Cost of other sales 359 (369)
Other operations and maintenance 233 (40)
Depreciation and amortization 79 13
Taxes other than income taxes 6 —
Impairment charges 50 38
(Gain) loss on dispositions, net (2,548) (2,548)
Total operating expenses (1,821) (2,906)
Operating income (loss) 2,353 2,423
Interest expense 517 (62)
Other income (expense), net 10 33
Income taxes (benefit) 960 1,182
Net income (loss) $ 886 $ 1,336
Operating Revenues
Southern Company's operating revenues for these other business activities decreased $483 million, or 47.6%, in 2019 as compared
to the prior year primarily related to PowerSecure's 2018 storm restoration services in Puerto Rico and the sale of PowerSecure's
utility infrastructure services business in June 2019.
Cost of Other Sales
Cost of other sales for these other business activities decreased $369 million, or 50.7%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year
primarily related to PowerSecure's 2018 storm restoration services in Puerto Rico and the sale of PowerSecure's utility
infrastructure services business in June 2019.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
Other operations and maintenance expenses for these other business activities decreased $40 million, or 14.7%, in 2019 as
compared to the prior year. The decrease was primarily due to PowerSecure's lower employee compensation and benefits in 2019
and 2018 storm restoration services in Puerto Rico.
Impairment Charges
In 2019, goodwill and asset impairment charges totaling $50 million were recorded related to the sale of PowerSecure's utility
infrastructure services and lighting businesses. In 2018, asset impairment charges of $12 million associated with Southern Linc's
tower leases were recorded in contemplation of the sale of Gulf Power.
(Gain) Loss on Dispositions, Net
The 2019 gain on dispositions, net primarily relates to the gain of $2.6 billion ($1.4 billion after tax) on the sale of Gulf Power. See
Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company" for additional information.
II-29
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Interest Expense
Interest expense for these other business activities decreased $62 million, or 10.7%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily
due to a decrease in average outstanding long-term debt at the parent company. See Note 8 to the financial statements for additional
information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net for these other business activities increased $33 million in 2019 as compared to the prior year
primarily due to a $43 million decrease in charitable donations at the parent company, partially offset by a $17 million impairment
charge associated with a leveraged lease at Southern Holdings in 2019. See Notes 1 and 3 to the financial statements under
"Leveraged Leases" and "Other Matters – Southern Company," respectively, for additional information.
Income Taxes (Benefit)
The income tax for these other business activities increased $1.2 billion in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily due to the
tax impacts related to the sale of Gulf Power. See Note 10 to the financial statements and Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company" for additional information.
Alabama Power
Alabama Power's 2019 net income after dividends on preferred and preference stock was $1.07 billion, representing a $140 million,
or 15.1%, increase over the previous year. The increase was primarily due to an increase in retail revenues associated with the
impacts of customer bill credits issued in 2018 related to the Tax Reform Legislation and a lower Rate RSE customer refund in
2019 as compared to the prior year, as well as additional capital investments recovered through Rate CNP Compliance. The
increase in revenue is partially offset by increases in operations and maintenance and depreciation expenses and lower customer
usage. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Alabama Power – Rate RSE" and " – Rate CNP
Compliance" herein for additional information.
A condensed income statement for Alabama Power follows:
 2019  Increase
(Decrease)
from 2018
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 6,125 $ 93
Fuel 1,112 (189)
Purchased power 403 (29)
Other operations and maintenance 1,821 152
Depreciation and amortization 793 29
Taxes other than income taxes 403 14
Total operating expenses 4,532 (23)
Operating income 1,593 116
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 52 (10)
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 336 13
Other income (expense), net 46 26
Income taxes 270 (21)
Net income 1,085 140
Dividends on preferred and preference stock 15 —
Net income after dividends on preferred and preference stock $ 1,070 $ 140
II-30
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for 2019 were $6.1 billion, reflecting a $0.1 billion increase from 2018. Details of operating revenues were as
follows:
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
Retail — prior year $ 5,367 
Estimated change resulting from —   
Rates and pricing 347 
Sales decline (79) 
Weather (3) 
Fuel and other cost recovery (131) 
Retail — current year 5,501 $ 5,367
Wholesale revenues —   
Non-affiliates 258 279
Affiliates 81 119
Total wholesale revenues 339 398
Other operating revenues 285 267
Total operating revenues $ 6,125 $ 6,032
Percent change 1.5% (0.1)%
Retail revenues in 2019 were $5.5 billion. These revenues increased $134 million, or 2.5%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year.
The increase in 2019 was primarily due to increases in rates and pricing associated with the impact of customer bill credits issued in
2018 related to the Tax Reform Legislation and additional capital investments recovered through Rate CNP Compliance, as well as
a lower Rate RSE customer refund in 2019 as compared to the prior year, partially offset by decreases in fuel revenues and
customer usage, as well as milder weather in 2019 as compared to 2018.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate RSE" and " – Rate CNP Compliance" for additional
information. See "Energy Sales" herein for a discussion of changes in the volume of energy sold, including changes related to sales
decline and weather.
Electric rates include provisions to recognize the recovery of fuel costs, purchased power costs, PPAs certificated by the Alabama
PSC, and costs associated with the natural disaster reserve. Under these provisions, fuel and other cost recovery revenues generally
equal fuel and other cost recovery expenses and do not affect net income. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory
Matters – Alabama Power – Rate ECR" herein for additional information.
Wholesale revenues from power sales to non-affiliated utilities were as follows:
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
Capacity and other $ 102 $ 101
Energy 156 178
Total non-affiliated $ 258 $ 279
Wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates will vary depending on fuel prices, the market prices of wholesale energy compared
to the cost of Alabama Power's and the Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company
system's electric service territory, and availability of the Southern Company system's generation. Increases and decreases in energy
revenues that are driven by fuel prices are accompanied by an increase or decrease in fuel costs and do not affect net income. Short-
term opportunity energy sales are also included in wholesale energy sales to non-affiliates. These opportunity sales are made at
market-based rates that generally provide a margin above Alabama Power's variable cost to produce the energy.
II-31
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
In 2019, wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates decreased $21 million, or 7.5%, as compared to the prior year primarily as
a result of an 8.2% decrease in energy prices due to lower natural gas prices, partially offset by a 1% increase in the amount of
KWHs sold.
Wholesale revenues from sales to affiliated companies will vary depending on demand and the availability and cost of generating
resources at each company. These affiliate sales and purchases are made in accordance with the IIC, as approved by the FERC.
These transactions do not have a significant impact on earnings since this energy is generally sold at marginal cost and energy
purchases are generally offset by energy revenues through Alabama Power's energy cost recovery clause.
In 2019, wholesale revenues from sales to affiliates decreased $38 million, or 31.9%, as compared to the prior year. In 2019, KWH
sales decreased 22.7% due to the decreased availability of coal generation associated with the retirement of Plant Gorgas Units 8, 9,
and 10, and the price of energy decreased 11.8% as a result of lower natural gas prices.
In 2019, other operating revenues increased $18 million, or 6.7%, as compared to the prior year primarily due to an increase in
unregulated sales of products and services and pole attachment agreements.
Energy Sales
Changes in revenues are influenced heavily by the change in the volume of energy sold from year to year. KWH sales for 2019 and
the percent change from the prior year were as follows:
 2019
 Total
KWHs  Total KWH
Percent Change Weather-Adjusted
Percent Change
 (in billions)     
Residential 18.3 (1.9)% (1.5)%
Commercial 13.6 (2.2) (2.2)
Industrial 22.1 (3.7) (3.7)
Other 0.2 (7.3) (7.3)
Total retail 54.2 (2.8) (2.6)%
Wholesale     
Non-affiliates 5.1 1.2   
Affiliates 3.5 (22.7)  
Total wholesale 8.6 (10.1)  
Total energy sales 62.8 (3.8)%  
Changes in retail energy sales are generally the result of changes in electricity usage by customers, changes in weather, and changes
in the number of customers. Retail energy sales in 2019 decreased 2.8% primarily due to lower customer usage and milder weather
in 2019 compared to 2018. Weather-adjusted residential sales were 1.5% lower in 2019 primarily due to lower customer usage
resulting from an increase in penetration of energy-efficient residential appliances, partially offset by customer growth. Weather-
adjusted commercial sales were 2.2% lower in 2019 primarily due to lower customer usage resulting from customer initiatives in
energy savings and an ongoing migration to the electronic commerce business model, partially offset by customer growth.
Industrial sales decreased 3.7% in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily as a result of changes in production levels in the primary
metals and chemicals sectors.
See "Operating Revenues" above for a discussion of significant changes in wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates and
wholesale revenues from sales to affiliated companies related to changes in price and KWH sales.
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
The mix of fuel sources for generation of electricity is determined primarily by the unit cost of fuel consumed, demand, and the
availability of generating units. Additionally, Alabama Power purchases a portion of its electricity needs from the wholesale market.
II-32
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Details of Alabama Power's generation and purchased power were as follows:
 2019  2018
Total generation (in billions of KWHs) 56.9 60.5
Total purchased power (in billions of KWHs) 9.4 8.1
Sources of generation (percent) —  
Coal 45 50
Nuclear 25 23
Gas 21 19
Hydro 9 8
Cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)  —  
Coal 2.69 2.73
Nuclear 0.77 0.77
Gas 2.47 2.84
Average cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)(a)(b)2.11 2.26
Average cost of purchased power (in cents per net KWH)(c)4.39 5.47
(a)For 2018, cost of fuel, generated and average cost of fuel, generated excludes a $30 million adjustment associated with a May 2018 Alabama PSC accounting
order related to excess deferred income taxes. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Alabama Power – Tax Reform Accounting
Order" herein for additional information.
(b)KWHs generated by hydro are excluded from the average cost of fuel, generated.
(c)Average cost of purchased power includes fuel, energy, and transmission purchased by Alabama Power for tolling agreements where power is generated by the
provider.
Fuel and purchased power expenses were $1.5 billion in 2019, a decrease of $218 million, or 12.6%, compared to 2018. The
decrease was primarily due to a $102 million decrease in the average cost of purchased power, a $56 million decrease in the
average cost of fuel, a $30 million net decrease related to the volume of KWHs purchased and generated, and a $30 million
decrease in fuel expense associated with the May 2018 Alabama PSC accounting order.
Fuel and purchased power energy transactions do not have a significant impact on earnings, since energy expenses are generally
offset by energy revenues through Alabama Power's energy cost recovery clause. Alabama Power, along with the Alabama PSC,
continuously monitors the under/over recovered balance to determine whether adjustments to billing rates are required. See Note 2
to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate ECR" for additional information.
Fuel
Fuel expenses were $1.1 billion in 2019, a decrease of $189 million, or 14.5%, compared to 2018. The decrease was primarily due
to a 13% decrease in the average cost of KWHs generated by natural gas, which excludes tolling agreements, a 14.4% decrease in
the volume of KWHs generated by coal, and a 5.2% increase in the volume of KWHs generated by hydro, as well as a $30 million
decrease in fuel expense associated with the May 2018 Alabama PSC accounting order.
Purchased Power – Non-Affiliates
Purchased power expense from non-affiliates was $203 million in 2019, a decrease of $13 million, or 6.0%, compared to 2018. This
decrease was primarily due to a 12.6% decrease in the average cost per KWH purchased due to lower natural gas prices. The
decrease was partially offset by a 9.1% increase in the amount of energy purchased as a result of decreased coal generation due to
the retirement of Plant Gorgas Units 8, 9, and 10.
Energy purchases from non-affiliates will vary depending on the market prices of wholesale energy as compared to the cost of the
Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company system's service territory, and the
availability of the Southern Company system's generation.
Purchased Power – Affiliates
Purchased power expense from affiliates was $200 million in 2019, a decrease of $16 million, or 7.4%, compared to 2018. This
decrease was primarily due to a 25.2% decrease in the average cost per KWH purchased due to lower natural gas prices. The
decrease was partially offset by a 24.1% increase in the amount of energy purchased primarily due to the availability of lower-cost
II-33
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
generation compared to Alabama Power's owned generation and a decrease in coal generation due to the retirement of Plant Gorgas
Units 8, 9, and 10.
Energy purchases from affiliates will vary depending on demand for energy and the availability and cost of generating resources at
each company within the Southern Company system. These purchases are made in accordance with the IIC or other contractual
agreements, as approved by the FERC.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
In 2019, other operations and maintenance expenses increased $152 million, or 9.1%, as compared to the prior year primarily due
to additional accruals of $123 million to the NDR as well as $11 million in Rate CNP Compliance-related expenses. See Note 2 to
the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate NDR" and " – Rate CNP Compliance" for additional information.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization increased $29 million, or 3.8%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily due to additional
plant in service. See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Depreciation and Amortization" for additional information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net increased $26 million, or 130.0%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily due to a decrease of
$17 million in charitable donations and an increase of $9 million in interest income from temporary cash investments.
Income Taxes
Income taxes decreased $21 million, or 7.2%, in 2019 as compared to the prior year primarily due to additional benefits from the
flowback of excess deferred income taxes in accordance with an Alabama PSC accounting order, partially offset by an increase in
pre-tax net income. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Tax Reform Accounting Order" for additional
information.
Georgia Power
Georgia Power's 2019 net income was $1.7 billion, representing a $927 million, or 116.9%, increase from the previous year. The
increase was primarily due to a $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) charge in the second quarter 2018 for an estimated probable loss
related to Georgia Power's construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, an increase in retail base revenues associated with higher
contributions from commercial and industrial customers with variable demand-driven pricing, and an increase in other revenues
primarily related to unregulated sales. Partially offsetting the increase were higher non-fuel operations and maintenance expenses
and depreciation and amortization.
A condensed income statement for Georgia Power follows:
 2019Increase
(Decrease)
from 2018
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 8,408 $ (12)
Fuel 1,444 (254)
Purchased power 1,096 (57)
Other operations and maintenance 1,972 112
Depreciation and amortization 981 58
Taxes other than income taxes 454 17
Estimated loss on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 — (1,060)
Total operating expenses 5,947 (1,184)
Operating income 2,461 1,172
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 409 12
Other income (expense), net 140 25
Income taxes 472 258
Net income $ 1,720 $ 927
II-34
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for 2019 were $8.4 billion, a $12 million decrease from 2018. Details of operating revenues were as follows:
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Retail — prior year $ 7,752  
Estimated change resulting from —   
Rates and pricing 202  
Sales decline (66)  
Weather 39  
Fuel cost recovery (220)  
Retail — current year 7,707 $ 7,752
Wholesale revenues —   
Non-affiliates 129 163
Affiliates 11 24
Total wholesale revenues 140 187
Other operating revenues 561 481
Total operating revenues $ 8,408 $ 8,420
Percent change (0.1)% 1.3%
Retail revenues of $7.7 billion in 2019 decreased $45 million, or 0.6%, compared to 2018. The significant factors driving this
change are shown in the preceding table. The increase in rates and pricing was primarily due to higher contributions from
commercial and industrial customers with variable demand-driven pricing, an increase in the NCCR tariff effective January 1,
2019, and pricing effects associated with a milder winter in 2019 compared to 2018. See Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information related to the NCCR tariff.
See "Energy Sales" below for a discussion of changes in the volume of energy sold, including changes related to the sales decline in
2019.
Electric rates include provisions to adjust billings for fluctuations in fuel costs, including the energy component of purchased power
costs. Under these fuel cost recovery provisions, fuel revenues generally equal fuel expenses and do not affect net income. See
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Georgia Power – Fuel Cost Recovery" herein for additional
information.
Wholesale revenues from power sales to non-affiliated utilities were as follows:
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
Capacity and other $ 55 $ 54
Energy 74 109
Total non-affiliated $ 129 $ 163
Wholesale capacity revenues from PPAs are recognized either on a levelized basis over the appropriate contract period or the
amounts billable under the contract terms and provide for recovery of fixed costs and a return on investment. Wholesale revenues
from sales to non-affiliates will vary depending on fuel prices, the market prices of wholesale energy compared to the cost of
Georgia Power's and the Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company system's
electric service territory, and the availability of the Southern Company system's generation. Increases and decreases in energy
revenues that are driven by fuel prices are accompanied by an increase or decrease in fuel costs and do not have a significant
impact on net income. Short-term opportunity sales are made at market-based rates that generally provide a margin above Georgia
Power's variable cost of energy.
Wholesale revenues from non-affiliated sales decreased $34 million, or 20.9%, in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily due to lower
energy prices and lower demand.
II-35
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Wholesale revenues from sales to affiliated companies will vary depending on demand and the availability and cost of generating
resources at each company. These affiliate sales are made in accordance with the IIC, as approved by the FERC. These transactions
do not have a significant impact on earnings since this energy is generally sold at marginal cost. In 2019, wholesale revenues from
sales to affiliates decreased $13 million, or 54.2%, as compared to 2018 primarily due to a 36.3% decrease in KWH sales as a result
of the lower market cost of available energy compared to the cost of Georgia Power-owned generation.
Other operating revenues increased $80 million, or 16.6%, in 2019 from the prior year primarily due to revenue increases of $27
million from power delivery construction and maintenance contracts, $20 million from unregulated sales associated with new
energy conservation projects, $11 million from outdoor lighting LED conversions and sales, $7 million from OATT sales, and $6
million in wholesale operating fees associated with contractual targets.
Energy Sales
Changes in revenues are influenced heavily by the change in the volume of energy sold from year to year. KWH sales for 2019 and
the percent change from the prior year were as follows:
 2019
 Total
KWHs  Total KWH
Percent Change Weather-Adjusted
Percent Change
 (in billions)     
Residential 28.2 (0.5)% (0.4)%
Commercial 32.8 (0.4) (1.3)
Industrial 23.2 (2.1) (2.2)
Other 0.5 (5.6) (5.5)
Total retail 84.7 (0.9) (1.2)%
Wholesale     
Non-affiliates 2.7 (15.8)  
Affiliates 0.3 (36.3)  
Total wholesale 3.0 (18.7)  
Total energy sales 87.7 (1.7)%  
Changes in retail energy sales are generally the result of changes in electricity usage by customers, changes in weather, and changes
in the number of customers.
In 2019, weather-adjusted residential and commercial KWH sales decreased 0.4% and 1.3%, respectively, compared to 2018
primarily due to a decline in average customer usage resulting from an increase in energy saving initiatives. The decreases in
weather-adjusted residential and commercial KWH sales were largely and partially, respectively, offset by customer growth.
Weather-adjusted industrial KWH sales decreased 2.2% primarily due to decreases in the paper, textile, stone, clay, and glass, and
lumber sectors, partially offset by an increase in the pipeline sector.
See "Operating Revenues" above for a discussion of significant changes in wholesale sales to non-affiliates and affiliated
companies.
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
Fuel costs constitute one of the largest expenses for Georgia Power. The mix of fuel sources for the generation of electricity is
determined primarily by demand, the unit cost of fuel consumed, and the availability of generating units. Additionally, Georgia
Power purchases a portion of its electricity needs from the wholesale market.
II-36
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Details of Georgia Power's generation and purchased power were as follows:
 2019  2018
Total generation (in billions of KWHs) 62.6 65.2
Total purchased power (in billions of KWHs) 29.1 27.9
Sources of generation (percent) —  
Gas 47 42
Nuclear 26 25
Coal 24 30
Hydro 3 3
Cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)  —  
Gas 2.42 2.75
Nuclear 0.81 0.82
Coal 3.09 3.21
Average cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH) 2.16 2.40
Average cost of purchased power (in cents per net KWH)(*)4.21 4.79
(*) Average cost of purchased power includes fuel purchased by Georgia Power for tolling agreements where power is generated by the provider.
Fuel and purchased power expenses were $2.5 billion in 2019, a decrease of $311 million, or 10.9%, compared to 2018. The
decrease was primarily due to a $289 million decrease related to the average cost of fuel and purchased power.
Fuel and purchased power energy transactions do not have a significant impact on earnings since these fuel expenses are generally
offset by fuel revenues through Georgia Power's fuel cost recovery mechanism. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL –
"Regulatory Matters – Georgia Power – Fuel Cost Recovery" herein for additional information.
Fuel
Fuel expense was $1.4 billion in 2019, a decrease of $254 million, or 15.0%, compared to 2018. The decrease was primarily due to
a 10% decrease in the average cost of fuel, primarily related to lower natural gas prices, and a 3.9% decrease in the volume of
KWHs generated, primarily due to the lower market cost of energy compared to available Georgia Power resources.
Purchased Power - Non-Affiliates
Purchased power expense from non-affiliates was $521 million in 2019, an increase of $91 million, or 21.2%, compared to 2018.
The increase was primarily due to a 53.1% increase in the volume of KWHs purchased primarily due to the lower market cost of
energy compared to available Southern Company system resources and warmer weather in the third quarter 2019 resulting in higher
customer demand, partially offset by a 22.1% decrease in the average cost per KWH purchased primarily due to lower energy
prices.
The volume increase also reflects purchases from Gulf Power which were classified as affiliate prior to January 1, 2019. See Note
15 to the financial statements for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
Energy purchases from non-affiliates will vary depending on the market prices of wholesale energy as compared to the cost of the
Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company system's electric service territory, and
the availability of the Southern Company system's generation.
Purchased Power - Affiliates
Purchased power expense from affiliates was $575 million in 2019, a decrease of $148 million, or 20.5%, compared to 2018. The
decrease was primarily due to an 11.1% decrease in the volume of KWHs purchased as Georgia Power units generally dispatched at
a lower cost than other Southern Company system resources and a 13.0% decrease in the average cost per KWH purchased
resulting from lower energy prices.
The decrease in purchased power expense from affiliates also reflects a change in the classification of capacity expenses of $24
million related to PPAs with Southern Power accounted for as finance leases following the adoption of FASB ASC Topic 842,
Leases (ASC 842). In 2019, these expenses are included in depreciation and amortization and interest expense, net of amounts
capitalized. The decrease in the volume of KWHs purchased also includes the effect of classifying purchases from Gulf Power as
II-37
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
non-affiliate beginning January 1, 2019. See Notes 9 and 15 to the financial statements for additional information regarding ASC
842 and the sale of Gulf Power, respectively.
Energy purchases from affiliates will vary depending on the demand and the availability and cost of generating resources at each
company within the Southern Company system. These purchases are made in accordance with the IIC or other contractual
agreements, all as approved by the FERC.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
In 2019, other operations and maintenance expenses increased $112 million, or 6.0%, compared to 2018. The increase reflects
increases in expenses of $30 million from unregulated sales primarily associated with new energy conservation projects and power
delivery construction and maintenance contracts, $26 million related to scheduled generation outages, $16 million related to an
adjustment for FERC fees following the conclusion of a multi-year audit of headwater benefits associated with hydro facilities, $12
million primarily due to the timing of vegetation management and other transmission-related expenses, and $10 million associated
with generation maintenance.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization increased $58 million, or 6.3%, in 2019 compared to 2018. The increase was primarily due to a $31
million increase in depreciation associated with additional plant in service and a $19 million increase in the amortization of
regulatory assets related to the retirement of certain generating units. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory
Matters – Georgia Power – Integrated Resource Plan" herein for additional information on unit retirements.
The increase also reflects the classification of approximately $9 million related to PPAs with Southern Power accounted for as
finance leases following the adoption of ASC 842. In prior periods, the expenses related to these PPAs were included in purchased
power, affiliates. See Note 9 to the financial statements for additional information regarding ASC 842.
See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Depreciation and Amortization" for additional information.
Taxes Other Than Income Taxes
In 2019, taxes other than income taxes increased $17 million, or 3.9%, compared to 2018 primarily due to higher property taxes of
$25 million as a result of increases in the assessed value of property, partially offset by a decrease of $11 million in municipal
franchise fees, largely due to adjustments associated with the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Georgia Power – Rate Plans – Tax Reform Settlement Agreement" herein for
additional information.
Estimated Loss on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
In the second quarter 2018, an estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion was recorded to reflect Georgia Power's revised estimate to
complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See ACCOUNTING POLICIES – "Estimated Cost, Schedule, and
Rate Recovery for the Construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia
Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
In 2019, interest expense, net of amounts capitalized increased $12 million, or 3.0%, compared to 2018. The increase was primarily
due to the reclassification of $15 million related to PPAs with Southern Power accounted for as finance leases following the
adoption of ASC 842 and a $6 million increase in interest expense associated with an increase in outstanding short-term
borrowings, partially offset by a $9 million increase in amounts capitalized largely associated with Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
In prior periods, the expenses related to the PPAs with Southern Power were included in purchased power, affiliates. See
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Sources of Capital" and "Financing Activities" herein for additional information
on borrowings, Note 9 to the financial statements for additional information regarding ASC 842, and Note 2 to the financial
statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information regarding Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Other Income (Expense), Net
In 2019, other income (expense), net increased $25 million compared to the prior year primarily due to a $16 million increase in
non-service cost-related retirement benefits income and a $13 million decrease in charitable donations, partially offset by a $4
million decrease in interest income from temporary cash investments. See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional
information on Georgia Power's net periodic pension and other postretirement benefit costs.
II-38
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Income Taxes
Income taxes increased $258 million, or 120.6%, in 2019 compared to the prior year primarily as a result of higher pre-tax earnings
largely due to the 2018 charge associated with Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 construction. This increase was partially offset by
additional state ITCs recognized in 2019 and the recognition of a valuation allowance in 2018. See Note 10 to the financial
statements for additional information.
Mississippi Power
Mississippi Power's net income after dividends on preferred stock was $139 million in 2019 compared to $235 million in 2018. The
change was primarily the result of higher income tax expense following the 2018 partial reversal of a valuation allowance.
A condensed statement of operations follows:
 2019  Increase
(Decrease)
from 2018
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 1,264 $ (1)
Fuel 407 2
Purchased power 20 (21)
Other operations and maintenance 283 (30)
Depreciation and amortization 192 23
Taxes other than income taxes 113 6
Estimated loss on Kemper IGCC 24 (13)
Total operating expenses 1,039 (33)
Operating income 225 32
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 1 1
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 69 (7)
Other income (expense), net 12 (5)
Income taxes (benefit) 30 132
Net income 139 (97)
Dividends on preferred stock — (1)
Net income after dividends on preferred stock $ 139 $ (96)
II-39
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for 2019 were approximately $1.3 billion, a $1 million decrease from 2018. Details of operating revenues were
as follows:
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Retail — prior year $ 889  
Estimated change resulting from —   
Rates and pricing 31  
Weather (2)  
Fuel and other cost recovery (41)  
Retail — current year 877 $ 889
Wholesale revenues —   
Non-affiliates 237 263
Affiliates 132 91
Total wholesale revenues 369 354
Other operating revenues 18 22
Total operating revenues $ 1,264 $ 1,265
Percent change (0.1)% 6.6%
Total retail revenues for 2019 decreased $12 million, or 1.3%, compared to 2018 primarily due to a fuel rate decrease that became
effective for the first billing cycle of February 2019. This decrease was largely offset by an increase in rates and pricing, primarily
related to PEP and ECO Plan rate changes that became effective for the first billing cycle of September 2018, net of a new tolling
arrangement accounted for as a sales-type lease effective January 2019. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi
Power – Environmental Compliance Overview Plan" and " – Performance Evaluation Plan" and Note 9 to the financial statements
under "Lessor" for additional information.
See "Energy Sales" below for a discussion of changes in the volume of energy sold, including changes related to sales and weather.
Electric rates for Mississippi Power include provisions to adjust billings for fluctuations in fuel costs, including the energy
component of purchased power costs. Under these provisions, fuel revenues generally equal fuel expenses, including the energy
component of purchased power costs, and do not affect net income. Recoverable fuel costs include fuel and purchased power
expenses reduced by the fuel and emissions portion of wholesale revenues from energy sold to customers outside Mississippi
Power's service territory. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Mississippi Power – Fuel Cost
Recovery" herein for additional information.
Wholesale revenues from power sales to non-affiliated utilities, including FERC-regulated MRA sales as well as market-based
sales, were as follows:
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
Capacity and other $ 3 $ 6
Energy 234 257
Total non-affiliated $ 237 $ 263
Wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates will vary depending on fuel prices, the market prices of wholesale energy compared
to the cost of Mississippi Power's and the Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern
Company system's electric service territory, and the availability of the Southern Company system's generation. Increases and
decreases in energy revenues that are driven by fuel prices are accompanied by an increase or decrease in fuel costs and do not have
a significant impact on net income. In addition, Mississippi Power provides service under long-term contracts with rural electric
cooperative associations and municipalities located in southeastern Mississippi under cost-based electric tariffs which are subject to
regulation by the FERC. The contracts with these wholesale customers represented 15.7% of Mississippi Power's total
II-40
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
operating revenues in 2019 and are generally subject to 10-year rolling cancellation notices. Historically, these wholesale customers
have acted as a group and any changes in contractual relationships for one customer are likely to be followed by the other
wholesale customers. Short-term opportunity energy sales are also included in sales for resale to non-affiliates. These opportunity
sales are made at market-based rates that generally provide a margin above Mississippi Power's variable cost to produce the energy.
Wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates decreased $26 million, or 9.9%, compared to 2018. This decrease primarily reflects
decreases of $14 million from lower fuel prices, $6 million from decreased customer usage, and $8 million from lower PPA
capacity and energy sales.
Wholesale revenues from sales to affiliates will vary depending on demand and the availability and cost of generating resources at
each company. These affiliate sales are made in accordance with the IIC, as approved by the FERC. These transactions do not have
a significant impact on earnings since this energy is generally sold at marginal cost.
Wholesale revenues from sales to affiliates increased $41 million, or 45.1%, in 2019 compared to 2018. This increase was primarily
due to a $76 million increase associated with higher KWH sales due to the dispatch of Mississippi Power's lower cost generation
resources to serve the Southern Company system's territorial load, partially offset by a $35 million decrease associated with lower
natural gas prices.
Energy Sales
Changes in revenues are influenced heavily by the change in the volume of energy sold from year to year. KWH sales for 2019 and
the percent change from the prior year were as follows:
 2019
 Total
KWHsTotal KWH
Percent ChangeWeather-Adjusted
Percent Change
 (in millions)
Residential 2,062 (2.4)% (0.8)%
Commercial 2,715 (2.9) (2.7)
Industrial 4,795 (2.6) (2.6)
Other 36 (1.9) (1.9)
Total retail 9,608 (2.7) (2.2)%
Wholesale  
Non-affiliated 3,966 (0.3)
Affiliated 4,758 84.1
Total wholesale 8,724 32.9
Total energy sales 18,332 11.5 %
Changes in retail energy sales are generally the result of changes in electricity usage by customers, changes in weather, and changes
in the number of customers. Retail energy sales decreased 2.7% in 2019 as compared to the prior year, primarily due to decreased
demand by several large industrial customers. Weather-adjusted residential and commercial KWH sales decreased 0.8% and 2.7%,
respectively, in 2019 primarily due to decreased customer usage as a result of an increase in energy saving initiatives, slightly offset
by customer growth.
See "Operating Revenues" above for a discussion of significant changes in wholesale revenues to affiliated companies.
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
The mix of fuel sources for generation of electricity is determined primarily by demand, the unit cost of fuel consumed, and the
availability of generating units. Additionally, Mississippi Power purchases a portion of its electricity needs from the wholesale
market.
II-41
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Details of Mississippi Power's generation and purchased power were as follows:
 2019  2018
Total generation (in millions of KWHs) 18,269 15,966
Total purchased power (in millions of KWHs) 529 960
Sources of generation (percent) –  
Gas 94 93
Coal 6 7
Cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)  –  
Gas 2.26 2.65
Coal 4.05 3.50
Average cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH) 2.37 2.72
Average cost of purchased power (in cents per net KWH) 3.71 4.27
Fuel and purchased power expenses were $427 million in 2019, a decrease of $19 million, or 4.3%, as compared to the prior year.
The decrease was primarily due to a $60 million decrease related to the average cost of fuel and purchased power primarily due to
the lower average cost of natural gas, partially offset by a $41 million net increase associated with the volume of KWHs generated
and purchased primarily due to the availability of Mississippi Power's lower-cost generation resources.
Fuel and purchased power energy transactions do not have a significant impact on earnings, since energy expenses are generally
offset by energy revenues through Mississippi Power's fuel cost recovery clauses. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL –
"Regulatory Matters – Mississippi Power – Fuel Cost Recovery" herein and Note 1 to the financial statements under "Fuel Costs"
for additional information.
Fuel
Fuel expense increased $2 million, or 0.5%, in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily due to a 15% increase in the volume of KWHs
generated, partially offset by a 13% net decrease in the average cost of fuel per KWH generated.
Purchased Power
Purchased power expense decreased $21 million, or 51.2%, in 2019 compared to 2018. The decrease was primarily the result of a
45% decrease in the volume of KWHs purchased due to the availability of Mississippi Power's lower-cost generation resources and
a 13% decrease in the average cost per KWH purchased.
Energy purchases will vary depending on the market prices of wholesale energy as compared to the cost of the Southern Company
system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company system's service territory, and the availability of the
Southern Company system's generation. These purchases are made in accordance with the IIC or other contractual agreements, as
approved by the FERC.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
Other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $30 million, or 9.6%, in 2019 compared to the prior year. The decrease was
primarily due to decreases of $21 million in compensation and benefit expenses primarily due to an employee attrition plan
implemented in the third quarter 2018, $5 million in amortization of previously deferred Plant Ratcliffe expenses as a result of a
settlement agreement reached with wholesale customers (MRA Settlement Agreement), $5 million in planned generation outage
costs, and $4 million in Plant Ratcliffe waste water treatment expenses. These decreases were partially offset by a $9 million
increase in overhead line maintenance and vegetation management expenses. See Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Mississippi Power – Municipal and Rural Associations Tariff" for additional information.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization increased $23 million, or 13.6%, in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily related to increases in
amortization associated with ECO Plan regulatory assets. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power –
Environmental Compliance Overview Plan" for additional information.
II-42
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Taxes Other Than Income Taxes
Taxes other than income taxes increased $6 million, or 5.6%, in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily due to increases of $4 million in
ad valorem taxes and $2 million in franchise taxes.
Estimated Loss on Kemper IGCC
In 2019 and 2018, charges of $24 million and $37 million, respectively, were recorded associated with the abandonment and
closure activities and period costs, net of sales proceeds for the mine and gasifier-related assets. The 2019 charge primarily related
to the expected close out of a DOE contract related to the Kemper County energy facility. See Note 2 to the financial statements
under "Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized decreased $7 million, or 9.2%, in 2019 compared to 2018, primarily as the result of a
decrease in outstanding long-term borrowings. See Note 8 to the financial statements for additional information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net decreased $5 million in 2019 compared to 2018. The decrease was primarily due to the $24 million
settlement of Mississippi Power's Deepwater Horizon claim in 2018, partially offset by a $9 million increase in interest income
associated with a new tolling arrangement accounted for as a sales-type lease and a $7 million decrease in charitable donations. See
Notes 3 and 9 to the financial statements under "Other Matters – Mississippi Power" and "Lessor," respectively, for additional
information.
Income Taxes (Benefit)
Income tax expense increased $132 million, or 129.4%, in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily due to a $92 million increase related
to the 2018 reduction of a valuation allowance for a state income tax net operating loss (NOL) carryforward, a $42 million increase
associated with the revaluation of deferred tax assets related to the Kemper IGCC recorded in 2018 in accordance with the Tax
Reform Legislation, and a $9 million increase due to higher pre-tax earnings in 2019. These increases were partially offset by $15
million associated with the flowback of excess deferred income taxes resulting from the MRA Settlement Agreement and a new
tolling arrangement accounted for as a sales-type lease. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein
and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Southern Power
Net income attributable to Southern Power for 2019 was $339 million, a $152 million increase from 2018, primarily due to net
impacts totaling approximately $141 million from the dispositions of the Florida Plants in 2018 and Plant Nacogdoches in the
second quarter 2019, which include an asset impairment charge in 2018, a gain on sale in 2019 (including the recognition of
deferred ITCs), and a decrease in operations and maintenance expense, partially offset by PPA capacity revenue decreases in 2019.
The increase in net income also reflects $79 million in tax expense recognized in 2018 related to the Tax Reform Legislation, a $27
million wind turbine equipment impairment charge in 2018, and net gains in 2019 of $25 million from the Roserock solar facility
litigation settlement and sales of wind equipment. These increases were partially offset by $65 million in state income tax benefits
recorded in 2018 arising from the reorganization of Southern Power's legal entities and reductions in net income of approximately
$60 million related to the SP Wind tax equity partnership entered into in 2018.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" and " – Development
Projects" for additional information on the Florida Plants and Plant Nacogdoches dispositions and sales of wind turbine equipment.
See Notes 7 and 10 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" and "Legal Entity Reorganizations" for additional
information on the tax equity partnerships and the legal entity reorganization, respectively. Also see Note 3 to the financial
statements under "General Litigation – Southern Power" for additional information on the Roserock solar facility litigation
settlement.
II-43
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
A condensed statement of income follows:
 2019Increase
(Decrease)
from 2018
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 1,938 $ (267)
Fuel 577 (122)
Purchased power 108 (68)
Other operations and maintenance 359 (36)
Depreciation and amortization 479 (14)
Taxes other than income taxes 40 (6)
Asset impairment 3 (153)
Gain on disposition (23) (21)
Total operating expenses 1,543 (420)
Operating income 395 153
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 169 (14)
Other income (expense), net 47 24
Income taxes (benefit) (56) 108
Net income 329 83
Net income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests (10) (69)
Net income attributable to Southern Power $ 339 $ 152
Operating Revenues
Total operating revenues include PPA capacity revenues, which are derived primarily from long-term contracts involving natural
gas facilities and a biomass generating facility (through the second quarter 2019 sale of Plant Nacogdoches), and PPA energy
revenues from Southern Power's generation facilities. To the extent Southern Power has capacity not contracted under a PPA, it
may sell power into an accessible wholesale market, or, to the extent those generation assets are part of the FERC-approved IIC, it
may sell power into the Southern Company power pool.
Natural Gas and Biomass Capacity and Energy Revenue
Capacity revenues generally represent the greatest contribution to operating income and are designed to provide recovery of fixed
costs plus a return on investment.
Energy is generally sold at variable cost or is indexed to published natural gas indices. Energy revenues will vary depending on the
energy demand of Southern Power's customers and their generation capacity, as well as the market prices of wholesale energy
compared to the cost of Southern Power's energy. Energy revenues also include fees for support services, fuel storage, and unit start
charges. Increases and decreases in energy revenues under PPAs that are driven by fuel or purchased power prices are accompanied
by an increase or decrease in fuel and purchased power costs and do not have a significant impact on net income.
Solar and Wind Energy Revenue
Southern Power's energy sales from solar and wind generating facilities are predominantly through long-term PPAs that do not have
capacity revenue. Customers either purchase the energy output of a dedicated renewable facility through an energy charge or pay a
fixed price related to the energy generated from the respective facility and sold to the grid. As a result, Southern Power's ability to
recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance expenses is dependent upon the level of energy generated from these
facilities, which can be impacted by weather conditions, equipment performance, transmission constraints, and other factors.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Southern Power's Power Sales Agreements" herein for additional information
regarding Southern Power's PPAs.
II-44
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Operating Revenues Details
Details of Southern Power's operating revenues were as follows:
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
PPA capacity revenues $ 482 $ 580
PPA energy revenues 1,081 1,140
Total PPA revenues 1,563 1,720
Non-PPA revenues 363 472
Other revenues 12 13
Total operating revenues $ 1,938 $ 2,205
Operating revenues for 2019 were $1.9 billion, a $267 million, or 12%, decrease from 2018. The decrease in operating revenues
was primarily due to the following:
•PPA capacity revenues decreased $98 million, or 17%, primarily due to the sales of the Florida Plants in December 2018 and
Plant Nacogdoches in June 2019. In addition, the change reflects a reduction of $34 million from the expiration of an affiliate
natural gas PPA, offset by a $36 million increase in new PPA capacity revenues from existing natural gas facilities, of which $13
million related to the expansion unit at Plant Mankato.
•PPA energy revenues decreased $59 million, or 5%, primarily due to a $67 million decrease in sales from natural gas facilities
primarily driven by a $103 million decrease in the average cost of fuel and purchased power, partially offset by a $36 million
increase in the volume of KWHs sold due to increased customer load.
•Non-PPA revenues decreased $109 million, or 23%, primarily due to a $72 million decrease in the volume of KWHs sold
through short-term sales and a $37 million decrease in the market price of energy.
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
Details of Southern Power's generation and purchased power were as follows:
 Total
KWHsTotal KWH
% ChangeTotal
KWHs
 2019  2018
 (in billions of KWHs)
Generation 47  46
Purchased power 3  4
Total generation and purchased power 50 —% 50
Total generation and purchased power, excluding solar, wind, and tolling
agreements 29 —% 29
Southern Power's PPAs for natural gas generation generally provide that the purchasers are responsible for either procuring the fuel
(tolling agreements) or reimbursing Southern Power for substantially all of the cost of fuel relating to the energy delivered under
such PPAs. Consequently, changes in such fuel costs are generally accompanied by a corresponding change in related fuel revenues
and do not have a significant impact on net income. Southern Power is responsible for the cost of fuel for generating units that are
not covered under PPAs. Power from these generating units is sold into the wholesale market or into the Southern Company power
pool for capacity owned directly by Southern Power.
Purchased power expenses will vary depending on demand, availability, and the cost of generating resources throughout the
Southern Company system and other contract resources. Load requirements are submitted to the Southern Company power pool on
an hourly basis and are fulfilled with the lowest cost alternative, whether that is generation owned by Southern Power, an affiliate
company, or external parties. Such purchased power costs are generally recovered through PPA revenues.
II-45
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Details of Southern Power's fuel and purchased power expenses were as follows:
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
Fuel $ 577 $ 699
Purchased power 108 176
Total fuel and purchased power expenses $ 685 $ 875
In 2019, total fuel and purchased power expenses decreased $190 million, or 22%, compared to 2018. Fuel expense decreased $122
million, or 17%, due to a $137 million decrease in the average cost of fuel per KWH generated, partially offset by a $15 million
increase associated with the volume of KWHs generated. Purchased power expense decreased $68 million, or 39%, due to a $37
million decrease associated with the average cost of purchased power and a $31 million decrease associated with the volume of
KWHs purchased.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
In 2019, other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $36 million, or 9%, compared to 2018. The decrease was due to
gains totaling $17 million on the sale of wind turbine equipment, decreased expense of $17 million related to the dispositions of the
Florida Plants and Plant Nacogdoches, and the recovery of $5 million in legal costs related to the Roserock solar facility litigation
settlement in the first quarter 2019. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Development Projects" and "
– Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" for additional information on the sale of wind turbine equipment and the dispositions,
respectively. Also see Note 3 to the financial statements under "General Litigation Matters – Southern Power" for additional
information on the litigation settlement.
Asset Impairment
Asset impairment charges totaling $156 million were recorded in 2018, including $119 million related to the sale of the Florida
Plants and $36 million related to wind turbine equipment held for development projects. Asset impairment charges in 2019 were
immaterial. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" and " –
Development Projects" for additional information.
Gain on Dispositions, Net
The sale of Plant Nacogdoches in 2019 resulted in a $23 million gain. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern
Power – Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
In 2019, interest expense, net of amounts capitalized decreased $14 million, or 8%, compared to 2018, primarily due to a decrease
in the amount of outstanding debt.
Other Income (Expense), Net
In 2019, other income (expense), net increased $24 million, or 104%, compared to 2018 primarily due to a $36 million gain arising
from the Roserock solar facility litigation settlement in 2019, partially offset by a $14 million gain from a joint-development wind
project in 2018 attributable to Southern Power's partner in the project, which was offset by a $14 million loss within noncontrolling
interests. See Note 3 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" for additional information regarding the litigation
settlement.
Income Taxes (Benefit)
In 2019, income tax benefit was $56 million compared to $164 million for 2018, a decrease of $108 million, primarily attributable
to reductions in tax benefits of $127 million from wind PTCs primarily following the 2018 sale of a noncontrolling tax equity
interest in SP Wind and $65 million from changes in state apportionment rates following the 2018 reorganizations of certain legal
entities, as well as a $64 million increase in income tax expense as a result of higher pre-tax earnings, partially offset by $79
million in tax expense recognized in 2018 related to the Tax Reform Legislation and a $75 million tax benefit resulting from the
recognition of deferred ITCs remaining from the original construction recognized in connection with the sale of Plant
Nacogdoches.
II-46
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters – Federal Tax Reform Legislation" herein and Notes 1, 10, and 15
to the financial statements under "Income Taxes," "Effective Tax Rate," and "Southern Power," respectively, for additional
information.
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests
In 2019, net income attributable to noncontrolling interests decreased $69 million, or 117%, compared to 2018. The decrease was
primarily due to $92 million of losses attributable to noncontrolling interests related to the tax equity partnerships entered into in
2018 and $14 million attributable to a joint-development wind project in 2018, partially offset by an allocation of approximately
$29 million of income to the noncontrolling interest partner related to the Roserock solar facility litigation settlement. See Note 3 to
the financial statements under "General Litigation Matters – Southern Power" and Note 7 to the financial statements under
"Southern Power" for additional information regarding the litigation settlement and tax equity partnerships, respectively.
Southern Company Gas
Operating Metrics
Southern Company Gas continues to focus on several operating metrics, including Heating Degree Days, customer count, and
volumes of natural gas sold.
Southern Company Gas measures weather and the effect on its business using Heating Degree Days. Generally, increased Heating
Degree Days result in higher demand for natural gas on Southern Company Gas' distribution system. Southern Company Gas has
various regulatory mechanisms, such as weather and revenue normalization and straight-fixed-variable rate design, which limit its
exposure to weather changes within typical ranges in each of its utility's respective service territory, including Nicor Gas following
the approval of a revenue decoupling mechanism for residential customers in its recent rate case. Southern Company Gas also
utilizes weather hedges to limit the negative income impacts in the event of warmer-than-normal weather.
The number of customers served by gas distribution operations and gas marketing services can be impacted by natural gas prices,
economic conditions, and competition from alternative fuels. Gas distribution operations and gas marketing services' customers are
primarily located in Georgia and Illinois.
Southern Company Gas' natural gas volume metrics for gas distribution operations and gas marketing services illustrate the effects
of weather and customer demand for natural gas. Wholesale gas services' physical sales volumes represent the daily average natural
gas volumes sold to its customers.
Seasonality of Results
During the Heating Season, natural gas usage and operating revenues are generally higher as more customers are connected to the
gas distribution systems and natural gas usage is higher in periods of colder weather. Occasionally in the summer, wholesale gas
services' operating revenues are impacted due to peak usage by power generators in response to summer energy demands. Southern
Company Gas' base operating expenses, excluding cost of natural gas, bad debt expense, and certain incentive compensation costs,
are incurred relatively evenly throughout the year. Seasonality also affects the comparison of certain balance sheet items across
quarters, including receivables, unbilled revenues, natural gas for sale, and notes payable. However, these items are comparable
when reviewing Southern Company Gas' annual results. Thus, Southern Company Gas' operating results can vary significantly
from quarter to quarter as a result of seasonality, which is illustrated in the table below.
  Percent Generated During
Heating Season
  Operating RevenuesNet
Income
2019  68.7% 86.8%
2018  68.7% 96.0%
Net Income
Net income attributable to Southern Company Gas in 2019 was $585 million, an increase of $213 million, or 57.3%, compared to
the prior year. The change in net income includes a $125 million increase at wholesale gas services, an increase of $57 million in
continued investment in infrastructure replacement programs and base rate changes at gas distribution operations, net of
depreciation, a $34 million decrease in income taxes primarily at Atlanta Gas Light due to increased flowback of excess deferred
income taxes in lieu of a rate increase as previously authorized by the Georgia PSC, and an $11 million increase in earnings from
equity method investments in 2019. This increase also includes a $51 million net loss in 2018 from the Southern Company Gas
II-47
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Dispositions (including the goodwill impairment charge) and $21 million in disposition-related costs in 2018, partially offset by
$86 million in after-tax impairment charges in 2019. See Notes 3 and 15 to the financial statements under "Other Matters –
Southern Company Gas" and "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline," respectively,
for additional information on the impairment charges. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Rate
Proceedings – Nicor Gas" and " – Atlanta Gas Light" for additional information on the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. Also
see FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein and Notes 10 and 15 to the financial statements for
additional information.
A condensed income statement for Southern Company Gas follows:
 2019Increase
(Decrease) from
2018
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 3,792$ (117)
Cost of natural gas 1,319 (220)
Cost of other sales — (12)
Other operations and maintenance 888 (93)
Depreciation and amortization 487 (13)
Taxes other than income taxes 213 2
Impairment charges 115 73
(Gain) loss on dispositions, net — 291
Total operating expenses 3,022 28
Operating income 770 (145)
Earnings from equity method investments 157 9
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 232 4
Other income (expense), net 20 19
Earnings before income taxes 715 (121)
Income taxes 130 (334)
Net Income $ 585$ 213
The Southern Company Gas Dispositions were completed by July 29, 2018 and represent the primary variance driver for 2019
compared to 2018. Detailed variance explanations are provided herein. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information on the Southern Company Gas Dispositions.
II-48
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues in 2019 were $3.8 billion, a $117 million decrease, compared to 2018. Details of operating revenues were as
follows:
 2019
 (in millions)
Operating revenues – prior year $ 3,909
Estimated change resulting from –
Infrastructure replacement programs and base rate changes 96
Gas costs and other cost recovery (89)
Wholesale gas services 150
Southern Company Gas Dispositions(*)(300)
Other 26
Operating revenues – current year $ 3,792
Percent change (3.0)%
(*)Includes a $245 million decrease related to natural gas revenues, including alternative revenue programs, and a $55 million decrease related to other revenues.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Revenues from infrastructure replacement programs and base rate changes increased in 2019 compared to the prior year primarily
due to increases of $74 million at Nicor Gas and $16 million at Atlanta Gas Light. These amounts include gas distribution
operations' continued investments recovered through infrastructure replacement programs and base rate increases as well as
customer refunds in 2018 as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information.
Revenues associated with gas costs and other cost recovery decreased in 2019 compared to the prior year primarily due to lower
natural gas prices and decreased volumes of natural gas sold. Natural gas distribution rates include provisions to adjust billings for
fluctuations in natural gas costs. Therefore, gas costs recovered through natural gas revenues generally equal the amount expensed
in cost of natural gas and do not affect net income from gas distribution operations. See "Cost of Natural Gas" herein for additional
information.
Revenues from wholesale gas services increased in 2019 primarily due to derivative gains, partially offset by decreased commercial
activity. See "Segment Information – Wholesale Gas Services" herein for additional information.
Other revenues increased in 2019 primarily due to increases in customers at gas distribution operations and recovery of prior period
hedge losses at gas marketing services.
Heating Degree Days
During Heating Season, natural gas usage and operating revenues are generally higher. Weather typically does not have a
significant net income impact other than during the Heating Season. The following table presents the Heating Degree Days
information for Illinois and Georgia, the primary locations where Southern Company Gas' operations are impacted by weather.
  Years Ended December 31,  2019 vs. normal 2019 vs. 2018
  Normal(a) 2019 2018  colder (warmer) colder (warmer)
  (in thousands)     
Illinois(b) 5,782 6,136 6,101 6.1 % 0.6 %
Georgia  2,529 2,157 2,588 (14.7)% (16.7)%
(a)Normal represents the 10-year average from January 1, 2009 through December 31, 2018 for Illinois at Chicago Midway International Airport and for Georgia
at Atlanta Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, based on information obtained from the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, National
Climatic Data Center.
(b)Heating Degree Days in Illinois are expected to have a limited financial impact in future years. On October 2, 2019, Nicor Gas received approval for a volume
balancing adjustment, a revenue decoupling mechanism for residential customers that provides a monthly benchmark level of revenue per rate class for
recovery.
II-49
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas hedged its exposure to warmer-than-normal weather in Illinois for gas distribution operations and in
Illinois and Georgia for gas marketing services. The remaining impacts of weather on earnings were immaterial.
Customer Count
The following table provides the number of customers served by Southern Company Gas at December 31, 2019 and 2018:
 2019 2018
 (in thousands, except market share %)
Gas distribution operations 4,277 4,248
Gas marketing services  
Energy customers(*)631 697
Market share of energy customers in Georgia 28.9% 29.0%
(*)Gas marketing services' customers are primarily located in Georgia and Illinois. Also included as of December 31, 2018 were approximately 70,000 customers
in Ohio contracted through an annual auction process to serve for 12 months beginning April 1, 2018.
Southern Company Gas anticipates overall customer growth trends in gas distribution operations to continue as it expects continued
improvement in the new housing market and low natural gas prices. Southern Company Gas uses a variety of targeted marketing
programs to attract new customers and to retain existing customers.
Cost of Natural Gas
Excluding Atlanta Gas Light, which does not sell natural gas to end-use customers, gas distribution operations charges its utility
customers for natural gas consumed using natural gas cost recovery mechanisms set by the applicable state regulatory agencies.
Under these mechanisms, all prudently-incurred natural gas costs are passed through to customers without markup, subject to
regulatory review. Gas distribution operations defers or accrues the difference between the actual cost of natural gas and the amount
of commodity revenue earned in a given period. The deferred or accrued amount is either billed or refunded to customers
prospectively through adjustments to the commodity rate. Deferred natural gas costs are reflected as regulatory assets and accrued
natural gas costs are reflected as regulatory liabilities. Therefore, gas costs recovered through natural gas revenues generally equal
the amount expensed in cost of natural gas and do not affect net income from gas distribution operations. Cost of natural gas at gas
distribution operations represented 84.5% of the total cost of natural gas for 2019.
Gas marketing services customers are charged for actual and estimated natural gas consumed. Cost of natural gas includes the cost
of fuel and associated transportation costs, lost and unaccounted for gas, adjustments to reduce the value of inventories to market
value, if applicable, and gains and losses associated with certain derivatives.
In 2019, cost of natural gas was $1.3 billion, a decrease of $220 million, or 14.3%, compared to the prior year. Excluding a $106
million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, cost of natural gas decreased by $114 million, which reflects a
14.8% decrease in natural gas prices compared to 2018.
II-50
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Volumes of Natural Gas Sold
The following table details the volumes of natural gas sold during all periods presented.
 2019 vs. 2018
 2019  2018 % Change
Gas distribution operations (mmBtu in millions)   
Firm 677 721 (6.1)%
Interruptible 92 95 (3.2)%
Total(*) 769 816 (5.8)%
Wholesale gas services (mmBtu in millions/day)   
Daily physical sales 6.4 6.7 (4.5)%
Gas marketing services (mmBtu in millions)   
Firm:   
Georgia 33 37 (10.8)%
Illinois 12 13 (7.7)%
Other 15 20 (25.0)%
Interruptible large commercial and industrial 14 14 — %
Total 74 84 (11.9)%
(*)Includes total volumes of natural gas sold of 38 mmBtu for 2018 related to Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, and Florida City Gas, which were sold in July 2018.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas" and " – Sale of Florida City Gas" for
additional information.
Cost of Other Sales
Cost of other sales related to Pivotal Home Solutions, which was sold on June 4, 2018. See Note 15 to the financial statements
under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions" for additional information.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
In 2019, other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $93 million, or 9.5%, compared to the prior year. Excluding a $65
million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $28
million. This decrease was primarily due to $28 million of disposition-related costs incurred during 2018, a $12 million adjustment
in 2018 for the adoption of a new paid time off policy, an $11 million expense for a litigation settlement to facilitate the sale of
Pivotal Home Solutions in 2018, and a $7 million decrease in compensation and benefits costs, partially offset by a $22 million
increase in rider expenses, primarily at Nicor Gas, passed through directly to customers. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
– "Southern Company Gas – Utility Regulation and Rate Design" herein for additional information.
Depreciation and Amortization
In 2019, depreciation and amortization decreased $13 million, or 2.6%, compared to the prior year. Excluding a $27 million
decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, depreciation and amortization increased $14 million. This increase
was primarily due to continued infrastructure investments at gas distribution operations, partially offset by accelerated depreciation
related to assets retired in 2018. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Infrastructure Replacement
Programs and Capital Projects" for additional information.
Impairment Charges
In 2019, Southern Company Gas recorded impairment charges of $91 million related to a natural gas storage facility in Louisiana
and $24 million in contemplation of the sale of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline. In 2018, a goodwill
impairment charge of $42 million was recorded in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. See Notes 1, 3, and 15 to
the financial statements under "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets and Liabilities," "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas,"
and "Southern Company Gas," respectively, for additional information.
II-51
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
(Gain) Loss on Dispositions, Net
In 2018, gain on dispositions, net was $291 million and was associated with the Southern Company Gas Dispositions. The income
tax expense on these gains included income tax expense on goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for which a deferred tax
liability had not been recorded previously.
Earnings from Equity Method Investments
In 2019, earnings from equity method investments increased $9 million, or 6.1%, compared to the prior year and reflect higher
earnings from SNG as a result of rate increases that became effective September 2018, partially offset by a $6 million pre-tax loss
on the sale of Triton in May 2019. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional
information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
In 2019, other income (expense), net increased $19 million compared to the prior year. This increase primarily resulted from a $23
million decrease in charitable donations in 2019.
Income Taxes
In 2019, income taxes decreased $334 million, or 72.0%, compared to the prior year. This decrease primarily reflects a reduction of
$348 million related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, as well as $29 million in benefits associated with impairment
charges in 2019 and additional benefits from the flowback of excess deferred income taxes in 2019 primarily at Atlanta Gas Light
as previously authorized by the Georgia PSC, partially offset by $48 million of additional taxes associated with increased pre-tax
earnings at wholesale gas services.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional
information. Also see Notes 2, 3, and 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas," "Other Matters – Southern
Company Gas," and "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline," respectively, for
additional information on Atlanta Gas Light's regulatory treatment of the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation and the impairment
charges.
Performance and Non-GAAP Measures
Adjusted operating margin is a non-GAAP measure that is calculated as operating revenues less cost of natural gas, cost of other
sales, and revenue tax expense. Adjusted operating margin excludes other operations and maintenance expenses, depreciation and
amortization, taxes other than income taxes, impairment charges, and gain (loss) on dispositions, net, which are included in the
calculation of operating income as calculated in accordance with GAAP and reflected in the statements of income. The presentation
of adjusted operating margin is believed to provide useful information regarding the contribution resulting from base rate changes,
infrastructure replacement programs and capital projects, and customer growth at gas distribution operations since the cost of
natural gas and revenue tax expense can vary significantly and are generally billed directly to customers. Southern Company Gas
further believes that utilizing adjusted operating margin at gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing
services allows it to focus on a direct measure of performance before overhead costs. The applicable reconciliation of operating
income to adjusted operating margin is provided herein.
Adjusted operating margin should not be considered an alternative to, or a more meaningful indicator of, Southern Company Gas'
operating performance than operating income as determined in accordance with GAAP. In addition, Southern Company Gas'
adjusted operating margin may not be comparable to similarly titled measures of other companies.
Detailed variance explanations of Southern Company Gas' financial performance are provided herein.
II-52
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Reconciliations of operating income to adjusted operating margin are as follows:
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Operating Income $ 770$ 915
Other operating expenses(a)1,703 1,443
Revenue taxes(b)(114) (111)
Adjusted Operating Margin $ 2,359$ 2,247
(a)Includes other operations and maintenance, depreciation and amortization, taxes other than income taxes, impairment charges, and gain (loss) on dispositions,
net.
(b)Nicor Gas' revenue tax expenses, which are passed through directly to customers.
Segment Information
  2019 2018
  Adjusted
Operating
Margin(a)Operating
Expenses(a)Net Income
(Loss) Adjusted
Operating
Margin(a) Operating
Expenses (a)(b) Net Income
(Loss)(b)
 (in millions) (in millions)
Gas distribution operations $ 1,799$ 1,226$ 337$ 1,794 $ 890 $ 334
Gas pipeline investments 32 12 94 32 12 103
Wholesale gas services 273 54 163 134 64 38
Gas marketing services 234 122 83 263 244 (40)
All other 28 182 (92) 33 131 (63)
Intercompany eliminations (7) (7) — (9) (9) —
Consolidated $ 2,359$ 1,589$ 585$ 2,247 $ 1,332 $ 372
(a)Adjusted operating margin and operating expenses are adjusted for Nicor Gas' revenue tax expenses, which are passed through directly to customers.
(b)Operating expenses for gas distribution operations and gas marketing services include the gain on dispositions, net. Net income for gas distribution operations
and gas marketing services includes the gain on dispositions, net and the associated income tax expense. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Gas Distribution Operations
Gas distribution operations is the largest component of Southern Company Gas' business and is subject to regulation and oversight
by agencies in each of the states it serves. These agencies approve natural gas rates designed to provide Southern Company Gas
with the opportunity to generate revenues to recover the cost of natural gas delivered to its customers and its fixed and variable
costs, including depreciation, interest expense, operations and maintenance, taxes, and overhead costs, and to earn a reasonable
return on its investments.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, Southern Company Gas' second largest utility that operates in a deregulated natural gas
market and has a straight-fixed-variable rate design that minimizes the variability of its revenues based on consumption, the
earnings of the natural gas distribution utilities can be affected by customer consumption patterns that are a function of weather
conditions, price levels for natural gas, and general economic conditions that may impact customers' ability to pay for natural gas
consumed. Southern Company Gas has various weather mechanisms, such as weather normalization mechanisms and weather
derivative instruments, that limit its exposure to weather changes within typical ranges in its natural gas distribution utilities'
service territories.
In July 2018, a Southern Company Gas subsidiary, Pivotal Utility Holdings, completed the sales of the assets of two of its natural
gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, to South Jersey Industries, Inc. Also in July 2018, Southern Company
Gas and its wholly-owned direct subsidiary, NUI Corporation, completed the sale of Pivotal Utility Holdings, which primarily
consisted of Florida City Gas, to NextEra Energy. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for
additional information.
II-53
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The following table details the results of gas distribution operations including and excluding the impact of the utilities sold in 2018.
Favorable(unfavorable) 2019 vs 2018Impacts of
Utilities Sold in
2018  Variance Excluding
Utilities Sold in 2018
 (in millions)
Adjusted Operating Margin $ 5$ 138 $ 143
Operating expenses (336) 246 (90)
Other income (expense), net (3) — (3)
Interest expenses (9) (13) (22)
Income tax expense 346 (315) 31
Net income $ 3$ 56 $ 59
Excluding the impact of the utilities sold in 2018, net income in 2019 increased $59 million, or 21.2%, compared to the prior year.
The $143 million increase in adjusted operating margin reflects additional revenue from base rate increases and continued
investment recovered through infrastructure replacement programs, a decrease in refunds associated with bad debt riders, and the
customer refunds in 2018 as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. The $90 million increase in operating expenses includes
increases in compensation and benefit costs and rider expenses passed through directly to customers, as well as additional
depreciation primarily due to additional assets placed in service. The $3 million decrease in other income (expense), net is
primarily due to a contractor litigation settlement in 2018. The $22 million increase in interest expense is primarily from the
issuance of first mortgage bonds at Nicor Gas. The $31 million decrease in income tax expense is primarily due to an increase in
the flowback of excess deferred income taxes in 2019 primarily at Atlanta Gas Light.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Rate Proceedings – Atlanta Gas Light" and " –
Infrastructure Replacement Programs and Capital Projects – Atlanta Gas Light – PRP" herein for additional information on Atlanta
Gas Light's stipulation reflecting the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation and the contractor litigation settlement, respectively.
Gas Pipeline Investments
Gas pipeline investments consists primarily of joint ventures in natural gas pipeline investments including SNG, Atlantic Coast
Pipeline, PennEast Pipeline, and Dalton Pipeline. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for
additional information.
Net income in 2019 decreased $9 million, or 8.7%, compared to the prior year. This decrease primarily relates to an increase in tax
expense due to changes in state apportionment rates, partially offset by higher earnings from SNG.
Wholesale Gas Services
Wholesale gas services is involved in asset management and optimization, storage, transportation, producer and peaking services,
natural gas supply, natural gas services, and wholesale gas marketing. Southern Company Gas has positioned the business to
generate positive economic earnings on an annual basis even under low volatility market conditions that can result from a number
of factors. When market price volatility increases, wholesale gas services is well positioned to capture significant value and
generate stronger results. Operating expenses primarily reflect employee compensation and benefits.
Net income in 2019 increased $125 million, or 328.9%, compared to the prior year. This increase primarily relates to a $139 million
increase in adjusted operating margin, a $10 million decrease in operating expenses, and a $20 million increase in other income
(expense), partially offset by a $48 million increase in income taxes.
II-54
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Details of adjusted operating margin are provided in the table below.
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Commercial activity recognized $ 54$ 254
Gain on storage derivatives 40 9
Gain (loss) on transportation and forward commodity derivatives 186 (119)
LOCOM adjustments, net of current period recoveries (16) (7)
Purchase accounting adjustments to fair value inventory and contracts 9 (3)
Adjusted operating margin $ 273$ 134
Change in Commercial Activity
The commercial activity at wholesale gas services includes recognition of storage and transportation values that were generated in
prior periods, which reflect the impact of prior period hedge gains and losses as associated physical transactions occur. The
decrease in commercial activity in 2019 compared to the prior year was primarily due to significant natural gas price volatility that
resulted from prolonged cold weather during 2018 coupled with low natural gas supply.
Change in Storage and Transportation Derivatives
Volatility in the natural gas market arises from a number of factors, such as weather fluctuations or changes in supply or demand
for natural gas in different regions of the U.S. The volatility of natural gas commodity prices has a significant impact on Southern
Company Gas' customer rates, long-term competitive position against other energy sources, and the ability of wholesale gas
services to capture value from locational and seasonal spreads. Forward storage or time spreads applicable to the locations of
wholesale gas services' specific storage positions in 2019 resulted in storage derivative gains. Transportation and forward
commodity derivative gains in 2019 are primarily the result of narrowing transportation spreads due to supply constraints and
increases in natural gas supply, which impacted forward prices at natural gas receipt and delivery points, primarily in the Northeast
and Midwest regions.
The natural gas that wholesale gas services purchases and injects into storage is accounted for at the LOCOM value utilizing gas
daily or spot prices at the end of the year. See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Natural Gas for Sale" for additional
information.
Withdrawal Schedule and Physical Transportation Transactions
The expected natural gas withdrawals from storage and expected offset to prior hedge losses/gains associated with the
transportation portfolio of wholesale gas services are presented in the following table, along with the net operating revenues
expected at the time of withdrawal from storage and the physical flow of natural gas between contracted transportation receipt and
delivery points. Wholesale gas services' expected net operating revenues exclude storage and transportation demand charges, as
well as other variable fuel, withdrawal, receipt, and delivery charges, and exclude estimated profit sharing under asset management
agreements. Further, the amounts that are realizable in future periods are based on the inventory withdrawal schedule, planned
physical flow of natural gas between the transportation receipt and delivery points, and forward natural gas prices at December 31,
2019. A portion of wholesale gas services' storage inventory and transportation capacity is economically hedged with futures
contracts, which results in the realization of substantially fixed net operating revenues.
II-55
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Storage Withdrawal  
 Total storage(a) Expected net operating
losses(b) Physical Transportation Transactions –
Expected Net Operating Gains(c)
 (in mmBtu in millions) (in millions)  (in millions)
2020 61 $ 6 $ (119)
2021 and thereafter — — (67)
Total at December 31, 2019 61 $ 6 $ (186)
(a)At December 31, 2019, the WACOG of wholesale gas services' expected natural gas withdrawals from storage was $1.87 per mmBtu.
(b)Represents expected operating losses from planned storage withdrawals associated with existing inventory positions and could change as wholesale gas services
adjusts its daily injection and withdrawal plans in response to changes in future market conditions and forward NYMEX price fluctuations.
(c)Represents the expected net gains during the periods in which the derivatives will be settled and the physical transportation transactions will occur that offset the
derivative gains and losses previously recognized.
Gas Marketing Services
Gas marketing services provides energy-related products and services to natural gas markets and participants in customer choice
programs that were approved in various states to increase competition. These programs allow customers to choose their natural gas
supplier while the local distribution utility continues to provide distribution and transportation services. Gas marketing services is
weather sensitive and uses a variety of hedging strategies, such as weather derivative instruments and other risk management tools,
to partially mitigate potential weather impacts.
On June 4, 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions to American Water Enterprises LLC. See
Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions" for additional information.
Net income increased $123 million in 2019 compared to the prior year. This increase primarily relates to a $122 million decrease in
operating expenses and a $27 million decrease in income tax expense, partially offset by a $29 million decrease in adjusted
operating margin.
Excluding a $43 million decrease attributable to the 2018 disposition of Pivotal Home Solutions, adjusted operating margin
increased $14 million, which primarily reflects favorable margins and recovery of prior period hedge losses. Excluding a $116
million decrease attributable to the 2018 disposition of Pivotal Home Solutions that includes the related goodwill impairment
charge, operating expense decreased $6 million due to lower amortization of intangible assets. Excluding a $33 million decrease
attributable to the 2018 disposition of Pivotal Home Solutions, income tax expense increased $6 million primarily due to higher
pre-tax earnings.
All Other
All other includes Southern Company Gas' storage and fuels operations and its investment in Triton through completion of its sale
on May 29, 2019, AGL Services Company, and Southern Company Gas Capital, as well as various corporate operating expenses
that are not allocated to the reportable segments and interest income (expense) associated with affiliate financing arrangements.
Net loss increased $29 million, or 46.0%, in 2019 compared to the prior year. This increase primarily reflects a $51 million increase
in operating expenses, partially offset by a $39 million decrease in income taxes. The increase in operating expenses primarily
reflects a $91 million impairment charge related to a natural gas storage facility in Louisiana and a $24 million impairment charge
in contemplation of the sale of Southern Company Gas' interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline, partially offset by a
$12 million one-time adjustment in the first quarter 2018 for the adoption of a new paid time off policy, $28 million of disposition-
related costs incurred during 2018, and a $14 million decrease in depreciation and amortization. The decrease in income taxes
reflects a $29 million benefit due to the impairment charge, a $13 million benefit related to the reversal of a federal income tax
valuation allowance in connection with the sale of Triton, the impact of deferred tax expenses related to the enactment of the State
of Illinois income tax legislation in 2018, and changes in state income tax apportionment factors in several states during 2019. See
Note 3 to the financial statements under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas," Note 10 to the financial statements, and Note
15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline" for
additional information.
Segment Reconciliations
Reconciliations of operating income to adjusted operating margin for 2019 and 2018 are provided in the following tables. See Note
16 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional segment information.
II-56
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019
 Gas
Distribution
OperationsGas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas ServicesGas
Marketing
Services All OtherInter company
Elimination Consolidated
 (in millions)
Operating Income (Loss) $ 573$ 20$ 219$ 112$ (154)$ — $ 770
Other operating expenses(a)1,340 12 54 122 182 (7) 1,703
Revenue tax expense(b)(114) — — — — — (114)
Adjusted Operating Margin $ 1,799$ 32$ 273$ 234$ 28$ (7)$ 2,359
 2018
 Gas
Distribution
OperationsGas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas
ServicesGas
Marketing
Services All OtherIntercompany
Elimination Consolidated
 (in millions)
Operating Income (Loss) $ 904$ 20$ 70$ 19$ (98)$ — $ 915
Other operating expenses(a)1,001 12 64 244 131 (9) 1,443
Revenue tax expense(b)(111) — — — — — (111)
Adjusted Operating Margin $ 1,794$ 32$ 134$ 263$ 33$ (9)$ 2,247
(a)Includes other operations and maintenance, depreciation and amortization, taxes other than income taxes, impairment charges, and (gain) loss on dispositions,
net.
(b)Nicor Gas' revenue tax expenses, which are passed through directly to customers.
Effects of Inflation
The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities are subject to rate regulation that is generally
based on the recovery of historical and projected costs. The effects of inflation can create an economic loss since the recovery of
costs could be in dollars that have less purchasing power. Southern Power is party to long-term contracts reflecting market-based
rates, including inflation expectations. Any adverse effect of inflation on the Registrants' results of operations has not been
substantial in recent years. See Note 2 to the financial statements for additional information on rate regulation.
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
General
Prices for electric service provided by the traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distributed by the natural gas
distribution utilities to retail customers are set by state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies under cost-based
regulatory principles. Retail rates and earnings are reviewed and may be adjusted periodically within certain limitations. Prices for
wholesale electricity sales, interconnecting transmission lines, and the exchange of electric power are regulated by the FERC.
Southern Power continues to focus on long-term PPAs. See ACCOUNTING POLICIES – "Application of Critical Accounting
Policies and Estimates – Utility Regulation" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements for additional information about
regulatory matters.
Each Registrant's results of operations are not necessarily indicative of its future earnings potential. Recent disposition activities
described under "Acquisitions and Dispositions" herein and in Note 15 to the financial statements will impact future earnings for
the applicable Registrants. The level of the Registrants' future earnings depends on numerous factors that affect the opportunities,
challenges, and risks of the Registrants' primary businesses of selling electricity and/or distributing natural gas, as described further
herein.
For the traditional electric operating companies, these factors include the ability to maintain constructive regulatory environments
that allow for the timely recovery of prudently-incurred costs during a time of increasing costs, continued customer growth, and the
trend of reduced electricity usage per customer, especially in residential and commercial markets. Other major factors include Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 construction and rate recovery related thereto for Georgia Power and the ability to prevail against legal
challenges associated with the Kemper County energy facility for Mississippi Power.
II-57
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Earnings in the electricity business will also depend upon maintaining and growing sales, considering, among other things, the
adoption and/or penetration rates of increasingly energy-efficient technologies, increasing volumes of electronic commerce
transactions, and, for Georgia Power, more multi-family home construction, all of which could contribute to a net reduction in
customer usage.
The level of future earnings for Southern Power's competitive wholesale electric business depends on numerous factors including
Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy through the development or acquisition of renewable facilities and other
energy projects while containing costs, as well as regulatory matters, creditworthiness of customers, total electric generating
capacity available in Southern Power's market areas, and Southern Power's ability to successfully remarket capacity as current
contracts expire. In addition, renewable portfolio standards, transmission constraints, cost of generation from units within the
Southern Company power pool, and operational limitations could influence Southern Power's future earnings.
The level of future earnings for Southern Company Gas' primary business of distributing natural gas and its complementary
businesses in the gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services sectors depends on numerous
factors. These factors include the natural gas distribution utilities' ability to maintain constructive regulatory environments that
allow for the timely recovery of prudently-incurred costs, the completion and subsequent operation of ongoing infrastructure and
other construction projects, creditworthiness of customers, and Southern Company Gas' ability to optimize its transportation and
storage positions and to re-contract storage rates at favorable prices. The volatility of natural gas prices has an impact on Southern
Company Gas' customer rates, its long-term competitive position against other energy sources, and the ability of Southern
Company Gas' gas marketing services and wholesale gas services businesses to capture value from locational and seasonal spreads.
Additionally, changes in commodity prices subject a portion of Southern Company Gas' operations to earnings variability. Over the
longer term, volatility is expected to be low to moderate and locational and/or transportation spreads are expected to decrease as
new pipelines are built to reduce the existing supply constraints in the shale areas of the Northeast U.S. To the extent these
pipelines are further delayed or not built, volatility could increase. See "Construction Programs" herein for additional information
on permitting challenges experienced by the Atlantic Coast Pipeline and the PennEast Pipeline. Additional economic factors may
contribute to this environment, including a significant drop in oil and natural gas prices, which could lead to consolidation of
natural gas producers or reduced levels of natural gas production. Further, if economic conditions continue to improve, the demand
for natural gas may increase, which may cause natural gas prices to rise and drive higher volatility in the natural gas markets on a
longer-term basis.
Earnings for both the electricity and natural gas businesses are subject to a variety of other factors. These factors include weather,
competition, developing new and maintaining existing energy contracts and associated load requirements with wholesale
customers, energy conservation practiced by customers, the use of alternative energy sources by customers, the prices of electricity
and natural gas, and the price elasticity of demand. Demand for electricity and natural gas in the Registrants' service territories is
primarily driven by the pace of economic growth or decline that may be affected by changes in regional and global economic
conditions, which may impact future earnings.
Mississippi Power provides service under long-term contracts with rural electric cooperative associations and municipalities located
in southeastern Mississippi under cost-based electric tariffs which are subject to regulation by the FERC. The contracts with these
wholesale customers represented 15.7% of Mississippi Power's total operating revenues in 2019 and are generally subject to 10-
year rolling cancellation notices. Historically, these wholesale customers have acted as a group and any changes in contractual
relationships for one customer are likely to be followed by the other wholesale customers.
As part of its ongoing effort to adapt to changing market conditions, Southern Company continues to evaluate and consider a wide
array of potential business strategies. These strategies may include business combinations, partnerships, and acquisitions involving
other utility or non-utility businesses or properties, disposition of certain assets or businesses, internal restructuring, or some
combination thereof. Furthermore, Southern Company may engage in new business ventures that arise from competitive and
regulatory changes in the utility industry. Pursuit of any of the above strategies, or any combination thereof, may significantly
affect the business operations, risks, and financial condition of Southern Company. In addition, Southern Power and Southern
Company Gas regularly consider and evaluate joint development arrangements as well as acquisitions and dispositions of
businesses and assets as part of their business strategies. See "Acquisitions and Dispositions" herein and Note 15 to the financial
statements for additional information.
II-58
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Acquisitions and Dispositions
See Note 15 to the financial statements for additional information.
Southern Company
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy for an aggregate cash purchase price
of approximately $5.8 billion (less $1.3 billion of indebtedness assumed), including the final working capital adjustments. The gain
associated with the sale of Gulf Power totaled $2.6 billion pre-tax ($1.4 billion after tax). In 2018, net income attributable to Gulf
Power was $160 million.
Alabama Power
On September 6, 2019, Alabama Power entered into a purchase and sale agreement (Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition) to
acquire all of the equity interests in Tenaska Alabama II Partners, L.P. Tenaska Alabama II Partners, L.P. owns and operates an
approximately 885-MW combined cycle generation facility in Autauga County, Alabama. The transaction is expected to close by
September 1, 2020. As part of the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition, Alabama Power will assume an existing power sales
agreement under which the full output of the generating facility remains committed to another third party for its remaining term of
approximately three years. The estimated revenues from the power sales agreement are expected to offset the associated costs of
operation during the remaining term.
The completion of the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition is subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, including,
among other customary conditions, approval by the Alabama PSC and the FERC. Alabama Power expects to obtain all regulatory
approvals by the end of the third quarter 2020.
The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Power
Acquisitions
During 2019, Southern Power acquired a controlling interest in the fuel cell generation facility listed below and acquired the
Skookumchuck wind facility discussed under "Construction Programs – Southern Power" herein. Acquisition-related costs were
expensed as incurred and were not material.
Project
Facility ResourceApproximate
Nameplate
Capacity (MW) LocationSouthern Power
Ownership
Percentage CODPPA
CounterpartyPPA
Remaining
Period
DSGP(a)Fuel Cell 28 Delaware 100% of Class B N/A(b)Delmarva Power
& Light 15 years
(a)During 2019, Southern Power made a total investment of approximately $167 million in DSGP and now holds a controlling interest and consolidates 100% of
DSGP's operating results. Southern Power records net income attributable to noncontrolling interests for approximately 10 MWs of the facility.
(b)Southern Power's 18-MW share of the facility was repowered between June and August 2019. In December 2019, a Class C member joined the existing
partnership between the Class A member and Southern Power and made an investment to repower the remaining 10 MWs. In connection with the Class C
member joining the partnership, the original fuel cells (before repower), which had a carrying value of approximately $55 million, were distributed to the Class
A member in a non-cash transaction that was excluded from the statements of cash flows.
Development Projects
Southern Power continues to evaluate and refine the deployment of the remaining wind turbine equipment purchased in 2016 and
2017 to development and construction projects. Wind projects utilizing equipment purchased in 2016 and 2017, and reaching
commercial operation by the end of 2020 and 2021, are expected to qualify for 100% and 80% PTCs, respectively. The significant
majority of this equipment either has been deployed to completed projects, projects under construction, or projects that are probable
of being completed or has been sold to third parties. Sales during 2019 resulted in gains totaling approximately $17 million.
Sales of Renewable Facility Interests
In May 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership
indirectly owning substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, to Global Atlantic for approximately $1.2 billion. Since
Southern Power retained control of the limited partnership through its wholly-owned general partner, the sale was recorded as an
II-59
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
equity transaction. Cash distributions from SP Solar are allocated 67% to Southern Power and 33% to Global Atlantic in
accordance with their partnership ownership interests.
In December 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP Wind, which owns a portfolio
of eight operating wind facilities, to three financial investors for approximately $1.2 billion. The tax equity investors together will
generally receive 40% of the cash distributions from available cash and will receive 99% of the tax attributes, including future
PTCs.
Southern Power consolidates each entity, as the primary beneficiary of the VIE, since it controls the most significant activities,
including operating and maintaining the assets.
Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants
In December 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of all of its equity interests in the Florida Plants to NextEra Energy for $203
million, including working capital adjustments. In contemplation of this sale transaction, Southern Power recorded an asset
impairment charge of approximately $119 million ($89 million after tax) in May 2018. Pre-tax net income for the Florida Plants
was $49 million for the period from January 1, 2018 to December 4, 2018.
On June 13, 2019, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Nacogdoches, a 115-MW biomass facility
located in Nacogdoches County, Texas, to Austin Energy, for a purchase price of approximately $461 million, including working
capital adjustments. Southern Power recorded a gain of $23 million ($88 million after tax) on the sale. The pre-tax net income for
Plant Nacogdoches was $13 million and $27 million for the period from January 1, 2019 to June 13, 2019 and for the year ended
2018, respectively.
On January 17, 2020, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion
unit completed in May 2019) to a subsidiary of Xcel for a purchase price of approximately $663 million, including estimated
working capital adjustments. The sale resulted in a gain of approximately $39 million ($23 million after tax) in 2020. Pre-tax net
income for Plant Mankato was $29 million and immaterial for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The
assets and liabilities of Plant Mankato are classified as held for sale as of December 31, 2019 and 2018.
Southern Company Gas
In June 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the stock sale of Pivotal Home Solutions to American Water Enterprises LLC.
Southern Company Gas and American Water Enterprises LLC entered into a transition services agreement whereby Southern
Company Gas provided certain administrative and operational services through November 4, 2018.
In July 2018, a Southern Company Gas subsidiary, Pivotal Utility Holdings, completed the sales of the assets of two of its natural
gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, to South Jersey Industries, Inc. Southern Company Gas and South
Jersey Industries, Inc. entered into transition services agreements whereby Southern Company Gas will provide certain
administrative and operational services through no later than July 31, 2020.
In July 2018, Southern Company Gas and its wholly-owned direct subsidiary, NUI Corporation, completed the stock sale of Pivotal
Utility Holdings, which primarily consisted of Florida City Gas, to NextEra Energy. Southern Company Gas and NextEra Energy
entered into a transition services agreement whereby Southern Company Gas will provide certain administrative and operational
services through no later than July 29, 2020.
The Southern Company Gas Dispositions resulted in a net loss of $51 million in 2018, which includes $342 million of tax expense.
The after-tax impacts of these dispositions included income tax expense on goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for which
a deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously. In addition, a goodwill impairment charge of $42 million was recorded
during 2018 in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions.
The Southern Company Gas Dispositions materially decreased Southern Company Gas' subsequent earnings and cash flows. For
the year ended December 31, 2018, pre-tax earnings attributable to these dispositions were $297 million, which includes a $291
million gain on dispositions, net and a $42 million goodwill impairment. Due to the seasonal nature of the natural gas business and
other factors including, but not limited to, weather, regulation, competition, customer demand, and general economic conditions,
these results are not necessarily indicative of the results to be expected for any other period.
On May 29, 2019, Southern Company Gas sold its investment in Triton, a cargo container leasing company. This disposition
resulted in a pre-tax loss of $6 million and a net after-tax gain of $7 million as a result of reversing a $13 million federal income tax
valuation allowance.
On February 7, 2020, Southern Company Gas entered into agreements with Dominion Modular LNG Holdings, Inc. and Dominion
Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC for the sale of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline, respectively, for an
II-60
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
aggregate purchase price of $165 million, including estimated working capital and timing adjustments. Southern Company Gas
may also receive two payments of $5 million each, contingent upon certain milestones related to Pivotal LNG being met by
Dominion Modular LNG Holdings, Inc. after the completion of the sale. Based on the terms of these pending transactions, Southern
Company Gas recorded an asset impairment charge, exclusive of the contingent payments, for Pivotal LNG of approximately $24
million ($17 million after tax) as of December 31, 2019. The completion of each transaction is subject to the satisfaction or waiver
of certain conditions, including, among other customary closing conditions, the completion of the other transaction and, for the sale
of the interest in Atlantic Coast Pipeline, the expiration or termination of any applicable waiting period under the Hart-Scott-
Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976. The transactions are expected to be completed in the first half of 2020; however, the
ultimate outcome cannot be determined at this time. The assets and liabilities of Pivotal LNG and the interest in Atlantic Coast
Pipeline are classified as held for sale as of December 31, 2019. See Notes 3, 7, and 15 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas – Gas Pipeline Projects," "Southern Company Gas – Equity Method Investments," and "Southern Company Gas –
Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline," respectively, for additional information.
Environmental Matters
The Southern Company system's operations are regulated by state and federal environmental agencies through a variety of laws and
regulations governing air, water, land, and other natural resources. The Southern Company system maintains comprehensive
environmental compliance and GHG strategies to assess both current and upcoming requirements and compliance costs associated
with these environmental laws and regulations. The costs required to comply with environmental laws and regulations and to
achieve stated goals, including capital expenditures, operations and maintenance costs, and costs reflected in ARO liabilities, may
impact future electric generating unit retirement and replacement decisions, results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial
condition. Related costs may result from the installation of additional environmental controls, closure and monitoring of CCR
facilities, unit retirements, or changing fuel sources for certain existing units, as well as related upgrades to the Southern Company
system's transmission and distribution (electric and natural gas) systems. A major portion of these costs is expected to be recovered
through retail and wholesale rates, including existing ratemaking and billing provisions. The ultimate impact of environmental laws
and regulations and the GHG goals discussed herein will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of
requirements, the availability and cost of any deployed technology, fuel prices, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal
challenges.
New or revised environmental laws and regulations could affect many areas of operations for the Subsidiary Registrants. The
impact of any such changes cannot be determined at this time. Environmental compliance costs could affect earnings if such costs
cannot continue to be recovered on a timely basis in rates for the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas
distribution utilities or through long-term wholesale agreements for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern
Power.
Alabama Power and Mississippi Power recover environmental compliance costs through separate mechanisms, Rate CNP
Compliance and the ECO Plan, respectively. Georgia Power's base rates include an Environmental Compliance Cost Recovery
(ECCR) tariff that allows for the recovery of environmental compliance costs. The natural gas distribution utilities of Southern
Company Gas generally recover environmental remediation expenditures through rate mechanisms approved by their applicable
state regulatory agencies. See Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements for additional information.
Southern Power's PPAs generally contain provisions that permit charging the counterparty with some of the new costs incurred as a
result of changes in environmental laws and regulations. Since Southern Power's units are newer natural gas and renewable
generating facilities, costs associated with environmental compliance for these facilities have been less significant than for similarly
situated coal or older natural gas generating facilities. Environmental, natural resource, and land use concerns, including the
applicability of air quality limitations, the potential presence of wetlands or threatened and endangered species, the availability of
water withdrawal rights, uncertainties regarding impacts such as increased light or noise, and concerns about potential adverse
health impacts can, however, increase the cost of siting and operating any type of future electric generating facility. The impact of
such laws, regulations, and other considerations on Southern Power and subsequent recovery through PPA provisions cannot be
determined at this time.
Further, increased costs that are recovered through regulated rates could contribute to reduced demand for electricity and natural
gas, which could negatively affect results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition. Additionally, many commercial and
industrial customers may also be affected by existing and future environmental requirements, which for some may have the
potential to affect their demand for electricity and natural gas.
Although the timing, requirements, and estimated costs could change as environmental laws and regulations are adopted or
modified, as compliance plans are revised or updated, and as legal challenges to rules are initiated or completed, estimated capital
II-61
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
expenditures through 2024 based on the current environmental compliance strategy for the Southern Company system and the
traditional electric operating companies are as follows:
 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company $ 223$ 250$ 244$ 214$ 131$ 1,062
Alabama Power 80 77 82 97 103 439
Georgia Power 115 156 152 105 23 551
Mississippi Power 28 17 10 12 5 72
These estimates do not include any costs associated with potential regulation of GHG emissions. See "Global Climate Issues"
herein for additional information. The Southern Company system also anticipates substantial expenditures associated with ash pond
closure and ground water monitoring under the CCR Rule and related state rules, which are reflected in the applicable Registrants'
ARO liabilities. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements" herein and Note 6 to the financial
statements for additional information.
Environmental Laws and Regulations
Air Quality
The Southern Company system reduced SO2 and NOX air emissions by 98% and 88%, respectively, from 1990 to 2018. The
Southern Company system reduced mercury air emissions by over 96% from 2005 to 2018.
The EPA finalized regional haze regulations in 2005 and 2017. These regulations require states, tribal governments, and various
federal agencies to develop and implement plans to reduce pollutants that impair visibility and demonstrate reasonable progress
toward the goal of restoring natural visibility conditions in certain areas, including national parks and wilderness areas. States are
required to submit state implementation plans for the second ten-year planning period (2018 through 2028) by July 31, 2021. These
plans could require further reductions in particulate matter, SO2, and/or NOX, which could result in increased compliance costs at
affected electric generating units.
Water Quality
In 2014, the EPA finalized requirements under Section 316(b) of the Clean Water Act (CWA) to regulate cooling water intake
structures (CWIS) to minimize their effects on fish and other aquatic life at existing power plants. The regulation requires plant-
specific studies to determine applicable CWIS changes to protect organisms. The Southern Company system is conducting these
studies and currently anticipates applicable CWIS changes may include fish-friendly CWIS screens with fish return systems and
minor additions of monitoring equipment at certain plants. The impact of this rule will depend on the outcome of these plant-
specific studies, any additional protective measures required to be incorporated into each plant's National Pollutant Discharge
Elimination System (NPDES) permit based on site-specific factors, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In 2015, the EPA finalized the steam electric effluent limitations guidelines (ELG) rule (2015 ELG Rule) that set national standards
for wastewater discharges from new and existing steam electric generating units generating greater than 50 MWs. The 2015 ELG
Rule prohibits effluent discharges of certain waste streams and imposes stringent limits on flue gas desulfurization (scrubber)
wastewater discharges. The 2015 technology-based limits and the CCR Rule require extensive changes to existing ash and
wastewater management systems or the installation and operation of new ash and wastewater management systems. Compliance
with the 2015 ELG Rule is expected to require capital expenditures and increased operational costs for the traditional electric
operating companies' coal-fired electric generation. State environmental agencies will incorporate specific compliance applicability
dates in the NPDES permitting process for each ELG waste stream. On November 22, 2019, the EPA published a proposed rule that
changes certain requirements in the 2015 ELG Rule, including adjusting compliance limits and providing certain exemptions for
boilers that are expected to be retired by December 31, 2028 and for low utilization boilers (876,000 MWh/year or less). The
proposal also extends the latest applicability date for flue gas desulfurization wastewater to December 31, 2025 but retains the latest
applicability date of December 31, 2023 for bottom ash transport water. The impact of any changes to the 2015 ELG Rule will
depend on the content of a new final rule, which the EPA plans to finalize by August 2020, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
Coal Combustion Residuals
In 2015, the EPA finalized non-hazardous solid waste regulations for the disposal of CCR, including coal ash and gypsum, in
landfills and surface impoundments (ash ponds) at active electric generating power plants. The CCR Rule requires landfills and
II-62
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
ash ponds to be evaluated against a set of performance criteria and potentially closed if certain criteria are not met. Closure of
existing landfills and ash ponds requires installation of equipment and infrastructure to manage CCR in accordance with the CCR
Rule. In addition to the CCR Rule, the States of Alabama and Georgia finalized state regulations regarding the handling of CCR
within their respective states. The State of Georgia received approval from the EPA on its partial permit program implementing the
state CCR permit program in lieu of the federal self-implementing rule in accordance with the Water Infrastructure Improvements
for the Nation Act. The State of Alabama also submitted its state CCR program for the EPA's review and approval. The State of
Mississippi has not yet developed a state CCR permit program.
The EPA is in the process of amending portions of the CCR Rule. Most recently, on December 2, 2019, the EPA published a
proposed rule that would require facilities to cease placement of both CCR and non-CCR waste in unlined surface impoundments
as soon as technically feasible, no later than August 31, 2020. This proposed rule also includes extensions beyond August 31, 2020,
provided that certain conditions are met. Impacts of the proposed rule to the Southern Company system are expected to be limited,
as the traditional electric operating companies and SEGCO stopped sending coal ash from most of the generating units to unlined
ponds in April 2019 and expect to stop sending coal ash from the remaining generating units within the timeframes and associated
extensions allowed in the proposed rule.
Based on cost estimates for closure and monitoring of landfills and ash ponds pursuant to the CCR Rule, the Southern Company
system recorded/revised AROs for each CCR unit in 2015 and has continued to update these cost estimates and ARO liabilities in
subsequent years. The traditional electric operating companies expect to continue updating these estimates periodically as
additional information related to ash pond closure methodologies, schedules, and/or costs becomes available. Alabama Power
anticipates increasing the ARO for one of its ash ponds within the next nine months upon completion of a feasibility study and the
related cost estimate, and the increase could be material. Additionally, the closure designs and plans in the States of Alabama and
Georgia are subject to approval by environmental regulatory agencies. Absent continued recovery of ARO costs through regulated
rates, results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition for Southern Company and the traditional electric operating
companies could be materially impacted. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements" and
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Georgia Power – Integrated Resource Plan" herein and Note 6 to the
financial statements for additional information.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Environmental Remediation
The Southern Company system must comply with environmental laws and regulations governing the handling and disposal of
waste and releases of hazardous substances. Under these various laws and regulations, the Southern Company system could incur
substantial costs to clean up affected sites. The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas conduct studies
to determine the extent of any required cleanup and have recognized the estimated costs to clean up known impacted sites in their
financial statements. Amounts for cleanup and ongoing monitoring costs were not material for any year presented. The traditional
electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities in Illinois and Georgia (which represent substantially all of
Southern Company Gas' accrued remediation costs) have all received authority from their respective state PSCs or other applicable
state regulatory agencies to recover approved environmental compliance costs through regulatory mechanisms. These regulatory
mechanisms are adjusted annually or as necessary within limits approved by the state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory
agencies. The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas may be liable for some or all required cleanup
costs for additional sites that may require environmental remediation. See Note 3 to the financial statements under "Environmental
Remediation" for additional information.
Global Climate Issues
On July 8, 2019, the EPA published the final Affordable Clean Energy rule (ACE Rule) to repeal and replace the CPP. The ACE
Rule requires states to develop unit-specific CO2 emission rate standards for existing coal-fired units based on heat-rate efficiency
improvements. The ACE Rule is being challenged in the D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals and Georgia Power is an intervenor in the
litigation in support of the rule, as are other industry parties. The ultimate impact of the ACE Rule to the Southern Company system
will depend on state implementation plan requirements and the outcome of associated legal challenges and cannot be determined at
this time.
Additional GHG policies, including legislation, may emerge in the future requiring the United States to transition to a lower GHG
emitting economy; however, associated impacts are currently unknown. The Southern Company system has transitioned from an
electric generating mix of 70% coal and 15% natural gas in 2007 to a mix of 22% coal and 52% natural gas in 2019, along with
over 8,300 MWs of renewable resources. This transition has been supported in part by the Southern Company system retiring over
5,600 MWs of coal- and oil-fired generating capacity since 2010 and converting over 3,400 MWs of generating capacity from coal
to natural gas since 2015. In addition, Southern Company Gas has replaced approximately 5,600 miles of bare steel and
II-63
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
cast-iron pipe, resulting in removal of approximately 2.5 million metric tons of GHG from its natural gas distribution system since
1998.
The following table provides the Registrants' 2018 and preliminary 2019 GHG emissions based on ownership or financial control
of facilities:
 2018 Preliminary 2019
 (in million metric tons of CO2 equivalent)
Southern Company(a)(b)102 88
Alabama Power 36 32
Georgia Power 30 27
Mississippi Power 8 9
Southern Power(b)14 13
Southern Company Gas(b)1 1
(a)Includes non-registrant subsidiaries.
(b)The 2018 and preliminary 2019 amounts include GHG emissions attributable to disposed assets through the date of the applicable disposition. See Note 15 to
the financial statements for additional information regarding disposition activities.
Based on the preliminary 2019 amount above, the Southern Company system has achieved an estimated GHG emission reduction
of 44% since 2007. In April 2018, Southern Company established an intermediate goal of a 50% reduction in carbon emissions
from 2007 levels by 2030 and a long-term goal of low- to no-carbon operations by 2050. The Southern Company system's ability to
achieve these goals depends on many external factors, including supportive national energy policies, low natural gas prices, and the
development, deployment, and advancement of relevant energy technologies. The Southern Company system expects to continue
cost-effectively growing its renewable energy portfolio, optimizing technology advancements to modernize its transmission and
distribution systems, increasing the use of natural gas for generation, completing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, investing in energy
efficiency, and continuing research and development efforts focused on technologies to lower GHG emissions. The Southern
Company system is also evaluating methods of removing carbon from the atmosphere.
Regulatory Matters
Alabama Power
Alabama Power's revenues from regulated retail operations are collected through various rate mechanisms subject to the oversight
of the Alabama PSC. Alabama Power currently recovers its costs from the regulated retail business primarily through Rate RSE,
Rate CNP, Rate ECR, and Rate NDR. In addition, the Alabama PSC issues accounting orders to address current events impacting
Alabama Power. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power" for additional information regarding Alabama
Power's rate mechanisms and accounting orders.
Petition for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity
On September 6, 2019, Alabama Power filed a petition for a CCN with the Alabama PSC for authorization to procure additional
generating capacity through the turnkey construction of a new combined cycle facility and long-term contracts for the purchase of
power from others, both as more fully described below, as well as the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition. In addition, Alabama
Power will pursue approximately 200 MWs of certain demand side management and distributed energy resource programs. This
filing was predicated on the results of Alabama Power's 2019 IRP provided to the Alabama PSC, which identified an approximately
2,400-MW resource need for Alabama Power, driven by the need for additional winter reserve capacity. See Note 15 to the
financial statements under "Alabama Power" for additional information regarding the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition.
The procurement of these resources is subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, including, among other customary
conditions, approval by the Alabama PSC. The completion of the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition is also subject to approval
by the FERC. Alabama Power expects to obtain all regulatory approvals by the end of the third quarter 2020.
On May 8, 2019, Alabama Power entered into an Agreement for Engineering, Procurement, and Construction with Mitsubishi
Hitachi Power Systems Americas, Inc. and Black & Veatch Construction, Inc. to construct an approximately 720-MW combined
cycle facility at Plant Barry (Plant Barry Unit 8), which is expected to be placed in service by the end of 2023.
II-64
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The capital investment associated with the construction of Plant Barry Unit 8 and the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition is
currently estimated to total approximately $1.1 billion.
Alabama Power entered into additional long-term PPAs totaling approximately 640 MWs of generating capacity consisting of
approximately 240 MWs of combined cycle generation expected to begin later in 2020 and approximately 400 MWs of solar
generation coupled with battery energy storage systems (solar/battery systems) expected to begin in 2022 through 2024. The terms
of the agreements for the solar/battery systems permit Alabama Power to use the energy and retire the associated renewable energy
credits (REC) in service of customers or to sell RECs, separately or bundled with energy.
Upon certification, Alabama Power expects to recover costs associated with Plant Barry Unit 8 pursuant to its Rate CNP New Plant.
Additionally, Alabama Power expects to recover costs associated with the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition through the
inclusion in Rate RSE of revenues from the existing power sales agreement and, on expiration of that agreement, pursuant to Rate
CNP New Plant. The recovery of costs associated with laws, regulations, and other such mandates directed at the utility industry are
expected to be recovered through Rate CNP Compliance. Alabama Power expects to recover the capacity-related costs associated
with the PPAs through its Rate CNP PPA. In addition, fuel and energy-related costs are expected to be recovered through Rate
ECR. Any remaining costs associated with the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition and Plant Barry Unit 8 will be incorporated
through the annual filing of Rate RSE.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Construction Work in Progress Accounting Order
On October 1, 2019, the Alabama PSC acknowledged that Alabama Power would begin certain limited preparatory activities
associated with Plant Barry Unit 8 construction to meet the target in-service date by authorizing Alabama Power to record the
related costs as CWIP prior to the issuance of an order on the CCN petition. Should a CCN not be granted and Alabama Power does
not proceed with the related construction of Plant Barry Unit 8, Alabama Power may transfer those costs and any costs that directly
result from the non-issuance of the CCN to a regulatory asset which would be amortized over a five-year period. If the balance of
incurred costs reaches 5% of the estimated in-service cost of the total project prior to issuance of an order on the CCN petition,
Alabama Power will confer with the Alabama PSC regarding the appropriateness of additional authorization. The Sierra Club
subsequently filed a petition for reconsideration of the accounting order. The Alabama PSC voted to deny the petition for
reconsideration on January 7, 2020.
Rate RSE
The Alabama PSC has adopted Rate RSE that provides for periodic annual adjustments based upon Alabama Power's projected
weighted common equity return (WCER) compared to an allowable range. Rate RSE adjustments are based on forward-looking
information for the applicable upcoming calendar year. Rate RSE adjustments for any two-year period, when averaged together,
cannot exceed 4.0% and any annual adjustment is limited to 5.0%. When the projected WCER is under the allowed range, there is
an adjusting point of 5.98% and eligibility for a performance-based adder of seven basis points, or 0.07%, to the WCER adjusting
point if Alabama Power (i) has an "A" credit rating equivalent with at least one of the recognized rating agencies or (ii) is in the top
one-third of a designated customer value benchmark survey. If Alabama Power's actual retail return is above the allowed WCER
range, the excess will be refunded to customers unless otherwise directed by the Alabama PSC; however, there is no provision for
additional customer billings should the actual retail return fall below the WCER range. Prior to January 2019, retail rates remained
unchanged when the WCER range was between 5.75% and 6.21%.
In May 2018, the Alabama PSC approved modifications to Rate RSE and other commitments designed to position Alabama Power
to address the growing pressure on its credit quality resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation, without increasing retail rates under
Rate RSE in the near term. Alabama Power plans to reduce growth in total debt by increasing equity, with corresponding reductions
in debt issuances, thereby de-leveraging its capital structure. Alabama Power's goal is to achieve an equity ratio of approximately
55% by the end of 2025. At December 31, 2019, Alabama Power's equity ratio was approximately 50%.
The approved modifications to Rate RSE began for billings in January 2019. The modifications include reducing the top of the
allowed WCER range from 6.21% to 6.15% and modifications to the refund mechanism applicable to prior year actual results. The
modifications to the refund mechanism allow Alabama Power to retain a portion of the revenue that causes the actual WCER for a
given year to exceed the allowed range.
Generally, during a year without a Rate RSE upward adjustment, if Alabama Power's actual WCER is between 6.15% and 7.65%,
customers will receive 25% of the amount between 6.15% and 6.65%, 40% of the amount between 6.65% and 7.15%, and 75% of
the amount between 7.15% and 7.65%. Customers will receive all amounts in excess of an actual WCER of 7.65%. During a year
II-65
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
with a Rate RSE upward adjustment, if Alabama Power's actual WCER exceeds 6.15%, customers receive 50% of the amount
between 6.15% and 6.90% and all amounts in excess of an actual WCER of 6.90%.
In conjunction with these modifications to Rate RSE, in May 2018, Alabama Power consented to a moratorium on any upward
adjustments under Rate RSE for 2019 and 2020 and to return $50 million to customers through bill credits in 2019.
On November 27, 2019, Alabama Power made its required annual Rate RSE submission to the Alabama PSC of projected data for
calendar year 2020. Projected earnings were within the specified range; therefore, retail rates under Rate RSE remain unchanged
for 2020.
During 2019, Alabama Power provided to the Alabama PSC and the Alabama Office of the Attorney General information related to
the operation and utilization of Rate RSE, in accordance with the rules governing the operation of Rate RSE. The ultimate outcome
of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
At December 31, 2019, Alabama Power's WCER exceeded 6.15%, resulting in Alabama Power establishing a current regulatory
liability of $53 million for Rate RSE refunds, which will be refunded to customers through bill credits in April 2020.
Rate CNP New Plant
Rate CNP New Plant allows for recovery of Alabama Power's retail costs associated with newly developed or acquired certificated
generating facilities placed into retail service. No adjustments to Rate CNP New Plant occurred during the period 2017 through
2019. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Petition for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity" for
additional information.
Rate CNP PPA
Rate CNP PPA allows for the recovery of Alabama Power's retail costs associated with certificated PPAs. No adjustments to Rate
CNP PPA occurred during the period 2017 through 2019 and no adjustment is expected for 2020.
Rate CNP Compliance
Rate CNP Compliance allows for the recovery of Alabama Power's retail costs associated with laws, regulations, and other such
mandates directed at the utility industry involving the environment, security, reliability, safety, sustainability, or similar
considerations impacting Alabama Power's facilities or operations. Rate CNP Compliance is based on forward-looking information
and provides for the recovery of these costs pursuant to factors that are calculated and submitted to the Alabama PSC by December
1 with rates effective for the following calendar year. Compliance costs to be recovered include operations and maintenance
expenses, depreciation, and a return on certain invested capital. Revenues for Rate CNP Compliance, as recorded on the financial
statements, are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. Accordingly,
changes in the billing factor will have no significant effect on Southern Company's or Alabama Power's revenues or net income, but
will affect annual cash flow. Changes in Rate CNP Compliance-related operations and maintenance expenses and depreciation
generally will have no effect on net income.
On November 27, 2019, Alabama Power submitted calculations associated with its cost of complying with governmental mandates,
as provided under Rate CNP Compliance. The filing reflected a projected over recovered retail revenue requirement for
governmental mandates, which resulted in a rate decrease of approximately $68 million that became effective for the billing month
of January 2020.
Rate ECR
Rate ECR recovers Alabama Power's retail energy costs based on an estimate of future energy costs and the current over or under
recovered balance. Revenues recognized under Rate ECR and recorded on the financial statements are adjusted for the difference in
actual recoverable fuel costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. The difference in the recoverable fuel costs and amounts
billed gives rise to the over or under recovered amounts recorded as regulatory assets or liabilities. Alabama Power, along with the
Alabama PSC, continually monitors the over or under recovered cost balance to determine whether an adjustment to billing rates is
required. Changes in the Rate ECR factor have no significant effect on Southern Company's or Alabama Power's net income but
will impact operating cash flows. The Alabama PSC may approve billing rates under Rate ECR of up to 5.910 cents per KWH.
On December 3, 2019, the Alabama PSC approved a decrease to Rate ECR from 2.353 to 2.160 cents per KWH, equal to 1.82%, or
approximately $102 million annually, effective January 1, 2020. The rate will adjust to 5.910 cents per KWH in January 2021
absent a further order from the Alabama PSC.
II-66
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Tax Reform Accounting Order
In May 2018, the Alabama PSC approved an accounting order that authorized Alabama Power to defer the benefits of federal
excess deferred income taxes associated with the Tax Reform Legislation for the year ended December 31, 2018 as a regulatory
liability and to use up to $30 million of such deferrals to offset under recovered amounts under Rate ECR. The final excess deferred
tax liability for the year ended December 31, 2018 totaled approximately $69 million, of which $30 million was used to offset the
Rate ECR under recovered balance. On December 3, 2019, the Alabama PSC issued an order authorizing Alabama Power to apply
the remaining deferred balance of approximately $39 million to increase the balance in the NDR. See "Rate NDR" herein and Note
10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
Plant Greene County
Alabama Power jointly owns Plant Greene County with an affiliate, Mississippi Power. See Note 5 to the financial statements under
"Joint Ownership Agreements" for additional information regarding the joint ownership agreement. On December 31, 2019,
Mississippi Power updated its proposed Reserve Margin Plan (RMP), originally filed in August 2018 with the Mississippi PSC. The
RMP proposed a four-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Greene County Units 1 and 2 to the third quarter 2021 and the
third quarter 2022, respectively. Mississippi Power's proposed Plant Greene County unit retirements would require the completion
of proposed transmission and system reliability improvements, as well as agreement by Alabama Power. Alabama Power will
continue to monitor the status of Mississippi Power's proposed RMP and associated regulatory process as well as the proposed
transmission and system reliability improvements. Alabama Power will review all the facts and circumstances and will evaluate all
its alternatives prior to reaching a final determination on the ongoing operations of Plant Greene County. The ultimate outcome of
this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Rate NDR
Based on an order from the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power maintains a reserve for operations and maintenance expenses to cover
the cost of damages from major storms to its transmission and distribution facilities. The order approves a separate monthly Rate
NDR charge to customers consisting of two components. The first component is intended to establish and maintain a reserve
balance for future storms and is an on-going part of customer billing. When the reserve balance falls below $50 million, a reserve
establishment charge will be activated (and the on-going reserve maintenance charge concurrently suspended) until the reserve
balance reaches $75 million.
The second component of the Rate NDR charge is intended to allow recovery of any existing deferred storm-related operations and
maintenance costs and any future reserve deficits over a 24-month period. The Alabama PSC order gives Alabama Power authority
to record a deficit balance in the NDR when costs of storm damage exceed any established reserve balance. Absent further Alabama
PSC approval, the maximum total Rate NDR charge consisting of both components is $10 per month per non-residential customer
account and $5 per month per residential customer account. Alabama Power has the authority, based on an order from the Alabama
PSC, to accrue certain additional amounts as circumstances warrant. The order allows for reliability-related expenditures to be
charged against the additional accruals when the NDR balance exceeds $75 million. Alabama Power may designate a portion of the
NDR to reliability-related expenditures as a part of an annual budget process for the following year or during the current year for
identified unbudgeted reliability-related expenditures that are incurred. Accruals that have not been designated can be used to offset
storm charges. Additional accruals to the NDR enhance Alabama Power's ability to mitigate the financial effects of future natural
disasters, promote system reliability, and offset costs retail customers would otherwise bear.
As discussed herein under "Tax Reform Accounting Order," in accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued on December 3,
2019, Alabama Power applied the remaining excess deferred income tax regulatory liability balance of approximately $39 million
to increase the balance in the NDR. Alabama Power also accrued an additional $84 million to the NDR in December 2019 resulting
in an accumulated balance of $150 million at December 31, 2019. Of this amount, Alabama Power designated $37 million to be
applied to budgeted reliability-related expenditures for 2020, which is included in other regulatory liabilities, current. The
remaining NDR balance of $113 million is included in other regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance sheet.
In December 2017, the reserve maintenance charge was suspended and the reserve establishment charge was activated and
collected approximately $16 million annually through 2019. Effective with the March 2020 billings, the reserve establishment
charge will be suspended and the reserve maintenance charge will be activated as a result of the NDR balance exceeding $75
million. Alabama Power expects to collect approximately $5 million in 2020 and $3 million annually thereafter unless the NDR
balance falls below $50 million.
As revenue from the Rate NDR charge is recognized, an equal amount of operations and maintenance expenses related to the NDR
will also be recognized. As a result, the Rate NDR charge will not have an effect on net income but will impact operating cash
flows.
II-67
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Environmental Accounting Order
Based on an order from the Alabama PSC (Environmental Accounting Order), Alabama Power is allowed to establish a regulatory
asset to record the unrecovered investment costs, including the unrecovered plant asset balance and the unrecovered costs
associated with site removal and closure associated with future unit retirements caused by environmental regulations. The
regulatory asset is being amortized and recovered over the affected unit's remaining useful life, as established prior to the decision
regarding early retirement through Rate CNP Compliance.
On April 15, 2019, Alabama Power retired Plant Gorgas Units 8, 9, and 10 and reclassified approximately $654 million of the
unrecovered asset balances to regulatory assets, which are being recovered over the units' remaining useful lives, the latest being
through 2037, as established prior to the decision to retire. At December 31, 2019, the related regulatory assets totaled $649
million. Additionally, approximately $700 million of net capitalized asset retirement costs were reclassified to a regulatory asset in
accordance with accounting guidance provided by the Alabama PSC. The asset retirement costs are being recovered through 2055.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power" and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
Georgia Power
Georgia Power's revenues from regulated retail operations are collected through various rate mechanisms subject to the oversight of
the Georgia PSC. Georgia Power currently recovers its costs from the regulated retail business through an alternate rate plan, which
includes traditional base tariffs, Demand-Side Management (DSM) tariffs, the ECCR tariff, and Municipal Franchise Fee (MFF)
tariffs. In addition, financing costs on certified construction costs of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are being collected through the
NCCR tariff and fuel costs are collected through a separate fuel cost recovery tariff. See Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Georgia Power – Rate Plans," " – Fuel Cost Recovery," and " – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
Rate Plans
2019 ARP
On December 17, 2019, the Georgia PSC voted to approve the 2019 ARP, under which Georgia Power increased its rates on
January 1, 2020 and will increase rates annually for 2021 and 2022 as detailed below based on compliance filings to be made at
least 90 days prior to the effective date. Georgia Power will recover estimated increases through its existing tariffs as follows:
Tariff 2020 2021 2022
 (in millions)
Traditional base $ —$ 120$ 192
ECCR(a)318 55 184
DSM 12 1 1
MFF 12 4 9
Total(b)$ 342$ 181$ 386
(a)Effective January 1, 2020, CCR AROs will be recovered through the ECCR tariff. See "Integrated Resource Plan" herein for additional information on recovery
of compliance costs for CCR AROs.
(b)Totals may not add due to rounding.
Further, under the 2019 ARP, Georgia Power's retail ROE is set at 10.50%, and earnings will be evaluated against a retail ROE
range of 9.50% to 12.00%. The Georgia PSC also approved an increase in the retail equity ratio to 56% from 55%. Any retail
earnings above 12.00% will be shared, with 40% being applied to reduce regulatory assets, 40% directly refunded to customers,
and the remaining 20% retained by Georgia Power. There will be no recovery of any earnings shortfall below 9.50% on an actual
basis. However, if at any time during the term of the 2019 ARP, Georgia Power projects that its retail earnings will be below 9.50%
for any calendar year, it could petition the Georgia PSC for implementation of the Interim Cost Recovery (ICR) tariff to adjust
Georgia Power's retail rates to achieve a 9.50% ROE. The Georgia PSC would have 90 days to rule on Georgia Power's request.
The ICR tariff would expire at the earlier of January 1, 2023 or the end of the calendar year in which the ICR tariff becomes
effective. In lieu of requesting implementation of an ICR tariff, or if the Georgia PSC chooses not to implement the ICR tariff,
Georgia Power may file a full rate case.
Additionally, under the 2019 ARP and pursuant to the sharing mechanism approved in the 2013 ARP whereby two-thirds of any
earnings above the top of the allowed ROE range are shared with Georgia Power's customers, (i) Georgia Power used 50%
(approximately $50 million) of the customer share of earnings above the band in 2018 to reduce regulatory assets and 50%
II-68
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
(approximately $50 million) will be refunded to customers in 2020 and (ii) Georgia Power will forgo its share of 2019 earnings in
excess of the earnings band so that 50% (approximately $60 million) of all earnings over the 2019 band will be refunded to
customers and 50% (approximately $60 million) were used to reduce regulatory assets.
Except as provided above, Georgia Power will not file for a general base rate increase while the 2019 ARP is in effect. Georgia
Power is required to file a general base rate case by July 1, 2022, in response to which the Georgia PSC would be expected to
determine whether the 2019 ARP should be continued, modified, or discontinued.
2013 ARP
Pursuant to the terms and conditions of a settlement agreement related to Southern Company's acquisition of Southern Company
Gas approved by the Georgia PSC in 2016, the 2013 ARP continued in effect until December 31, 2019. Furthermore, through
December 31, 2019, Georgia Power retained its merger savings, net of transition costs, as defined in the settlement agreement;
through December 31, 2022, such net merger savings will be shared on a 60/40 basis with customers; thereafter, all merger savings
will be retained by customers.
There were no changes to Georgia Power's traditional base tariffs, ECCR tariff, DSM tariffs, or MFF tariffs in 2017, 2018, or 2019.
Under the 2013 ARP, Georgia Power's retail ROE was set at 10.95% and earnings were evaluated against a retail ROE range of
10.00% to 12.00%. Two-thirds of any earnings above 12.00% were to be directly refunded to customers, with the remaining one-
third retained by Georgia Power. On February 5, 2019, the Georgia PSC approved a settlement between Georgia Power and the
staff of the Georgia PSC under which Georgia Power's retail ROE for 2017 was stipulated to exceed 12.00% and Georgia Power
reduced certain regulatory assets by approximately $4 million in lieu of providing refunds to retail customers. In 2019 and 2018,
Georgia Power's retail ROE exceeded 12.00% and, under the modified sharing mechanism pursuant to the 2019 ARP, Georgia
Power has reduced regulatory assets by a total of approximately $110 million and expects to refund a total of approximately $110
million to customers, subject to review and approval by the Georgia PSC. See "2019 ARP" and "Integrated Resource Plan" herein
for additional information.
Tax Reform Settlement Agreement
In April 2018, the Georgia PSC approved the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. To reflect the federal income tax
rate reduction impact of the Tax Reform Legislation, Georgia Power issued bill credits of approximately $95 million and $130
million in 2019 and 2018, respectively, and is issuing bill credits of approximately $105 million in February 2020, for a total of
$330 million. In addition, Georgia Power deferred as a regulatory liability (i) the revenue equivalent of the tax expense reduction
resulting from legislation lowering the Georgia state income tax rate from 6.00% to 5.75% in 2019 and (ii) the entire benefit of
federal and state excess accumulated deferred income taxes. At December 31, 2019, the related regulatory liability balance totaled
$659 million, which is being amortized over a three-year period ending December 31, 2022 in accordance with the 2019 ARP.
To address some of the negative cash flow and credit quality impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation, the Georgia PSC also
approved an increase in Georgia Power's retail equity ratio to the lower of (i) Georgia Power's actual common equity weight in its
capital structure or (ii) 55%, until the Georgia PSC approved the 2019 ARP. Benefits from reduced federal income tax rates in
excess of the amounts refunded to customers were retained by Georgia Power to cover the carrying costs of the incremental equity
in 2018 and 2019.
See "2019 ARP" herein for additional information.
Integrated Resource Plan
See "Environmental Matters" herein for additional information regarding proposed and final EPA rules and regulations, including
revisions to ELG for steam electric power plants and additional regulations of CCR and CO2.
On July 16, 2019, the Georgia PSC voted to approve Georgia Power's modified triennial IRP (Georgia Power 2019 IRP). In the
Georgia Power 2019 IRP, the Georgia PSC approved the decertification and retirement of Plant Hammond Units 1 through 4 (840
MWs) and Plant McIntosh Unit 1 (142.5 MWs) effective July 29, 2019. In accordance with the 2019 ARP, the remaining net book
values at December 31, 2019 of $488 million for the Plant Hammond units are being recovered over a period equal to the
respective unit's remaining useful life, which varies between 2024 and 2035, and $30 million for Plant McIntosh Unit 1 is being
recovered over a three-year period ending December 31, 2022. In addition, approximately $20 million of related unusable materials
and supplies inventory balances and approximately $295 million of net capitalized asset retirement costs were reclassified to a
regulatory asset. In accordance with the modifications to the earnings sharing mechanism approved in the 2019 ARP, Georgia
Power fully amortized the regulatory assets associated with these unusable materials and supplies inventory
II-69
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
balances as well as a regulatory asset of approximately $50 million related to costs for a future generation site in Stewart County,
Georgia. See "Rate Plans – 2019 ARP" herein for additional information.
Also in the Georgia Power 2019 IRP, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's proposed environmental compliance strategy
associated with ash pond and certain landfill closures and post-closure care in compliance with the CCR Rule and the related state
rule. In the 2019 ARP, the Georgia PSC approved recovery of the estimated under recovered balance of these compliance costs at
December 31, 2019 over a three-year period ending December 31, 2022 and recovery of estimated compliance costs for 2020,
2021, and 2022 over three-year periods ending December 31, 2022, 2023, and 2024, respectively, with recovery of construction
contingency beginning in the year following actual expenditure. The under recovered balance at December 31, 2019 was $175
million and the estimated compliance costs expected to be incurred in 2020, 2021, and 2022 are $265 million, $290 million, and
$390 million, respectively. The ECCR tariff is expected to be revised for actual expenditures and updated estimates through future
annual compliance filings. See "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" and
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements" and "Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the
financial statements for additional information regarding Georgia Power's AROs.
On February 4, 2020, the Georgia PSC voted to deny a motion for reconsideration filed by the Sierra Club regarding the Georgia
PSC's decision in the 2019 ARP allowing Georgia Power to recover compliance costs for CCR AROs.
Additionally, the Georgia PSC rejected a request to certify approximately 25 MWs of capacity at Plant Scherer Unit 3 for the retail
jurisdiction beginning January 1, 2020 following the expiration of a wholesale PPA. Georgia Power may offer such capacity in the
wholesale market or to the retail jurisdiction in a future IRP.
The Georgia PSC also approved Georgia Power to (i) issue requests for proposals (RFP) for capacity beginning in 2022 or 2023
and in 2026, 2027, or 2028; (ii) procure up to an additional 2,210 MWs of renewable resources through competitive RFPs; and (iii)
invest in a portfolio of up to 80 MWs of battery energy storage technologies.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Georgia Power has established fuel cost recovery rates approved by the Georgia PSC. Georgia Power is scheduled to file its next
fuel case no later than March 16, 2020, with new rates, if any, to be effective June 1, 2020. Georgia Power continues to be allowed
to adjust its fuel cost recovery rates under an interim fuel rider prior to the next fuel case if the under or over recovered fuel balance
exceeds $200 million. At December 31, 2019, Georgia Power's over recovered fuel balance was $73 million.
Georgia Power's fuel cost recovery mechanism includes costs associated with a natural gas hedging program, as revised and
approved by the Georgia PSC, allowing the use of an array of derivative instruments within a 48-month time horizon.
Fuel cost recovery revenues as recorded on the financial statements are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel costs and
amounts billed in current regulated rates. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor will not have a significant effect on Southern
Company's or Georgia Power's revenues or net income but will affect operating cash flows.
Storm Damage Recovery
Beginning January 1, 2020, Georgia Power is recovering $213 million annually through December 31, 2022, as provided in the
2019 ARP, for incremental operations and maintenance costs of damage from major storms to its transmission and distribution
facilities. At December 31, 2019, the balance in the regulatory asset related to storm damage was $410 million. The rate of storm
damage cost recovery is expected to be adjusted in future regulatory proceedings as necessary. As a result of this regulatory
treatment, costs related to storms are not expected to have a material impact on Southern Company's or Georgia Power's financial
statements. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Storm Damage Recovery" for additional information
regarding Georgia Power's storm damage reserve.
Mississippi Power
Mississippi Power's rates and charges for service to retail customers are subject to the regulatory oversight of the Mississippi PSC.
Mississippi Power's rates are a combination of base rates and several separate cost recovery clauses for specific categories of costs.
These separate cost recovery clauses address such items as fuel and purchased power, energy efficiency programs, ad valorem
taxes, property damage, and the costs of compliance with environmental laws and regulations. Costs not addressed through one of
the specific cost recovery clauses are expected to be recovered through Mississippi Power's base rates. See Note 2 to the financial
statements under "Mississippi Power" for additional information.
II-70
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
2019 Base Rate Case
On November 26, 2019, Mississippi Power filed the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case with the Mississippi PSC. The filing
includes a requested annual decrease in Mississippi Power's retail rates of $5.8 million, or 0.6%, which is driven primarily by
changes in the amortization rates of certain regulatory assets and liabilities and cost reductions, partially offset by an increase in
Mississippi Power's requested return on investment and depreciation associated with the filing of an updated depreciation study.
The revenue requirements included in the filing are based on a projected test year period of January 1, 2020 through December 31,
2020, a 53% average equity ratio, and a 7.728% return on investment. The filing reflects the elimination of separate rates for costs
associated with the Kemper County energy facility and energy efficiency initiatives; those costs are proposed to be included in the
PEP, ECO Plan, and ad valorem tax adjustment factor, as applicable. On December 10, 2019, the Mississippi PSC suspended the
base rate case filing through no later than March 25, 2020. If no further action is taken by the Mississippi PSC, the proposed rates
may be effective beginning on March 26, 2020. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Operations Review
In August 2018, the Mississippi PSC began an operations review of Mississippi Power, for which the final report is expected prior
to the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The review includes, but is not limited to, a comparative analysis
of its costs, its cost recovery framework, and ways in which it may streamline management operations for the reasonable benefit of
ratepayers. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Reserve Margin Plan
On December 31, 2019, Mississippi Power updated its proposed RMP, originally filed in August 2018, as required by the
Mississippi PSC. In 2018, Mississippi Power had proposed alternatives to reduce its reserve margin and lower or avoid operating
costs, with the most economic alternatives being the two-year and seven-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Watson Units 4
and 5, respectively, to the first quarter 2022 and the four-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Greene County Units 1 and 2
to the third quarter 2021 and the third quarter 2022, respectively. The December 2019 update noted that Plant Daniel Units 1 and 2
currently have long-term economics similar to Plant Watson Unit 5. The Plant Greene County unit retirements would require the
completion by Alabama Power of proposed transmission and system reliability improvements, as well as agreement by Alabama
Power. The RMP filing also states that, in the event the Mississippi PSC ultimately approves an alternative that includes an
accelerated retirement, Mississippi Power would require authorization to defer in a regulatory asset for future recovery the
remaining net book value of the units at the time of retirement. A decision by the Mississippi PSC that does not include recovery of
the remaining book value of any generating units retired could have a material impact on Southern Company's and Mississippi
Power's financial statements. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time. See Note 3 to the financial
statements under "Other Matters – Mississippi Power" for additional information on Plant Daniel Units 1 and 2.
Performance Evaluation Plan
Mississippi Power's retail base rates generally are set under the PEP, a rate plan approved by the Mississippi PSC. In recognition
that Mississippi Power's long-term financial success is dependent upon how well it satisfies its customers' needs, PEP includes
performance indicators that directly tie customer service indicators to Mississippi Power's allowed ROE. PEP measures Mississippi
Power's performance on a 10-point scale as a weighted average of results in three areas: average customer price, as compared to
prices of other regional utilities (weighted at 40%); service reliability, measured in percentage of time customers had electric
service (40%); and customer satisfaction, measured in a survey of residential customers (20%). Typically, two PEP filings are made
for each calendar year: the PEP projected filing, which is typically filed prior to the beginning of the year based on a projected
revenue requirement, and the PEP lookback filing, which is filed after the end of the year and allows for review of the actual
revenue requirement compared to the projected filing.
In February 2018, Mississippi Power revised its annual projected PEP filing for 2018 to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform
Legislation. The revised filing requested an increase of $26 million in annual revenues, based on a performance adjusted ROE of
9.33% and an increased equity ratio of 55%. In July 2018, Mississippi Power and the MPUS entered into a settlement agreement,
which was approved by the Mississippi PSC in August 2018 (PEP Settlement Agreement). Rates under the PEP Settlement
Agreement became effective with the first billing cycle of September 2018. The PEP Settlement Agreement provided for an
increase of approximately $21.6 million in annual base retail revenues, which excluded certain compensation costs contested by the
MPUS, as well as approximately $2 million subsequently approved for recovery through the 2018 Energy Efficiency Cost Rider.
Under the PEP Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power deferred a portion of the contested compensation costs for 2018 and 2019
as a regulatory asset, which totaled $4 million as of December 31, 2019 and is included in other regulatory assets,
II-71
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
deferred on the balance sheet. The Mississippi PSC is expected to rule on the appropriate treatment for such costs in connection
with the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Pursuant to the PEP Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power's performance-adjusted allowed ROE is 9.31% and its allowed
equity ratio is capped at 51%, pending further review by the Mississippi PSC. In lieu of the requested equity ratio increase,
Mississippi Power retained $44 million of excess accumulated deferred income taxes resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation
until the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Further, Mississippi Power agreed to seek equity contributions
sufficient to restore its equity ratio to 50% by December 31, 2018. Since Mississippi Power's actual average equity ratio for 2018
was more than 1% lower than the 50% target, Mississippi Power deferred the corresponding difference in its revenue requirement
of approximately $4 million as a regulatory liability for resolution in the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Pursuant to the
PEP Settlement Agreement, PEP proceedings are suspended until after the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate
Case and Mississippi Power was not required to make any PEP filings for regulatory years 2018, 2019, and 2020.
Energy Efficiency
On February 5, 2019, the Mississippi PSC issued an order approving Mississippi Power's Energy Efficiency Cost Rider 2019
compliance filing, which included a slight decrease in annual retail revenues, effective with the first billing cycle in March 2019.
As part of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case, Mississippi Power has proposed that the Energy Efficiency Cost Rider be
eliminated and those costs be included in the PEP. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Environmental Compliance Overview Plan
In accordance with a 2011 accounting order from the Mississippi PSC, Mississippi Power has the authority to defer in a regulatory
asset for future recovery all plant retirement- or partial retirement-related costs resulting from environmental regulations. The
Mississippi PSC approved $41 million and $17 million of costs that were reclassified to regulatory assets associated with the fuel
conversion of Plant Watson and Plant Greene County, respectively, for amortization over five-year periods ending in July 2021 and
July 2022, respectively.
In August 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved an annual increase in revenues related to the ECO Plan of approximately $17
million, effective with the first billing cycle for September 2018. This increase represented the maximum 2% annual increase in
revenues and primarily related to the carryforward from the prior year.
The increase was the result of Mississippi PSC approval of an agreement between Mississippi Power and the MPUS to settle the
2018 ECO Plan filing (ECO Settlement Agreement) and was sufficient to recover costs through 2019, including remaining amounts
deferred from prior years along with the related carrying costs. In accordance with the ECO Settlement Agreement, ECO Plan
proceedings are suspended until after the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case and Mississippi Power was not
required to make any ECO Plan filings for 2018, 2019, and 2020, with any necessary adjustments reflected in the Mississippi
Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The ECO Settlement Agreement contains the same terms as the PEP Settlement Agreement described
herein with respect to allowed ROE and equity ratio. At December 31, 2019, Mississippi Power has recorded $2 million in other
regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance sheet related to the actual December 31, 2018 average equity ratio differential from
target applicable to the ECO Plan.
On October 24, 2019, the Mississippi PSC approved Mississippi Power's July 9, 2019 request for a CPCN to complete certain
environmental compliance projects, primarily associated with the Plant Daniel coal units co-owned 50% with Gulf Power. The total
estimated cost is approximately $125 million, with Mississippi Power's share of approximately $66 million being proposed for
recovery through its ECO Plan. Approximately $17 million of Mississippi Power's share is associated with ash pond closure and is
reflected in Mississippi Power's ARO liabilities. See Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information on AROs and
Note 3 to the financial statements under "Other Matters – Mississippi Power" for additional information on Gulf Power's ownership
in Plant Daniel.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Mississippi Power annually establishes and is required to file for an adjustment to the retail fuel cost recovery factor that is
approved by the Mississippi PSC. The Mississippi PSC approved decreases of $35 million and $24 million, effective in February
2019 and 2020, respectively. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, over recovered retail fuel costs included in other current liabilities
on Southern Company's balance sheets and over recovered regulatory clause liabilities on Mississippi Power's balance sheets were
approximately $23 million and $8 million, respectively.
II-72
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Mississippi Power has wholesale MRA and Market Based (MB) fuel cost recovery factors. Effective with the first billing cycle for
January 2019, the wholesale MRA fuel rate increased $16 million annually and the wholesale MB fuel rate decreased by an
immaterial amount. Effective January 1, 2020, the wholesale MRA fuel rate increased $1 million annually and the wholesale MB
fuel rate decreased by an immaterial amount. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, over recovered wholesale MRA fuel costs included
in other current liabilities on Southern Company's balance sheets and over recovered regulatory clause liabilities on Mississippi
Power's balance sheets were approximately $6 million. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, over/under recovered wholesale MB fuel
costs included in the balance sheets were immaterial.
Mississippi Power's operating revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel cost and amounts billed in accordance
with the currently approved cost recovery rate. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor should have no significant effect on
Mississippi Power's revenues or net income but will affect operating cash flows.
Kemper County Energy Facility
Overview
The Kemper County energy facility was designed to utilize IGCC technology with an expected output capacity of 582 MWs and to
be fueled by locally mined lignite (an abundant, lower heating value coal) from a mine owned by Mississippi Power and situated
adjacent to the Kemper County energy facility.
Schedule and Cost Estimate
In 2012, the Mississippi PSC issued an order confirming the CPCN originally approved by the Mississippi PSC in 2010 authorizing
the acquisition, construction, and operation of the Kemper County energy facility. The order approved a construction cost cap of up
to $2.88 billion, with recovery of prudently-incurred costs subject to approval by the Mississippi PSC. The Kemper County energy
facility was originally projected to be placed in service in May 2014. Mississippi Power placed the combined cycle and the
associated common facilities portion of the Kemper County energy facility in service in August 2014. The combined cycle and
associated common facilities portions of the Kemper County energy facility were dedicated as Plant Ratcliffe in April 2018.
In June 2017, the Mississippi PSC stated its intent to issue an order, which occurred in July 2017, directing Mississippi Power to
pursue a settlement under which the Kemper County energy facility would be operated as a natural gas plant, rather than an IGCC
plant, and address all issues associated with the Kemper County energy facility. The order established a new docket for the purpose
of pursuing a global settlement of the related costs (Kemper Settlement Docket). In June 2017, Mississippi Power notified the
Mississippi PSC that it would begin a process to suspend operations and start-up activities on the gasifier portion of the Kemper
County energy facility, given the uncertainty as to its future.
At the time of project suspension in June 2017, the total cost estimate for the Kemper County energy facility was approximately
$7.38 billion, including approximately $5.95 billion of costs subject to the construction cost cap, net of $137 million in additional
grants from the DOE received in April 2016. In the aggregate, Mississippi Power had recorded charges to income of $3.07 billion
($1.89 billion after tax) as a result of changes in the cost estimate above the cost cap for the Kemper IGCC through May 2017.
Given the Mississippi PSC's stated intent regarding no further rate increase for the Kemper County energy facility and the
subsequent suspension, cost recovery of the gasifier portions became no longer probable; therefore, Mississippi Power recorded an
additional charge to income in June 2017 of $2.8 billion ($2.0 billion after tax), which included estimated costs associated with the
gasification portions of the plant and lignite mine. During the third and fourth quarters of 2017, Mississippi Power recorded charges
to income of $242 million ($206 million after tax), including $164 million for ongoing project costs, estimated mine and gasifier-
related costs, and certain termination costs during the suspension period prior to conclusion of the Kemper Settlement Docket, as
well as the charge associated with the Kemper Settlement Agreement discussed below.
In 2019, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax and after-tax charges to income of $24 million, primarily associated with the expected
close out of a related DOE contract, as well as other abandonment and related closure costs and ongoing period costs, net of salvage
proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets. The after-tax amount for 2019 includes an adjustment related to the tax
abandonment of the Kemper IGCC following the filing of the 2018 tax return. In 2018, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax charges
to income of $37 million ($68 million benefit after tax), primarily associated with abandonment and related closure costs and
ongoing period costs, net of salvage proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets, as well as the impact of a change in the
valuation allowance for the related state income tax NOL carryforward.
Mississippi Power expects to substantially complete mine reclamation activities in 2020 and dismantlement of the abandoned
gasifier-related assets and site restoration activities are expected to be completed in 2024. The additional pre-tax period costs
associated with dismantlement and site restoration activities, including related costs for compliance and safety, ARO accretion,
II-73
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
and property taxes, are estimated to total $17 million in 2020, $15 million to $16 million annually in 2021 through 2023, and $5
million in 2024.
See Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Rate Recovery
In February 2018, the Mississippi PSC voted to approve a settlement agreement related to cost recovery for the Kemper County
energy facility among Mississippi Power, the MPUS, and certain intervenors (Kemper Settlement Agreement), which resolved all
cost recovery issues, modified the CPCN to limit the Kemper County energy facility to natural gas combined cycle operation, and
provided for an annual revenue requirement of approximately $99.3 million for costs related to the Kemper County energy facility,
which included the impact of the Tax Reform Legislation. The revenue requirement was based on (i) a fixed ROE for 2018 of 8.6%
excluding any performance adjustment, (ii) a ROE for 2019 calculated in accordance with PEP, excluding the performance
adjustment, (iii) for future years, a performance-based ROE calculated pursuant to PEP, and (iv) amortization periods for the related
regulatory assets and liabilities of eight years and six years, respectively. The revenue requirement also reflects a disallowance
related to a portion of Mississippi Power's investment in the Kemper County energy facility requested for inclusion in rate base,
which was recorded in the fourth quarter 2017 as an additional charge to income of approximately $78 million ($85 million net of
accumulated depreciation of $7 million) pre-tax ($48 million after tax).
Under the Kemper Settlement Agreement, retail customer rates were reduced by approximately $26.8 million annually, effective
with the first billing cycle of April 2018, and include no recovery for costs associated with the gasifier portion of the Kemper
County energy facility in 2018 or at any future date.
On November 26, 2019, Mississippi Power filed the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case, which reflects the elimination of
separate rates for costs associated with the Kemper County energy facility; these costs are proposed to be included in rates for PEP,
ECO Plan, and ad valorem tax adjustment factor, as applicable. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this
time.
Lignite Mine and CO2 Pipeline Facilities
Mississippi Power owns the lignite mine and equipment and mineral reserves located around the Kemper County energy facility
site. The mine started commercial operation in June 2013. In connection with the Kemper County energy facility construction,
Mississippi Power also constructed a pipeline for the transport of captured CO2.
In 2010, Mississippi Power executed a management fee contract with Liberty Fuels Company, LLC (Liberty Fuels), a wholly-
owned subsidiary of The North American Coal Corporation, which developed, constructed, and is responsible for the mining
operations through the end of the mine reclamation. As the mining permit holder, Liberty Fuels has a legal obligation to perform
mine reclamation and Mississippi Power has a contractual obligation to fund all reclamation activities. As a result of the
abandonment of the Kemper IGCC, final mine reclamation began in 2018 and is expected to be substantially completed in 2020,
with monitoring expected to continue through 2027. See Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
On December 31, 2019, Mississippi Power transferred ownership of the CO2 pipeline to an unrelated gas pipeline company, with no
resulting impact on income. In conjunction with the transfer of the CO2 pipeline, the parties agreed to enter into a 15-year firm
transportation agreement, which is expected to be signed by March 2020, providing for the conversion by the pipeline company of
the CO2 pipeline to a natural gas pipeline to be used for the delivery of natural gas to Plant Ratcliffe. The agreement will be treated
as a finance lease for accounting purposes upon commencement, which is expected to occur by August 2020. See Note 9 to the
financial statements for additional information.
Government Grants
In 2010, the DOE, through a cooperative agreement with SCS, agreed to fund $270 million of the Kemper County energy facility
through the grants awarded to the project by the DOE under the Clean Coal Power Initiative Round 2. In 2016, additional DOE
grants in the amount of $137 million were awarded to the Kemper County energy facility. Through December 31, 2018, Mississippi
Power received total DOE grants of $387 million, of which $382 million reduced the construction costs of the Kemper County
energy facility and $5 million reimbursed Mississippi Power for expenses associated with DOE reporting. In December 2018,
Mississippi Power filed with the DOE its request for property closeout certification under the contract related to the $387 million of
grants received. Mississippi Power expects to close out the DOE contract related to the Kemper County energy facility in 2020. In
connection with the DOE closeout discussions, on April 29, 2019, the Civil Division of the Department of Justice informed
Southern Company and Mississippi Power of an investigation related to the Kemper County energy facility. The ultimate outcome
of this matter cannot be determined at this time; however, it could have a material impact on Southern Company's and Mississippi
Power's financial statements.
II-74
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Municipal and Rural Associations Tariff
Mississippi Power provides wholesale electric service to Cooperative Energy, East Mississippi Electric Power Association, and the
City of Collins, all located in southeastern Mississippi, under a long-term, cost-based, FERC-regulated MRA tariff.
In 2017, Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy executed, and the FERC accepted, a Shared Service Agreement (SSA), as part
of the MRA tariff, under which Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy will share in providing electricity to the Cooperative
Energy delivery points under the tariff, effective January 1, 2018. The SSA may be cancelled by Cooperative Energy with 10 years
notice after December 31, 2020. As of December 31, 2019, Cooperative Energy has the option to decrease its use of Mississippi
Power's generation services under the MRA tariff up to 2.5% annually, with required notice, up to a maximum total reduction of
11%, or approximately $9 million in cumulative annual base revenues.
On May 7, 2019, the FERC accepted Mississippi Power's requested $3.7 million annual decrease in MRA base rates effective
January 1, 2019, as agreed upon in the MRA Settlement Agreement, resolving all matters related to the Kemper County energy
facility, similar to the retail rate settlement agreement approved by the Mississippi PSC in February 2018, and reflecting the
impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation.
Cooperative Energy Power Supply Agreement
Effective April 1, 2018, Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy amended and extended a previous power supply agreement
through March 31, 2021, which was subsequently extended through May 31, 2021. The amendment increased the total capacity
from 86 MWs to 286 MWs.
Cooperative Energy also has a 10-year network integration transmission service agreement (NITSA) with SCS for transmission
service to certain delivery points on Mississippi Power's transmission system through March 31, 2021. As a result of the PSA
amendment, Cooperative Energy and SCS also amended the terms of the NITSA, which the FERC approved, to provide for the
purchase of incremental transmission capacity from April 1, 2018 through March 31, 2021.
Southern Company Gas
Utility Regulation and Rate Design
The natural gas distribution utilities are subject to regulations and oversight by their respective state regulatory agencies. Rates
charged to customers vary according to customer class (residential, commercial, or industrial) and rate jurisdiction. These agencies
approve rates designed to provide the opportunity to generate revenues to recover all prudently-incurred costs, including a return on
rate base sufficient to pay interest on debt and provide a reasonable ROE. Rate base generally consists of the original cost of the
utility plant in service, working capital, and certain other assets, less accumulated depreciation on the utility plant in service and net
deferred income tax liabilities, and may include certain other additions or deductions.
The natural gas market for Atlanta Gas Light was deregulated in 1997. Accordingly, Marketers, rather than a traditional utility, sell
natural gas to end-use customers in Georgia and handle customer billing functions. The Marketers file their rates monthly with the
Georgia PSC. As a result of operating in a deregulated environment, Atlanta Gas Light's role includes:
•distributing natural gas for Marketers;
•constructing, operating, and maintaining the gas system infrastructure, including responding to customer service calls and
leaks;
•reading meters and maintaining underlying customer premise information for Marketers; and
•planning and contracting for capacity on interstate transportation and storage systems.
Atlanta Gas Light earns revenue by charging rates to its customers based primarily on monthly fixed charges that are set by the
Georgia PSC and adjusted periodically. The Marketers add these fixed charges when billing customers. This mechanism, called a
straight-fixed-variable rate design, minimizes the seasonality of Atlanta Gas Light's revenues since the monthly fixed charge is not
volumetric or directly weather dependent. See "GRAM" and "PRP" herein for additional information.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, the earnings of the natural gas distribution utilities can be affected by customer
consumption patterns that are largely a function of weather conditions and price levels for natural gas. Specifically, customer
demand substantially increases during the Heating Season when natural gas is used for heating purposes. Southern Company Gas
has various mechanisms, such as weather and revenue normalization mechanisms and weather derivative instruments, that limit
exposure to weather changes within typical ranges in these utilities' respective service territories.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, the natural gas distribution utilities are authorized by the relevant regulatory agencies in
the states in which they serve to use natural gas cost recovery mechanisms that adjust rates to reflect changes in the wholesale
II-75
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
cost of natural gas and ensure recovery of all costs prudently incurred in purchasing natural gas for customers. Natural gas cost
recovery revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable natural gas costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates.
Changes in the billing factor will not have a significant effect on Southern Company Gas' revenues or net income, but will affect
cash flows. Since Atlanta Gas Light does not sell natural gas directly to its end-use customers, it does not utilize a traditional
natural gas cost recovery mechanism. However, Atlanta Gas Light does maintain natural gas inventory for the Marketers in Georgia
and recovers the cost through recovery mechanisms approved by the Georgia PSC specific to Georgia's deregulated market. In
addition to natural gas recovery mechanisms, there are other cost recovery mechanisms, such as regulatory riders, which vary by
utility but allow recovery of certain costs, such as those related to infrastructure replacement programs as well as environmental
remediation and energy efficiency plans. In traditional rate designs, utilities recover a significant portion of the fixed customer
service and pipeline infrastructure costs based on assumed natural gas volumes used by customers. The utilities, including Nicor
Gas beginning in November 2019, have decoupled regulatory mechanisms that Southern Company Gas believes encourage
conservation by separating the recoverable amount of these fixed costs from the amounts of natural gas used by customers. See
Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Rate Proceedings" for additional information. Also see
"Construction Programs – Southern Company Gas – Infrastructure Replacement Programs and Capital Projects" for additional
information regarding infrastructure replacement programs at certain of the natural gas distribution utilities.
The following table provides regulatory information for Southern Company Gas' natural gas distribution utilities:
 Nicor GasAtlanta Gas Light Virginia Natural
Gas  Chattanooga Gas
Authorized ROE(a)9.73% 10.25%  9.50%  9.80%
Authorized ROE range(a)N/A 10.05% - 10.45% 9.00% - 10.00% N/A
Weather normalization mechanisms(b) ü  ü
Decoupled, including straight-fixed-variable rates(c)ü ü  ü  
Regulatory infrastructure program rates(d)ü  ü   
Bad debt rider(e)ü  ü  ü
Energy efficiency plan(f)ü  ü  
Annual base rate adjustment mechanism(g) ü   ü
Year of last rate decision 2019 2019  2018  2018
(a)Atlanta Gas Light's authorized ROE and ROE range became effective on January 1, 2020. Atlanta Gas Light's ROE for 2019 was 10.75%.
(b)Regulatory mechanisms that allow recovery of costs in the event of unseasonal weather, but are not direct offsets to the potential impacts on earnings of weather
and customer consumption. These mechanisms are designed to help stabilize operating results by increasing base rate amounts charged to customers when
weather is warmer than normal and decreasing amounts charged when weather is colder than normal.
(c)Allows for recovery of fixed customer service costs separately from assumed natural gas volumes used by customers. On October 2, 2019, Nicor Gas received
approval for a volume balancing adjustment, a revenue decoupling mechanism for residential customers that provides a monthly benchmark level of revenue per
rate class for recovery.
(d)Programs that update or expand distribution systems and LNG facilities.
(e)The recovery (refund) of bad debt expense over (under) an established benchmark expense. Nicor Gas, Virginia Natural Gas, and Chattanooga Gas recover the
gas portion of bad debt expense through their purchased gas adjustment mechanisms.
(f)Recovery of costs associated with plans to achieve specified energy savings goals.
(g)Regulatory mechanism allowing annual adjustments to base rates up or down based on authorized ROE and/or ROE range.
GRAM
In December 2019, the Georgia PSC approved the continuation of GRAM as part of Atlanta Gas Light's 2019 rate case order.
Various infrastructure programs previously authorized by the Georgia PSC, including the Integrated Vintage Plastic Replacement
Program (i-VPR) to replace aging plastic pipe and the Integrated System Reinforcement Program (i-SRP) to upgrade Atlanta Gas
Light's distribution system and LNG facilities in Georgia, continue under GRAM and the recovery of and return on the
infrastructure program investments are included in annual base rate adjustments. The future expected costs to be recovered through
rates related to allowed, but not incurred, costs are recognized in an unrecognized ratemaking amount that is not reflected on the
balance sheets. This allowed cost is primarily the equity return on the capital investment under the infrastructure programs in place
prior to GRAM. See "Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts" herein for additional information. The Georgia PSC reviews Atlanta
Gas Light's performance annually under GRAM. See "Rate Proceedings" herein for additional information.
II-76
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Pursuant to the GRAM approval, Atlanta Gas Light and the staff of the Georgia PSC agreed to a variation of the Integrated
Customer Growth Program to extend pipeline facilities to serve customers in areas without pipeline access and create new
economic development opportunities in Georgia. As a result, a new tariff was created, effective October 10, 2017, to provide up to
$15 million annually for Atlanta Gas Light to commit to strategic economic development projects. Projects under this tariff must be
approved by the Georgia PSC.
PRP
Atlanta Gas Light previously recovered PRP costs through a PRP surcharge established in 2015 to address recovery of the under
recovered PRP balance and the related carrying costs. Effective January 2018, PRP costs are being recovered through GRAM and
base rates until the earlier of the full recovery of the under recovered amount or December 31, 2025. The under recovered balance
at December 31, 2019 was $135 million, including $70 million of unrecognized equity return. See "Rate Proceedings" and
"Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts" herein for additional information.
Rate Proceedings
Nicor Gas
In January 2018, the Illinois Commission approved a $137 million increase in annual base rate revenues, including $93 million
related to the recovery of investments under the Investing in Illinois program, effective in February 2018, based on a ROE of 9.8%.
In May 2018, the Illinois Commission approved Nicor Gas' rehearing request for revised base rates to incorporate the reduction in
the federal income tax rate as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. The resulting decrease of approximately $44 million in annual
base rate revenues became effective May 5, 2018. The benefits of the Tax Reform Legislation from January 25, 2018 through May
4, 2018 were refunded to customers via bill credits and concluded in the second quarter 2019.
In November 2018, Nicor Gas filed a general base rate case with the Illinois Commission. On October 2, 2019, the Illinois
Commission approved a $168 million annual base rate increase effective October 8, 2019. The base rate increase included $65
million related to the recovery of program costs under the Investing in Illinois program and was based on a ROE of 9.73% and an
equity ratio of 54.2%. Additionally, the Illinois Commission approved a volume balancing adjustment, a revenue decoupling
mechanism for residential customers that provides a monthly benchmark level of revenue per rate class for recovery.
Atlanta Gas Light
On June 3, 2019, Atlanta Gas Light filed a general base rate case with the Georgia PSC. On December 19, 2019, the Georgia PSC
approved a $65 million annual base rate increase, effective January 1, 2020, based on a ROE of 10.25% and an equity ratio of 56%.
Earnings will be evaluated against a ROE range of 10.05% to 10.45%, with disposition of any earnings above 10.45% to be
determined by the Georgia PSC. Additionally, the Georgia PSC approved continuation of the previously authorized inclusion in
base rates of the recovery of and return on the infrastructure program investments, including, but not limited to, GRAM
adjustments, and a reauthorization and continuation of GRAM until terminated by the Georgia PSC. GRAM filing rate adjustments
will be based on the authorized ROE of 10.25%. GRAM adjustments for 2021 may not exceed 5% of 2020 base rates. The 5%
limitation does not set a precedent in any future rate proceedings by Atlanta Gas Light.
On January 31, 2020, in accordance with the Georgia PSC's order for the 2019 rate case, Atlanta Gas Light filed a recommended
notice of proposed rulemaking for a long-range planning tool. The proposal provides for participating natural gas utilities to file a
comprehensive capacity supply and related infrastructure delivery plan for a 10-year period, including capital and related
operations and maintenance expense budgets. Participating natural gas utilities would file an updated 10-year plan at least once
every third year under the proposal. Related costs of implementing an approved comprehensive plan would be included in the
utility's next rate case or GRAM filing. The rulemaking process is expected to be completed during 2020.
Virginia Natural Gas
In December 2018, the Virginia Commission approved Virginia Natural Gas' annual information form filing, which reduced annual
base rates by $14 million effective January 1, 2019 due to lower tax expense as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, along with
customer refunds, via bill credits, for $14 million related to 2018 tax benefits deferred as a regulatory liability at December 31,
2018. These customer refunds were completed in the first quarter 2019.
On February 3, 2020, Virginia Natural Gas filed a notice of intent with the Virginia Commission as required prior to the filing of a
base rate case, which will occur between April 3, 2020 and April 30, 2020. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Rate Proceedings" for additional information.
II-77
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Affiliate Asset Management Agreements
With the exception of Nicor Gas, the natural gas distribution utilities use asset management agreements with an affiliate, Sequent,
for the primary purpose of reducing utility customers' gas cost recovery rates through payments to the utilities by Sequent. For
Atlanta Gas Light, these payments are controlled by the Georgia PSC and are utilized for infrastructure improvements and to fund
heating assistance programs, rather than as a reduction to gas cost recovery rates. Under these asset management agreements,
Sequent supplies natural gas to the utility and markets available pipeline and storage capacity to improve the overall cost of
supplying gas to the utility customers. Currently, the natural gas distribution utilities primarily purchase their gas from
Sequent. The purchase agreements require Sequent to provide firm gas to the natural gas distribution utilities, but these natural gas
distribution utilities maintain the right and ability to make their own long-term supply arrangements if they believe it is in the best
interest of their customers.
Each agreement provides for Sequent to make payments to the natural gas distribution utility through either an annual minimum
guarantee within a profit sharing structure, a profit sharing structure without an annual minimum guarantee, or a fixed fee.
Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts
The following table illustrates Southern Company Gas' authorized ratemaking amounts that are not recognized on its balance
sheets. These amounts are primarily composed of an allowed equity rate of return on assets associated with certain regulatory
infrastructure programs. These amounts will be recognized as revenues in Southern Company Gas' financial statements in the
periods they are billable to customers, the majority of which will be recovered by 2025.
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
 (in millions)
Atlanta Gas Light $ 70$ 95
Virginia Natural Gas 10 11
Nicor Gas 2 4
Total $ 82$ 110
Construction Programs
The Registrants are engaged in continuous construction programs to accommodate existing and estimated future loads on their
respective systems. The Southern Company system intends to continue its strategy of developing and constructing new electric
generating facilities, expanding and improving the electric transmission and electric and natural gas distribution systems, and
undertaking projects to comply with environmental laws and regulations.
For the traditional electric operating companies, major generation construction projects are subject to state PSC approval in order to
be included in retail rates. The largest construction project currently underway in the Southern Company system is Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4. See "Nuclear Construction" herein for additional information. Also see "Regulatory Matters – Alabama Power"
herein for information regarding Alabama Power's construction of Plant Barry Unit 8.
While Southern Power generally constructs and acquires generation assets covered by long-term PPAs, any uncontracted capacity
could negatively affect future earnings. See "Southern Power" herein, "Acquisitions and Dispositions – Southern Power" herein,
and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" for additional information about costs relating to Southern Power's
acquisitions that involve construction of renewable energy facilities.
Southern Company Gas is engaged in various infrastructure improvement programs designed to update or expand the natural gas
distribution systems of the natural gas distribution utilities to improve reliability and meet operational flexibility and growth. The
natural gas distribution utilities recover their investment and a return associated with these infrastructure programs through their
regulated rates. See "Southern Company Gas" herein for additional information regarding infrastructure improvement programs at
the natural gas distribution utilities and certain pipeline construction projects.
See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements" herein for additional information regarding the
Registrants' capital requirements for their construction programs, including estimated totals for each of the next five years.
Nuclear Construction
In 2009, the Georgia PSC certified construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Georgia Power holds a 45.7% ownership interest in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In 2012, the NRC issued the related combined construction and operating licenses, which allowed full
construction of the two AP1000 nuclear units (with electric generating capacity of approximately 1,100 MWs each) and related
facilities to begin. Until March 2017, construction on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 continued under the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement,
II-78
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
which was a substantially fixed price agreement. In March 2017, the EPC Contractor filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter
11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.
In connection with the EPC Contractor's bankruptcy filing, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle
Owners, entered into several transitional arrangements to allow construction to continue. In July 2017, Georgia Power, acting for
itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, entered into the Vogtle Services Agreement, whereby Westinghouse provides
facility design and engineering services, procurement and technical support, and staff augmentation on a time and materials cost
basis. The Vogtle Services Agreement provides that it will continue until the start-up and testing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are
complete and electricity is generated and sold from both units. The Vogtle Services Agreement is terminable by the Vogtle Owners
upon 30 days' written notice.
In October 2017, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, executed the Bechtel Agreement, a cost
reimbursable plus fee arrangement, whereby Bechtel is reimbursed for actual costs plus a base fee and an at-risk fee, which is
subject to adjustment based on Bechtel's performance against cost and schedule targets. Each Vogtle Owner is severally (not
jointly) liable for its proportionate share, based on its ownership interest, of all amounts owed to Bechtel under the Bechtel
Agreement. The Vogtle Owners may terminate the Bechtel Agreement at any time for their convenience, provided that the Vogtle
Owners will be required to pay amounts related to work performed prior to the termination (including the applicable portion of the
base fee), certain termination-related costs, and, at certain stages of the work, the applicable portion of the at-risk fee. Bechtel may
terminate the Bechtel Agreement under certain circumstances, including certain Vogtle Owner suspensions of work, certain
breaches of the Bechtel Agreement by the Vogtle Owners, Vogtle Owner insolvency, and certain other events.
See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" for information on the
Amended and Restated Loan Guarantee Agreement, including applicable covenants, events of default, mandatory prepayment
events, and conditions to borrowing.
Cost and Schedule
Georgia Power's approximate proportionate share of the remaining estimated capital cost to complete Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 by
the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, is as follows:
(in billions)
Base project capital cost forecast(a)(b)$ 8.2
Construction contingency estimate 0.2
Total project capital cost forecast(a)(b)8.4
Net investment as of December 31, 2019(b)(5.9)
Remaining estimate to complete(a)$ 2.5
(a)Excludes financing costs expected to be capitalized through AFUDC of approximately $300 million, of which $23 million had been accrued through
December 31, 2019.
(b)Net of $1.7 billion received from Toshiba under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related customer refunds.
As of December 31, 2019, approximately $140 million of the $366 million construction contingency estimate established in the
second quarter 2018 was allocated to the base capital cost forecast for cost risks including, among other factors, construction
productivity; craft labor incentives; adding resources for supervision, field support, project management, initial test program, start-
up, and operations and engineering support; subcontracts; and procurement. As and when construction contingency is spent,
Georgia Power may request the Georgia PSC to evaluate those expenditures for rate recovery.
Georgia Power estimates that its financing costs for construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will total approximately $3.1 billion,
of which $2.2 billion had been incurred through December 31, 2019.
As part of its ongoing processes, Southern Nuclear continues to evaluate cost and schedule forecasts on a regular basis to
incorporate current information available, particularly in the areas of commodity installation, system turnovers, and workforce
statistics.
In April 2019, Southern Nuclear established aggressive target values for monthly construction production and system turnover
activities as part of a strategy to maintain and, where possible, build margin to the regulatory-approved in-service dates of
November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4. The project has faced challenges with the April 2019 aggressive strategy
targets, including, but not limited to, electrical and pipefitting labor productivity and closure rates for work packages, which
resulted in a backlog of activities and completion percentages below the April 2019 aggressive strategy targets. However,
II-79
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Nuclear and Georgia Power believe that existing productivity levels and pace of activity completion are sufficient to meet
the regulatory-approved in-service dates.
In February 2020, Southern Nuclear updated its cost and schedule forecast, which did not change the projected overall capital cost
forecast and confirmed the expected in-service dates of November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4. This update
included initiatives to improve productivity while refining and extending system turnover plans and certain near-term milestone
dates. Other milestone dates did not change. Achievement of the aggressive site work plan relies on meeting increased monthly
production and activity target values during 2020. To meet these 2020 targets, existing craft, including subcontractors, construction
productivity must improve and be sustained above historical average levels, appropriate levels of craft laborers, particularly
electrical and pipefitter craft labor, must be maintained, and additional supervision and other field support resources must be
retained. Southern Nuclear and Georgia Power continue to believe that pursuit of an aggressive site work plan is an appropriate
strategy to achieve completion of the units by their regulatory-approved in-service dates.
As construction, including subcontract work, continues and testing and system turnover activities increase, challenges with
management of contractors and vendors; subcontractor performance; supervision of craft labor and related craft labor productivity,
particularly in the installation of electrical and mechanical commodities, ability to attract and retain craft labor, and/or related cost
escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, installation, system turnover, and the initial testing and start-up, including
any required engineering changes or any remediation related thereto, of plant systems, structures, or components (some of which
are based on new technology that only within the last few years began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale),
or regional transmission upgrades, any of which may require additional labor and/or materials; or other issues could arise and
change the projected schedule and estimated cost.
There have been technical and procedural challenges to the construction and licensing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at the federal
and state level and additional challenges may arise. Processes are in place that are designed to assure compliance with the
requirements specified in the Westinghouse Design Control Document and the combined construction and operating licenses,
including inspections by Southern Nuclear and the NRC that occur throughout construction. As a result of such compliance
processes, certain license amendment requests have been filed and approved or are pending before the NRC. Various design and
other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely submittal by Southern Nuclear of the ITAAC documentation for
each unit and the related reviews and approvals by the NRC necessary to support NRC authorization to load fuel, may arise, which
may result in additional license amendments or require other resolution. As part of the aggressive site work plan, in January 2020,
Southern Nuclear notified the NRC of its intent to load fuel in 2020. If any license amendment requests or other licensing-based
compliance issues are not resolved in a timely manner, there may be delays in the project schedule that could result in increased
costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. However, any extension of the regulatory-approved
project schedule is currently estimated to result in additional base capital costs of approximately $50 million per month, based on
Georgia Power's ownership interests, and AFUDC of approximately $12 million per month. While Georgia Power is not precluded
from seeking recovery of any future capital cost forecast increase, management will ultimately determine whether or not to seek
recovery. Any further changes to the capital cost forecast that are not expected to be recoverable through regulated rates will be
required to be charged to income and such charges could be material.
Joint Owner Contracts
In November 2017, the Vogtle Owners entered into an amendment to their joint ownership agreements for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4 to provide for, among other conditions, additional Vogtle Owner approval requirements. Effective in August 2018, the Vogtle
Owners further amended the joint ownership agreements to clarify and provide procedures for certain provisions of the joint
ownership agreements related to adverse events that require the vote of the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to continue construction (as amended, and together with the November 2017 amendment, the Vogtle
Joint Ownership Agreements). The Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements also confirm that the Vogtle Owners' sole recourse against
Georgia Power or Southern Nuclear for any action or inaction in connection with their performance as agent for the Vogtle Owners
is limited to removal of Georgia Power and/or Southern Nuclear as agent, except in cases of willful misconduct.
As a result of an increase in the total project capital cost forecast and Georgia Power's decision not to seek rate recovery of the
increase in the base capital costs in conjunction with the nineteenth VCM report in 2018, the holders of at least 90% of the
ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 were required to vote to continue construction. In September 2018, the Vogtle
Owners unanimously voted to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
II-80
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
In connection with the vote to continue construction, Georgia Power entered into (i) a binding term sheet (Vogtle Owner Term
Sheet) with the other Vogtle Owners and MEAG Power's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC (MEAG SPVJ),
MEAG Power SPVM, LLC (MEAG SPVM), and MEAG Power SPVP, LLC (MEAG SPVP) to take certain actions which partially
mitigate potential financial exposure for the other Vogtle Owners, including additional amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements and the purchase of PTCs from the other Vogtle Owners at pre-established prices, and (ii) a term sheet (MEAG Term
Sheet) with MEAG Power and MEAG SPVJ to provide funding with respect to MEAG SPVJ's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 under certain circumstances. On January 14, 2019, Georgia Power, MEAG Power, and MEAG SPVJ entered into an
agreement to implement the provisions of the MEAG Term Sheet. On February 18, 2019, Georgia Power, the other Vogtle Owners,
and MEAG Power's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG SPVJ, MEAG SPVM, and MEAG SPVP entered into certain amendments
to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements to implement the provisions of the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Regulatory Matters
In 2009, the Georgia PSC voted to certify construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 with a certified capital cost of $4.418 billion.
In addition, in 2009 the Georgia PSC approved inclusion of the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 related CWIP accounts in rate base, and
the State of Georgia enacted the Georgia Nuclear Energy Financing Act, which allows Georgia Power to recover financing costs for
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Financing costs are recovered on all applicable certified costs through annual adjustments to the NCCR
tariff up to the certified capital cost of $4.418 billion. At December 31, 2019, Georgia Power had recovered approximately $2.2
billion of financing costs. Financing costs related to capital costs above $4.418 billion are being recognized through AFUDC and
are expected to be recovered through retail rates over the life of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4; however, Georgia Power will not record
AFUDC related to any capital costs in excess of the total deemed reasonable by the Georgia PSC (currently $7.3 billion) and not
requested for rate recovery. On December 17, 2019, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's request to decrease the NCCR
tariff by $62 million annually, effective January 1, 2020.
Georgia Power is required to file semi-annual VCM reports with the Georgia PSC by February 28 and August 31 of each year. In
2013, in connection with the eighth VCM report, the Georgia PSC approved a stipulation between Georgia Power and the staff of
the Georgia PSC to waive the requirement to amend the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 certificate in accordance with the 2009
certification order until the completion of Plant Vogtle Unit 3, or earlier if deemed appropriate by the Georgia PSC and Georgia
Power.
In 2016, the Georgia PSC voted to approve a settlement agreement (Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement) resolving certain prudency
matters in connection with the fifteenth VCM report. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC voted to approve (and issued its related
order on January 11, 2018) Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM report and modified the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement. The
Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, as modified by the January 11, 2018 order, resolved the following regulatory matters related to
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4: (i) none of the $3.3 billion of costs incurred through December 31, 2015 and reflected in the fourteenth
VCM report should be disallowed from rate base on the basis of imprudence; (ii) the Contractor Settlement Agreement was
reasonable and prudent and none of the amounts paid pursuant to the Contractor Settlement Agreement should be disallowed from
rate base on the basis of imprudence; (iii) (a) capital costs incurred up to $5.68 billion would be presumed to be reasonable and
prudent with the burden of proof on any party challenging such costs, (b) Georgia Power would have the burden to show that any
capital costs above $5.68 billion were prudent, and (c) a revised capital cost forecast of $7.3 billion (after reflecting the impact of
payments received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and related customer refunds) was found reasonable; (iv)
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 should be completed, with Southern Nuclear serving as project manager and Bechtel as
primary contractor; (v) approved and deemed reasonable Georgia Power's revised schedule placing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 in
service in November 2021 and November 2022, respectively; (vi) confirmed that the revised cost forecast does not represent a cost
cap and that prudence decisions on cost recovery will be made at a later date, consistent with applicable Georgia law; (vii) reduced
the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff (a) from 10.95% (the ROE rate setting point authorized by the Georgia PSC in the 2013
ARP) to 10.00% effective January 1, 2016, (b) from 10.00% to 8.30%, effective January 1, 2020, and (c) from 8.30% to 5.30%,
effective January 1, 2021 (provided that the ROE in no case will be less than Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt);
(viii) reduced the ROE used for AFUDC equity for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 from 10.00% to Georgia Power's average cost of
long-term debt, effective January 1, 2018; and (ix) agreed that upon Unit 3 reaching commercial operation, retail base rates would
be adjusted to include carrying costs on those capital costs deemed prudent in the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement. The January
11, 2018 order also stated that if Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are not commercially operational by June 1, 2021 and June 1, 2022,
respectively, the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff will be further reduced by 10 basis points each month (but not lower than
Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt) until the respective Unit is commercially operational. The ROE reductions
negatively impacted earnings by approximately $75 million,
II-81
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
$100 million, and $25 million in 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively, and are estimated to have negative earnings impacts of
approximately $140 million, $240 million, and $190 million in 2020, 2021, and 2022, respectively. In its January 11, 2018 order,
the Georgia PSC also stated if other conditions change and assumptions upon which Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM report are
based do not materialize, the Georgia PSC reserved the right to reconsider the decision to continue construction.
In February 2018, Georgia Interfaith Power & Light, Inc. (GIPL) and Partnership for Southern Equity, Inc. (PSE) filed a petition
appealing the Georgia PSC's January 11, 2018 order with the Fulton County Superior Court. In March 2018, Georgia Watch filed a
similar appeal to the Fulton County Superior Court for judicial review of the Georgia PSC's decision and denial of Georgia Watch's
motion for reconsideration. In December 2018, the Fulton County Superior Court granted Georgia Power's motion to dismiss the
two appeals. On January 9, 2019, GIPL, PSE, and Georgia Watch filed an appeal of this decision with the Georgia Court of
Appeals. On October 29, 2019, the Georgia Court of Appeals issued an opinion affirming the Fulton County Superior Court's ruling
that the Georgia PSC's January 11, 2018 order was not a final, appealable decision. In addition, the Georgia Court of Appeals
remanded the case to the Fulton County Superior Court to clarify its ruling as to whether the petitioners showed that review of the
Georgia PSC's final order would not provide them an adequate remedy. Georgia Power believes the petitions have no merit;
however, an adverse outcome in the litigation combined with subsequent adverse action by the Georgia PSC could have a material
impact on Southern Company's and Georgia Power's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
On February 18, 2020, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's twentieth VCM report and its concurrently-filed twenty-first
VCM report, including approval of (i) $1.2 billion of construction capital costs incurred from July 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019
and (ii) $21.5 million of expenditures related to Georgia Power's portion of an administrative claim filed in the Westinghouse
bankruptcy proceedings (which expenditures had previously been deferred by the Georgia PSC for later approval). Through the
twenty-first VCM, the Georgia PSC has approved total construction capital costs incurred through June 30, 2019 of $6.7 billion
(before $1.7 billion of payments received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related
customer refunds). On February 19, 2020, Georgia Power filed its twenty-second VCM report with the Georgia PSC covering the
period from July 1, 2019 through December 31, 2019, requesting approval of $674 million of construction capital costs incurred
during that period.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Power
During 2019, Southern Power completed construction of and placed in service the 385-MW Plant Mankato expansion and the
Wildhorse Mountain facility, acquired and continued construction of the Skookumchuck facility, and continued construction of the
Reading facility.
Project Facility Resour ceAppr oximate
Nameplate
Capacity ( MW) LocationActual/Expected
COD PPA CounterpartiesPPA
Contract
Period
Projects Completed During the Year Ended December  31, 2019
Mankato expansion(a)Natural Gas 385 Mankato, MN May 2019 Northern States
Power Company20 years
Wildhorse Mountain (b)Wind 100 Pushmataha County ,
OKDecember 2019 Arkansas Electric
Cooperative
Corporation20 years
Projects Under  Construction at December  31, 2019
Reading(c)Wind 200 Osage and L yon
Counties, KSSecond quarter 2020 Royal Caribbean
Cruises L TD12 years
Skookumchuck(d)Wind 136 Lewis and Thurston
Counties, WASecond quarter 2020 Puget Sound Ener gy 20 years
(a)Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Mankato, including the expansion, to a subsidiary of Xcel on January 17, 2020. The expansion
unit started providing energy under a PPA with Northern States Power on June 1, 2019. See "Acquisitions and Dispositions – Southern Power – Sales of Natural
Gas and Biomass Plants" herein and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" and "Assets Held for Sale" for additional information.
(b)In May 2018, Southern Power purchased 100% of the membership interests of the Wildhorse Mountain facility. In December 2019, Southern Power entered into
a tax equity partnership and, as a result, owns 100% of the Class B membership interests.
(c)In August 2018, Southern Power purchased 100% of the membership interests of the Reading facility pursuant to a joint development arrangement. Southern
Power may enter into a tax equity partnership, in which case it would then own 100% of the Class B membership interests. The ultimate outcome of this matter
cannot be determined at this time.
II-82
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
(d)In October 2019, Southern Power purchased 100% of the membership interests of the Skookumchuck facility pursuant to a joint development arrangement. In
December 2019, Southern Power entered into a tax equity agreement as the Class B member with funding of the tax equity amounts expected to occur upon
commercial operation. Shortly after commercial operation, Southern Power may sell a noncontrolling interest in these Class B membership interests to another
partner. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Total aggregate construction costs for the two projects under construction at December 31, 2019, excluding acquisition costs, are
expected to be between $490 million and $535 million. At December 31, 2019, total costs of construction incurred for these
projects were $417 million and are included in CWIP. The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Company Gas
Infrastructure Replacement Programs and Capital Projects
Southern Company Gas continues to focus on capital discipline and cost control while pursuing projects and initiatives that are
expected to have current and future benefits to customers, provide an appropriate return on invested capital, and help ensure the
safety and reliability of the utility infrastructure. In addition to capital expenditures recovered through base rates by each of the
natural gas distribution utilities, Nicor Gas and Virginia Natural Gas have separate rate riders that provide timely recovery of
capital expenditures for specific infrastructure replacement programs. Total capital expenditures incurred during 2019 for gas
distribution operations were $1.4 billion.
The following table and discussions provide updates on the infrastructure replacement programs and capital projects at the natural
gas distribution utilities at December 31, 2019. These programs are risk-based and designed to update and replace cast iron, bare
steel, and mid-vintage plastic materials or expand Southern Company Gas' distribution systems to improve reliability and meet
operational flexibility and growth. The anticipated expenditures for these programs in 2020 are quantified in the discussion below.
Utility Program  Recovery Expenditures in
2019  Expenditures
Since Project
Inception  Pipe
Installed
Since
Project
InceptionScope of
ProgramProgram
Duration Last
Year of
Program
   (in millions)  (miles) (miles) (years) 
Nicor Gas Investing in Illinois(*) Rider $ 396 $ 1,712 843 1,450 9 2023
Virginia
Natural GasSteps to Advance
Virginia's Energy (SAVE
and SAVE II)  Rider 45 244 363 770 13 2024
Total   $ 441 $ 1,956 1,206 2,220  
(*)Includes replacement of pipes, compressors, and transmission mains along with other improvements such as new meters. Scope of program miles is an estimate
and subject to change.
Nicor Gas
In 2013, Illinois enacted legislation that allows Nicor Gas to provide more widespread safety and reliability enhancements to its
distribution system. The legislation stipulates that rate increases to customers as a result of any infrastructure investments shall not
exceed a cumulative annual average of 4.0% or, in any given year, 5.5% of base rate revenues. In 2014, the Illinois Commission
approved the nine-year regulatory infrastructure program, Investing in Illinois, subject to annual review. Nicor Gas expects to place
into service $400 million of qualifying projects under Investing in Illinois in 2020.
In conjunction with the base rate case order issued by the Illinois Commission in January 2018, Nicor Gas is recovering program
costs incurred prior to December 31, 2017 through base rates. Additionally, the Illinois Commission's approval of Nicor Gas' rate
case on October 2, 2019 included $65 million in annual revenues related to the recovery of program costs from January 1, 2018
through September 30, 2019 under the Investing in Illinois program. See "Regulatory Matters – Southern Company Gas – Rate
Proceedings" herein for additional information.
Virginia Natural Gas
In 2012, the Virginia Commission approved the SAVE program, an accelerated infrastructure replacement program. In 2016 and on
September 25, 2019, the Virginia Commission approved amendments and extensions to the SAVE program. The latest extension
allows Virginia Natural Gas to continue replacing aging pipeline infrastructure through 2024 and increases its authorized
investment under the previously-approved plan from $35 million to $40 million in 2019 with additional annual investments of $50
million in 2020, $60 million in 2021, $70 million in each year from 2022 through 2024, and a total potential
II-83
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
variance of up to $5 million allowed for the program, for a maximum total investment over the six-year term (2019 through 2024)
of $365 million. Virginia Natural Gas expects to invest $50 million under this program in 2020.
The SAVE program is subject to annual review by the Virginia Commission. In accordance with the base rate case order issued by
the Virginia Commission in 2017, Virginia Natural Gas is recovering program costs incurred prior to September 1, 2017 through
base rates. Program costs incurred subsequent to September 1, 2017 are currently recovered through a separate rider and are subject
to future base rate case proceedings.
On December 6, 2019, Virginia Natural Gas filed an application with the Virginia Commission for a 24.1-mile header improvement
project to improve resiliency and increase the supply of natural gas delivered to energy suppliers, including Virginia Natural Gas.
The cost of the project is expected to total $346 million. The Virginia Commission is expected to rule on this application in the
second quarter 2020. Construction is expected to begin in June 2021 and the project is expected to be placed in service in the fourth
quarter 2022. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Atlanta Gas Light
As discussed under "Regulatory Matters – Southern Company Gas – Utility Regulation and Rate Design" herein, i-SRP and i-VPR
will continue under GRAM and the recovery of and return on current and future infrastructure program capital investments will be
included in base rates.
Pipeline Construction Projects
Southern Company Gas is involved in two significant pipeline construction projects within its gas pipeline investments segment.
These projects, along with Southern Company Gas' existing pipelines, are intended to provide diverse sources of natural gas
supplies to customers, resolve current and long-term supply planning for new capacity, enhance system reliability, and generate
economic development in the areas served.
In 2014, Southern Company Gas entered into a joint venture, whereby it holds a 5% ownership interest in the Atlantic Coast
Pipeline, an interstate pipeline company formed to develop and operate an approximate 605-mile natural gas pipeline in North
Carolina, Virginia, and West Virginia with expected initial transportation capacity of 1.5 Bcf per day. The proposed pipeline project
is expected to transport natural gas to customers in Virginia. In 2017, the Atlantic Coast Pipeline received FERC approval.
The Atlantic Coast Pipeline has experienced challenges to its permits since construction began in 2018. During the third and fourth
quarters 2018, a FERC stop work order, together with delays in obtaining permits necessary for construction and construction
delays due to judicial actions, impacted the cost and schedule for the project. Project cost estimates are approximately $8.0 billion
($400 million for Southern Company Gas), excluding financing costs. On October 4, 2019, the U.S. Supreme Court agreed to hear
Atlantic Coast Pipeline's appeal of a lower court ruling that overturned a key permit for the project. On January 7, 2020, the U.S.
Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit vacated another key permit. The operator of the joint venture has indicated that it currently
expects to complete construction by the end of 2021 and place the project in service shortly thereafter.
On February 7, 2020, Southern Company Gas entered into an agreement with Dominion Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC for the sale
of its interest in Atlantic Coast Pipeline. The transaction is expected to be completed in the first half of 2020; however, the ultimate
outcome cannot be determined at this time. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale
of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline" for additional information.
Also in 2014, Southern Company Gas entered into a partnership in which it holds a 20% ownership interest in the PennEast
Pipeline, an interstate pipeline company formed to develop and operate an approximate 118-mile natural gas pipeline between New
Jersey and Pennsylvania. The expected initial transportation capacity of 1.0 Bcf per day is under long-term contracts, mainly with
public utilities and other market-serving entities, such as electric generation companies, in New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and New
York. Southern Company Gas believes this pipeline will alleviate takeaway constraints in the Marcellus region and help mitigate
some of the price volatility experienced during recent winters.
Expected project costs related to the PennEast Pipeline for Southern Company Gas total approximately $300 million, excluding
financing costs. In January 2018, the PennEast Pipeline received initial FERC approval. Work continues with state and federal
agencies to obtain the required permits to begin construction. On September 10, 2019, an appellate court ruled that the PennEast
Pipeline does not have federal eminent domain authority over lands in which a state has property rights interests. On February 18,
2020, PennEast Pipeline filed a petition for a writ of certiorari to seek U.S. Supreme Court review of the appellate court decision.
On December 30, 2019, PennEast Pipeline filed a two-year extension request with the FERC to complete the project by January 19,
2022.
II-84
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Additionally, on January 30, 2020, PennEast Pipeline filed an amendment with the FERC to construct the pipeline project in two
phases. The first phase would consist of 68 miles of pipe, constructed entirely within Pennsylvania, which is expected to be
completed by November 2021. The second phase would include the remaining route in Pennsylvania and New Jersey and is
targeted for completion in 2023. FERC approval of the amended plan is required prior to beginning the first phase.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time; however, any work delays, whether caused by judicial or
regulatory action, abnormal weather, or other conditions, may result in additional cost or schedule modifications or, ultimately, in
project cancellation, any of which could result in an impairment of one or both of Southern Company Gas' investments and could
have a material impact on Southern Company's and Southern Company Gas' financial statements. Southern Company Gas
evaluated its investments and determined there was no impairment as of December 31, 2019.
See Notes 3 and 7 to the financial statements under "Guarantees" and "Southern Company Gas – Equity Method Investments,"
respectively, for additional information on these pipeline projects.
Southern Power's Power Sales Agreements
General
Southern Power has PPAs with some of the traditional electric operating companies, other investor-owned utilities, IPPs,
municipalities, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial customers. The PPAs are expected to provide
Southern Power with a stable source of revenue during their respective terms.
Many of Southern Power's PPAs have provisions that require Southern Power or the counterparty to post collateral or an acceptable
substitute guarantee in the event that S&P or Moody's downgrades the credit ratings of the respective company to an unacceptable
credit rating or if the counterparty is not rated or fails to maintain a minimum coverage ratio.
On January 29, 2019, Pacific Gas & Electric Company (PG&E) filed petitions to reorganize under Chapter 11 of the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code. Southern Power, together with its noncontrolling partners, owns four solar facilities where PG&E is the energy
off-taker for approximately 207 MWs of capacity under long-term PPAs. PG&E is also the transmission provider for these four
facilities and two of Southern Power's other solar facilities. At December 31, 2019, Southern Power had outstanding accounts
receivables due from PG&E of $2 million related to the PPAs and $33 million related to the transmission interconnections (of
which $27 million is classified in receivables – other and $6 million is classified in other deferred charges and assets). Subsequent
to December 31, 2019, Southern Power received $15 million in accordance with a November 2019 bankruptcy court order granting
payment of transmission interconnections for amounts due and owing. Southern Power continues to evaluate the recoverability of
its investments in these solar facilities under various scenarios, including selling the related energy into the competitive markets,
and has concluded that these solar facilities are not impaired. PG&E has continued to perform under the terms of the PPAs.
Southern Power does not expect a material impact to its financial statements if, as a result of the bankruptcy proceedings, PG&E
does not perform in accordance with the PPAs or the terms of the PPAs are renegotiated; however, the ultimate outcome of this
matter cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Power is working to maintain and expand its share of the wholesale markets. During 2019, Southern Power saw an
increase in the demand for energy and capacity that can be served from natural gas generating facilities, especially in the Southeast,
and expects that this increase in demand will continue in the near term (2020-2022), with timing varying depending on the market.
During 2019, Southern Power successfully remarketed approximately 190 to 650 MWs of annual natural gas generation capacity to
load-serving entities through several PPAs extending over the next nine years. Southern Power calculates an investment coverage
ratio for its generating assets, including those owned with various partners, based on the ratio of investment under contract to total
investment using the respective generation facilities' net book value (or expected in-service value for facilities under construction)
as the investment amount. With the inclusion of investments associated with the wind facilities currently under construction, as well
as other capacity and energy contracts, and excluding Plant Mankato, which was sold on January 17, 2020, Southern Power's
average investment coverage ratio at December 31, 2019 was 93% through 2024 and 90% through 2029, with an average remaining
contract duration of approximately 14 years. See "Acquisitions and Dispositions – Southern Power" and "Construction Programs –
Southern Power" herein for additional information.
Natural Gas
Southern Power's electricity sales from natural gas facilities are primarily through long-term PPAs that consist of two types of
agreements. The first type, referred to as a unit or block sale, is a customer purchase from a dedicated generating unit where all or a
portion of the generation from that unit is reserved for that customer. Southern Power typically has the ability to serve the unit or
block sale customer from an alternate resource. The second type, referred to as requirements service, provides that Southern Power
serve the customer's capacity and energy requirements from a combination of the customer's own generating units and
II-85
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
from Southern Power resources not dedicated to serve unit or block sales. Southern Power has rights to purchase power provided
by the requirements customers' resources when economically viable.
As a general matter, substantially all of the PPAs provide that the purchasers are responsible for either procuring the fuel (tolling
agreements) or reimbursing Southern Power for substantially all of the cost of fuel or purchased power relating to the energy
delivered under such PPAs. To the extent a particular generating facility does not meet the operational requirements contemplated
in the PPAs, Southern Power may be responsible for excess fuel costs. With respect to fuel transportation risk, most of Southern
Power's PPAs provide that the counterparties are responsible for the availability of fuel transportation to the particular generating
facility.
Capacity charges that form part of the PPA payments are designed to recover fixed and variable operation and maintenance costs
based on dollars-per-kilowatt year. In general, to reduce Southern Power's exposure to certain operation and maintenance costs,
Southern Power has LTSAs. See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Long-Term Service Agreements" for additional
information.
Solar and Wind
Southern Power's electricity sales from solar and wind (renewable) generating facilities are also primarily through long-term PPAs;
however, these solar and wind PPAs do not have a capacity charge and customers either purchase the energy output of a dedicated
renewable facility through an energy charge or provide Southern Power a certain fixed price for the electricity sold to the grid. As a
result, Southern Power's ability to recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance expenses is dependent upon the level of
energy generated from these facilities, which can be impacted by weather conditions, equipment performance, transmission
constraints, and other factors. Generally, under the renewable generation PPAs, the purchasing party retains the right to keep or
resell the renewable energy credits.
Income Tax Matters
Consolidated Income Taxes
On behalf of the Registrants, Southern Company files a consolidated federal income tax return and various state income tax returns,
some of which are combined or unitary. Under a joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement, each Southern Company
subsidiary's current and deferred tax expense is computed on a stand-alone basis and no subsidiary is allocated more current
expense than would be paid if it filed a separate income tax return. In accordance with IRS regulations, each company is jointly and
severally liable for the federal tax liability.
The impact of certain tax events at Southern Company and/or its other subsidiaries can, and does, affect each Registrant's ability to
utilize certain tax credits. See "Tax Credits" and ACCOUNTING POLICIES – "Application of Critical Accounting Policies and
Estimates" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Federal Tax Reform Legislation
In 2017, the Tax Reform Legislation was signed into law and became effective on January 1, 2018. The Tax Reform Legislation,
among other things, reduced the federal corporate income tax rate to 21%, retained normalization provisions for public utility
property and existing renewable energy incentives, and repealed the corporate alternative minimum tax. In addition, under the Tax
Reform Legislation, NOLs generated after December 31, 2017 can no longer be carried back to previous tax years but can be
carried forward indefinitely, with utilization limited to 80% of taxable income of the subsequent tax year. The projected reduction
of Southern Company's consolidated income tax liability resulting from the tax rate reduction also delays the expected utilization of
existing tax credit carryforwards. See "Consolidated Income Taxes" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for information
on Southern Company's joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement.
II-86
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Bonus Depreciation
Under the Tax Reform Legislation, projects with binding contracts prior to September 28, 2017 and placed in service after
September 27, 2017 remain eligible for 50% bonus depreciation for 2015 through 2017, 40% bonus depreciation for 2018, and 30%
bonus depreciation for 2019 and certain long-lived assets placed in service in 2020. Based on provisional estimates, bonus
depreciation is expected to result in positive cash flows for the Registrants as follows:
 2019 Tax Year 2020 Tax Year
 (in millions)
Southern Company $ 989 $ 382
Alabama Power 180 68
Georgia Power 314 56
Mississippi Power 7 2
Southern Power(*)87 95
Southern Company Gas 190 58
(*)Cash flows resulting from bonus depreciation for Southern Power would also be impacted by Southern Power's use of tax equity partnerships.
See Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information. The ultimate
outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Tax Credits
The Tax Reform Legislation retained solar energy incentives of 30% ITC for projects that commenced construction by December
31, 2019; 26% ITC for projects that commence construction in 2020; 22% ITC for projects that commence construction in 2021;
and a permanent 10% ITC for projects that commence construction on or after January 1, 2022. In addition, the Tax Reform
Legislation retained wind energy incentives of 100% PTC for projects that commenced construction in 2016; 80% PTC for projects
that commenced construction in 2017; 60% PTC for projects that commenced construction in 2018; and 40% PTC for projects that
commenced construction in 2019. As a result of a tax extenders bill passed in December 2019, projects that begin construction in
2020 will be entitled to 60% PTC. Projects commencing construction after 2020 will not be entitled to any PTCs. Southern
Company has received ITCs and PTCs in connection with investments in solar, wind, and biomass facilities primarily at Southern
Power and Georgia Power.
Southern Power's ITCs relate to its investment in new solar facilities acquired or constructed and its PTCs relate to the first 10
years of energy production from its wind facilities, which have had, and may continue to have, a material impact on Southern
Power's cash flows and net income. At December 31, 2019, Southern Company and Southern Power had approximately $1.8 billion
and $1.4 billion, respectively, of unutilized ITCs and PTCs, which are currently expected to be fully utilized by 2024, but could be
further delayed. Since 2018, Southern Power has been utilizing tax equity partnerships for wind and solar projects, where the tax
partner takes significantly all of the respective federal tax benefits. These tax equity partnerships are consolidated in Southern
Company's and Southern Power's financial statements using the HLBV methodology to allocate partnership gains and losses. See
Note 1 to the financial statements under "General" for additional information on the HLBV methodology and Note 1 to the
financial statements under "Income Taxes" and Note 10 to the financial statements under "Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities – Tax
Credit Carryforwards" and "Effective Tax Rate" for additional information regarding utilization and amortization of credits and the
tax benefit related to associated basis differences.
General Litigation Matters
The Registrants are involved in various other matters being litigated and regulatory matters that could affect future earnings. The
ultimate outcome of such pending or potential litigation or regulatory matters against each Registrant and any subsidiaries cannot
be determined at this time; however, for current proceedings not specifically reported herein or in Notes 2 and 3 to the financial
statements, management does not anticipate that the ultimate liabilities, if any, arising from such current proceedings would have a
material effect on such Registrant's financial statements. See Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements for a discussion of various
other contingencies, regulatory matters, and other matters being litigated which may affect future earnings potential.
The Registrants believe the pending legal challenges discussed below have no merit; however, the ultimate outcome of these
matters cannot be determined at this time.
II-87
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Company
In January 2017, a securities class action complaint was filed against Southern Company, certain of its officers, and certain former
Mississippi Power officers in the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia by Monroe County Employees'
Retirement System on behalf of all persons who purchased shares of Southern Company's common stock between April 25, 2012
and October 29, 2013. The complaint alleges that Southern Company, certain of its officers, and certain former Mississippi Power
officers made materially false and misleading statements regarding the Kemper County energy facility in violation of certain
provisions under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. The complaint seeks, among other things, compensatory
damages and litigation costs and attorneys' fees. In 2017, the plaintiffs filed an amended complaint that provided additional detail
about their claims, increased the purported class period by one day, and added certain other former Mississippi Power officers as
defendants. Also in 2017, the defendants filed a motion to dismiss the plaintiffs' amended complaint with prejudice, to which the
plaintiffs filed an opposition. In March 2018, the court issued an order granting, in part, the defendants' motion to dismiss. The
court dismissed certain claims against certain officers of Southern Company and Mississippi Power and dismissed the allegations
related to a number of the statements that plaintiffs challenged as being false or misleading. In April 2018, the defendants filed a
motion for reconsideration of the court's order, seeking dismissal of the remaining claims in the lawsuit. In August 2018, the court
denied the motion for reconsideration and denied a motion to certify the issue for interlocutory appeal. On August 22, 2019, the
court certified the plaintiffs' proposed class. On September 5, 2019, the defendants filed a petition for interlocutory appeal of the
class certification order with the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Eleventh Circuit. On December 19, 2019, the U.S. District Court for
the Northern District of Georgia entered an order staying all deadlines in the case pending mediation. The stay automatically
expires on March 31, 2020.
In February 2017, Jean Vineyard and Judy Mesirov each filed a shareholder derivative lawsuit in the U.S. District Court for the
Northern District of Georgia. Each of these lawsuits names as defendants Southern Company, certain of its directors, certain of its
officers, and certain former Mississippi Power officers. In 2017, these two shareholder derivative lawsuits were consolidated in the
U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia. The complaints allege that the defendants caused Southern Company to
make false or misleading statements regarding the Kemper County energy facility cost and schedule. Further, the complaints allege
that the defendants were unjustly enriched and caused the waste of corporate assets and also allege that the individual defendants
violated their fiduciary duties. Each plaintiff seeks to recover, on behalf of Southern Company, unspecified actual damages and, on
each plaintiff's own behalf, attorneys' fees and costs in bringing the lawsuit. Each plaintiff also seeks certain changes to Southern
Company's corporate governance and internal processes. In April 2018, the court entered an order staying this lawsuit until 30 days
after the resolution of any dispositive motions or any settlement, whichever is earlier, in the securities class action.
In May 2017, Helen E. Piper Survivor's Trust filed a shareholder derivative lawsuit in the Superior Court of Gwinnett County,
Georgia that names as defendants Southern Company, certain of its directors, certain of its officers, and certain former Mississippi
Power officers. The complaint alleges that the individual defendants, among other things, breached their fiduciary duties in
connection with schedule delays and cost overruns associated with the construction of the Kemper County energy facility. The
complaint further alleges that the individual defendants authorized or failed to correct false and misleading statements regarding the
Kemper County energy facility schedule and cost and failed to implement necessary internal controls to prevent harm to Southern
Company. The plaintiff seeks to recover, on behalf of Southern Company, unspecified actual damages and disgorgement of profits
and, on its behalf, attorneys' fees and costs in bringing the lawsuit. The plaintiff also seeks certain unspecified changes to Southern
Company's corporate governance and internal processes. In May 2018, the court entered an order staying this lawsuit until 30 days
after the resolution of any dispositive motions or any settlement, whichever is earlier, in the securities class action. On August 5,
2019, the court granted a motion filed by the plaintiff on July 17, 2019 to substitute a new named plaintiff, Martin J. Kobuck, in
place of Helen E. Piper Survivor's Trust.
Georgia Power
In 2011, plaintiffs filed a putative class action against Georgia Power in the Superior Court of Fulton County, Georgia alleging that
Georgia Power's collection in rates of amounts for municipal franchise fees (which fees are paid to municipalities) exceeded the
amounts allowed in orders of the Georgia PSC and alleging certain state tort law claims. In 2016, the Georgia Court of Appeals
reversed the trial court's previous dismissal of the case and remanded the case to the trial court. Georgia Power filed a petition for
writ of certiorari with the Georgia Supreme Court, which was granted in 2017. In June 2018, the Georgia Supreme Court affirmed
the judgment of the Georgia Court of Appeals and remanded the case to the trial court for further proceedings. Following a motion
by Georgia Power, on February 13, 2019, the Superior Court of Fulton County ordered the parties to submit petitions to the Georgia
PSC for a declaratory ruling to address certain terms the court previously held were ambiguous as used in the Georgia PSC's orders.
The order entered by the Superior Court of Fulton County also conditionally certified the proposed class. In March 2019, Georgia
Power and the plaintiffs filed petitions with the Georgia PSC seeking confirmation of the proper
II-88
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
application of the municipal franchise fee schedule pursuant to the Georgia PSC's orders. On October 23, 2019, the Georgia PSC
issued an order that found and concluded that Georgia Power has appropriately implemented the municipal franchise fee schedule.
On March 6, 2019, Georgia Power filed a notice of appeal with the Georgia Court of Appeals regarding the Superior Court of
Fulton County's February 2019 order. The amount of any possible losses cannot be calculated at this time because, among other
factors, it is unknown whether conditional class certification will be upheld and the ultimate composition of any class and whether
any losses would be subject to recovery from any municipalities.
Mississippi Power
In May 2018, Southern Company and Mississippi Power received a notice of dispute and arbitration demand filed by Martin
Product Sales, LLC (Martin) based on two agreements, both related to Kemper IGCC byproducts for which Mississippi Power
provided termination notices in 2017. Martin alleges breach of contract, breach of good faith and fair dealing, fraud and
misrepresentation, and civil conspiracy and makes a claim for damages in the amount of approximately $143 million, as well as
additional unspecified damages, attorney's fees, costs, and interest. A portion of the claim for damages was on behalf of Martin
Transport, Inc. (Martin Transport), an affiliate of Martin. In the first quarter 2019, Mississippi Power and Southern Company filed
motions to dismiss, which were denied by the arbitration panel on May 10, 2019. On September 27, 2019, Martin Transport filed a
separate complaint against Mississippi Power in the Circuit Court of Kemper County, Mississippi alleging claims of fraud,
negligent misrepresentation, promissory estoppel, and equitable estoppel, each arising out of the same alleged facts and
circumstances that underlie Martin's arbitration demand. Martin Transport seeks compensatory damages of $5 million and punitive
damages of $50 million. In November 2019, Martin Transport's claim was combined with the Martin arbitration case and the
separate court case was dismissed. On December 16, 2019, Southern Company and Mississippi Power each filed motions for
summary judgment on all claims. On February 17, 2020, the arbitration panel granted Southern Company's motion and dismissed
Southern Company from the arbitration. An adverse outcome in this proceeding could have a material impact on Southern
Company's and Mississippi Power's financial statements.
In November 2018, Ray C. Turnage and 10 other individual plaintiffs filed a putative class action complaint against Mississippi
Power and three members of the Mississippi PSC in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of Mississippi. Mississippi
Power received Mississippi PSC approval in 2013 to charge a mirror CWIP rate premised upon including in its rate base pre-
construction and construction costs for the Kemper IGCC prior to placing the Kemper IGCC into service. The Mississippi Supreme
Court reversed that approval and ordered Mississippi Power to refund the amounts paid by customers under the previously-
approved mirror CWIP rate. The plaintiffs allege that the initial approval process, and the amount approved, were improper. They
also allege that Mississippi Power underpaid customers by up to $23.5 million in the refund process by applying an incorrect
interest rate. The plaintiffs seek to recover, on behalf of themselves and their putative class, actual damages, punitive damages, pre-
judgment interest, post-judgment interest, attorney's fees, and costs. In response to Mississippi Power and the Mississippi PSC each
filing a motion to dismiss, the plaintiffs filed an amended complaint on March 14, 2019. The amended complaint included four
additional plaintiffs and additional claims for gross negligence, reckless conduct, and intentional wrongdoing. Mississippi Power
and the Mississippi PSC have each filed a motion to dismiss the amended complaint. An adverse outcome in this proceeding could
have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial statements.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
Other Matters
Southern Company
A subsidiary of Southern Holdings has several leveraged lease agreements, with original terms ranging up to 45 years, which relate
to international and domestic energy generation, distribution, and transportation assets. Southern Company receives federal income
tax deductions for depreciation and amortization, as well as interest on long-term debt related to these investments. Southern
Company reviews all important lease assumptions at least annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances
indicate that a change in assumptions has occurred or may occur. These assumptions include the effective tax rate, the residual
value, the credit quality of the lessees, and the timing of expected tax cash flows. See Note 1 to the financial statements under
"Leveraged Leases" for additional information.
The ability of the lessees to make required payments to the Southern Holdings subsidiary is dependent on the operational
performance of the assets. In 2017, the financial and operational performance of one of the lessees and the associated generation
assets raised significant concerns about the short-term ability of the generation assets to produce cash flows sufficient to support
ongoing operations and the lessee's contractual obligations and its ability to make the remaining semi-annual lease payments
through the end of the lease term in 2047. In addition, following the expiration of the existing power offtake agreement in 2032, the
lessee also is exposed to remarketing risk, which encompasses the price and availability of alternative sources of generation.
II-89
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
While all lease payments through December 31, 2019 have been paid in full due to recent operational improvements, operational
and remarketing risks and the resulting cash liquidity challenges persist, and significant concerns continue regarding the lessee's
ability to make the remaining semi-annual lease payments. These challenges may also impact the expected residual value of the
generation assets. Southern Company has evaluated the recoverability of the lease receivable and the expected residual value of the
generation assets under various scenarios. Based on current forecasts of energy prices in the years following the expiration of the
existing PPA, Southern Company concluded that it is no longer probable that all of the associated rental payments will be received
over the term of the lease. As a result, during the fourth quarter 2019, Southern Company revised the estimate of cash flows to be
received under the leveraged lease, which resulted in an impairment charge of $17 million ($13 million after tax). If any future
lease payment is not paid in full, the Southern Holdings subsidiary may be unable to make its corresponding payment to the holders
of the underlying non-recourse debt related to the generation assets. Failure to make the required payment to the debtholders could
represent an event of default that would give the debtholders the right to foreclose on, and take ownership of, the generation assets
from the Southern Holdings subsidiary, in effect terminating the lease and resulting in the write-off of the related lease receivable,
which totaled approximately $76 million at December 31, 2019. Southern Company will continue to monitor the operational
performance of the underlying assets and evaluate the ability of the lessee to continue to make the required lease payments. The
ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Mississippi Power
In conjunction with Southern Company's sale of Gulf Power, NextEra Energy held back $75 million of the purchase price pending
Mississippi Power and Gulf Power negotiating a mutually acceptable revised operating agreement for Plant Daniel. In addition,
Mississippi Power and Gulf Power committed to seek a restructuring of their 50% undivided ownership interests in Plant Daniel
such that each of them would, after the restructuring, own 100% of a generating unit. On January 15, 2019, Gulf Power provided
notice to Mississippi Power that Gulf Power will retire its share of the generating capacity of Plant Daniel on January 15, 2024.
Mississippi Power has the option to purchase Gulf Power's ownership interest for $1 on January 15, 2024, provided that Mississippi
Power exercises the option no later than 120 days prior to that date. Mississippi Power is assessing the potential operational and
economic effects of Gulf Power's notice. The ultimate outcome of these matters remains subject to completion of Mississippi
Power's evaluations and applicable regulatory approvals, including by the FERC and the Mississippi PSC, and cannot be
determined at this time. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company" for information regarding the sale of
Gulf Power.
Southern Company Gas
A wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas owns and operates a natural gas storage facility consisting of two salt dome
caverns in Louisiana. Periodic integrity tests are required in accordance with rules of the Louisiana Department of Natural
Resources (DNR). In 2017, in connection with an ongoing integrity project, updated seismic mapping indicated the proximity of
one of the caverns to the edge of the salt dome may be less than the required minimum and could result in Southern Company Gas
retiring the cavern early.
In the third quarter 2019, management determined that it no longer planned to obtain the core samples during 2020 that are
necessary to determine the composition of the sheath surrounding the edge of the salt dome. Core sampling is a requirement of the
Louisiana DNR to put the cavern back in service; as a result, the cavern will not return to service by 2021. This change in plan,
which affects the future operation of the entire storage facility, resulted in a pre-tax impairment charge of $91 million ($69 million
after-tax) recorded by Southern Company Gas in 2019. Southern Company Gas continues to monitor the pressure and overall
structural integrity of the entire facility pending any future decisions regarding decommissioning.
Southern Company Gas has two other natural gas storage facilities located in California and Texas, which could be impacted by
ongoing changes in the U.S. natural gas storage market. Recent sales of natural gas storage facilities have resulted in losses for the
sellers and may imply an impact on future rates and/or asset values. Sustained diminished natural gas storage values could trigger
impairment of either or both of these natural gas storage facilities, which have a combined net book value of $326 million at
December 31, 2019.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time, but could have a material impact on the financial
statements of Southern Company and Southern Company Gas.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Application of Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
The Registrants prepare their financial statements in accordance with GAAP. Significant accounting policies are described in the
notes to the financial statements. In the application of these policies, certain estimates are made that may have a material impact
II-90
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
on the results of operations and related disclosures of the applicable Registrants (as indicated in the section descriptions herein).
Different assumptions and measurements could produce estimates that are significantly different from those recorded in the
financial statements. Senior management has reviewed and discussed the following critical accounting policies and estimates with
the Audit Committee of Southern Company's Board of Directors.
Utility Regulation (Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, and Southern Company Gas)
The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities are subject to retail regulation by their
respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies and wholesale regulation by the FERC. These regulatory
agencies set the rates the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities are permitted to charge
customers based on allowable costs, including a reasonable ROE. As a result, the traditional electric operating companies and the
natural gas distribution utilities apply accounting standards which require the financial statements to reflect the effects of rate
regulation. Through the ratemaking process, the regulators may require the inclusion of costs or revenues in periods different than
when they would be recognized by a non-regulated company. This treatment may result in the deferral of expenses and the
recording of related regulatory assets based on anticipated future recovery through rates or the deferral of gains or creation of
liabilities and the recording of related regulatory liabilities. The application of the accounting standards for rate regulated entities
also impacts their financial statements as a result of the estimates of allowable costs used in the ratemaking process. These
estimates may differ from those actually incurred by the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution
utilities; therefore, the accounting estimates inherent in specific costs such as depreciation, AROs, and pension and other
postretirement benefits have less of a direct impact on the results of operations and financial condition of the applicable Registrants
than they would on a non-regulated company.
Revenues related to regulated utility operations as a percentage of total operating revenues in 2019 for the applicable Registrants
were as follows: 87% for Southern Company, 99% for Alabama Power, 97% for Georgia Power, 100% for Mississippi Power, and
80% for Southern Company Gas.
As reflected in Note 2 to the financial statements, significant regulatory assets and liabilities have been recorded. Management
reviews the ultimate recoverability of these regulatory assets and any requirement to refund these regulatory liabilities based on
applicable regulatory guidelines and GAAP. However, adverse legislative, judicial, or regulatory actions could materially impact
the amounts of such regulatory assets and liabilities and could adversely impact the financial statements of the applicable
Registrants.
Estimated Cost, Schedule, and Rate Recovery for the Construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
(Southern Company and Georgia Power)
In 2016, the Georgia PSC approved the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, which resolved certain prudency matters in connection
with Georgia Power's fifteenth VCM report. In 2017, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM report, which
included a recommendation to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, with Southern Nuclear serving as project
manager and Bechtel serving as the primary construction contractor, as well as a modification of the Vogtle Cost Settlement
Agreement. The Georgia PSC's related order stated that under the modified Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, (i) none of the $3.3
billion of costs incurred through December 31, 2015 should be disallowed as imprudent; (ii) capital costs incurred up to $5.68
billion would be presumed to be reasonable and prudent with the burden of proof on any party challenging such costs; (iii) Georgia
Power would have the burden of proof to show that any capital costs above $5.68 billion were prudent; (iv) Georgia Power's total
project capital cost forecast of $7.3 billion (net of $1.7 billion received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and
approximately $188 million in related customer refunds) was found reasonable and did not represent a cost cap; and (v) prudence
decisions would be made subsequent to achieving fuel load for Unit 4.
In its order, the Georgia PSC also stated if other conditions change and assumptions upon which Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM
report are based do not materialize, the Georgia PSC reserved the right to reconsider the decision to continue construction.
In the second quarter 2018, Georgia Power revised its base cost forecast and estimated contingency to complete construction and
start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to $8.0 billion and $0.4 billion, respectively, for a total project capital cost forecast of $8.4
billion (net of $1.7 billion received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related customer
refunds). Although Georgia Power believes these incremental costs are reasonable and necessary to complete the project and the
Georgia PSC's order in the seventeenth VCM proceeding specifically states that the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is
not subject to a cost cap, Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery for the $0.7 billion increase in costs included in the base capital
cost forecast in the nineteenth VCM report. After considering the significant level of uncertainty that exists regarding the future
recoverability of costs included in the construction contingency estimate since the ultimate outcome of these matters is subject to
the outcome of future assessments by management, as well as Georgia PSC decisions in these future regulatory
II-91
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
proceedings, Georgia Power recorded a total pre-tax charge to income of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the second quarter
2018.
Georgia Power's revised cost estimate reflects an expected in-service date of November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for
Unit 4.
As of December 31, 2019, approximately $140 million of the $366 million construction contingency estimate established in the
second quarter 2018 was allocated to the base capital cost forecast for cost risks including, among other factors, construction
productivity; craft labor incentives; adding resources for supervision, field support, project management, initial test program, start-
up, and operations and engineering support; subcontracts; and procurement. As and when construction contingency is spent,
Georgia Power may request the Georgia PSC to evaluate those expenditures for rate recovery.
As part of its ongoing processes, Southern Nuclear continues to evaluate cost and schedule forecasts on a regular basis to
incorporate current information available, particularly in the areas of commodity installation, system turnovers, and workforce
statistics.
In April 2019, Southern Nuclear established aggressive target values for monthly construction production and system turnover
activities as part of a strategy to maintain and, where possible, build margin to the regulatory-approved in-service dates of
November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4. The project has faced challenges with the April 2019 aggressive strategy
targets, including, but not limited to, electrical and pipefitting labor productivity and closure rates for work packages, which
resulted in a backlog of activities and completion percentages below the April 2019 aggressive strategy targets. However, Southern
Nuclear and Georgia Power believe that existing productivity levels and pace of activity completion are sufficient to meet the
regulatory-approved in-service dates.
In February 2020, Southern Nuclear updated its cost and schedule forecast, which did not change the projected overall capital cost
forecast and confirmed the expected in-service dates of November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4. This update
included initiatives to improve productivity while refining and extending system turnover plans and certain near-term milestone
dates. Other milestone dates did not change. Achievement of the aggressive site work plan relies on meeting increased monthly
production and activity target values during 2020. To meet these 2020 targets, existing craft, including subcontractors, construction
productivity must improve and be sustained above historical average levels, appropriate levels of craft laborers, particularly
electrical and pipefitter craft labor, must be maintained, and additional supervision and other field support resources must be
retained. Southern Nuclear and Georgia Power continue to believe that pursuit of an aggressive site work plan is an appropriate
strategy to achieve completion of the units by their regulatory-approved in-service dates.
As construction, including subcontract work, continues and testing and system turnover activities increase, challenges with
management of contractors and vendors; subcontractor performance; supervision of craft labor and related craft labor productivity,
particularly in the installation of electrical and mechanical commodities, ability to attract and retain craft labor, and/or related cost
escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, installation, system turnover, and the initial testing and start-up, including
any required engineering changes or any remediation related thereto, of plant systems, structures, or components (some of which
are based on new technology that only within the last few years began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale),
or regional transmission upgrades, any of which may require additional labor and/or materials; or other issues could arise and
change the projected schedule and estimated cost.
There have been technical and procedural challenges to the construction and licensing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at the federal
and state level and additional challenges may arise. Processes are in place that are designed to assure compliance with the
requirements specified in the Westinghouse Design Control Document and the combined construction and operating licenses,
including inspections by Southern Nuclear and the NRC that occur throughout construction. As a result of such compliance
processes, certain license amendment requests have been filed and approved or are pending before the NRC. Various design and
other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely submittal by Southern Nuclear of the ITAAC documentation for
each unit and the related reviews and approvals by the NRC necessary to support NRC authorization to load fuel, may arise, which
may result in additional license amendments or require other resolution. As part of the aggressive site work plan, in January 2020,
Southern Nuclear notified the NRC of its intent to load fuel in 2020. If any license amendment requests or other licensing-based
compliance issues are not resolved in a timely manner, there may be delays in the project schedule that could result in increased
costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. However, any extension of the regulatory-approved
project schedule is currently estimated to result in additional base capital costs of approximately $50 million per month, based on
Georgia Power's ownership interests, and AFUDC of approximately $12 million per month. While Georgia Power is not precluded
from seeking recovery of any future capital cost forecast increase, management will ultimately determine whether or
II-92
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
not to seek recovery. Any further changes to the capital cost forecast that are not expected to be recoverable through regulated rates
will be required to be charged to income and such charges could be material.
Given the significant complexity involved in estimating the future costs to complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units
3 and 4 and the significant management judgment necessary to assess the related uncertainties surrounding future rate recovery of
any projected cost increases, as well as the potential impact on results of operations and cash flows, Southern Company and
Georgia Power consider these items to be critical accounting estimates. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia
Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
Accounting for Income Taxes (Southern Company, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas)
The consolidated income tax provision and deferred income tax assets and liabilities, as well as any unrecognized tax benefits and
valuation allowances, require significant judgment and estimates. These estimates are supported by historical tax return data,
reasonable projections of taxable income, and interpretations of applicable tax laws and regulations across multiple taxing
jurisdictions. The effective tax rate reflects the statutory tax rates and calculated apportionments for the various states in which the
Southern Company system operates.
On behalf of its subsidiaries, Southern Company files a consolidated federal income tax return and various state income tax returns,
some of which are combined or unitary. Under a joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement, each Southern Company
subsidiary's current and deferred tax expense is computed on a stand-alone basis and no subsidiary is allocated more current
expense than would be paid if it filed a separate income tax return. Certain deductions and credits can be limited or utilized at the
consolidated or combined level resulting in NOL and tax credit carryforwards that would not otherwise result on a stand-alone
basis. Utilization of NOL and tax credit carryforwards and the assessment of valuation allowances are based on significant
judgment and extensive analysis of Southern Company's and its subsidiaries' current financial position and results of operations,
including currently available information about future years, to estimate when future taxable income will be realized.
Current and deferred state income tax liabilities and assets are estimated based on laws of multiple states that determine the income
to be apportioned to their jurisdictions. States utilize various formulas to calculate the apportionment of taxable income, primarily
using sales, assets, or payroll within the jurisdiction compared to the consolidated totals. In addition, each state varies as to whether
a stand-alone, combined, or unitary filing methodology is required. The calculation of deferred state taxes considers apportionment
factors and filing methodologies that are expected to apply in future years. The apportionments and methodologies which are
ultimately finalized in a manner inconsistent with expectations could have a material effect on the financial statements of the
applicable Registrants.
Given the significant judgment involved in estimating NOL and tax credit carryforwards and multi-state apportionments for all
subsidiaries, the applicable Registrants consider deferred income tax liabilities and assets to be critical accounting estimates.
Asset Retirement Obligations (Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, and Southern Company
Gas)
AROs are computed as the present value of the estimated costs for an asset's future retirement and are recorded in the period in
which the liability is incurred. The estimated costs are capitalized as part of the related long-lived asset and depreciated over the
asset's useful life. In the absence of quoted market prices, AROs are estimated using present value techniques in which estimates of
future cash outlays associated with the asset retirements are discounted using a credit-adjusted risk-free rate. Estimates of the
timing and amounts of future cash outlays are based on projections of when and how the assets will be retired and the cost of future
removal activities.
The ARO liabilities for the traditional electric operating companies primarily relate to facilities that are subject to the CCR Rule
and the related state rules, principally ash ponds. In addition, Alabama Power and Georgia Power have retirement obligations
related to the decommissioning of nuclear facilities (Alabama Power's Plant Farley and Georgia Power's ownership interests in
Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2). The traditional electric operating companies also have AROs related to various landfill
sites, asbestos removal, and underground storage tanks, as well as, for Alabama Power, disposal of polychlorinated biphenyls in
certain transformers and sulfur hexafluoride gas in certain substation breakers, for Georgia Power, gypsum cells and restoration of
land at the end of long-term land leases for solar facilities, and for Mississippi Power, mine reclamation and water wells.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas also have identified other retirement obligations, such as
obligations related to certain electric transmission and distribution facilities, certain asbestos-containing material within long-term
assets not subject to ongoing repair and maintenance activities, certain wireless communication towers, the disposal of
polychlorinated biphenyls in certain transformers, leasehold improvements, equipment on customer property, and property
associated with the Southern Company system's rail lines and natural gas pipelines. However, liabilities for the removal of these
II-93
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
assets have not been recorded because the settlement timing for certain retirement obligations related to these assets is
indeterminable and, therefore, the fair value of the retirement obligations cannot be reasonably estimated. A liability for these
retirement obligations will be recognized when sufficient information becomes available to support a reasonable estimation of the
ARO.
The cost estimates for AROs related to the disposal of CCR are based on information using various assumptions related to closure
and post-closure costs, timing of future cash outlays, inflation and discount rates, and the potential methods for complying with the
CCR Rule and the related state rules. The traditional electric operating companies expect to update their ARO cost estimates
periodically as additional information related to these assumptions becomes available. See Note 6 to the financial statements for
additional information, including increases to AROs related to ash ponds recorded during 2019 by certain Registrants.
Given the significant judgment involved in estimating AROs, the applicable Registrants consider the liabilities for AROs to be
critical accounting estimates.
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits (Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, and
Southern Company Gas)
The applicable Registrants' calculations of pension and other postretirement benefits expense are dependent on a number of
assumptions. These assumptions include discount rates, healthcare cost trend rates, expected long-term rate of return (LRR) on plan
assets, mortality rates, expected salary and wage increases, and other factors. Components of pension and other postretirement
benefits expense include interest and service cost on the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, expected return on plan
assets, and amortization of certain unrecognized costs and obligations. Actual results that differ from the assumptions utilized are
accumulated and amortized over future periods and, therefore, generally affect recognized expense and the recorded obligation in
future periods. While the applicable Registrants believe the assumptions used are appropriate, differences in actual experience or
significant changes in assumptions would affect their pension and other postretirement benefit costs and obligations.
Key elements in determining the applicable Registrants' pension and other postretirement benefit expense are the LRR and the
discount rate used to measure the benefit plan obligations and the periodic benefit plan expense for future periods. For purposes of
determining the applicable Registrants' liabilities related to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, Southern Company
discounts the future related cash flows using a single-point discount rate for each plan developed from the weighted average of
market-observed yields for high quality fixed income securities with maturities that correspond to expected benefit payments. The
discount rate assumption impacts both the service cost and non-service costs components of net periodic benefit costs as well as the
projected benefit obligations.
The LRR on pension and other postretirement benefit plan assets is based on Southern Company's investment strategy, historical
experience, and expectations that consider external actuarial advice, and represents the average rate of earnings expected over the
long term on the assets invested to provide for anticipated future benefit payments. Southern Company determines the amount of
the expected return on plan assets component of non-service costs by applying the LRR of various asset classes to Southern
Company's target asset allocation. The LRR only impacts the non-service costs component of net periodic benefit costs for the
following year and is set annually at the beginning of the year.
For 2019, the LRR assumption for qualified pension plan assets was reduced from 7.95% to 7.75% for purposes of determining net
periodic pension expense as a result of changes in the economic outlook used in estimating the expected returns as of December 31,
2018. As a result of the decrease in the LRR, the non-service costs component of net periodic pension expense increased by $24
million for the Southern Company system in 2019. See the table below for the impact on each Registrant.
II-94
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
For 2020, net periodic pension expense will be impacted by two factors: a change in the approach used to determine the LRR
assumption and cash contributions totaling $1.1 billion to the qualified pension plan made in December 2019. Historically,
Southern Company has set the LRR assumption using asset return modeling based on geometric returns that reflect the compound
average returns for dependent annual periods. Beginning in 2020, Southern Company will set the LRR assumption using an
arithmetic mean which represents the expected simple average return to be earned by the pension plan assets over any one year.
Southern Company believes the use of the arithmetic mean is more compatible with the LRR's function of estimating a single year's
investment return. Excluding the additional pension contribution in December 2019, the change in the LRR assumption will reduce
the non-service costs component of net periodic pension expense by $78 million for the Southern Company system in 2020. See the
table below for the impact on each Registrant. The contributions in 2019 will further reduce expense by $88 million for the
Southern Company system in 2020.
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Increase (decrease) in pension expense:   
2019$ 24$ 5$ 8$ 1$ 2
2020 (78) (18) (25) (4) (7)
The following table illustrates the sensitivity to changes in the applicable Registrants' long-term assumptions with respect to the
discount rate, salary increases, and the long-term rate of return on plan assets:
 Increase/(Decrease) in
25 Basis Point Change in:Total Benefit Expense
for 2020Projected Obligation for
Pension Plan at
December 31, 2019Projected Obligation for
Other Postretirement
Benefit Plans at
December 31, 2019
 (in millions)
Discount rate:    
Southern Company $41/$(39) $549/$(518) $57/$(54)
Alabama Power $10/$(10) $131/$(123) $14/$(13)
Georgia Power $12/$(11) $166/$(156) $21/$(20)
Mississippi Power $2/$(2) $25/$(23) $2/$(2)
Southern Company Gas $1/$(1) $38/$(36) $6/$(6)
Salaries:    
Southern Company $23/$(22) $118/$(113) $–/$–
Alabama Power $6/$(6) $33/$(32) $–/$–
Georgia Power $6/$(6) $34/$(33) $–/$–
Mississippi Power $1/$(1) $5/$(5) $–/$–
Southern Company Gas $1/$(1) $3/$(3) $–/$–
Long-term return on plan assets:    
Southern Company $35/$(35) N/A N/A
Alabama Power $9/$(9) N/A N/A
Georgia Power $11/$(11) N/A N/A
Mississippi Power $2/$(2) N/A N/A
Southern Company Gas $3/$(3) N/A N/A
See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information regarding pension and other postretirement benefits.
II-95
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Asset Impairment (Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas)
Goodwill (Southern Company and Southern Company Gas)
The acquisition method of accounting requires the assets acquired and liabilities assumed to be recorded at the date of acquisition at
their respective estimated fair values. The applicable Registrants have recognized goodwill as of the date of their acquisitions, as a
residual over the fair values of the identifiable net assets acquired. Goodwill is tested for impairment at the reporting unit level on
an annual basis in the fourth quarter of the year as well as on an interim basis as events and changes in circumstances occur,
including, but not limited to, a significant change in operating performance, the business climate, legal or regulatory factors, or a
planned sale or disposition of a significant portion of the business. A reporting unit is the operating segment, or a business one level
below the operating segment (a component), if discrete financial information is prepared and regularly reviewed by management.
Components are aggregated if they have similar economic characteristics.
As part of the impairment tests, the applicable Registrant may perform an initial qualitative assessment to determine whether it is
more likely than not that the fair value of each reporting unit is less than its carrying amount before applying the quantitative
goodwill impairment test. If the applicable Registrant elects to perform the qualitative assessment, it evaluates relevant events and
circumstances, including but not limited to, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market conditions, cost factors, financial
performance, entity specific events, and events specific to each reporting unit. If the applicable Registrant determines that it is more
likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying amount, or it elects not to perform a qualitative
assessment, it compares the fair value of the reporting unit to its carrying value to determine if the fair value is greater than its
carrying value.
Goodwill for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas was $5.3 billion and $5.0 billion, respectively, at December 31, 2019.
For its 2019 and 2018 annual impairment tests, Southern Company Gas performed the qualitative assessment and determined that it
was more likely than not that the fair value of all of its reporting units with goodwill exceeded their carrying amounts, and therefore
no quantitative analysis was required. For its 2017 annual impairment test, Southern Company Gas performed the quantitative
assessment, which resulted in the fair value of all of its reporting units that have goodwill exceeding their carrying value. For its
annual impairment tests for PowerSecure, Southern Company performed the quantitative assessment, which resulted in the fair
value of goodwill at PowerSecure exceeding its carrying value in all years presented. However, Southern Company recorded
goodwill impairment charges totaling $34 million in 2019 as a result of its decision to sell certain PowerSecure business units. See
Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company" for additional information.
The judgments made in determining the estimated fair value assigned to each class of assets acquired and liabilities assumed, as
well as asset lives, can significantly impact the applicable Registrant's results of operations. Fair values and useful lives are
determined based on, among other factors, the expected future period of benefit of the asset, the various characteristics of the asset,
and projected cash flows. As the determination of an asset's fair value and useful life involves management making certain
estimates and because these estimates form the basis for the determination of whether or not an impairment charge should be
recorded, the applicable Registrants consider these estimates to be critical accounting estimates.
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets and Liabilities" for additional information
regarding the applicable Registrants' goodwill.
Long-Lived Assets (Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas)
Impairments of long-lived assets of the traditional electric utilities and natural gas distribution utilities are generally related to
specific regulatory disallowances. The applicable Registrants assess their other long-lived assets for impairment whenever events or
changes in circumstances indicate that an asset's carrying amount may not be recoverable. If an indicator exists, the asset is tested
for recoverability by comparing the asset carrying value to the sum of the undiscounted expected future cash flows directly
attributable to the asset's use and eventual disposition. If the estimate of undiscounted future cash flows is less than the carrying
value of the asset, the fair value of the asset is determined and a loss is recorded equal to the difference between the carrying value
and the fair value of the asset. In addition, when assets are identified as held for sale, an impairment loss is recognized to the extent
the carrying value of the assets or asset group exceeds their fair value less cost to sell. A high degree of judgment is required in
developing estimates related to these evaluations, which are based on projections of various factors, some of which have been quite
volatile in recent years.
Southern Power's investments in long-lived assets are primarily generation assets, whether in service or under construction.
Excluding the natural gas distribution utilities, Southern Company Gas' investments in long-lived assets are primarily natural gas
transportation and storage facility assets, whether in service or under construction. In addition, exclusive of the traditional electric
operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities, Southern Company's investments in long-lived assets also include
investments in leveraged leases.
II-96
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
For Southern Power, examples of impairment indicators could include significant changes in construction schedules, current period
losses combined with a history of losses or a projection of continuing losses, a significant decrease in market prices, the inability to
remarket generating capacity for an extended period, the unplanned termination of a customer contract or the inability of a
customer to perform under the terms of the contract, or the inability to deploy wind turbine equipment to a development project.
For Southern Company Gas, examples of impairment indicators could include, but are not limited to, significant changes in the
U.S. natural gas storage market, construction schedules, current period losses combined with a history of losses or a projection of
continuing losses, a significant decrease in market prices, the inability to renew or extend customer contracts or the inability of a
customer to perform under the terms of the contract, attrition rates, or the inability to deploy a development project. For Southern
Company's investments in leveraged leases, impairment indicators include changes in estimates of future rental payments to be
received under the lease as well as the residual value of the leased asset at the end of the lease.
As the determination of the expected future cash flows generated from an asset, an asset's fair value, and useful life involves
management making certain estimates and because these estimates form the basis for the determination of whether or not an
impairment charge should be recorded, the applicable Registrants consider these estimates to be critical accounting estimates.
See Note 3 to the financial statements under "Other Matters" and Note 15 to the financial statements for information on certain
assets recently evaluated for impairment.
Derivatives and Hedging Activities (Southern Company and Southern Company Gas)
Determining whether a contract meets the definition of a derivative instrument, contains an embedded derivative requiring
bifurcation, or qualifies for hedge accounting treatment is complex. The treatment of a single contract may vary from period to
period depending upon accounting elections, changes in the applicable Registrant's assessment of the likelihood of future hedged
transactions, or new interpretations of accounting guidance. As a result, judgment is required in determining the appropriate
accounting treatment. In addition, the estimated fair value of derivative instruments may change significantly from period to period
depending upon market conditions, and changes in hedge effectiveness may impact the accounting treatment.
Derivative instruments (including certain derivative instruments embedded in other contracts) are recorded on the balance sheets as
either assets or liabilities measured at their fair value. If the transaction qualifies for, and is designated as, a normal purchase or
normal sale, it is exempt from fair value accounting treatment and is, instead, subject to traditional accrual accounting. The
applicable Registrant utilizes market data or assumptions that market participants would use in pricing the derivative asset or
liability, including assumptions about risk and the risks inherent in the inputs of the valuation technique.
Changes in the derivatives' fair value are recognized concurrently in earnings unless specific hedge accounting criteria are met. If
the derivatives meet those criteria, derivative gains and losses offset related results of the hedged item in the income statement in
the case of a fair value hedge, or gains and losses are deferred in OCI on the balance sheets until the hedged transaction affects
earnings in the case of a cash flow hedge. Additionally, a company is required to formally designate a derivative as a hedge as well
as document and assess the effectiveness of derivatives associated with transactions that receive hedge accounting treatment.
Southern Company Gas uses derivative instruments primarily to reduce the impact to its results of operations due to the risk of
changes in the price of natural gas and, to a lesser extent, Southern Company Gas hedges against warmer-than-normal weather and
interest rates. The fair value of natural gas derivative instruments used to manage exposure to changing natural gas prices reflects
the estimated amounts that Southern Company Gas would receive or pay to terminate or close the contracts at the reporting date,
taking into account the current unrealized gains or losses on open contracts. For derivatives utilized at gas marketing services and
wholesale gas services that are not designated as accounting hedges, changes in fair value are reported as gains or losses in results
of operations in the period of change. Gas marketing services records derivative gains or losses arising from cash flow hedges in
OCI and reclassifies them into earnings in the same period that the underlying hedged item is recognized in earnings.
Derivative assets and liabilities are classified based on the lowest level of input that is significant to the fair value measurement.
The assessment of the significance of a particular input to the fair value measurement requires judgment and may affect the
valuation of fair value assets and liabilities and their placement within the fair value hierarchy. The determination of the fair value
of the derivative instruments incorporates various required factors. These factors include:
•the creditworthiness of the counterparties involved and the impact of credit enhancements (such as cash deposits and
letters of credit);
•events specific to a given counterparty; and
•the impact of nonperformance risk on liabilities.
A significant change in the underlying market prices or pricing assumptions used in pricing derivative assets or liabilities may
result in a significant financial statement impact.
II-97
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Given the assumptions used in pricing the derivative asset or liability, Southern Company and Southern Company Gas consider the
valuation of derivative assets and liabilities a critical accounting estimate. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY –
"Market Price Risk" herein and Note 14 to the financial statements for more information.
Revenue Recognition (Southern Power)
Southern Power's power sale transactions, which include PPAs, are classified in one of four general categories: leases, non-
derivatives or normal sale derivatives, derivatives designated as cash flow hedges, and derivatives not designated as hedges, as
described further below. For more information on derivative transactions, see FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY –
"Market Price Risk" herein and Notes 1 and 14 to the financial statements. Southern Power's revenues are dependent upon
significant judgments used to determine the appropriate transaction classification, which must be documented upon the inception of
each contract.
Lease Transactions
Southern Power considers the following factors to determine whether the sales contract is a lease:
•Assessing whether specific property is explicitly or implicitly identified in the agreement;
•Determining whether the fulfillment of the arrangement is dependent on the use of the identified property; and
•Assessing whether the arrangement conveys to the counterparty substantially all of the economic benefits and the right to
direct the use of the asset.
If the contract meets the above criteria for a lease, Southern Power performs further analysis as to whether the lease is classified as
operating, financing, or sales-type. All of Southern Power's power sales contracts that are determined to be leases are accounted for
as operating leases and the capacity revenue is recognized on a straight-line basis over the term of the contract and is included in
Southern Power's operating revenues. Energy revenues and other contingent revenues are recognized in the period the energy is
delivered or the service is rendered. See Note 9 to the financial statements for additional information.
Non-Derivative and Normal Sale Derivative Transactions
If the power sales contract is not classified as a lease, Southern Power further considers the following factors to determine proper
classification:
•Assessing whether the contract meets the definition of a derivative;
•Assessing whether the contract meets the definition of a capacity contract;
•Assessing the probability at inception and throughout the term of the individual contract that the contract will result in physical
delivery; and
•Ensuring that the contract quantities do not exceed available generating capacity (including purchased capacity).
Contracts that do not meet the definition of a derivative or are designated as normal sales (i.e. capacity contracts which provide for
the sale of electricity that involve physical delivery in quantities within Southern Power's available generating capacity) are
accounted for as executory contracts. For contracts that have a capacity charge, the revenue is generally recognized in the period
that it becomes billable. Revenues related to energy and ancillary services are recognized in the period the energy is delivered or
the service is rendered. See Note 4 to the financial statements for additional information.
Cash Flow Hedge Transactions
Southern Power further considers the following in designating other derivative contracts for the sale of electricity as cash flow
hedges of anticipated sale transactions:
•Identifying the hedging instrument, the forecasted hedged transaction, and the nature of the risk being hedged; and
•Assessing hedge effectiveness at inception and throughout the contract term.
These contracts are accounted for on a fair value basis and are recorded in AOCI over the life of the contract. Realized gains and
losses are then recognized in operating revenues as incurred.
Derivative (Non-Hedge) Transactions
Contracts for sales of electricity, which meet the definition of a derivative and that either do not qualify or are not designated as
normal sales or as cash flow hedges, are accounted for on a fair value basis and are recorded in operating revenues.
II-98
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Acquisition Accounting (Southern Power)
Southern Power may acquire generation assets as part of its overall growth strategy. At the time of an acquisition, Southern Power
will assess if these assets and activities meet the definition of a business. For acquisitions that meet the definition of a business, the
purchase price, including any contingent consideration, is allocated based on the fair value of the identifiable assets acquired and
liabilities assumed (including any intangible assets, primarily related to acquired PPAs). Assets acquired that do not meet the
definition of a business are accounted for as an asset acquisition. The purchase price of each asset acquisition is allocated based on
the relative fair value of assets acquired.
Determining the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed requires management judgment and Southern Power may
engage independent valuation experts to assist in this process. Fair values are determined by using market participant assumptions,
and typically include the timing and amounts of future cash flows, incurred construction costs, the nature of acquired contracts,
discount rates, power market prices, and expected asset lives. Any due diligence or transition costs incurred by Southern Power for
potential or successful acquisitions are expensed as incurred.
Contingent consideration primarily relates to fixed amounts due to the seller once the facility is placed in service. For contingent
consideration with variable payments, Southern Power fair values the arrangement with any changes recorded in the consolidated
statements of income. See Note 13 to the financial statements for additional fair value information and Note 15 to the financial
statements for additional information on recent acquisitions.
Variable Interest Entities (Southern Power)
Southern Power enters into partnerships with varying ownership structures. Upon entering into such arrangements, membership
interests and other variable interests are evaluated to determine if the legal entity is a VIE. If the legal entity is a VIE, Southern
Power will assess if it has both the power to direct the activities of the VIE that most significantly impact the VIE's economic
performance and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits from the VIE that could potentially be significant to
the VIE, making it the primary beneficiary. Making this determination may require significant management judgment.
If Southern Power is the primary beneficiary, the assets, liabilities, and results of operations of the entity are consolidated. If
Southern Power is not the primary beneficiary, the legal entity is generally accounted for under the equity method of accounting.
Southern Power reconsiders its conclusions as to whether the legal entity is a VIE and whether it is the primary beneficiary for
events that impact the rights of variable interests, such as ownership changes in membership interests.
Southern Power has partial ownership in certain legal entities for which the contractual provisions represent profit-sharing
arrangements because the allocations of cash distributions and tax benefits are not based on fixed ownership percentages. For these
arrangements, the noncontrolling interest is accounted for under a balance sheet approach utilizing the HLBV method. The HLBV
method calculates each partner's share of income based on the change in net equity the partner can legally claim in a HLBV at the
end of the period compared to the beginning of the period.
Contingent Obligations (All Registrants)
The Registrants are subject to a number of federal and state laws and regulations, as well as other factors and conditions that
subject them to environmental, litigation, and other risks. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL herein and Notes 2 and 3 to the
financial statements for more information regarding certain of these contingencies. The Registrants periodically evaluate their
exposure to such risks and record reserves for those matters where a non-tax-related loss is considered probable and reasonably
estimable. The adequacy of reserves can be significantly affected by external events or conditions that can be unpredictable; thus,
the ultimate outcome of such matters could materially affect the results of operations, cash flows, or financial condition of the
Registrants.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards" for additional information.
In 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842) (ASU 2016-02). ASU 2016-02 requires lessees to recognize on the
balance sheet a lease liability and a right-of-use asset for all leases. ASU 2016-02 also changes the recognition, measurement, and
presentation of expense associated with leases and provides clarification regarding the identification of certain components of
contracts that would represent a lease. The accounting required by lessors is relatively unchanged and there is no change to the
accounting for existing leveraged leases. The Registrants adopted the new standard effective January 1, 2019. See Note 9 to the
financial statements for additional information and related disclosures.
II-99
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY
Overview
The financial condition of each Registrant remained stable at December 31, 2019. The Registrants' cash requirements primarily
consist of funding ongoing operations, including unconsolidated subsidiaries, as well as common stock dividends, capital
expenditures, and debt maturities. Southern Power's cash requirements also include distributions to noncontrolling interests. Capital
expenditures and other investing activities for the traditional electric operating companies include investments to meet projected
long-term demand requirements, including to build new generation facilities, to maintain existing generation facilities, to comply
with environmental regulations including adding environmental modifications to certain existing generating units and closures of
ash ponds, to expand and improve transmission and distribution facilities, and for restoration following major storms. Southern
Power's capital expenditures and other investing activities may include acquisitions or new construction associated with its overall
growth strategy and to maintain its existing generation fleet's performance. Southern Company Gas' capital expenditures and other
investing activities include investments to meet projected long-term demand requirements, to maintain existing natural gas
distribution systems as well as to update and expand these systems, and to comply with environmental regulations.
Operating cash flows provide a substantial portion of the Registrants' cash needs. During 2019, Southern Power utilized tax credits,
which provided $734 million in operating cash flows. For the three-year period from 2020 through 2022, each Registrant's
projected stock dividends, capital expenditures, and debt maturities, as well as distributions to noncontrolling interests for Southern
Power, are expected to exceed its operating cash flows. Southern Company plans to finance future cash needs in excess of its
operating cash flows primarily by accessing borrowings from financial institutions and issuing debt and hybrid securities in the
capital markets. Each Subsidiary Registrant plans to finance its future cash needs in excess of its operating cash flows primarily
through external securities issuances, borrowings from financial institutions, and equity contributions from Southern Company. In
addition, Georgia Power plans to utilize borrowings through the FFB and Southern Power plans to utilize tax equity partnership
contributions. The Registrants plan to use commercial paper to manage seasonal variations in operating cash flows and for other
working capital needs and continue to monitor their access to short-term and long-term capital markets as well as their bank credit
arrangements to meet future capital and liquidity needs. See "Sources of Capital," "Financing Activities," "Capital Requirements,"
and "Contractual Obligations" herein for additional information.
The Registrants' investments in their qualified pension plans and Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's investments in their
nuclear decommissioning trust funds increased in value at December 31, 2019 as compared to December 31, 2018. In December
2019, the Registrants voluntarily contributed the following amounts to the qualified pension plan:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Contributions to qualified
pension plan $ 1,136$ 362$ 200$ 54$ 24$ 145
No mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plans are anticipated during 2020. See "Contractual Obligations" herein and
Notes 6 and 11 to the financial statements under "Nuclear Decommissioning" and "Pension Plans," respectively, for additional
information.
At the end of 2019, the market price of Southern Company's common stock was $63.70 per share (based on the closing price as
reported on the NYSE) and the book value was $26.11 per share, representing a market-to-book value ratio of 244%, compared to
$43.92, $23.91, and 184%, respectively, at the end of 2018.
II-100
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Analysis of Cash Flows
Net cash flows provided from (used for) operating, investing, and financing activities in 2019 and 2018 are presented in the
following table:
Net cash provided from (used for):Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2019     
Operating activities $ 5,781$ 1,779$ 2,907$ 339$ 1,385$ 1,067
Investing activities (3,392) (1,963) (3,885) (263) (167) (1,386)
Financing activities (1,930) 765 918 (83) (1,120) 298
2018     
Operating activities $ 6,945$ 1,881$ 2,769$ 804$ 631$ 764
Investing activities (5,760) (2,289) (3,109) (232) (227) 998
Financing activities (1,813) 177 (400) (527) (363) (1,770)
Fluctuations in cash flows from financing activities vary from year to year based on capital needs and the maturity or redemption of
securities.
Southern Company
Net cash provided from operating activities decreased $1.2 billion in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily due to the voluntary
contribution to the qualified pension plan and the timing of vendor payments.
The net cash used for investing activities in 2019 and 2018 was primarily due to the traditional electric operating companies'
construction of electric generation, transmission, and distribution facilities, including installation of equipment to comply with
environmental standards, and capital expenditures for Southern Company Gas' infrastructure replacement programs, partially offset
by proceeds from the sale transactions described in Note 15 to the financial statements, which totaled $5.1 billion and $3.0 billion
in 2019 and 2018, respectively.
The net cash used for financing activities in 2019 was primarily due to common stock dividend payments and net repayments of
short-term bank debt and commercial paper, partially offset by net issuances of long-term debt and the issuance of common stock.
The net cash used for financing activities in 2018 was primarily due to net redemptions and repurchases of long-term debt, common
stock dividend payments, and a decrease in commercial paper borrowings, partially offset by net issuances of short-term bank debt,
proceeds from Southern Power's sales of non-controlling equity interests in entities indirectly owning substantially all of its solar
facilities and eight of its wind facilities, and the issuance of common stock.
Alabama Power
Net cash provided from operating activities decreased $102 million in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily due to the voluntary
contribution to the qualified pension plan, partially offset by the impacts of customer bill credits issued in 2018 related to the Tax
Reform Legislation and increased fuel cost recovery.
The net cash used for investing activities in 2019 and 2018 was primarily due to gross property additions.
The net cash provided from financing activities in 2019 was primarily due to capital contributions from Southern Company and a
long-term debt issuance, partially offset by payments of common stock dividends and a maturity of long-term debt. The net cash
provided from financing activities in 2018 was primarily due to issuances of long-term debt and additional capital contributions
from Southern Company, partially offset by the payment of common stock dividends and a maturity of long-term debt.
Georgia Power
Net cash provided from operating activities increased $138 million in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily due to lower customer
refunds and increased fuel cost recovery, partially offset by the voluntary contribution to the qualified pension plan.
II-101
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The net cash used for investing activities in 2019 and 2018 was primarily due to gross property additions, including a total of $2.5
billion related to the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Construction
Programs – Nuclear Construction" herein for additional information on construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
The net cash provided from financing activities in 2019 was primarily due to borrowings from the FFB for construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4, issuances of senior notes, capital contributions from Southern Company, and pollution control revenue bonds
reoffered to the public, partially offset by payment of common stock dividends and the maturity of senior notes. The net cash used
for financing activities in 2018 was primarily due to the redemption and repurchase of senior notes, payment of common stock
dividends, and pollution control revenue bond repurchases, partially offset by capital contributions from Southern Company.
Mississippi Power
Net cash provided from operating activities decreased $465 million in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily due to higher income
tax refunds in 2018 as a result of the tax impact of the abandonment of the Kemper IGCC and the voluntary contribution to the
qualified pension plan in 2019.
The net cash used for investing activities in 2019 and 2018 was primarily due to gross property additions.
The net cash used for financing activities in 2019 was primarily due to a return of capital to Southern Company and the redemption
of senior notes, partially offset by capital contributions from Southern Company and pollution control revenue bonds reoffered to
the public. The net cash used for financing activities in 2018 was primarily due to the redemption of preferred stock, long-term
bank debt, short-term borrowings, and senior notes, partially offset by the issuance of senior notes and short-term borrowings.
Southern Power
Net cash provided from operating activities increased $754 million in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily due to the utilization of
federal ITCs totaling $734 million in 2019. At December 31, 2019, Southern Power had $1.4 billion of unutilized ITCs and PTCs
which are expected to be fully utilized by 2024. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters – Tax Credits"
herein for additional information.
The net cash used for investing activities in 2019 was primarily due to Southern Power's investment in DSGP and ongoing
construction activities, largely offset by proceeds from the sales of Plant Nacogdoches and certain wind turbine equipment. The net
cash used for investing activities in 2018 was primarily due to the construction of generating facilities and payments for renewable
acquisitions, partially offset by proceeds from the disposition of the Florida Plants. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL –
"Acquisitions and Dispositions" and "Construction Programs" herein and Note 15 to the financial statements for additional
information.
The net cash used for financing activities in 2019 was primarily due to returns of capital to Southern Company, the repayment at
maturity of senior notes, payments of common stock dividends, and distributions to noncontrolling interests, partially offset by
proceeds from net issuances of commercial paper. The net cash used for financing activities in 2018 was primarily due to returns of
capital to Southern Company, payments of common stock dividends, and distributions to noncontrolling interests, partially offset
by capital contributions from noncontrolling interests.
Southern Company Gas
Net cash provided from operating activities increased $303 million in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily due to the timing of
collection of customer receivables and lower income tax payments, partially offset by the timing of vendor payments and the
voluntary contribution to the qualified pension plan.
The net cash used for investing activities in 2019 was primarily due to gross property additions related to utility capital
expenditures and infrastructure investments recovered through replacement programs at gas distribution operations and capital
contributed to equity method pipeline investments, partially offset by proceeds from the sale of Triton and capital distributions in
excess of earnings from equity method pipeline investments. The net cash provided from investing activities in 2018 was primarily
due to proceeds from the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, partially offset by gross property additions primarily related to
utility capital expenditures and pre-approved rider and infrastructure investments recovered through replacement programs at gas
distribution operations as well as net capital contributions to equity method pipeline investments.
The net cash provided from financing activities in 2019 was primarily due to capital contributions from Southern Company and
proceeds from the issuance of first mortgage bonds, partially offset by the redemption of long-term debt and payments of common
stock dividends. The net cash used for financing activities in 2018 was primarily due to payments of common stock dividends to
II-102
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Company, return of capital to Southern Company, redemptions of gas facility revenue bonds and senior notes, and
repayments of commercial paper borrowings and long-term debt, partially offset by debt issuances and capital contributions from
Southern Company.
Significant Balance Sheet Changes
Southern Company
Significant balance sheet changes in 2019 for Southern Company included:
•decreases in assets and liabilities held for sale of $5.0 billion and $3.3 billion, respectively, and an increase of $2.7 billion in
total stockholders' equity primarily related to the sale of Gulf Power;
•an increase of $2.3 billion in total property, plant, and equipment primarily related to the traditional electric operating
companies' construction of electric generation, transmission, and distribution facilities, including installation of equipment to
comply with environmental standards, net of $1.2 billion and $1.0 billion reclassified to other regulatory assets and regulatory
assets associated with AROs, respectively, as a result of generating unit retirements at Alabama Power and Georgia Power;
•an increase in other regulatory assets of $1.8 billion primarily related to the $1.2 billion reclassification from property, plant,
and equipment discussed above and a $0.8 billion increase in regulatory assets associated with retiree benefit plans primarily
resulting from a decrease in the overall discount rate used to calculate benefit obligations;
•increases in operating lease right-of-use assets, net of amortization and operating lease obligations, each totaling $1.8 billion,
recorded upon the adoption of ASC 842;
•an increase of $1.4 billion in regulatory assets associated with AROs primarily related to the $1.0 billion reclassification from
property, plant, and equipment discussed above and ARO revisions at Alabama Power and Mississippi Power related to the
CCR Rule;
•an increase of $1.3 billion in accumulated deferred income taxes primarily related to the expected utilization of tax credit
carryforwards in the 2019 tax year as a result of increased taxable income from the sale of Gulf Power; and
•a decrease of $0.9 billion in notes payable related to net repayments of short-term bank debt and commercial paper.
See Notes 2, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 15 to the financial statements for additional information.
Alabama Power
Significant balance sheet changes in 2019 for Alabama Power included:
•an increase of $1.5 billion in total common stockholder's equity primarily due to a $1.2 billion capital contribution from
Southern Company;
•increases of $0.9 billion in regulatory assets associated with AROs and $0.7 billion in other regulatory assets, deferred
primarily due to the impacts of retiring and reclassifying Plant Gorgas Units 8, 9, and 10;
•an increase of $0.6 billion in cash and cash equivalents; and
•an increase of $0.3 billion in AROs, deferred primarily due to an increase in the ARO estimate related to ash pond facilities.
See Notes 2 and 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
II-103
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Georgia Power
Significant balance sheet changes in 2019 for Georgia Power included:
•an increase of $1.8 billion in long-term debt (including securities due within one year) primarily due to borrowings from the
FFB for construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, issuances of senior notes, and pollution control revenue bonds being
reoffered to the public;
•an increase of $1.6 billion in property, plant, and equipment to comply with environmental standards and the construction of
generation, transmission, and distribution facilities, net of approximately $0.8 billion reclassified to regulatory assets due to the
retirement of certain generating units as approved in the Georgia Power 2019 IRP;
•increases in operating lease right-of-use assets, net of amortization and operating lease obligations, each totaling $1.4 billion,
recorded upon the adoption of ASC 842;
•an increase of $1.2 billion in regulatory assets primarily due to the $0.8 billion reclassification from property, plant, and
equipment discussed above and $0.2 billion associated with retiree benefit plans primarily as a result of a decrease in the
overall discount rate used to calculate benefit obligations; and
•an increase of $742 million in total common stockholder's equity primarily due to capital contributions from Southern
Company.
See Notes 2, 8, 9, and 11 to the financial statements for additional information.
Mississippi Power
Significant balance sheet changes in 2019 for Mississippi Power included:
•a decrease of $231 million in long-term debt, primarily due to the reclassification of $249 million of senior notes to securities
due within one year and the redemption of $25 million of senior notes, partially offset by $43 million in pollution control
revenue bonds reoffered to the public;
•an increase of $107 million in other property and investments primarily due to a new tolling arrangement accounted for as a
sales-type lease;
•increases of $67 million in regulatory assets associated with AROs and $31 million in AROs, deferred primarily due to ARO
revisions; and
•a net change of $57 million in accumulated deferred income tax assets and liabilities primarily due to the recognition of a tax
loss on the CO2 pipeline transfer and the alternative minimum tax carryforward from prior years.
See Notes 2, 6, 8, 9, and 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Southern Power
Significant balance sheet changes in 2019 for Southern Power included:
•a $662 million decrease in stockholders' equity due to returns of capital to Southern Company;
•a $635 million decrease in accumulated deferred income tax assets primarily related to the utilization of tax credits for the
2019 tax year;
•a $619 million decrease in long-term debt (including securities due within one year) related to the maturity of $600 million in
senior notes;
•a $449 million increase in notes payable due to net issuances of commercial paper; and
•increases in operating lease right-of-use assets, net of amortization and operating lease obligations totaling $369 million and
$376 million, respectively, recorded upon the adoption of ASC 842.
See Notes 8, 9, and 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Southern Company Gas
Significant balance sheet changes in 2019 for Southern Company Gas included:
•an increase of $950 million in property, plant, and equipment primarily due to utility capital expenditures and infrastructure
investments recovered through replacement programs, partially offset by $115 million of asset impairment charges;
•additional paid-in-capital of $841 million primarily related to capital contributions from Southern Company;
•decreases of $373 million and $414 million in energy marketing receivables and payables, respectively, due to lower natural
gas prices and volumes of natural gas sold;
II-104
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
•a $287 million decrease in equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries primarily due to $151 million associated with
Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline reclassified to assets held for sale, as well as distributions from SNG and the sale of
Triton;
•a $203 million increase in accumulated deferred income taxes primarily due to accelerated tax depreciation and other timing
differences;
•reclassification of $171 million in total assets held for sale associated with Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline;
•a $95 million decrease in long-term debt primarily due to the redemption of $300 million in senior notes and the repayment of
$50 million in first mortgage bonds, partially offset by the issuance of $300 million in first mortgage bonds; and
•increases of $93 million in operating right-of-use assets and $92 million in operating lease obligations, respectively, related to
the adoption of ASC 842.
See Notes 3, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 15 to the financial statements for additional information.
Sources of Capital
Southern Company intends to meet its future capital needs through operating cash flows, borrowings from financial institutions,
and debt and equity issuances in the capital markets. Equity capital can be provided from any combination of Southern Company's
stock plans, private placements, or public offerings. Southern Company does not expect to issue any equity in the capital markets
through 2024.
The Subsidiary Registrants plan to obtain the funds to meet their future capital needs from sources similar to those they used in the
past, which were primarily from operating cash flows, external securities issuances, borrowings from financial institutions, and
equity contributions from Southern Company. In addition, Georgia Power plans to utilize borrowings from the FFB, as discussed
further in Note 8 to the financial statements under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings," Southern Power plans to
utilize tax equity partnership contributions, as discussed further herein, and Southern Company Gas plans to utilize proceeds from
the pending sale of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline, as discussed further in Note 15 to the financial
statements under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline."
The amount, type, and timing of any financings in 2020, as well as in subsequent years, will be contingent on investment
opportunities and the Registrants' capital requirements and will depend upon prevailing market conditions, regulatory approvals
(for the Subsidiary Registrants), and other factors. See "Capital Requirements" herein for additional information.
Southern Power utilizes tax equity partnerships as one of its financing sources, where the tax partner takes significantly all of the
federal tax benefits. These tax equity partnerships are consolidated in Southern Power's financial statements and are accounted for
using HLBV methodology to allocate partnership gains and losses. During 2019, Southern Power obtained tax equity funding for
the Wildhorse Mountain wind project and received proceeds of $97 million. See Notes 1 and 15 to the financial statements under
"General" and "Southern Power," respectively, for additional information.
The issuance of securities by the traditional electric operating companies and Nicor Gas is generally subject to the approval of the
applicable state PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency. The issuance of all securities by Mississippi Power and short-term
securities by Georgia Power is generally subject to regulatory approval by the FERC. Additionally, with respect to the public
offering of securities, Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Power (excluding its
subsidiaries), Southern Company Gas Capital, and Southern Company Gas (excluding its other subsidiaries) file registration
statements with the SEC under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (1933 Act). The amounts of securities authorized by the
appropriate regulatory authorities, as well as the securities registered under the 1933 Act, are closely monitored and appropriate
filings are made to ensure flexibility in the capital markets.
The Registrants generally obtain financing separately without credit support from any affiliate. See Note 8 to the financial
statements under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information. The Southern Company system does not maintain a
centralized cash or money pool. Therefore, funds of each company are not commingled with funds of any other company in the
Southern Company system, except in the case of Southern Company Gas, as described below.
The traditional electric operating companies and SEGCO may utilize a Southern Company subsidiary organized to issue and sell
commercial paper at their request and for their benefit. Proceeds from such issuances for the benefit of an individual company are
loaned directly to that company. The obligations of each traditional electric operating company and SEGCO under these
arrangements are several and there is no cross-affiliate credit support. Alabama Power also maintains its own separate commercial
paper program.
Southern Company Gas Capital obtains external financing for Southern Company Gas and its subsidiaries, other than Nicor Gas,
which obtains financing separately without credit support from any affiliates. Southern Company Gas maintains commercial
II-105
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
paper programs at Southern Company Gas Capital and Nicor Gas. Nicor Gas' commercial paper program supports its working
capital needs as Nicor Gas is not permitted to make money pool loans to affiliates. All of the other Southern Company Gas
subsidiaries benefit from Southern Company Gas Capital's commercial paper program.
By regulation, Nicor Gas is restricted, to the extent of its retained earnings balance, in the amount it can dividend or loan to
affiliates and is not permitted to make money pool loans to affiliates. At December 31, 2019, the amount of subsidiary retained
earnings restricted to dividend totaled $951 million. This restriction did not impact Southern Company Gas' ability to meet its cash
obligations, nor does management expect such restriction to materially impact Southern Company Gas' ability to meet its currently
anticipated cash obligations.
The Registrants' current liabilities frequently exceed their current assets because of long-term debt maturities and the periodic use
of short-term debt as a funding source, as well as significant seasonal fluctuations in cash needs. See Note 8 to the financial
statements for additional information. Also see "Financing Activities" herein for information on issuances of long-term debt
subsequent to December 31, 2019. At December 31, 2019, the following Registrants' current liabilities exceeded their current
assets, primarily as a result of securities due within one year and notes payable, as shown in the table below:
At December 31, 2019Southern
Company(*)Georgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
Current liabilities in excess of current assets$ 2,729$ 1,902$ 125$ 945
Securities due within one year 2,989 1,025 281 824
Notes payable 2,055 365 — 549
(*)Includes $600 million and $465 million of securities due within one year and notes payable, respectively, at the parent company.
The Registrants believe the need for working capital can be adequately met by utilizing operating cash flows, as well as
commercial paper, lines of credit, and short-term bank notes, as market conditions permit. In addition, under certain circumstances,
the Subsidiary Registrants may utilize equity contributions and/or loans from Southern Company.
Bank Credit Arrangements
At December 31, 2019, the Registrants' unused committed credit arrangements with banks were as follows:
At December 31, 2019Southern
Company
parentAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
 Power(a)Southern
Company
Gas(b)SEGCOSouthern
Company
 (in millions)
Unused committed credit$ 1,999$ 1,328$ 1,733$ 150$ 591$ 1,745$ 30$ 7,576
(a)At December 31, 2019, Southern Power also had a continuing letter of credit facility for standby letters of credit, of which $23 million was unused. Subsequent
to December 31, 2019, Southern Power entered into an additional $60 million continuing letter of credit facility for standby letters of credit. Southern Power's
subsidiaries are not parties to its bank credit arrangement or to the letter of credit facilities.
(b)Includes $1.245 billion and $500 million at Southern Company Gas Capital and Nicor Gas, respectively.
Subject to applicable market conditions, the Registrants, Nicor Gas, and SEGCO expect to renew or replace their bank credit
arrangements as needed, prior to expiration. In connection therewith, the Registrants, Nicor Gas, and SEGCO may extend the
maturity dates and/or increase or decrease the lending commitments thereunder. A portion of the unused credit with banks is
allocated to provide liquidity support to the revenue bonds of the traditional electric operating companies and the commercial paper
programs of the Registrants, Nicor Gas, and SEGCO. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for
additional information.
Short-term Borrowings
The Registrants, Nicor Gas, and SEGCO make short-term borrowings primarily through commercial paper programs that have the
liquidity support of the committed bank credit arrangements described above. Southern Power's subsidiaries are not issuers or
obligors under its commercial paper program. Commercial paper and short-term bank term loans are included in notes payable in
the balance sheets. Details of the Registrants' short-term borrowings were as follows:
II-106
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Short-term Debt at the End of the Period
 Amount
Outstanding  Weighted Average
Interest Rate
 December 31,  December 31,
 2019 2018 2017  2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)    
Southern Company $ 2,055$ 2,915$ 2,439 2.1% 3.1% 1.9%
Alabama Power — — 3 — — 3.7
Georgia Power 365 294 150 2.2 3.1 2.2
Mississippi Power — — 4 — — 3.8
Southern Power 549 100 105 2.2 3.1 2.0
Southern Company Gas:    
Southern Company Gas Capital $ 372$ 403$ 1,243 2.1% 3.1% 1.7%
Nicor Gas 278 247 275 1.8 3.0 1.8
Southern Company Gas Total $ 650$ 650$ 1,518 2.0% 3.0% 1.8%
Short-term Debt During the Period(*)
Average Amount
Outstanding  Weighted Average
Interest RateMaximum Amount
Outstanding
2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
(in millions)   (in millions)
Southern Company $1,240$3,377$2,672 2.6% 2.6% 1.5%$2,914$5,447$3,668
Alabama Power 17 27 25 2.6 2.3 1.3 190 258 223
Georgia Power 371 139 427 2.7 2.5 1.8 935 710 1,460
Mississippi Power — 68 18 — 2.0 3.0 — 300 36
Southern Power 76 188 232 2.7 2.5 1.4 578 385 419
Southern Company Gas:       
Southern Company Gas
Capital $ 302$ 520$ 723 2.6% 2.3% 1.4%$ 490$1,361$1,243
Nicor Gas 91 123 176 2.3 2.2 1.1 278 275 525
Southern Company Gas Total$ 393$ 643$ 899 2.5% 2.3% 1.4%  
(*)Average and maximum amounts are based upon daily balances during the 12-month periods ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017.
II-107
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Financing Activities
The following table outlines the Registrants' long-term debt financing activities for the year ended December 31, 2019:
CompanySenior
Note
Issuances Senior Note
Maturities,
Redemptions,
and
RepurchasesRevenue
Bond
Issuances and
Reofferings
of Purchased
BondsRevenue
Bond
Maturities,
Redemptions,
 and
Repurchases Other
Long-Term
Debt
Issuances Other
Long-Term
Debt
Redemptions
and
Maturities(a)
 (in millions)
Southern Company
parent $ — $ 2,400$ — $ — $ 1,725 $ —
Alabama Power 600 200 — — — 1
Georgia Power 750 500 584 223 1,218 13
Mississippi Power — 25 43 — — —
Southern Power — 600 — — — —
Southern Company Gas — 300 — — 300 50
Other — — — 25 — 17
Elimination(b)— — — — — (7)
Southern Company $ 1,350 $ 4,025$ 627$ 248 $ 3,243 $ 74
(a)Includes reductions in finance lease obligations resulting from cash payments under finance leases.
(b)Represents reductions in affiliate finance lease obligations at Georgia Power, which are eliminated in Southern Company's consolidated financial statements.
Except as otherwise described herein, the Registrants used the proceeds of debt issuances for their redemptions and maturities
shown in the table above, to repay short-term indebtedness, and for general corporate purposes, including working capital. The
Subsidiary Registrants also used the proceeds for their construction programs.
In addition to any financings that may be necessary to meet capital requirements and contractual obligations, the Registrants plan to
continue, when economically feasible, a program to retire higher-cost securities and replace these obligations with lower-cost
capital if market conditions permit.
Southern Company
During 2019, Southern Company issued approximately 19.5 million shares of common stock through employee equity
compensation plans and received proceeds of approximately $844 million.
In addition, in August 2019, Southern Company issued 34.5 million 2019 Series A Equity Units (Equity Units), initially in the form
of corporate units (Corporate Units), at a stated amount of $50 per Corporate Unit, for a total stated amount of $1.725 billion. Net
proceeds from the issuance were approximately $1.682 billion. Each Corporate Unit is comprised of (i) a 1/40 undivided beneficial
ownership interest in $1,000 principal amount of Southern Company's Series 2019A Remarketable Junior Subordinated Notes due
2024, (ii) a 1/40 undivided beneficial ownership interest in $1,000 principal amount of Southern Company's Series 2019B
Remarketable Junior Subordinated Notes due 2027, and (iii) a stock purchase contract, which obligates the holder to purchase from
Southern Company, no later than August 1, 2022, a certain number of shares of Southern Company's common stock for $50 in cash.
See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Equity Units" for additional information.
In January 2019, Southern Company repaid a $250 million short-term uncommitted bank credit arrangement and a $1.5 billion
short-term floating rate bank loan.
In 2019, Southern Company, through repurchases and redemptions, retired all $1.0 billion aggregate principal amount of its 1.85%
Senior Notes due July 1, 2019, $350 million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2014B 2.15% Senior Notes due September 1,
2019, $750 million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2018A Floating Rate Notes due February 14, 2020, and $300
million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2017A Floating Rate Senior Notes due September 30, 2020.
Subsequent to December 31, 2019, Southern Company issued $1.0 billion aggregate principal amount of Series 2020A 4.95%
Junior Subordinated Notes due January 30, 2080.
Alabama Power
In February 2019, Alabama Power repaid at maturity $200 million aggregate principal amount of Series Z 5.125% Senior Notes
due February 15, 2019.
II-108
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
In September 2019, Alabama Power issued $600 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2019A 3.45% Senior Notes due
October 1, 2049.
Subsequent to December 31, 2019, Alabama Power received a capital contribution totaling $610 million from Southern Company.
Georgia Power
In March and December 2019, Georgia Power made borrowings under the multi-advance credit facilities related to the Amended
and Restated Loan Guarantee Agreement in an aggregate principal amount of $835 million and $383 million, respectively, with
applicable interest rates of 3.213% and 2.537%, respectively, both for an interest period that extends to the final maturity date of
February 20, 2044. The proceeds were used to reimburse Georgia Power for Eligible Project Costs relating to the construction of
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" for
additional information.
In June 2019, Georgia Power entered into two short-term floating rate bank loans in aggregate principal amounts of $125 million
each, both of which bear interest based on one-month LIBOR.
In September 2019, Georgia Power issued $400 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2019A 2.20% Senior Notes due
September 15, 2024 and $350 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2019B 2.65% Senior Notes due September 15, 2029.
Subsequent to December 31, 2019, Georgia Power issued $700 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2020A 2.10% Senior
Notes due July 30, 2023, $500 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2020B 3.70% Senior Notes due January 30, 2050, and
an additional $300 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2019B 2.65% Senior Notes due September 15, 2029.
During 2019, Georgia Power reoffered to the public the following pollution control revenue bonds that previously had been
purchased and were held by Georgia Power at December 31, 2018:
•$173 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Bartow County (Georgia) Pollution Control
Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Bowen Project), First Series 2009;
•approximately $105 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution
Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), First Series 2013;
•$65 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control Revenue
Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), Second Series 2008;
•$55 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control Revenue
Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), Fifth Series 1994; and
•approximately $72 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Bartow County (Georgia) Pollution
Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Bowen Project), First Series 2013.
During 2019, Georgia Power purchased, held, and subsequently reoffered to the public an additional $115 million of pollution
control revenue bonds.
In January 2019, Georgia Power redeemed approximately $13 million, $20 million, and $75 million aggregate principal amount of
Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle
Project), First Series 1992, Eighth Series 1994, and Second Series 1995, respectively.
In December 2019, Georgia Power repaid at maturity $500 million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2009B 4.25% Senior
Notes.
Subsequent to December 31, 2019, Georgia Power received a capital contribution totaling $500 million from Southern Company
and announced the redemption of all $500 million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2017C 2.00% Senior Notes due
September 8, 2020.
Mississippi Power
In March 2019, Mississippi Power reoffered to the public approximately $43 million of Mississippi Business Finance Corporation
Pollution Control Revenue Refunding Bonds, Series 2002, which previously had been purchased and held by Mississippi Power.
In December 2019, Mississippi Power redeemed $25 million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2018A Floating Rate Senior
Notes due March 27, 2020.
Southern Power
In May 2019, Southern Power repaid at maturity a $100 million short-term floating rate bank loan.
II-109
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
In December 2019, Southern Power repaid at maturity $600 million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2016D 1.95% Senior
Notes.
Also in December 2019, Southern Power entered into a short-term floating rate bank loan in the aggregate principal amount of
$100 million, bearing interest based on one-month LIBOR. Subsequent to December 31, 2019, Southern Power repaid the bank
loan.
Southern Company Gas
In July 2019, Nicor Gas repaid at maturity $50 million aggregate principal amount of its 4.7% first mortgage bonds.
In August 2019, Southern Company Gas Capital repaid at maturity $300 million aggregate principal amount of its 5.25% Senior
Notes.
In August and October 2019, Nicor Gas issued $200 million and $100 million, respectively, aggregate principal amount of first
mortgage bonds in a private placement.
Credit Rating Risk
At December 31, 2019, the Registrants did not have any credit arrangements that would require material changes in payment
schedules or terminations as a result of a credit rating downgrade.
There are certain contracts that could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of a credit rating change of
certain Registrants to BBB and/or Baa2 or below. These contracts are primarily for physical electricity and natural gas purchases
and sales, fuel purchases, fuel transportation and storage, energy price risk management, transmission, interest rate management,
and, for Georgia Power, construction of new generation at Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
The maximum potential collateral requirements under these contracts at December 31, 2019 were as follows:
Credit RatingsSouthern
Company(*)Alabama
Power Georgia PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power(*)Southern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
At BBB and/or Baa2 $ 36$ 1$ —$ —$ 35$ —
At BBB- and/or Baa3 472 1 86 — 385 —
At BB+ and/or Ba1 or
below 2,040 322 1,020 267 1,174 18
(*)Excludes amounts related to Plant Mankato, which was sold on January 17, 2020. Southern Power has PPAs that could require collateral, but not accelerated
payment, in the event of a downgrade of Southern Power's credit. The PPAs require credit assurances without stating a specific credit rating. The amount of
collateral required would depend upon actual losses resulting from a credit downgrade. Southern Power had $104 million of cash collateral posted related to
PPA requirements at December 31, 2019.
The potential collateral requirement amounts in the previous table for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern
Power include certain agreements that could require collateral in the event that either Alabama Power or Georgia Power has a credit
rating change to below investment grade. Generally, collateral may be provided by a Southern Company guaranty, letter of credit,
or cash. Additionally, a credit rating downgrade could impact the ability of the Registrants to access capital markets and would be
likely to impact the cost at which they do so.
Mississippi Power and its largest retail customer, Chevron, have agreements under which Mississippi Power continues to provide
retail service to the Chevron refinery in Pascagoula, Mississippi through 2038. The agreements grant Chevron a security interest in
the co-generation assets located at the refinery that is exercisable upon the occurrence of (i) certain bankruptcy events or (ii) other
events of default coupled with specific reductions in steam output at the facility and a downgrade of Mississippi Power's credit
rating to below investment grade by two of the three rating agencies.
On August 1, 2019, Moody's upgraded Mississippi Power's senior unsecured long-term debt rating to Baa2 from Baa3 and
maintained the positive rating outlook.
On September 12, 2019, S&P upgraded the senior unsecured long-term debt rating of Alabama Power to A from A-, the long-term
issuer rating of Nicor Gas to A from A-, and the senior secured debt rating of Nicor Gas to A+ from A. The ratings outlooks
remained negative.
II-110
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Market Price Risk
The Registrants are exposed to market risks, including commodity price risk, interest rate risk, weather risk, and occasionally
foreign currency exchange rate risk. To manage the volatility attributable to these exposures, the applicable company nets the
exposures, where possible, to take advantage of natural offsets and enters into various derivative transactions for the remaining
exposures pursuant to the applicable company's policies in areas such as counterparty exposure and risk management practices.
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas operations uses various contracts in its commercial activities that generally meet the
definition of derivatives. For the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas' other
businesses, each company's policy is that derivatives are to be used primarily for hedging purposes and mandates strict adherence
to all applicable risk management policies. Derivative positions are monitored using techniques including, but not limited to,
market valuation, value at risk, stress testing, and sensitivity analysis.
Due to cost-based rate regulation and other various cost recovery mechanisms, the traditional electric operating companies and the
natural gas distribution utilities that sell natural gas directly to end-use customers continue to have limited exposure to market
volatility in interest rates, foreign currency exchange rates, commodity fuel prices, and prices of electricity. The traditional electric
operating companies and certain of the natural gas distribution utilities manage fuel-hedging programs implemented per the
guidelines of their respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies to hedge the impact of market fluctuations in
natural gas prices for customers. Mississippi Power also manages wholesale fuel-hedging programs under agreements with its
wholesale customers. Because energy from Southern Power's facilities is primarily sold under long-term PPAs with tolling
agreements and provisions shifting substantially all of the responsibility for fuel cost to the counterparties, Southern Power's
exposure to market volatility in commodity fuel prices and prices of electricity is generally limited. However, Southern Power has
been and may continue to be exposed to market volatility in energy-related commodity prices as a result of uncontracted generating
capacity. To mitigate residual risks relative to movements in electricity prices, the traditional electric operating companies and
Southern Power may enter into physical fixed-price contracts for the purchase and sale of electricity through the wholesale
electricity market and, to a lesser extent, financial hedge contracts for natural gas purchases; however, a significant portion of
contracts are priced at market.
Certain of Southern Company Gas' non-regulated operations routinely utilize various types of derivative instruments to
economically hedge certain commodity price and weather risks inherent in the natural gas industry. These instruments include a
variety of exchange-traded and OTC energy contracts, such as forward contracts, futures contracts, options contracts, and swap
agreements. Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services and wholesale gas services businesses also actively manage storage
positions through a variety of hedging transactions for the purpose of managing exposures arising from changing natural gas
prices. These hedging instruments are used to substantially protect economic margins (as spreads between wholesale and retail
natural gas prices widen between periods) and thereby minimize exposure to declining operating margins. Some of these economic
hedge activities may not qualify, or may not be designated, for hedge accounting treatment.
The Registrants had no material change in market risk exposure for the year ended December 31, 2019 when compared to the year
ended December 31, 2018. See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial
statements for additional information.
The Registrants may enter into interest rate derivatives designated as hedges, which are intended to mitigate interest rate volatility
related to forecasted debt financings and existing fixed and floating rate obligations. Outstanding interest rate derivatives at
December 31, 2019 are as follows:
At December 31, 2019Southern
Company(*)Georgia
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Hedges of forecasted debt $ 700$ 500$ 200
Hedges of existing debt 1,800 — —
Total $ 2,500$ 500$ 200
(*)Includes $1.8 billion of hedges of existing debt at the Southern Company parent.
II-111
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The following table provides information related to variable interest rate exposure on long-term debt (including amounts due within
one year) at December 31, 2019 for the applicable Registrants:
At December 31, 2019Southern
Company(*)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
(in millions, except percentages)
Long-term variable interest rate exposure $ 4,063$ 1,079$ 550$ 308$ 525
Weighted average interest rate on long-term
variable interest rate exposure 2.38% 2.35% 1.74% 2.51% 2.46%
Impact on annualized interest expense of 100
basis point change in interest rates $ 41$ 11$ 6$ 3$ 5
(*)Includes $1.5 billion of long-term variable interest rate exposure at the Southern Company parent entity.
Southern Power Company had foreign currency denominated debt of €1.1 billion at December 31, 2019. Southern Power Company
has mitigated its exposure to foreign currency exchange rate risk through the use of foreign currency swaps converting all interest
and principal payments to fixed-rate U.S. dollars.
The changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas for the years
ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 are provided in the table below. The fair value of energy-related derivative contracts was not
material for the other Registrants.
 Southern
Company(a)Southern
Company Gas(a)
 (in millions)
Contracts outstanding at December 31, 2017, assets (liabilities), net $ (163)$ (106)
Contracts realized or settled 93 66
Current period changes(b)(131) (127)
Contracts outstanding at December 31, 2018, assets (liabilities), net $ (201)$ (167)
Contracts realized or settled 69 26
Current period changes(b)105 213
Disposition 6 —
Contracts outstanding at December 31, 2019, assets (liabilities), net $ (21)$ 72
(a)Excludes cash collateral held on deposit in broker margin accounts of $99 million, $277 million, and $193 million at December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017,
respectively, and premium and intrinsic value associated with weather derivatives of $4 million, $8 million, and $11 million at December 31, 2019, 2018, and
2017, respectively.
(b)The changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts are substantially attributable to both the volume and the price of natural gas. Current period
changes also include the changes in fair value of new contracts entered into during the period, if any.
The net hedge volumes of energy-related derivative contracts for natural gas purchased (sold) at December 31, 2019 and 2018 for
Southern Company and Southern Company Gas were as follows:
 Southern
CompanySouthern
Company Gas
 mmBtu Volume (in millions)
At December 31, 2019:  
Commodity – Natural gas swaps 327 —
Commodity – Natural gas options 262 218
Total hedge volume 589 218
At December 31, 2018:  
Commodity – Natural gas swaps 287 —
Commodity – Natural gas options 144 120
Total hedge volume 431 120
II-112
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas' derivative contracts are comprised of both long and short natural gas positions. A long position is a
contract to purchase natural gas, and a short position is a contract to sell natural gas. The volumes presented above for Southern
Company Gas represent the net of long natural gas positions of 4.10 billion mmBtu and short natural gas positions of 3.88 billion
mmBtu at December 31, 2019 and the net of long natural gas positions of 4.16 billion mmBtu and short natural gas positions of
4.04 billion mmBtu at December 31, 2018.
For the Southern Company system, the weighted average swap contract cost above market prices was approximately $0.28 and
$0.12 per mmBtu at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The change in option fair value is primarily attributable to the
volatility of the market and the underlying change in the natural gas price. Substantially all of the traditional electric operating
companies' natural gas hedge gains and losses are recovered through their respective fuel cost recovery clauses.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, substantially all of the traditional electric operating companies' and certain of the natural gas
distribution utilities' energy-related derivative contracts were designated as regulatory hedges and were related to the applicable
company's fuel-hedging program. Gains and losses associated with regulatory hedges are initially recorded as regulatory liabilities
and assets, respectively, and then are included in fuel expense/cost of natural gas as they are recovered through their respective cost
recovery clause. Gains and losses on energy-related derivatives designated as cash flow hedges, which are used to hedge
anticipated purchases and sales, are initially deferred in AOCI before being recognized in income in the same period as the hedged
transaction. Gains and losses on energy-related derivative contracts that are not designated or fail to qualify as hedges are
recognized in the statements of income as incurred. See Note 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
Some energy-related derivative contracts require physical delivery as opposed to financial settlement, and this type of derivative is
both common and prevalent within the electric and natural gas industries. When an energy-related derivative contract is settled
physically, any cumulative unrealized gain or loss is reversed and the contract price is recognized in the respective line item
representing the actual price of the underlying goods being delivered.
The Registrants use over-the-counter contracts that are not exchange traded but are fair valued using prices which are market
observable, and thus fall into Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. In addition, Southern Company Gas uses exchange-traded market-
observable contracts, which are categorized as Level 1, and contracts that include a combination of observable and unobservable
components, which are categorized as Level 3. See Note 13 to the financial statements for further discussion of fair value
measurements. The maturities of the energy-related derivative contracts for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas at
December 31, 2019 were as follows:
 Fair Value Measurements of Contracts at
 December 31, 2019
 Total
Fair Value Maturity
  Year 1 Years 2&3 Years 4&5
 (in millions)
Southern Company    
Level 1(a)$ (53) $ (19)$ (37)$ 3
Level 2(b)18 42 (25) 1
Level 3 14 10 1 3
Southern Company total(c)$ (21) $ 33 $ (61)$ 7
Southern Company Gas    
Level 1(a)$ (53) $ (19)$ (37)$ 3
Level 2(b)111 98 11 2
Level 3 14 10 1 3
Southern Company Gas total(c)$ 72 $ 89 $ (25)$ 8
(a)Valued using NYMEX futures prices.
(b)Level 2 amounts for Southern Company Gas are valued using basis transactions that represent the cost to transport natural gas from a NYMEX delivery point to
the contract delivery point. These transactions are based on quotes obtained either through electronic trading platforms or directly from brokers.
(c)Excludes cash collateral of $99 million as well as premium and associated intrinsic value associated with weather derivatives of $4 million at December 31,
2019.
The Registrants are exposed to risk in the event of nonperformance by counterparties to energy-related and interest rate derivative
contracts, as applicable. The Registrants only enter into agreements and material transactions with counterparties that have
II-113
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
investment grade credit ratings by Moody's and S&P, or with counterparties who have posted collateral to cover potential credit
exposure. Therefore, the Registrants do not anticipate market risk exposure from nonperformance by the counterparties. For
additional information, see Note 1 to the financial statements under "Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements.
Southern Company performs periodic reviews of its leveraged lease transactions, both domestic and international, and the
creditworthiness of the lessees, including a review of the value of the underlying leased assets and the credit ratings of the lessees.
Southern Company's domestic lease transactions generally do not have any credit enhancement mechanisms; however, the lessees
in its international lease transactions have pledged various deposits as additional security to secure the obligations. The lessees in
Southern Company's international lease transactions are also required to provide additional collateral in the event of a credit
downgrade below a certain level. See Notes 1 and 3 to the financial statements under "Leveraged Leases" and "Other Matters –
Southern Company," respectively, for additional information.
Southern Company Gas Value at Risk (VaR)
VaR is the maximum potential loss in portfolio value over a specified time period that is not expected to be exceeded within a given
degree of probability. Southern Company Gas' VaR may not be comparable to that of other companies due to differences in the
factors used to calculate VaR. Southern Company Gas' VaR is determined on a 95% confidence interval and a one-day holding
period, which means that 95% of the time, the risk of loss in a day from a portfolio of positions is expected to be less than or equal
to the amount of VaR calculated. The open exposure of Southern Company Gas is managed in accordance with established policies
that limit market risk and require daily reporting of potential financial exposure to senior management. Because Southern Company
Gas generally manages physical gas assets and economically protects its positions by hedging in the futures markets, Southern
Company Gas' open exposure is generally mitigated. Southern Company Gas employs daily risk testing, using both VaR and stress
testing, to evaluate the risk of its positions.
Southern Company Gas actively monitors open commodity positions and the resulting VaR and maintains a relatively small risk
exposure as total buy volume is close to sell volume, with minimal open natural gas price risk. Based on a 95% confidence interval
and employing a one-day holding period, SouthStar's portfolio of positions for all periods presented was immaterial.
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services segment had the following VaRs at December 31:
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Period end(*)$ 2.6$ 6.4$ 4.8
Average 3.4 3.7 2.0
High(*)7.0 11.7 4.8
Low 2.1 1.2 1.0
(*)The increase in VaR at December 31, 2018 reflects significant natural gas price increases in Sequent's key markets driven by an industry-wide lower-than-
normal natural gas storage inventory position and colder-than-normal weather in the middle of fourth quarter 2018. As weather and natural gas prices moderated
subsequent to December 31, 2018, VaR reduced.
Credit Risk
Southern Company (except as discussed herein), the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Power are not exposed
to any concentrations of credit risk. Southern Company Gas' exposure to concentrations of credit risk is discussed herein.
Southern Company Gas
Gas Distribution Operations
Concentration of credit risk occurs at Atlanta Gas Light for amounts billed for services and other costs to its customers, which
consist of 16 Marketers in Georgia. The credit risk exposure to Marketers varies seasonally, with the lowest exposure in the non-
peak summer months and the highest exposure in the peak winter months. Marketers are responsible for the retail sale of natural
gas to end-use customers in Georgia. The provisions of Atlanta Gas Light's tariff allow Atlanta Gas Light to obtain credit security
support in an amount equal to a minimum of two times a Marketer's highest month's estimated bill from Atlanta Gas Light. For
2019, the four largest Marketers based on customer count, which includes SouthStar, accounted for 21% of Southern Company Gas'
adjusted operating margin and 27% of adjusted operating margin for Southern Company Gas' gas distribution operations segment.
II-114
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Several factors are designed to mitigate Southern Company Gas' risks from the increased concentration of credit that has resulted
from deregulation. In addition to the security support described above, Atlanta Gas Light bills intrastate delivery service to
Marketers in advance rather than in arrears. Atlanta Gas Light accepts credit support in the form of cash deposits, letters of
credit/surety bonds from acceptable issuers, and corporate guarantees from investment-grade entities. Southern Company Gas
reviews the adequacy of credit support coverage, credit rating profiles of credit support providers, and payment status of each
Marketer. Southern Company Gas believes that adequate policies and procedures are in place to properly quantify, manage, and
report on Atlanta Gas Light's credit risk exposure to Marketers.
Atlanta Gas Light also faces potential credit risk in connection with assignments of interstate pipeline transportation and storage
capacity to Marketers. Although Atlanta Gas Light assigns this capacity to Marketers, in the event that a Marketer fails to pay the
interstate pipelines for the capacity, the interstate pipelines would likely seek repayment from Atlanta Gas Light.
Wholesale Gas Services
Southern Company Gas has established credit policies to determine and monitor the creditworthiness of counterparties, as well as
the quality of pledged collateral. Southern Company Gas also utilizes netting agreements whenever possible to mitigate exposure to
counterparty credit risk. When Southern Company Gas is engaged in more than one outstanding derivative transaction with the
same counterparty and also has a legally enforceable netting agreement with that counterparty, the "net" mark-to-market exposure
represents the netting of the positive and negative exposures with that counterparty and a reasonable measure of Southern Company
Gas' credit risk. Southern Company Gas also uses other netting agreements with certain counterparties with whom it conducts
significant transactions. Netting agreements enable Southern Company Gas to net certain assets and liabilities by counterparty.
Southern Company Gas also nets across product lines and against cash collateral, provided the netting and cash collateral
agreements include such provisions.
Southern Company Gas may require counterparties to pledge additional collateral when deemed necessary. Southern Company Gas
conducts credit evaluations and obtains appropriate internal approvals for a counterparty's line of credit before any transaction with
the counterparty is executed. In most cases, the counterparty must have an investment grade rating, which includes a minimum
long-term debt rating of Baa3 from Moody's and BBB- from S&P. Generally, Southern Company Gas requires credit enhancements
by way of a guaranty, cash deposit, or letter of credit for transaction counterparties that do not have investment grade ratings.
Certain of Southern Company Gas' derivative instruments contain credit-risk-related or other contingent features that could increase
the payments for collateral it posts in the normal course of business when its financial instruments are in net liability positions. At
December 31, 2019, for agreements with such features, Southern Company Gas' derivative instruments with liability fair values
were immaterial and Southern Company Gas had no collateral posted with derivatives counterparties to satisfy these arrangements.
Southern Company Gas has a concentration of credit risk as measured by its 30-day receivable exposure plus forward exposure. At
December 31, 2019, the top 20 counterparties of Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services segment represented
approximately 59%, or $218 million, of its total counterparty exposure and had a weighted average S&P equivalent credit rating of
A-, all of which is consistent with the prior year. The S&P equivalent credit rating is determined by a process of converting the
lower of the S&P or Moody's ratings to an internal rating ranging from 9 to 1, with 9 being equivalent to AAA/Aaa by S&P and
Moody's, respectively, and 1 being D / Default by S&P and Moody's, respectively. A counterparty that does not have an external
rating is assigned an internal rating based on the strength of the financial ratios of that counterparty. To arrive at the weighted
average credit rating, each counterparty is assigned an internal ratio, which is multiplied by their credit exposure and summed for
all counterparties. The sum is divided by the aggregate total counterparties' exposures, and this numeric value is then converted to a
S&P equivalent.
II-115
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The following table provides credit risk information related to Southern Company Gas' third-party natural gas contracts receivable
and payable positions at December 31:
 Gross Receivables Gross Payables
 2019 2018 2019  2018
 (in millions) (in millions)
Netting agreements in place:    
Counterparty is investment grade $ 238$ 461$ 127 $ 255
Counterparty is non-investment grade 1 5 43 95
Counterparty has no external rating 175 314 272 505
No netting agreements in place:    
Counterparty is investment grade 14 19 — 1
Counterparty has no external rating — 2 — —
Amount recorded in balance sheets $ 428$ 801$ 442 $ 856
Gas Marketing Services
Southern Company Gas obtains credit scores for its firm residential and small commercial customers using a national credit
reporting agency, enrolling only those customers that meet or exceed Southern Company Gas' credit threshold. Southern Company
Gas considers potential interruptible and large commercial customers based on reviews of publicly available financial statements
and commercially available credit reports. Prior to entering into a physical transaction, Southern Company Gas also assigns
physical wholesale counterparties an internal credit rating and credit limit based on the counterparties' Moody's, S&P, and Fitch
ratings, commercially available credit reports, and audited financial statements.
Capital Requirements
Total estimated capital expenditures for the Registrants through 2024 based on their current construction programs are as follows:
 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024
 (in billions)
Southern Company(a)(b)(c)(d)$ 8.7$ 7.3$ 6.8$ 6.8$ 6.2
Alabama Power(b)2.1 1.8 1.8 1.8 1.6
Georgia Power(c)4.1 3.4 3.0 2.8 2.7
Mississippi Power 0.3 0.2 0.2 0.3 0.2
Southern Power(d)0.3 0.2 0.1 0.1 0.1
Southern Company Gas 1.8 1.6 1.6 1.7 1.6
(a)Includes the Subsidiary Registrants, as well the other subsidiaries.
(b)Includes amounts contingent upon approval by the Alabama PSC related to Alabama Power's September 6, 2019 CCN filing totaling $0.5 billion for 2020, $0.2
billion for 2021, $0.3 billion for 2022, and $0.1 billion for 2023. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Alabama Power – Petition
for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity" herein for additional information.
(c)These amounts include expenditures of approximately $1.6 billion, $0.9 billion, and $0.3 billion for the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 in 2020,
2021, and 2022, respectively.
(d)These amounts do not include approximately $0.5 billion per year for 2020 through 2024 for Southern Power's planned expenditures for plant acquisitions and
placeholder growth, which may vary materially due to market opportunities and Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy.
These amounts include estimated capital expenditures to comply with environmental laws and regulations, but do not include any
potential compliance costs associated with pending regulation of CO2 emissions from fossil fuel-fired electric generating units. See
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters" herein for additional information. These amounts also include
capital expenditures related to contractual purchase commitments for nuclear fuel (for Southern Company, Alabama Power, and
Georgia Power) and capital expenditures covered under LTSAs.
The traditional electric operating companies also anticipate costs associated with closure and monitoring of ash ponds and landfills
in accordance with the CCR Rule and the related state rules, which are reflected in the applicable Registrants' ARO liabilities.
Alabama Power's cost estimates are based on closure-in-place for all of its ash ponds. The cost estimates for Georgia
II-116
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Power and Mississippi Power are based on a combination of closure-in-place for some ash ponds and closure by removal for others.
These anticipated costs are likely to change, and could change materially, as assumptions and details pertaining to closure are
refined and compliance activities continue. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental
Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information. The
current estimates of these costs through 2024 are as follows:
 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024
 (in millions)
Southern Company $ 498$ 551$ 742$ 916$ 967
Alabama Power 200 217 284 363 386
Georgia Power 265 289 391 475 530
Mississippi Power 23 29 24 23 20
The construction programs are subject to periodic review and revision, and actual construction costs may vary from these estimates
because of numerous factors. These factors include: changes in business conditions; changes in load projections; changes in
environmental laws and regulations; the outcome of any legal challenges to environmental rules; changes in electric generating
plants, including unit retirements and replacements and adding or changing fuel sources at existing electric generating units, to
meet regulatory requirements; changes in FERC rules and regulations; state regulatory agency approvals; changes in the expected
environmental compliance program; changes in legislation; the cost and efficiency of construction labor, equipment, and materials;
project scope and design changes; abnormal weather; delays in construction due to judicial or regulatory action; storm impacts; and
the cost of capital. In addition, there can be no assurance that costs related to capital expenditures will be fully recovered.
Additionally, Southern Power's planned expenditures for plant acquisitions may vary due to market opportunities and Southern
Power's ability to execute its growth strategy. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" for additional
information regarding Southern Power's plant acquisitions and construction projects.
The construction program of Georgia Power also includes Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which includes components based on new
technology that only within the last few years began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale and which may be
subject to additional revised cost estimates during construction. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power –
Nuclear Construction" for information regarding Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 and additional factors that may impact construction
expenditures.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Construction Programs" herein for additional information. Also see "Contractual
Obligations" herein for information regarding other future funding requirements of the Registrants.
II-117
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Contractual Obligations
The following tables present the Registrants' contractual obligations at December 31, 2019. Additional information about these
funding requirements is provided herein.
Southern Company 2020  2021-2022 2023-2024 After 2024 Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt –      
Principal $ 2,971 $ 5,189 $ 2,890 $ 33,489 $ 44,539
Interest 1,677 3,109 2,809 25,986 33,581
Financial derivative obligations 450 204 65 — 719
Operating leases 294 543 386 1,609 2,832
Finance leases 31 47 33 246 357
Pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas supply 725 1,085 784 1,677 4,271
Purchase commitments –     
Capital 7,758 12,981 11,989  32,728
Fuel 2,787 3,491 1,527 4,546 12,351
Purchased power 150 270 237 1,725 2,382
Other 406 618 530 2,174 3,728
ARO settlements 498 1,293 1,883  3,674
Other(*)163 310 38 65 576
Southern Company system total $ 17,910 $ 29,140 $ 23,171 $ 71,517 $141,738
(*)Includes funding requirements related to pension and other postretirement benefit plans, nuclear decommissioning trusts of Georgia Power, and preferred stock
dividends of Alabama Power.
Alabama Power 2020 2021-2022 2023-2024 After 2024 Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt –      
Principal $ 250 $ 1,060 $ 321 $ 6,956 $ 8,587
Interest 338 649 578 4,985 6,550
Preferred stock dividends 15 29 29 — 73
Financial derivative obligations 14 10 — — 24
Operating leases 54 105 5 1 165
Finance leases 1 2 1 — 4
Purchase commitments –      
Capital 1,502 2,891 2,927   7,320
Fuel 959 1,226 465 808 3,458
Purchased power 35 75 77 446 633
Other 39 81 62 243 425
ARO settlements 200 501 749   1,450
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans 14 28    42
Alabama Power total $ 3,421 $ 6,657 $ 5,214 $ 13,439 $ 28,731
II-118
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Georgia Power 2020 2021-2022 2023-2024 After 2024 Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt –      
Principal $ 1,014 $ 906 $ 628 $ 9,236 $ 11,784
Interest 384 715 668 5,070 6,837
Financial derivative obligations 49 21 — — 70
Operating leases 205 395 359 831 1,790
Finance leases 28 49 50 134 261
Purchase commitments –      
Capital 3,805 6,080 4,966  14,851
Fuel 1,091 1,401 629 3,610 6,731
Purchased power 56 117 123 862 1,158
Other 117 121 133 205 576
ARO settlements 265 680 1,006  1,951
Nuclear decommissioning trust 5 9 9 65 88
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans 50 93   143
Georgia Power total $ 7,069 $ 10,587 $ 8,571 $ 20,013 $ 46,240
Mississippi Power 2020  2021-2022 2023-2024 After 2024 Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt –      
Principal $ 282 $ 270 $ — $ 1,026 $ 1,578
Interest 68 102 83 542 795
Financial derivative obligations 15 11 1 — 27
Operating leases 2 2 1 2 7
Purchase commitments –      
Capital 255 397 402  1,054
Fuel 313 312 169 108 902
Purchased power 17 36 37 417 507
Other 28 58 69 230 385
ARO settlements 23 53 44  120
Pension and other postretirement benefits plans 7 14   21
Mississippi Power total $ 1,010 $ 1,255 $ 806 $ 2,325 $ 5,396
Southern Power 2020 2021-2022 2023-2024 After 2024 Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt –     
Principal $ 825 $ 977 $ 290 $ 2,339 $ 4,431
Interest 163 278 222 1,302 1,965
Financial derivative obligations 3 — — — 3
Operating leases 29 50 52 888 1,019
Purchase commitments –     
Capital 251 306 294  851
Fuel 424 552 265 20 1,261
Purchased power 42 42 — — 84
Other 159 296 239 1,481 2,175
Southern Power total $ 1,896 $ 2,501 $ 1,362 $ 6,030 $ 11,789
II-119
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas 2020 2021-2022 2023-2024 After 2024 Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt –      
Principal $ — $ 376 $ 400 $ 4,659 $ 5,435
Interest 235 458 425 3,213 4,331
Financial derivative obligations 369 161 66 — 596
Operating leases 18 31 21 44 114
Pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas supply 725 1,085 784 1,677 4,271
Purchase commitments –     
Capital 1,775 3,191 3,335   8,301
Other 31 14 1 — 46
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans 16 29    45
Southern Company Gas total $ 3,169 $ 5,345 $ 5,032 $ 9,593 $ 23,139
Additional information about these funding requirements is provided below:
•Long-term debt – Represents scheduled maturities of long-term debt, as well as the related interest. All amounts are reflected
based on final maturity dates except for amounts related to Georgia Power's FFB borrowings. The final maturity date for
Georgia Power's FFB borrowings is February 20, 2044; however, principal amortization is reflected beginning in February
2020. The interest amounts also include the effects of interest rate derivatives employed to manage interest rate risk and effects
of foreign currency swaps employed to manage foreign currency exchange rate risk, as applicable. For Southern Company and
Southern Power, debt principal includes a $5 million loss related to Southern Power's foreign currency hedge of €1.1 billion.
The Registrants plan to continue, when economically feasible, to retire higher-cost securities and replace these obligations with
lower-cost capital if market conditions permit. Variable rate interest obligations are estimated based on rates at December 31,
2019, as reflected in the statements of capitalization for each Registrant. Long-term debt excludes finance lease amounts,
which are shown separately. See Note 8 to the financial statements for additional information.
•Financial derivative obligations – See Note 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
•Operating and finance leases – See Note 9 to the financial statements for additional information. Operating lease commitments
may include certain land leases for facilities that may be subject to annual price escalation based on indices. Estimated lease
payments for Southern Company and Alabama Power exclude amounts contingent upon approval by the Alabama PSC related
to Alabama Power's September 6, 2019 CCN filing totaling $1 million for 2021, $2 million for 2022, $3 million for 2023, $4
million for 2024, and $85 million for after 2024. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Petition for
Certificate of Convenience and Necessity" for additional information.
•Purchase commitments – Capital – Estimated capital expenditures are provided for a five-year period, including capital
expenditures associated with environmental regulations. These amounts exclude contractual purchase commitments for nuclear
fuel, capital expenditures covered under LTSAs, and estimated capital expenditures for AROs, which are reflected in the "fuel,"
"other," and "ARO settlements" categories, respectively, where applicable. Estimated capital expenditures for Southern
Company and Alabama Power exclude amounts contingent upon approval by the Alabama PSC related to Alabama Power's
September 6, 2019 CCN filing totaling $0.5 billion for 2020, $0.2 billion for 2021, $0.3 billion for 2022, and $0.1 billion for
2023. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Petition for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity"
for additional information. Estimated capital expenditures for Southern Company and Southern Power exclude approximately
$0.5 billion per year for 2020 through 2024 for Southern Power's planned expenditures for plant acquisitions and placeholder
growth. At December 31, 2019, significant purchase commitments were outstanding in connection with the Registrants'
construction programs. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters" and "Construction Programs"
herein and "Capital Requirements" herein for additional information.
•Purchase commitments – Fuel – Primarily includes commitments to purchase coal (for the traditional electric operating
companies), natural gas (for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power), and nuclear fuel (for Alabama
Power and Georgia Power), as well as the related transportation and storage. In most cases, these contracts contain provisions
for price escalation, minimum purchase levels, and other financial commitments. Natural gas purchase commitments are based
on various indices at the time of delivery. Amounts reflected for natural gas purchase commitments have been estimated based
on the NYMEX future prices at December 31, 2019.
•Purchase commitments – Purchased power – Represents estimated minimum obligations for various PPAs for the purchase of
capacity and energy, as well as, for Georgia Power, capacity payments related to Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2. Amounts exclude
PPAs accounted for as leases, which are reflected in the "operating leases" and "finance leases" categories, where applicable.
II-120
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
COMBINED MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Estimated capacity payments for Southern Company and Alabama Power exclude amounts contingent upon approval by the
Alabama PSC related to Alabama Power's September 6, 2019 CCN filing totaling $4 million for 2020, $7 million for 2021, $7
million for 2022, $8 million for 2023, $8 million for 2024, and $107 million for after 2024. See Note 2 to the financial
statements under "Alabama Power – Petition for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity" for additional information.
Mississippi Power's long-term PPAs are associated with solar facilities and only include an energy component. Southern
Power's purchased power commitments will be resold under a third-party agreement at cost. See Note 3 to the financial
statements under "Guarantees" for additional information.
•Purchase commitments – Other – Includes LTSAs (for all Registrants), contracts for the procurement of limestone (for
Alabama Power and Georgia Power), contractual environmental remediation liabilities (for Southern Company Gas), operation
and maintenance agreements (for Southern Power), and transmission agreements (for Southern Power). LTSAs include price
escalation based on inflation indices. Southern Power's transmission commitments are based on the Southern Company
system's current tariff rate for point-to-point transmission.
•Pension and other postretirement benefit plans – The Southern Company system provides postretirement benefits to the
majority of its employees and funds trusts to the extent required by PSCs, other applicable state regulatory agencies, or the
FERC. The Registrants forecast contributions to their pension and other postretirement benefit plans over a three-year period.
The Registrants anticipate no mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plan during the next three years. Amounts
presented represent estimated benefit payments for the nonqualified pension plans, estimated non-trust benefit payments for
the other postretirement benefit plans, and estimated contributions to the other postretirement benefit plan trusts, all of which
will be made from corporate assets of the applicable subsidiaries. See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional
information related to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, including estimated benefit payments. Certain benefit
payments will be made through the related benefit plans. Other benefit payments will be made from corporate assets of the
applicable subsidiaries.
•ARO settlements – Represents estimated costs for a five-year period associated with closing and monitoring ash ponds at the
traditional electric operating companies in accordance with the CCR Rule and the related state rules, which are reflected in the
applicable Registrants' ARO liabilities. Material expenditures in future years for ARO settlements also will be required for ash
ponds, nuclear decommissioning (for Alabama Power and Georgia Power), and other liabilities reflected in the applicable
Registrants' AROs. See Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
•Preferred stock dividends – Represents preferred stock of Alabama Power. Preferred stock does not mature; therefore, amounts
are provided for the next five years only.
•Nuclear decommissioning trusts – As a result of NRC requirements, Alabama Power and Georgia Power have external trust
funds for nuclear decommissioning costs. Based on its most recent site study completed in 2018, Alabama Power currently has
no additional funding requirements. Alabama Power's next site study is expected to be conducted by 2023. Georgia Power's
projections of nuclear decommissioning trust fund contributions for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 are based on
the 2019 ARP. See Note 6 to the financial statements under "Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
•Pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas supply – Includes charges at Southern Company Gas recoverable through a natural
gas cost recovery mechanism, or alternatively billed to Marketers selling retail natural gas, and demand charges associated
with Sequent. The gas supply balance includes amounts for Nicor Gas and SouthStar gas commodity purchase commitments of
45 million mmBtu at floating gas prices calculated using forward natural gas prices at December 31, 2019 and valued at $84
million. Southern Company Gas provides guarantees to certain gas suppliers for certain of its subsidiaries, including SouthStar,
in support of payment obligations.
II-121
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Item 8.FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
INDEX TO 2019 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 Page
The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-124
Consolidated Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-128
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-129
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-130
Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-131
Consolidated Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-133
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-135
 
Alabama Power:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-136
Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-137
Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-138
Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-139
Balance Sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-140
Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-142
Statements of Common Stockholder's Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-143
 
Georgia Power:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-144
Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-145
Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-146
Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-147
Balance Sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-148
Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-150
Statements of Common Stockholder's Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-151
 
Mississippi Power:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-152
Statements of Operations for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-153
Statements of Comprehensive Income (Loss) for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-154
Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-155
Balance Sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-156
Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-158
Statements of Common Stockholder's Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-159
II-122
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 Page
Southern Power  and Subsidiary Companies:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-160
Consolidated Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-161
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-162
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-163
Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-164
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-166
 
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-167
Consolidated Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-168
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-169
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-170
Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-171
Consolidated Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2019 and 2018 II-173
Consolidated Statements of Common Stockholder's Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 II-174
 
Combined Notes to Financial Statements II-175
II-123
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets and consolidated statements of capitalization of The Southern
Company and subsidiary companies (Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related consolidated statements
of income, comprehensive income, stockholders' equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2019, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). We also have audited Southern
Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control –
Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Southern
Company as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Also, in our opinion, Southern Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
Basis for Opinions
Southern Company's management is responsible for these financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control over
financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the
accompanying Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
these financial statements and an opinion on Southern Company's internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We
are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are
required to be independent with respect to Southern Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable
rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures to respond to those risks. Such procedures
included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also
included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall
presentation of the financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding
of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design
and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other
procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
II-124
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that
were communicated or required to be communicated to the Audit Committee of Southern Company's Board of Directors and that
(1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved especially challenging, subjective,
or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the
critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Note 1 (Summary of Significant Accounting Policies –
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities) and Note 2 (Regulatory Matters) to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
Southern Company's traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities (the "regulated utility
subsidiaries"), which represent approximately 87% of Southern Company's consolidated operating revenues for the year ended
December 31, 2019 and 84% of its consolidated total assets at December 31, 2019, are subject to rate regulation by their respective
state Public Service Commissions or other applicable state regulatory agencies and wholesale regulation by the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission (the "Commissions"). Management has determined that the regulated utility subsidiaries meet the
requirements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America to utilize specialized rules to account
for the effects of rate regulation in the preparation of its financial statements. Accounting for the economics of rate regulation
impacts multiple financial statement line items and disclosures, including, but not limited to, property, plant, and equipment; other
regulatory assets; other regulatory liabilities; other cost of removal obligations; deferred charges and credits related to income
taxes; under and over recovered regulatory clause revenues; operating revenues; operations and maintenance expenses; and
depreciation.
The Commissions set the rates the regulated utility subsidiaries are permitted to charge customers based on allowable costs,
including a reasonable return on equity. Rates are determined and approved in regulatory proceedings based on an analysis of the
applicable regulated subsidiary's costs to provide utility service and a return on, and recovery of, its investment in the utility
business. Current and future regulatory decisions can have an impact on the recovery of costs, the rate of return earned on
investments, and the timing and amount of assets to be recovered by rates. The Commissions' regulation of rates is premised on the
full recovery of prudently incurred costs and a reasonable rate of return on invested capital. While Southern Company's regulated
utility subsidiaries expect to recover costs from customers through regulated rates, there is a risk that the Commissions will not
approve: (1) full recovery of the costs of providing utility service, or (2) full recovery of all amounts invested in the utility business
and a reasonable return on that investment.
We identified the impact of rate regulation as a critical audit matter due to the significant judgments made by management to
support its assertions about impacted account balances and disclosures (e.g., asset retirement costs, property damage reserves, and
net book value of retired assets) and the high degree of subjectivity involved in assessing the potential impact of future regulatory
orders on the financial statements. Management judgments include assessing the likelihood of (1) recovery in future rates of
incurred costs, (2) a disallowance of part of the cost of recently completed plant or plant under construction, and/or (3) a refund to
customers. Given that management's accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future decisions by the
Commissions, auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the rate setting
process due to its inherent complexities and significant auditor judgment to evaluate management estimates and the subjectivity of
audit evidence.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the uncertainty of future decisions by the Commissions included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of management's controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of (1) the recovery in future rates of
costs incurred as property, plant, and equipment and deferred as regulatory assets, and (2) a refund or a future reduction in rates
that should be reported as regulatory liabilities. We also tested the effectiveness of management's controls over the initial
recognition of amounts as property, plant, and equipment; regulatory assets or liabilities; and the monitoring and evaluation of
regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates or of a future reduction in rates.
•We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions for the regulated utility subsidiaries, regulatory statutes,
interpretations, procedural memorandums, filings made by intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the
likelihood of recovery in future rates or of a future reduction in rates based on precedence of the Commissions' treatment of
similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to management's recorded
regulatory asset and liability balances for completeness.
II-125
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
•For regulatory matters in process, we inspected filings with the Commissions by both Southern Company's regulated utility
subsidiaries and other interested parties that may impact the regulated utility subsidiaries' future rates for any evidence that
might contradict management's assertions.
•We evaluated regulatory filings for any evidence that intervenors are challenging full recovery of the cost of any capital
projects. We tested selected costs included in the capitalized project costs for completeness and accuracy.
•We obtained representation from management regarding probability of recovery for regulatory assets or refund or future
reduction in rates for regulatory liabilities to assess management's assertion that amounts are probable of recovery, refund, or a
future reduction in rates.
•We evaluated Southern Company's disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and
regulatory developments.
Disclosure of Uncertainties – Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 Construction – Refer to Note 2 (Regulatory Matters – Georgia Power –
Nuclear Construction) to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
As discussed in Note 2 to the financial statements, the ultimate recovery of Georgia Power Company's (Georgia Power) investment
in the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is subject to multiple uncertainties. Such uncertainties include the potential impact
of future decisions by Georgia Power's regulators (particularly the Georgia Public Service Commission), actions by the co-owners
of the Vogtle project, and litigation or other legal proceedings involving the project. In addition, Georgia Power's ability to meet its
cost and schedule forecasts could impact its capacity to fully recover its investment in the project. While the project is not subject
to a cost cap, Georgia Power's cost and schedule forecasts are subject to numerous uncertainties which could impact cost recovery,
including challenges with management of contractors and vendors; subcontractor performance; supervision of craft labor and
related craft labor productivity, particularly in the installation of electrical and mechanical commodities, ability to attract and retain
craft labor, and/or related cost escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, installation, system turnover, and the initial
testing and start-up, including any required engineering changes or any remediation related thereto, of plant systems, structures, or
components (some of which are based on new technology that only within the last few years began initial operation in the global
nuclear industry at this scale), or regional transmission upgrades, any of which may require additional labor and/or materials; or
other issues that could arise and change the projected schedule and estimated cost. The ultimate recovery of Georgia Power's
investment in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is subject to the outcome of future assessments by management as well as Georgia Public
Service Commission decisions in future regulatory proceedings.
Management has disclosed the status, risks, and uncertainties associated with Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, including (1) the status of
construction; (2) challenges to the achievement of Georgia Power's cost and schedule forecasts; (3) the status of regulatory
proceedings; (4) the status of legal actions or issues involving the co-owners of the project; and (5) other matters which could
impact the ultimate recoverability of Georgia Power's investment in the project. We identified as a critical audit matter the
evaluation of these disclosures which involved significant audit effort requiring specialized industry and construction expertise,
extensive knowledge of rate regulation, and difficult and subjective judgments.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the disclosure of the status, risks, and uncertainties of the nuclear construction at Plant Vogtle Units
3 and 4 included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of internal controls over the on-going evaluation and monitoring of the construction schedule
and capital cost forecast and over the disclosure of matters related to the construction and ultimate cost recovery of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
•We involved construction specialists to assist in our evaluation of Georgia Power's processes for on-going evaluation and
monitoring of the construction schedule and cost forecast and to assess the disclosures of challenges to the achievement of
such forecasts.
•We attended meetings with Georgia Power and Southern Company officials, project managers (including contractors),
independent regulatory monitors, and co-owners of the project to evaluate and monitor construction status and identify
cost and schedule challenges.
•We read reports of external independent monitors employed by the Georgia Public Service Commission to monitor the
status of construction at Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to evaluate the completeness of Georgia Power's disclosure of
challenges to the achievement of cost and schedule forecasts.
II-126
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
•We inquired of Georgia Power and Southern Company officials and project managers regarding the status of construction,
the construction schedule, and cost forecasts to assess the financial statement disclosures with respect to project status and
potential risks and uncertainties to the achievement of such forecasts.
•We inspected regulatory filings and transcripts of Georgia Public Service Commission hearings regarding the construction
of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to identify potential challenges to the recovery of Georgia Power's construction costs and to
evaluate the disclosures with respect to such uncertainties.
•We inquired of Georgia Power and Southern Company management and internal and external legal counsel regarding any
potential legal actions or issues arising from project construction or issues involving the co-owners of the project.
•We compared the financial statement disclosures relating to this matter to the information gathered through the conduct of
all our procedures to evaluate whether there were omissions relating to significant facts or uncertainties regarding the
status of construction or other factors which could impact the ultimate cost recovery of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
•We obtained representation from management regarding disclosure of all matters related to the cost and/or status,
including matters related to a co-owner or regulatory development, that could result in a potential disallowance of costs
related to the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
We have served as Southern Company's auditor since 2002.
II-127
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:   
Retail electric revenues $ 14,084$ 15,222 $ 15,330
Wholesale electric revenues 2,152 2,516 2,426
Other electric revenues 636 664 681
Natural gas revenues 3,792 3,854 3,791
Other revenues 755 1,239 803
Total operating revenues 21,419 23,495 23,031
Operating Expenses:   
Fuel 3,622 4,637 4,400
Purchased power 816 971 863
Cost of natural gas 1,319 1,539 1,601
Cost of other sales 435 806 513
Other operations and maintenance 5,600 5,889 5,739
Depreciation and amortization 3,038 3,131 3,010
Taxes other than income taxes 1,230 1,315 1,250
Estimated loss on plants under construction 24 1,097 3,362
Impairment charges 168 210 —
(Gain) loss on dispositions, net (2,569) (291) (40)
Total operating expenses 13,683 19,304 20,698
Operating Income 7,736 4,191 2,333
Other Income and (Expense):   
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 128 138 160
Earnings from equity method investments 162 148 106
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (1,736) (1,842) (1,694)
Other income (expense), net 252 114 163
Total other income and (expense) (1,194) (1,442) (1,265)
Earnings Before Income Taxes 6,542 2,749 1,068
Income taxes 1,798 449 142
Consolidated Net Income 4,744 2,300 926
Dividends on preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries 15 16 38
Net income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests (10) 58 46
Consolidated Net Income Attributable to Southern Company $ 4,739$ 2,226 $ 842
Common Stock Data:   
Earnings per share —   
Basic $ 4.53$ 2.18 $ 0.84
Diluted 4.50 2.17 0.84
Average number of shares of common stock outstanding — (in millions)   
Basic 1,046 1,020 1,000
Diluted 1,054 1,025 1,008
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
 
II-128
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 
 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Consolidated Net Income $ 4,744$ 2,300 $ 926
Other comprehensive income (loss):   
Qualifying hedges:   
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $(39), $(16), and $34, respectively (115) (47) 57
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $19, $24, and $(37), respectively 57 72 (60)
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans:   
Benefit plan net gain (loss), net of tax of $(31), $(2), and $6, respectively (64) (5) 17
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $1, $5, and $(6), respectively 4 6 (23)
Total other comprehensive income (loss) (118) 26 (9)
Dividends on preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries 15 16 38
Comprehensive income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests (10) 58 46
Consolidated Comprehensive Income Attributable to Southern Company$ 4,621$ 2,252 $ 833
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
 
II-129
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF  CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December  31, 2019 , 2018 , and 2017
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019  Annual Report
 2019  2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:     
Consolidated net income $ 4,744  $ 2,300  $ 926
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income
to net cash provided from operating activities —     
Depreciation and amortization, total 3,331  3,549  3,457
Deferred income taxes 611 89 166
Utilization of federal investment tax credits 757  5 —
Allowance for equity funds used during construction (128) (138) (160)
Pension, postretirement, and other employee benefits (204) (103) (84)
Pension and postretirement funding (1,136 ) (4) (2)
Settlement of asset retirement obligations (328) (244) (177)
Storm damage reserve accruals 168  74 38
Stock based compensation expense 107  125  109
Estimated loss on plants under construction 15 1,093  3,179
Impairment char ges 168  210  —
(Gain) loss on dispositions, net (2,588 ) (301) (42)
Other , net 102  14 (63)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —     
-Receivables 630  (426) (202)
-Fossil fuel for generation (120) 123  36
-Natural gas for sale 44 49 36
-Other current assets 70 (127) (143)
-Accounts payable (693) 291  (280)
-Accrued taxes 117 267  (142)
-Accrued compensation (9) 33 (8)
-Retail fuel cost over recovery 62 36 (212)
-Other current liabilities 61 30 (38)
Net cash provided from operating activities 5,781  6,945  6,394
Investing Activities:     
Business acquisitions, net of cash acquired (50) (65) (1,054 )
Property additions (7,555 ) (8,001 ) (7,423 )
Proceeds pursuant to the Toshiba Guarantee, net of joint owner portion               — — 1,682
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund purchases (888) (1,117) (811)
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund sales 882  1,111 805
Proceeds from dispositions and asset sales 5,122  2,956  97
Cost of removal, net of salvage (393) (388) (313)
Change in construction payables, net (169) 50 259
Investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries (148) (114) (152)
Payments pursuant to L TSAs (234) (186) (227)
Other investing activities 41 (6) (53)
Net cash used for investing activities (3,392 ) (5,760 ) (7,190 )
Financing Activities:     
Increase (decrease) in notes payable, net 640  (774) (401)
Proceeds —     
Long-term debt 5,220  2,478  5,858
Common stock 844  1,090  793
Preferred stock — — 250
Short-term borrowings 350  3,150  1,259
Redemptions and repurchases —     
Long-term debt (4,347 ) (5,533 ) (2,930 )
Preferred and preference stock — (33) (658)
Short-term borrowings (1,850 ) (1,900 ) (659)
Distributions to noncontrolling interests (256) (153) (119)
Capital contributions from noncontrolling interests 196  2,551  80
Payment of common stock dividends (2,570 ) (2,425 ) (2,300 )
Other financing activities (157) (264) (222)
Net cash provided from (used for) financing activities (1,930 ) (1,813 ) 951
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash 459  (628) 155
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 1,519  2,147  1,992
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 1,978  $ 1,519  $ 2,147
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:     
Cash paid (received) during the period for —     
Interest (net of $74, $72, and $89 capitalized, respectively) $ 1,651  $ 1,794  $ 1,676
Income taxes (net of refunds) 276  172  (410)
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year -end 932  1,103  985
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-130
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Assets 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Assets:  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,975$ 1,396
Receivables —  
Customer accounts receivable 1,614 1,726
Energy marketing receivable 428 801
Unbilled revenues 599 654
Under recovered fuel clause revenues — 115
Other accounts and notes receivable 817 813
Accumulated provision for uncollectible accounts (49) (50)
Materials and supplies 1,388 1,465
Fossil fuel for generation 521 405
Natural gas for sale 479 524
Prepaid expenses 314 432
Assets from risk management activities, net of collateral 183 222
Regulatory assets – asset retirement obligations 287 —
Other regulatory assets 885 525
Assets held for sale 188 393
Other current assets 188 162
Total current assets 9,817 9,583
Property, Plant, and Equipment:  
In service 105,114 103,706
Less: Accumulated depreciation 30,765 31,038
Plant in service, net of depreciation 74,349 72,668
Nuclear fuel, at amortized cost 851 875
Construction work in progress 7,880 7,254
Total property, plant, and equipment 83,080 80,797
Other Property and Investments:  
Goodwill 5,280 5,315
Equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries 1,303 1,580
Other intangible assets, net of amortization of $280 and $235
at December 31, 2019 and December 31, 2018, respectively 536 613
Nuclear decommissioning trusts, at fair value 2,036 1,721
Leveraged leases 788 798
Miscellaneous property and investments 391 269
Total other property and investments 10,334 10,296
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:  
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net of amortization 1,800 —
Deferred charges related to income taxes 798 794
Unamortized loss on reacquired debt 300 323
Regulatory assets – asset retirement obligations, deferred 4,094 2,933
Other regulatory assets, deferred 6,805 5,375
Assets held for sale, deferred 601 5,350
Other deferred charges and assets 1,071 1,463
Total deferred charges and other assets 15,469 16,238
Total Assets $ 118,700$ 116,914
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-131
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:  
Securities due within one year $ 2,989$ 3,198
Notes payable 2,055 2,915
Energy marketing trade payables 442 856
Accounts payable 2,115 2,580
Customer deposits 496 522
Accrued taxes —  
Accrued income taxes — 21
Other accrued taxes 659 635
Accrued interest 474 472
Accrued compensation 992 1,030
Asset retirement obligations 504 404
Other regulatory liabilities 756 376
Liabilities held for sale 5 425
Operating lease obligations 229 —
Other current liabilities 830 852
Total current liabilities 12,546 14,286
Long-Term Debt (See accompanying statements) 41,798 40,736
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:  
Accumulated deferred income taxes 7,888 6,558
Deferred credits related to income taxes 6,078 6,460
Accumulated deferred ITCs 2,291 2,372
Employee benefit obligations 1,814 2,147
Operating lease obligations, deferred 1,615 —
Asset retirement obligations, deferred 9,282 8,990
Accrued environmental remediation 234 268
Other cost of removal obligations 2,239 2,297
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred 256 169
Liabilities held for sale, deferred — 2,836
Other deferred credits and liabilities 609 465
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 32,306 32,562
Total Liabilities 86,650 87,584
Redeemable Preferred Stock of Subsidiaries (See accompanying statements) 291 291
Total Stockholders' Equity (See accompanying statements) 31,759 29,039
Total Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity $ 118,700$ 116,914
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
 
II-132
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Weighted Average
Interest Rate
at December 31,
2019 2019 2018 2019 2018
  (in millions) (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:    
Long-term debt payable to affiliated trusts —    
Variable rate due 2042 5.20% $ 206$ 206  
Long-term senior notes and debt —    
Maturity    
2019 — — 2,948  
2020 2.43% 2,100 2,271  
2021 2.70% 2,672 2,638  
2022 2.53% 1,870 1,983  
2023 3.05% 2,290 2,290  
2024 2.20% 400 —  
2025 through 2049 4.27% 20,120 19,895  
Variable rate due 2020 2.50% 800 1,875  
Variable rate due 2021 2.42% 125 125  
Total long-term senior notes and debt 30,377 34,025  
Other long-term debt —    
Pollution control revenue bonds —    
Maturity    
2019 — — 25  
2022 2.35% 53 90  
2023 — — 33  
2025 through 2053 2.40% 1,466 1,112  
Variable rate due 2020 1.80% 7 148  
Variable rate due 2021 1.75% 65 65  
Variable rate due 2022 — — 4  
Variable rate due 2024 1.72% 21 21  
Variable rate due 2025 to 2052 1.69% 1,351 1,396  
Plant Daniel revenue bonds due 2021 7.13% 270 270  
FFB loans —    
Maturity    
2020 3.20% 64 44  
2021 3.20% 64 44  
2022 3.20% 64 44  
2023 3.20% 64 44  
2024 3.20% 64 44  
2025 to 2044 3.20% 3,523 2,405  
First mortgage bonds —    
Maturity    
2019 — — 50  
2023 5.80% 50 50  
2026 to 2059 3.94% 1,525 1,225  
Junior subordinated notes due 2024 2.70% 863 —  
Junior subordinated notes due 2027 to 2077 5.00% 4,433 3,570  
Total other long-term debt 13,947 10,684  
Unamortized fair value adjustment of long-term debt 430 474  
Finance lease obligations 226 197  
Unamortized debt premium (discount), net (152) (158)  
Unamortized debt issuance expense (247) (208)  
Total long-term debt 44,787 45,220  
Less:    
Amount due within one year 2,989 3,198  
Amount held for sale — 1,286  
Long-term debt excluding amounts due within one year and held
for sale 41,798 40,736 56.6% 58.1%
    
II-133
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION (continued)
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report   
  2019 2018 2019 2018
  (in millions) (percent of total)
Redeemable Preferred Stock of Subsidiaries:    
Cumulative preferred stock    
$100 par or stated value — 4.20% to 4.92%    
Authorized — 10 million shares    
Outstanding — 475,115 shares  48 48  
$1 par value — 5.00%    
Authorized — 28 million shares    
Outstanding — 10 million shares  243 243  
Total redeemable preferred stock of subsidiaries   
(annual dividend requirement — $15 million)  291 291 0.4 0.4
Common Stockholders' Equity:    
Common stock, par value $5 per share —  5,257 5,164  
Authorized — 1.5 billion shares    
Issued — 2019: 1.1 billion shares    
  — 2018: 1.0 billion shares    
Treasury — 2019: 1.0 million shares    
      — 2018: 1.0 million shares    
Paid-in capital  11,734 11,094  
Treasury, at cost  (42) (38)  
Retained earnings  10,877 8,706  
Accumulated other comprehensive loss  (321) (203)  
Total common stockholders' equity  27,505 24,723 37.2 35.3
Noncontrolling interests  4,254 4,316 5.8 6.2
Total stockholders' equity  31,759 29,039  
Total Capitalization  $73,848$70,066 100.0% 100.0%
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements. 
II-134
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Southern Company Common Stockholders' Equity   
 Number of
Common Shares Common Stock   Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income
(Loss) Preferred
and
Preference
Stock of
SubsidiariesNoncontrolling
Interests(a) 
 Issued Treasury Par
ValuePaid-In
CapitalTreasury Retained
Earnings  Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December
31, 2016 991 (1) $4,952$9,661 $ (31) $ 10,356 $ (180) $ 609 $ 1,245$26,612
Consolidated net income
attributable
   to Southern Company — — — — — 842 — — — 842
Other comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — — (9) — — (9)
Stock issued 18 — 86 707 — — — — — 793
Stock-based
compensation — — — 105 — — — — — 105
Cash dividends of
$2.3000 per share — — — — — (2,300) — — — (2,300)
Preferred and preference
stock
   redemptions — — — — — — — (609) — (609)
Contributions from
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — 79 79
Distributions to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (122) (122)
Net income attributable
to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — 44 44
Reclassification from
redeemable
noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — 114 114
Other — — — (4) (5) (13) — — 1 (21)
Balance at December
31, 2017 1,009 (1) 5,038 10,469 (36) 8,885 (189) — 1,361 25,528
Consolidated net income
attributable
   to Southern Company — — — — — 2,226 — — — 2,226
Other comprehensive
income — — — — — — 26 — — 26
Stock issued 26 — 126 964 — — — — — 1,090
Stock-based
compensation — — — 84 — — — — — 84
Cash dividends of
$2.3800 per share — — — — — (2,425) — — — (2,425)
Contributions from
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — 1,372 1,372
Distributions to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (164) (164)
Net income attributable
to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — 58 58
Sale of noncontrolling
interests — — — (417) — — — — 1,690 1,273
Other — — — (6) (2) 20 (40) — (1) (29)
Balance at December
31, 2018 1,035 (1) 5,164 11,094 (38) 8,706 (203) — 4,316 29,039
Consolidated net income
attributable
   to Southern Company — — — — — 4,739 — — — 4,739
Other comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — — (118) — — (118)
Issuance of equity units(b) — — — (198) — — — — — (198)
Stock issued 19 — 93 751 — — — — — 844
Stock-based
compensation — — — 66 — — — — — 66
Cash dividends of
$2.4600 per share — — — — — (2,570) — — — (2,570)
Contributions from
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — 276 276
Distributions to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (327) (327)
Net income (loss)
attributable to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (10) (10)
Other — — — 21 (4) 2 — — (1) 18
Balance at December
31, 2019 1,054 (1) $5,257$11,734 $ (42) $ 10,877 $ (321) $ — $ 4,254$31,759
(a)Excludes redeemable noncontrolling interests. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests" for
additional information.
(b)See Note 8 under "Equity Units" for additional information.
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-135
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Alabama Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets and statements of capitalization of Alabama Power Company (Alabama Power)
(a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related statements of income,
comprehensive income, common stockholder's equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31,
2019, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial statements present
fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Alabama Power as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Alabama Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
Alabama Power's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to Alabama Power in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Alabama Power is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial
reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for
the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Alabama Power's internal control over financial reporting.
Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Birmingham, Alabama
February 19, 2020
We have served as Alabama Power's auditor since 2002.
II-136
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:    
Retail revenues $ 5,501$ 5,367 $ 5,458
Wholesale revenues, non-affiliates 258 279 276
Wholesale revenues, affiliates 81 119 97
Other revenues 285 267 208
Total operating revenues 6,125 6,032 6,039
Operating Expenses:    
Fuel 1,112 1,301 1,225
Purchased power, non-affiliates 203 216 170
Purchased power, affiliates 200 216 158
Other operations and maintenance 1,821 1,669 1,709
Depreciation and amortization 793 764 736
Taxes other than income taxes 403 389 384
Total operating expenses 4,532 4,555 4,382
Operating Income 1,593 1,477 1,657
Other Income and (Expense):    
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 52 62 39
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (336) (323) (305)
Other income (expense), net 46 20 43
Total other income and (expense) (238) (241) (223)
Earnings Before Income Taxes 1,355 1,236 1,434
Income taxes 270 291 568
Net Income 1,085 945 866
Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock 15 15 18
Net Income After Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock $ 1,070$ 930 $ 848
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-137
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018  2017
 (in millions)
Net Income $ 1,085 $ 945 $ 866
Other comprehensive income (loss):    
Qualifying hedges:    
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $-, $-, and $(1), respectively — — 1
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $2, $2, and $2, respectively 4 4 3
Total other comprehensive income (loss) 4 4 4
Comprehensive Income $ 1,089 $ 949 $ 870
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-138
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018 2017
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:    
Net income $ 1,085  $ 945 $ 866
Adjustments to reconcile net income
to net cash provided from operating activities —    
Depreciation and amortization, total 951  917 888
Deferred income taxes 197  174 409
Allowance for equity funds used during construction (52) (62) (39)
Pension and postretirement funding (362) (4) (2)
Settlement of asset retirement obligations (127) (55) (26)
Natural disaster reserve accruals 138  16 4
Other deferred char ges – af filiated (42) — —
Other , net (90) (17) 9
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —    
-Receivables 9 (149) (168)
-Prepayments (4) (2) (2)
-Materials and supplies 23 (82) (34)
-Other current assets (85) 30 20
-Accounts payable (41) 24 71
-Accrued taxes 49 10 (84)
-Accrued compensation (14) 8 (2)
-Retail fuel cost over recovery 47 — (76)
-Other current liabilities 97 128 3
Net cash provided from operating activities 1,779  1,881 1,837
Investing Activities:    
Property additions (1,757 ) (2,158 ) (1,882 )
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund purchases (261) (279) (237)
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund sales 260  278 237
Cost of removal net of salvage (103) (130) (112)
Change in construction payables (71) 26 161
Other investing activities (31) (26) (43)
Net cash used for investing activities (1,963 ) (2,289 ) (1,876 )
Financing Activities:    
Proceeds —    
Senior notes 600  500 1,100
Preferred stock — — 250
Pollution control revenue bonds — 120 —
Capital contributions from parent company 1,240  511 361
Redemptions and repurchases —    
Senior notes (200) — (525)
Preferred and preference stock — — (238)
Pollution control revenue bonds — (120) (36)
Payment of common stock dividends (844) (801) (714)
Other financing activities (31) (33) (35)
Net cash provided from financing activities 765  177 163
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash 581  (231) 124
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 313  544 420
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 894  $ 313 $ 544
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:    
Cash paid during the period for —    
Interest (net of $19, $22, and $15 capitalized, respectively) $ 311 $ 284 $ 285
Income taxes (net of refunds) 26 106 236
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year -end 200  272 245
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-139
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
Assets 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Assets:  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 894$ 313
Receivables —  
Customer accounts receivable 425 403
Unbilled revenues 134 150
Affiliated 37 94
Other accounts and notes receivable 72 51
Accumulated provision for uncollectible accounts (22) (10)
Fossil fuel stock 212 141
Materials and supplies 512 546
Prepaid expenses 50 66
Other regulatory assets 242 137
Other current assets 30 18
Total current assets 2,586 1,909
Property, Plant, and Equipment:  
In service 30,023 30,402
Less: Accumulated provision for depreciation 9,540 9,988
Plant in service, net of depreciation 20,483 20,414
Nuclear fuel, at amortized cost 296 324
Construction work in progress 890 1,113
Total property, plant, and equipment 21,669 21,851
Other Property and Investments:  
Equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries 66 65
Nuclear decommissioning trusts, at fair value 1,023 847
Miscellaneous property and investments 128 127
Total other property and investments 1,217 1,039
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:  
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net of amortization 132 —
Deferred charges related to income taxes 244 240
Deferred under recovered regulatory clause revenues 40 116
Regulatory assets – asset retirement obligations 1,019 147
Other regulatory assets, deferred 1,976 1,240
Other deferred charges and assets 269 188
Total deferred charges and other assets 3,680 1,931
Total Assets $ 29,152$ 26,730
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-140
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:  
Securities due within one year $ 251$ 201
Accounts payable —  
Affiliated 316 364
Other 514 614
Customer deposits 100 96
Accrued taxes 78 44
Accrued interest 92 89
Accrued compensation 216 227
Asset retirement obligations 195 163
Other regulatory liabilities 193 116
Other current liabilities 105 45
Total current liabilities 2,060 1,959
Long-Term Debt (See accompanying statements) 8,270 7,923
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:  
Accumulated deferred income taxes 3,260 2,962
Deferred credits related to income taxes 1,960 2,027
Accumulated deferred ITCs 100 106
Employee benefit obligations 206 314
Operating lease obligations 107 —
Asset retirement obligations, deferred 3,345 3,047
Other cost of removal obligations 412 497
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred 146 69
Other deferred credits and liabilities 40 58
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 9,576 9,080
Total Liabilities 19,906 18,962
Redeemable Preferred Stock (See accompanying statements) 291 291
Common Stockholder's Equity (See accompanying statements) 8,955 7,477
Total Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity $ 29,152$ 26,730
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-141
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
 Weighted Average
Interest Rate
at December 31,
2019 2019 2018 2019 2018
 (in millions) (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:   
Long-term debt payable to affiliated trusts —   
Variable rate due 2042 5.20% $ 206$ 206  
Long-term notes payable —   
Maturity   
2019 — — 200  
2020 3.38% 250 250  
2021 3.81% 220 220  
2022 3.36% 750 750  
2023 3.55% 300 300  
2025-2049 4.41% 5,775 5,175  
Variable rate due 2021 2.90% 25 25  
Total long-term notes payable 7,320 6,920  
Other long-term debt —   
Pollution control revenue bonds —   
Due 2034 2.46% 207 207  
Variable rate due 2021 1.75% 65 65  
Variable rate due 2024 1.72% 21 21  
Variable rate due 2028-2038 1.65% 767 767  
Total other long-term debt 1,060 1,060  
Finance lease obligations 4 4  
Unamortized debt premium (discount), net (14) (12)  
Unamortized debt issuance expense (55) (54)  
Total long-term debt 8,521 8,124  
Less amount due within one year 251 201  
Long-term debt excluding amount due within one year 8,270 7,923 47.2% 50.4%
Redeemable Preferred Stock:   
Cumulative redeemable preferred stock   
$100 par or stated value — 4.20% to 4.92%   
Authorized — 3,850,000 shares   
Outstanding — 475,115 shares 48 48  
$1 par value — 5.00%   
Authorized — 27,500,000 shares   
Outstanding — 10,000,000 shares: $25 stated value 243 243  
Total redeemable preferred stock
(annual dividend requirement — $15 million) 291 291 1.7 1.9
Common Stockholder's Equity:   
Common stock, par value $40 per share —   
Authorized — 40,000,000 shares   
Outstanding — 30,537,500 shares 1,222 1,222  
Paid-in capital 4,755 3,508  
Retained earnings 3,001 2,775  
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (23) (28)  
Total common stockholder's equity 8,955 7,477 51.1 47.7
Total Capitalization $17,516$15,691 100.0% 100.0%
 The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-142
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMMON STOCKHOLDER'S EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 Number of
Common
Shares
IssuedCommon
StockPaid-In
Capital Retained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss) Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2016 31$ 1,222$ 2,613 $ 2,518$ (30)$6,323
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 848 — 848
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 373 — — 373
Other comprehensive income — — — — 4 4
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (714) — (714)
Other — — — (5) — (5)
Balance at December 31, 2017 31 1,222 2,986 2,647 (26) 6,829
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 930 — 930
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 522 — — 522
Other comprehensive income — — — — 4 4
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (801) — (801)
Other — — — (1) (6) (7)
Balance at December 31, 2018 31 1,222 3,508 2,775 (28) 7,477
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 1,070 — 1,070
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 1,247 — — 1,247
Other comprehensive income — — — — 4 4
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (844) — (844)
Other — — — — 1 1
Balance at December 31, 2019 31$ 1,222$ 4,755 $ 3,001$ (23)$8,955
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-143
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Georgia Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets and statements of capitalization of Georgia Power Company (Georgia Power) (a
wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related statements of income,
comprehensive income, common stockholder's equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31,
2019, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial statements present
fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Georgia Power as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Georgia Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
Georgia Power's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to Georgia Power in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Georgia Power is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial
reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for
the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Georgia Power's internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly,
we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
We have served as Georgia Power's auditor since 2002.
II-144
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:    
Retail revenues $ 7,707$ 7,752 $ 7,738
Wholesale revenues, non-affiliates 129 163 163
Wholesale revenues, affiliates 11 24 26
Other revenues 561 481 383
Total operating revenues 8,408 8,420 8,310
Operating Expenses:    
Fuel 1,444 1,698 1,671
Purchased power, non-affiliates 521 430 416
Purchased power, affiliates 575 723 622
Other operations and maintenance 1,972 1,860 1,724
Depreciation and amortization 981 923 895
Taxes other than income taxes 454 437 409
Estimated loss on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 — 1,060 —
Total operating expenses 5,947 7,131 5,737
Operating Income 2,461 1,289 2,573
Other Income and (Expense):    
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (409) (397) (419)
Other income (expense), net 140 115 104
Total other income and (expense) (269) (282) (315)
Earnings Before Income Taxes 2,192 1,007 2,258
Income taxes 472 214 830
Net Income 1,720 793 1,428
Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock — — 14
Net Income After Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock $ 1,720$ 793 $ 1,414
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-145
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
 2019  2018  2017
 (in millions)
Net Income $ 1,720 $ 793 $ 1,428
Other comprehensive income (loss):   
Qualifying hedges:   
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $(15), $-, and $-, respectively (44) — —
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $1, $1, and $1, respectively 2 3 3
Total other comprehensive income (loss) (42) 3 3
Comprehensive Income $ 1,678 $ 796 $ 1,431
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-146
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:   
Net income $ 1,720 $ 793  $ 1,428
Adjustments to reconcile net income
to net cash provided from operating activities —   
Depreciation and amortization, total 1,193 1,142  1,100
Deferred income taxes 179 (260) 458
Pension, postretirement, and other employee benefits (146) (75) (68)
Pension and postretirement funding (200) — —
Settlement of asset retirement obligations (151) (116) (120)
Retail fuel cost over recovery – long-term 73 — —
Other deferred char ges – af filiated (108) — —
Estimated loss on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 — 1,060  —
Other , net 12 (21) (83)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —   
-Receivables 177 8 (256)
-Fossil fuel stock (41) 83 (16)
-Prepaid income taxes 102 152  (168)
-Other current assets (19) (43) (28)
-Accounts payable (92) 95 (219)
-Accrued taxes 58 58 1
-Retail fuel cost over recovery — — (84)
-Other current liabilities 150 (107) (33)
Net cash provided from operating activities 2,907 2,769  1,912
Investing Activities:   
Property additions (3,510 ) (3,116) (2,704 )
Proceeds pursuant to the Toshiba Guarantee, net of joint owner portion            — — 1,682
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund purchases (628) (839) (574)
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund sales 622 833  568
Cost of removal, net of salvage (186) (107) (100)
Change in construction payables, net of joint owner portion (122) 68 223
Payments pursuant to L TSAs (81) (54) (64)
Proceeds from dispositions and asset sales 14 138  96
Other investing activities 6 (32) (39)
Net cash used for investing activities (3,885 ) (3,109 ) (912)
Financing Activities:   
Increase (decrease) in notes payable, net (179) 294  (391)
Proceeds —   
FFB loan 1,218 — —
Senior notes 750 — 1,350
Pollution control revenue bonds issuances and remarketings 584 108  65
Capital contributions from parent company 634 2,985  431
Short-term borrowings 250 — 700
Other long-term debt — — 370
Redemptions and repurchases —   
Senior notes (500) (1,500 ) (450)
Pollution control revenue bonds (223) (469) (65)
Short-term borrowings — (150) (550)
Preferred and preference stock — — (270)
Other long-term debt — (100) —
Payment of common stock dividends (1,576 ) (1,396 ) (1,281 )
Premiums on redemption and repurchases of senior notes — (152) —
Other financing activities (40) (20) (60)
Net cash provided from (used for) financing activities 918 (400) (151)
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash (60) (740) 849
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 112 852  3
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 52 $ 112 $ 852
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:   
Cash paid during the period for —   
Interest (net of $35, $26, and $23 capitalized, respectively) $ 373 $ 408  $ 386
Income taxes (net of refunds) 110 300  496
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year -end 560 683  550
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-147
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
Assets 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Assets:  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 52$ 4
Restricted cash and cash equivalents — 108
Receivables —  
Customer accounts receivable 533 591
Unbilled revenues 203 208
Under recovered fuel clause revenues — 115
Joint owner accounts receivable 136 170
Affiliated 21 39
Other accounts and notes receivable 209 80
Accumulated provision for uncollectible accounts (2) (2)
Fossil fuel stock 272 231
Materials and supplies 501 519
Prepaid expenses 63 142
Regulatory assets – storm damage reserves 213 30
Regulatory assets – asset retirement obligations 254 —
Other regulatory assets 263 169
Other current assets 77 70
Total current assets 2,795 2,474
Property, Plant, and Equipment:  
In service 38,137 37,675
Less: Accumulated provision for depreciation 11,753 12,096
Plant in service, net of depreciation 26,384 25,579
Nuclear fuel, at amortized cost 555 550
Construction work in progress 5,650 4,833
Total property, plant, and equipment 32,589 30,962
Other Property and Investments:  
Equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries 52 51
Nuclear decommissioning trusts, at fair value 1,013 873
Miscellaneous property and investments 64 72
Total other property and investments 1,129 996
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:  
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net of amortization 1,428 —
Deferred charges related to income taxes 519 517
Regulatory assets – asset retirement obligations, deferred 2,865 2,644
Other regulatory assets, deferred 2,716 2,258
Other deferred charges and assets 500 514
Total deferred charges and other assets 8,028 5,933
Total Assets $ 44,541$ 40,365
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-148
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:  
Securities due within one year $ 1,025$ 617
Notes payable 365 294
Accounts payable —  
Affiliated 512 575
Other 711 890
Customer deposits 283 276
Accrued taxes 407 377
Accrued interest 118 105
Accrued compensation 233 221
Operating lease obligations 144 —
Asset retirement obligations 265 202
Other regulatory liabilities 447 169
Other current liabilities 187 183
Total current liabilities 4,697 3,909
Long-Term Debt (See accompanying statements) 10,791 9,364
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:  
Accumulated deferred income taxes 3,257 3,062
Deferred credits related to income taxes 2,862 3,080
Accumulated deferred ITCs 255 262
Employee benefit obligations 540 599
Operating lease obligations, deferred 1,282 —
Asset retirement obligations, deferred 5,519 5,627
Other deferred credits and liabilities 273 139
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 13,988 12,769
Total Liabilities 29,476 26,042
Common Stockholder's Equity (See accompanying statements) 15,065 14,323
Total Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity $ 44,541$ 40,365
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-149
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
 Weighted Average
Interest Rate
at December 31,
2019 2019 2018 2019 2018
 (in millions) (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:  
Long-term notes payable —  
Maturity  
2019 — $ —$ 498 
2020 2.00% 950 950 
2021 2.40% 325 325 
2022 2.85% 400 400 
2023 5.75% 100 100 
2024 2.20% 400 — 
2026-2043 4.21% 3,675 3,325 
Total long-term notes payable 5,850 5,598 
Other long-term debt —  
Pollution control revenue bonds —  
Due 2022 2.35% 53 53 
Due 2025-2053 2.37% 1,217 748 
Variable rate due 2019 — — 108 
Variable rate due 2026-2052 1.74% 551 551 
FFB loans —  
Maturity  
2020 3.20% 64 44 
2021 3.20% 64 44 
2022 3.20% 64 44 
2023 3.20% 64 44 
2024 3.20% 64 44 
2025-2044 3.20% 3,523 2,405 
Junior subordinated notes due 2077 5.00% 270 270 
Total other long-term debt 5,934 4,355 
Finance lease obligations 156 142 
Unamortized debt premium (discount), net (7) (6) 
Unamortized debt issuance expense (117) (108) 
Total long-term debt 11,816 9,981 
Less amount due within one year 1,025 617 
Long-term debt excluding amount due within one year 10,791 9,364 41.7% 39.5%
Common Stockholder's Equity:  
Common stock, without par value —  
Authorized — 20,000,000 shares  
Outstanding — 9,261,500 shares 398 398 
Paid-in capital 10,962 10,322 
Retained earnings 3,756 3,612 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (51) (9) 
Total common stockholder's equity 15,065 14,323 58.3 60.5
Total Capitalization $25,856$23,687 100.0% 100.0%
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-150
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMMON STOCKHOLDER'S EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 
 Number of
Common
Shares
IssuedCommon
StockPaid-In
Capital Retained
Earnings Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss) Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2016 9$ 398$6,885 $ 4,086 $ (13) $11,356
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 1,414 —  1,414
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 443 — —  443
Other comprehensive income — — — — 3 3
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (1,281) —  (1,281)
Other — — — (4) —  (4)
Balance at December 31, 2017 9 398 7,328 4,215 (10) 11,931
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 793 —  793
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 2,994 — —  2,994
Other comprehensive income — — — — 3 3
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (1,396) —  (1,396)
Other — — — — (2) (2)
Balance at December 31, 2018 9 398 10,322 3,612 (9) 14,323
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 1,720 —  1,720
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 640 — —  640
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — (42) (42)
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (1,576) —  (1,576)
Balance at December 31, 2019 9$ 398$10,962 $ 3,756 $ (51) $15,065
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-151
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Mississippi Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets and statements of capitalization of Mississippi Power Company (Mississippi
Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related statements of
operations, comprehensive income (loss), common stockholder's equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period
ended December 31, 2019, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial
statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Mississippi Power as of December 31, 2019 and 2018,
and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Mississippi Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
Mississippi Power's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to Mississippi Power in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Mississippi Power is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial
reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for
the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Mississippi Power's internal control over financial reporting.
Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
We have served as Mississippi Power's auditor since 2002.
II-152
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Mississippi Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:   
Retail revenues $ 877$ 889 $ 854
Wholesale revenues, non-affiliates 237 263 259
Wholesale revenues, affiliates 132 91 56
Other revenues 18 22 18
Total operating revenues 1,264 1,265 1,187
Operating Expenses:   
Fuel 407 405 395
Purchased power 20 41 25
Other operations and maintenance 283 313 291
Depreciation and amortization 192 169 161
Taxes other than income taxes 113 107 104
Estimated loss on Kemper IGCC 24 37 3,362
Total operating expenses 1,039 1,072 4,338
Operating Income (Loss) 225 193 (3,151)
Other Income and (Expense):   
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 1 — 72
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (69) (76) (42)
Other income (expense), net 12 17 1
Total other income and (expense) (56) (59) 31
Earnings (Loss) Before Income Taxes 169 134 (3,120)
Income taxes (benefit) 30 (102) (532)
Net Income (Loss) 139 236 (2,588)
Dividends on Preferred Stock — 1 2
Net Income (Loss) After Dividends on Preferred Stock $ 139$ 235 $ (2,590)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-153
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS)
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Mississippi Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018  2017
 (in millions)
Net Income (Loss) $ 139 $ 236 $ (2,588)
Other comprehensive income (loss):     
Qualifying hedges:     
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $-, $(1), and $(1), respectively — (1) (1)
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $-, $-, and $1, respectively 1 1 1
Total other comprehensive income (loss) 1 — —
Comprehensive Income (Loss) $ 140 $ 236 $ (2,588)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-154
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF  CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December  31, 2019 , 2018 , and 2017
Mississippi Power  Company 2019  Annual Report
 2019  2018 2017
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:   
Net income (loss) $ 139 $ 236$ (2,588)
Adjustments to reconcile net income (loss)
to net cash provided from operating activities —   
Depreciation and amortization, total 197 177 198
Deferred income taxes 37 475 (727)
Allowance for equity funds used during construction (1) — (72)
Pension and postretirement funding (54) — —
Settlement of asset retirement obligations (35) (35) (23)
Estimated loss on Kemper IGCC 15 33 3,179
Other, net 21 18 (8)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —   
-Receivables 6 (19) 540
-Fossil fuel stock (6) (3) 24
-Prepaid income taxes 12 (12) —
-Other current assets (2) (7) (13)
-Accounts payable 3 15 (3)
-Accrued interest — (1) (29)
-Accrued taxes 11 (46) 80
-Over recovered regulatory clause revenues 16 14 (51)
-Other current liabilities (20) (41) (4)
Net cash provided from operating activities 339 804 503
Investing Activities:   
Property additions (202) (188) (429)
Construction payables (1) 4 (47)
Payments pursuant to LTSAs (23) (29) (10)
Other investing activities (37) (19) (18)
Net cash used for investing activities (263) (232) (504)
Financing Activities:   
Decrease in notes payable, net — (4) (18)
Proceeds —   
Capital contributions from parent company 51 15 1,002
Senior notes — 600 —
Long-term debt issuance to parent company — — 40
Short-term borrowings — 300 109
Pollution control revenue bonds 43 — —
Redemptions —   
Preferred stock — (33) —
Pollution control revenue bonds — (43) —
Short-term borrowings — (300) (109)
Long-term debt to parent company — — (591)
Capital leases — — (71)
Senior notes (25) (155) (35)
Other long-term debt — (900) (300)
Return of capital to parent company (150) — —
Other financing activities (2) (7) (2)
Net cash provided from (used for) financing activities (83) (527) 25
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash (7) 45 24
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 293 248 224
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 286 $ 293$ 248
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:   
Cash paid (received) during the period for —   
Interest (net of $(1), $-, and $29 capitalized, respectively) $ 71 $ 80$ 65
Income taxes (net of refunds) (27) (525) (424)
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year-end 35 35 32
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements. 
II-155
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Mississippi Power Company 2019 Annual Report
Assets 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 286$ 293
Receivables —   
Customer accounts receivable 35 34
Unbilled revenues 39 41
Affiliated 27 21
Other accounts and notes receivable 26 31
Fossil fuel stock 26 20
Materials and supplies 61 53
Other regulatory assets 99 116
Prepaid income taxes — 12
Other current assets 10 7
Total current assets 609 628
Property, Plant, and Equipment:   
In service 4,857 4,900
Less: Accumulated provision for depreciation 1,463 1,429
Plant in service, net of depreciation 3,394 3,471
Construction work in progress 126 103
Total property, plant, and equipment 3,520 3,574
Other Property and Investments 131 24
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:   
Deferred charges related to income taxes 32 33
Regulatory assets – asset retirement obligations 210 143
Other regulatory assets, deferred 360 331
Accumulated deferred income taxes 139 150
Other deferred charges and assets 34 3
Total deferred charges and other assets 775 660
Total Assets $ 5,035$ 4,886
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-156
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Mississippi Power Company 2019 Annual Report
Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:   
Securities due within one year $ 281$ 40
Accounts payable —   
Affiliated 76 60
Other 75 90
Accrued taxes 105 95
Accrued interest 15 15
Accrued compensation 35 38
Accrued plant closure costs 15 29
Asset retirement obligations 33 34
Other regulatory liabilities 21 12
Over recovered regulatory clause liabilities 29 14
Other current liabilities 49 28
Total current liabilities 734 455
Long-Term Debt (See accompanying statements) 1,308 1,539
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:   
Accumulated deferred income taxes 424 378
Deferred credits related to income taxes 352 382
Employee benefit obligations 99 115
Asset retirement obligations, deferred 157 126
Other cost of removal obligations 189 185
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred 76 81
Other deferred credits and liabilities 44 16
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 1,341 1,283
Total Liabilities 3,383 3,277
Common Stockholder's Equity (See accompanying statements) 1,652 1,609
Total Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity $ 5,035$ 4,886
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-157
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Mississippi Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 Weighted Average
Interest Rate
at December 31,
2019 2019 2018 2019 2018
 (in millions) (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:    
Long-term notes payable —    
Due 2028-2042 4.16% $ 950$ 950  
Adjustable rate due 2020 2.59% 275 300  
Total long-term notes payable 1,225 1,250  
Other long-term debt —    
Pollution control revenue bonds —    
Due 2028 3.20% 43 —  
Variable rate due 2020 1.80% 7 40  
Variable rate due 2025-2028 1.80% 33 —  
Plant Daniel revenue bonds due 2021 7.13% 270 270  
Total other long-term debt 353 310  
Unamortized debt premium (discount), net 19 27  
Unamortized debt issuance expense (8) (8)  
Total long-term debt 1,589 1,579  
Less amount due within one year 281 40  
Long-term debt excluding amount due within one year 1,308 1,539 44.2% 48.9%
Common Stockholder's Equity:    
Common stock, without par value —    
Authorized — 1,130,000 shares   
Outstanding — 1,121,000 shares 38 38  
Paid-in capital 4,449 4,546  
Accumulated deficit (2,832)(2,971)  
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (3) (4)  
Total common stockholder's equity 1,652 1,609 55.8 51.1
Total Capitalization $2,960$3,148 100.0% 100.0%
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-158
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMMON STOCKHOLDER'S EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Mississippi Power Company 2019 Annual Report
 Number of
Common
Shares
Issued  Common
StockPaid-In
Capital Retained
Earnings
(Accumulated
Deficit)Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss) Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2016 1 $ 38$3,525 $ (616)$ (4) $2,943
Net loss after dividends on preferred
stock — — — (2,590) —  (2,590)
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 1,004 — —  1,004
Other — — — 1 —  1
Balance at December 31, 2017 1 38 4,529 (3,205) (4) 1,358
Net income after dividends on
preferred stock — — — 235 —  235
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 17 — —  17
Other — — — (1) —  (1)
Balance at December 31, 2018 1 38 4,546 (2,971) (4) 1,609
Net income after dividends on
preferred stock — — — 139 —  139
Return of capital to parent company — — (150) — —  (150)
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 53 — —  53
Other comprehensive income — — — — 1 1
Balance at December 31, 2019 1 $ 38$4,449 $ (2,832)$ (3) $1,652
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-159
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Southern Power Company and subsidiary companies (Southern
Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related consolidated
statements of income, comprehensive income, stockholders' equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2019, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial
statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Southern Power as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and
the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Southern Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
Southern Power's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to Southern Power in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Southern Power is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial
reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for
the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Southern Power's internal control over financial reporting.
Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
We have served as Southern Power's auditor since 2002.
II-160
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 
 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:    
Wholesale revenues, non-affiliates $ 1,528$ 1,757 $ 1,671
Wholesale revenues, affiliates 398 435 392
Other revenues 12 13 12
Total operating revenues 1,938 2,205 2,075
Operating Expenses:    
Fuel 577 699 621
Purchased power 108 176 149
Other operations and maintenance 359 395 386
Depreciation and amortization 479 493 503
Taxes other than income taxes 40 46 48
Asset impairment 3 156 —
Gain on dispositions, net (23) (2) —
Total operating expenses 1,543 1,963 1,707
Operating Income 395 242 368
Other Income and (Expense):    
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (169) (183) (191)
Other income (expense), net 47 23 1
Total other income and (expense) (122) (160) (190)
Earnings Before Income Taxes 273 82 178
Income taxes (benefit) (56) (164) (939)
Net Income 329 246 1,117
Net income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests (10) 59 46
Net Income Attributable to Southern Power $ 339$ 187 $ 1,071
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-161
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 
 2019  2018  2017
 (in millions)
Net Income $ 329 $ 246 $ 1,117
Other comprehensive income (loss):    
Qualifying hedges:    
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $(22), $(17), and $39, respectively (66) (51) 63
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $14, $19, and $(46), respectively 41 58 (73)
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans:    
Benefit plan net gain (loss), net of tax of $(6), $2, and $-, respectively (17) 5 —
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $-, $-, and $-, respectively — 2 —
Total other comprehensive income (loss) (42) 14 (10)
Comprehensive income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests (10) 59 46
Comprehensive Income Attributable to Southern Power $ 297 $ 201 $ 1,061
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
 
II-162
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:    
Net income $ 329 $ 246  $ 1,117
Adjustments to reconcile net income
to net cash provided from operating activities —    
Depreciation and amortization, total 505 524  536
Deferred income taxes (74) (244) (263)
Utilization of federal investment tax credits 734 5 —
Amortization of investment tax credits (151) (58) (57)
Accrued income taxes, non-current — (14) 14
Income taxes receivable, non-current 25 42 (61)
Pension and postretirement funding (24) — —
Asset impairment 3 156  —
Other , net (33) 7 (13)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —    
-Receivables 72 (20) (60)
-Prepaid income taxes 39 25 24
-Other current assets (8) (26) (28)
-Accrued taxes 6 7 (55)
-Other current liabilities (38) (19) 1
Net cash provided from operating activities 1,385 631  1,155
Investing Activities:    
Business acquisitions. net of cash acquired (50) (65) (1,016 )
Property additions (489) (315) (268)
Change in construction payables 7 (6) (153)
Investment in unconsolidated subsidiaries (116) — —
Proceeds from dispositions and asset sales 572 203  —
Payments pursuant to L TSAs and for equipment not yet received (104) (75) (203)
Other investing activities 13 31 15
Net cash used for investing activities (167) (227) (1,625 )
Financing Activities:    
Increase (decrease) in notes payable, net 449 (105) (104)
Proceeds —    
Short-term borrowings 100 200  —
Capital contributions from parent company 64 2 —
Senior notes — — 525
Other long-term debt — — 43
Redemptions —    
Senior notes (600) (350) (500)
Other long-term debt — (420) (18)
Short-term borrowings (100) (100) —
Return of capital to parent company (755) (1,650 ) —
Distributions to noncontrolling interests (256) (153) (119)
Capital contributions from noncontrolling interests 196 2,551  80
Purchase of membership interests from noncontrolling interests — — (59)
Payment of common stock dividends (206) (312) (317)
Other financing activities (12) (26) (33)
Net cash used for financing activities (1,120 ) (363) (502)
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash 98 41 (972)
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 181 140  1,112
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 279 $ 181  $ 140
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:    
Cash paid (received) during the period for —    
Interest (net of $15, $17, and $1 1 capitalized, respectively) $ 167 $ 173  $ 189
Income taxes (net of refunds and investment tax credits) (664) 79 (487)
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year -end 57 31 32
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-163
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Assets 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Assets:  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 279$ 181
Receivables —  
Customer accounts receivable 107 111
Affiliated 30 55
Other 73 116
Materials and supplies 191 220
Prepaid income taxes 36 25
Other current assets 43 37
Total current assets 759 745
Property, Plant, and Equipment:  
In service 13,270 13,271
Less: Accumulated provision for depreciation 2,464 2,171
Plant in service, net of depreciation 10,806 11,100
Construction work in progress 515 430
Total property, plant, and equipment 11,321 11,530
Other Property and Investments:  
Intangible assets, net of amortization of $69 and $61
at December 31, 2019 and December 31, 2018, respectively 322 345
Equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries 28 —
Total other property and investments 350 345
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:  
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net of amortization 369 —
Prepaid LTSAs 128 98
Accumulated deferred income taxes 551 1,186
Income taxes receivable, non-current 5 30
Assets held for sale 601 576
Other deferred charges and assets 216 373
Total deferred charges and other assets 1,870 2,263
Total Assets $ 14,300$ 14,883
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-164
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:  
Securities due within one year $ 824$ 599
Notes payable 549 100
Accounts payable —  
Affiliated 56 92
Other 85 77
Accrued taxes 26 6
Accrued interest 32 36
Other current liabilities 132 121
Total current liabilities 1,704 1,031
Long-Term Debt:  
Senior notes —  
2.375% due 2020 — 300
2.50% due 2021 300 300
1.00% due 2022 674 687
2.75% due 2023 290 290
Weighted average interest rate 4.12% at 12/31/19 due 2025-2046 2,337 2,348
Other long-term debt —  
Variable rate (3.34% at 12/31/18) due 2020 — 525
Unamortized debt premium (discount), net (8) (9)
Unamortized debt issuance expense (19) (23)
Total long-term debt 3,574 4,418
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:  
Accumulated deferred income taxes 115 105
Accumulated deferred ITCs 1,731 1,832
Operating lease obligations 376 —
Other deferred credits and liabilities 178 213
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 2,400 2,150
Total Liabilities 7,678 7,599
Common Stockholder's Equity:  
Common stock, par value $0.01 per share —  
Authorized — 1,000,000 shares  
Outstanding — 1,000 shares — —
Paid-in capital 909 1,600
Retained earnings 1,485 1,352
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) (26) 16
Total common stockholder's equity 2,368 2,968
Noncontrolling Interests 4,254 4,316
Total Stockholders' Equity 6,622 7,284
Total Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity $ 14,300$ 14,883
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-165
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Number
of
Common
Shar es
Issued  Common
Stock  Paid-In
Capital  Retained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Compr ehensive
Income  Total
Common
Stockholder's
EquityNoncontr olling
Inter ests(a) Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December  31,
2016 — $ — $3,671  $ 724 $ 35 $ 4,430 $ 1,245  $5,675
Net income attributable
   to Southern Power — — — 1,071 — 1,071 — 1,071
Capital contributions to
   parent company , net — — (2) — — (2) — (2)
Other comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — (10) (10) — (10)
Cash dividends on common
   stock — — — (317) — (317) — (317)
Other comprehensive
income
transfer from SCS(b)— — — — (27) (27) — (27)
Capital contributions from
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 79 79
Distributions to
noncontrolling
   interests — — — — — — (122) (122)
Net income attributable to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 44 44
Reclassification from
redeemable
noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 114 114
Other — — (7) — — (7) — (7)
Balance at December  31,
2017 — — 3,662  1,478 (2) 5,138 1,360  6,498
Net income attributable
   to Southern Power — — — 187 — 187 — 187
Return of capital to parent
   company — — (1,650 ) — — (1,650 ) — (1,650 )
Capital contributions from
parent
   company — — 2 — — 2 — 2
Other comprehensive
income — — — — 14 14 — 14
Cash dividends on common
   stock — — — (312) — (312) — (312)
Capital contributions from
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 1,372  1,372
Distributions to
noncontrolling
   interests — — — — — — (164) (164)
Net income attributable to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 59 59
Sale of noncontrolling
interests(c)— — (417) — — (417) 1,690  1,273
Other — — 3 (1) 4 6 (1) 5
Balance at December  31,
2018 — — 1,600  1,352 16 2,968 4,316  7,284
Net income attributable
   to Southern Power — — — 339 — 339 — 339
Return of capital to parent — — (755) — — (755) — (755)
   company
Capital contributions from
parent
   company — — 64 — — 64 — 64
Other comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — (42) (42) — (42)
Cash dividends on common
   stock — — — (206) — (206) — (206)
Capital contributions from
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 276  276
Distributions to
noncontrolling
   interests — — — — — — (327) (327)
Net income (loss)
attributable to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — (10) (10)
Other — — — — — — (1) (1)
Balance at December  31,
2019 — $ — $909  $1,485 $ (26) $ 2,368 $ 4,254  $6,622
(a)Excludes redeemable noncontrolling interests. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Noncontrolling Interests" for additional information.
(b)In connection with Southern Power becoming a participant to the Southern Company qualified pension plan and other postretirement benefit plan, $27 million
of other comprehensive income, net of tax of $9 million, was transferred from SCS.
(c)See Note 15 under "Southern Power - Sales of Renewable Facility Interests" for additional information.
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-166
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets and consolidated statements of capitalization of Southern Company
Gas and subsidiary companies (Southern Company Gas) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of
December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, common stockholder's equity,
and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, and the related notes (collectively referred to as
the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of
Southern Company Gas as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of
America.
We did not audit the financial statements of Southern Natural Gas Company, L.L.C. (SNG), Southern Company Gas' investment
which is accounted for by the use of the equity method. The accompanying consolidated financial statements of Southern Company
Gas include its equity investment in SNG of $1,137 million and $1,261 million as of December 31, 2019 and December 31, 2018,
respectively, and its earnings from its equity method investment in SNG of $141 million, $131 million, and $88 million for the
years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. Those statements were audited by other auditors whose reports
(which express unqualified opinions on SNG's financial statements and contain an emphasis of matter paragraph calling attention to
SNG's significant transactions with related parties) have been furnished to us, and our opinion, insofar as it relates to the amounts
included for SNG, is based solely on the reports of the other auditors.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Southern Company Gas' management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion on Southern Company Gas' financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the
Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to
Southern Company Gas in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the
Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Southern Company Gas is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over
financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but
not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Southern Company Gas' internal control over financial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits and the reports of the other auditors provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
We have served as Southern Company Gas' auditor since 2016.
II-167
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
  2019  2018  2017
  (in millions)
Operating Revenues:      
Natural gas revenues (includes revenue taxes of $117, $114, and $100
for the periods presented, respectively)  $ 3,793 $ 3,874 $ 3,787
Alternative revenue programs  (1) (20) 4
Other revenues  — 55 129
Total operating revenues  3,792 3,909 3,920
Operating Expenses:      
Cost of natural gas  1,319 1,539 1,601
Cost of other sales  — 12 29
Other operations and maintenance  888 981 945
Depreciation and amortization  487 500 501
Taxes other than income taxes  213 211 184
Impairment charges  115 42 —
(Gain) loss on dispositions, net  — (291) —
Total operating expenses  3,022 2,994 3,260
Operating Income  770 915 660
Other Income and (Expense):      
Earnings from equity method investments  157 148 106
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized  (232) (228) (200)
Other income (expense), net  20 1 44
Total other income and (expense)  (55) (79) (50)
Earnings Before Income Taxes  715 836 610
Income taxes  130 464 367
Net Income  $ 585 $ 372 $ 243
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-168
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019  2018  2017
 (in millions)
Net Income $ 585 $ 372 $ 243
Other comprehensive income (loss):    
Qualifying hedges:    
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $(2), $2, and $(3), respectively (5) 5 (5)
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $-, $(1), and $-, respectively 2 (1) 1
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans:    
Benefit plan net gain (loss), net of tax of $(14), $-, and $-,
respectively (16) — (1)
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $-, $3, and $-, respectively — (2) —
Total other comprehensive income (loss) (19) 2 (5)
Comprehensive Income $ 566 $ 374 $ 238
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-169
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
  2019  2018  2017
  (in millions)
Operating Activities:     
Net income  $ 585  $ 372  $ 243
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash
provided from operating activities —     
Depreciation and amortization, total  487  500  501
Deferred income taxes  213  (1) 236
Pension and postretirement funding  (145) — —
Impairment char ges  115 42 —
(Gain) loss on dispositions, net  — (291) —
Mark-to-market adjustments  (56) (19) (24)
Other , net  (55) (24) (51)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —     
-Receivables  467  (218) (94)
-Natural gas for sale  44 49 36
-Prepaid income taxes  40 (42) (39)
-Other current assets  31 4 (24)
-Accounts payable  (520) 372  (20)
-Accrued taxes  (69) 10 110
-Accrued compensation  1 32 15
-Other current liabilities  (71) (22) (8)
Net cash provided from operating activities  1,067  764  881
Investing Activities:     
Property additions  (1,408 ) (1,388 ) (1,514 )
Cost of removal, net of salvage  (82) (96) (66)
Change in construction payables, net  24 (37) 72
Investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries  (31) (110) (145)
Returned investment in unconsolidated subsidiaries  67 20 80
Proceeds from dispositions and asset sales  32 2,609  —
Other investing activities  12 — 5
Net cash provided from (used for) investing activities  (1,386 ) 998  (1,568 )
Financing Activities:     
Increase (decrease) in notes payable, net  — (868) 262
Proceeds —     
First mortgage bonds  300  300  400
Capital contributions from parent company  821  24 103
Senior notes  — — 450
Redemptions and repurchases —     
Gas facility revenue bonds  — (200) —
Medium-term notes  — — (22)
First mortgage bonds  (50) — —
Senior notes  (300) (155) —
Return of capital to parent company  — (400) —
Payment of common stock dividends  (471) (468) (443)
Other financing activities  (2) (3) (9)
Net cash provided from (used for) financing activities  298  (1,770 ) 741
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash  (21) (8) 54
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year  70 78 24
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year  $ 49 $ 70 $ 78
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:     
Cash paid (received) during the period for —     
Interest (net of $6, $7, and $1 1 capitalized, respectively)  $ 251  $ 249  $ 223
Income taxes (net of refunds)  (41) 524  72
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year -end  122  97 135
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-170
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Assets 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 46$ 64
Receivables —   
Energy marketing receivable 428 801
Customer accounts receivable 323 370
Unbilled revenues 183 213
Affiliated 5 11
Other accounts and notes receivable 114 142
Accumulated provision for uncollectible accounts (18) (30)
Natural gas for sale 479 524
Prepaid expenses 65 118
Assets from risk management activities, net of collateral 177 219
Other regulatory assets 92 73
Assets held for sale 171 —
Other current assets 41 50
Total current assets 2,106 2,555
Property, Plant, and Equipment:   
In service 16,344 15,177
Less: Accumulated depreciation 4,650 4,400
Plant in service, net of depreciation 11,694 10,777
Construction work in progress 613 580
Total property, plant, and equipment 12,307 11,357
Other Property and Investments:   
Goodwill 5,015 5,015
Equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries 1,251 1,538
Other intangible assets, net of amortization of $176 and $145
at December 31, 2019 and December 31, 2018, respectively 70 101
Miscellaneous property and investments 20 20
Total other property and investments 6,356 6,674
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:   
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net of amortization 93 —
Other regulatory assets, deferred 618 669
Other deferred charges and assets 207 193
Total deferred charges and other assets 918 862
Total Assets $ 21,687$ 21,448
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-171
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:   
Securities due within one year $ — $ 357
Notes payable 650 650
Energy marketing trade payables 442 856
Accounts payable —   
Affiliated 41 45
Other 315 402
Customer deposits 96 133
Accrued taxes —   
Accrued income taxes — 66
Other accrued taxes 71 75
Accrued interest 52 55
Accrued compensation 100 100
Liabilities from risk management activities, net of collateral 21 76
Other regulatory liabilities 94 79
Other current liabilities 128 130
Total current liabilities 2,010 3,024
Long-term Debt (See accompanying statements) 5,845 5,583
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:   
Accumulated deferred income taxes 1,219 1,016
Deferred credits related to income taxes 874 940
Employee benefit obligations 265 357
Operating lease obligations 78 —
Other cost of removal obligations 1,606 1,585
Accrued environmental remediation 233 268
Other deferred credits and liabilities 51 105
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 4,326 4,271
Total Liabilities 12,181 12,878
Common Stockholder's Equity (See accompanying statements) 9,506 8,570
Total Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity $ 21,687$ 21,448
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-172
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2019 and 2018
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Weighted Average
Interest Rate
at December 31,
2019 2019 2018 2019 2018
 (in millions) (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:   
Long-term notes payable —   
Maturity   
2019 — $ —$ 300 
2021 4.01% 330 330 
2022 8.63% 46 46 
2023 2.45% 350 350 
2025-2047 4.68% 3,134 3,134 
Total long-term notes payable 3,860 4,160 
Other long-term debt —   
First mortgage bonds —   
Maturity   
2019 — — 50 
2023 5.80% 50 50 
2026-2059 3.94% 1,525 1,225 
Total other long-term debt 1,575 1,325 
Unamortized fair value adjustment of long-term debt 430 474 
Unamortized debt discount (20) (19) 
Total long-term debt 5,845 5,940 
Less amount due within one year — 357 
Long-term debt excluding amount due within one year 5,845 5,583 38.1% 39.4%
Common Stockholder's Equity:   
Common stock — par value $0.01 per share   
Authorized — 100 million shares   
Outstanding — 100 shares   
Paid-in capital 9,697 8,856 
Accumulated deficit (198) (312) 
Accumulated other comprehensive income 7 26 
Total common stockholder's equity 9,506 8,570 61.9 60.6
Total Capitalization $15,351$14,153 100.0% 100.0%
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-173
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMMON STOCKHOLDER'S EQUITY
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 
 Number  of
Common
Shar es
IssuedCommon
StockPaid-In
Capital  Retained
Earnings
(Accumulated
Deficit)Accumulated
Other
Compr ehensive
Income (Loss) Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December  31, 2016 — $ — $ 9,095  $ (12)$ 26 $9,109
Net income — — — 243 — 243
Capital contributions from parent company — — 117 — — 117
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — (5) (5)
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (443) — (443)
Other — — 2 — (1) 1
Balance at December  31, 2017 — — 9,214  (212) 20 9,022
Net income — — — 372 — 372
Return of capital to parent company — — (400) — — (400)
Capital contributions from parent company — — 42 — — 42
Other comprehensive income — — — — 2 2
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (468) — (468)
Other — — — (4) 4 —
Balance at December  31, 2018 — — 8,856  (312) 26 8,570
Net income — — — 585 — 585
Capital contributions from parent company — — 841  — — 841
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — (19) (19)
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (471) — (471)
Balance at December  31, 2019 — $ — $ 9,697  $ (198)$ 7 $9,506
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements. 
II-174
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Notes to the Financial Statements
for
The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies
Alabama Power Company
Georgia Power Company
Mississippi Power Company
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies
Index to the Combined Notes to Financial Statements
Note  Page
1 Summary of Significant Accounting Policies II-176
2 Regulatory Matters II-193
3 Contingencies, Commitments, and Guarantees II-217
4 Revenue from Contracts with Customers II-225
5 Property, Plant, and Equipment II-229
6 Asset Retirement Obligations II-233
7 Consolidated Entities and Equity Method Investments II-237
8 Financing II-241
9 Leases II-249
10 Income Taxes II-255
11 Retirement Benefits II-264
12 Stock Compensation II-293
13 Fair Value Measurements II-297
14 Derivatives II-306
15 Acquisitions and Dispositions II-316
16 Segment and Related Information II-321
17 Quarterly Financial Information (Unaudited) II-326
Index to Applicable Notes to Financial Statements by Registrant
The following notes to the financial statements are a combined presentation; however, information contained herein relating to any
individual Registrant is filed by such Registrant on its own behalf and each Registrant makes no representation as to information
related to the other Registrants. The list below indicates the Registrants to which each note applies.
Registrant Applicable Notes
Southern Company 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17
Alabama Power 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 17
Georgia Power 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 17
Mississippi Power 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 17
Southern Power 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 17
Southern Company Gas 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17
II-175
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
General
Southern Company is the parent company of three traditional electric operating companies, as well as Southern Power, Southern
Company Gas, SCS, Southern Linc, Southern Holdings, Southern Nuclear, PowerSecure, and other direct and indirect subsidiaries.
The traditional electric operating companies – Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power – are vertically integrated
utilities providing electric service in three Southeastern states. On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of Gulf
Power (another traditional electric operating company through December 31, 2018) to NextEra Energy. Southern Power develops,
constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including renewable energy projects, and sells electricity at
market-based rates in the wholesale market. Southern Company Gas distributes natural gas through natural gas distribution utilities,
including Nicor Gas (Illinois), Atlanta Gas Light (Georgia), Virginia Natural Gas, and Chattanooga Gas (Tennessee). In 2018,
Southern Company Gas sold its other natural gas utilities – Elizabethtown Gas (New Jersey), Florida City Gas, and Elkton Gas
(Maryland). Southern Company Gas is also involved in several other complementary businesses including gas pipeline
investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services. SCS, the system service company, provides, at cost, specialized
services to Southern Company and its subsidiary companies. Southern Linc provides digital wireless communications for use by
Southern Company and its subsidiary companies and also markets these services to the public and provides fiber optics services
within the Southeast. Southern Holdings is an intermediate holding company subsidiary, primarily for Southern Company's
leveraged lease and other investments. Southern Nuclear operates and provides services to the Southern Company system's nuclear
power plants, including Alabama Power's Plant Farley and Georgia Power's Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2, and is
currently managing construction of and developing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which are co-owned by Georgia Power.
PowerSecure provides energy solutions to electric utilities and their customers in the areas of distributed generation, energy storage
and renewables, and energy efficiency. See Note 15 for information regarding disposition activities at Southern Power and Southern
Company Gas, as well as additional information regarding Southern Company's sale of Gulf Power.
The Registrants' financial statements reflect investments in subsidiaries on a consolidated basis. Intercompany transactions have
been eliminated in consolidation. The equity method is used for investments in entities in which a Registrant has significant
influence but does not have control and for VIEs where a Registrant has an equity investment but is not the primary beneficiary.
Southern Power has partial ownership in certain legal entities for which the contractual provisions represent profit-sharing
arrangements because the allocations of cash distributions and tax benefits are not based on fixed ownership percentages. For these
arrangements, the noncontrolling interest is accounted for under a balance sheet approach utilizing the HLBV method. The HLBV
method calculates each partner's share of income based on the change in net equity the partner can legally claim in a HLBV at the
end of the period compared to the beginning of the period. See "Variable Interest Entities" herein and Note 7 for additional
information.
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, certain subsidiaries of Southern Company Gas, and certain other
subsidiaries are subject to regulation by the FERC, and the traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution
utilities are also subject to regulation by their respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies. As such, the
respective financial statements of the Registrants reflect the effects of rate regulation in accordance with GAAP and comply with
the accounting policies and practices prescribed by relevant state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies.
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires the use of estimates, and the actual results may differ
from those estimates. Certain prior years' data presented in the financial statements have been reclassified to conform to the current
year presentation. These reclassifications had no impact on the Registrants' results of operations, financial position, or cash flows.
In addition, during 2018, Southern Company Gas recast its reportable segments. See Note 16 under "Southern Company Gas" for
additional information.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, Southern Company and Southern Power each had assets and liabilities held for sale on their
balance sheets. At December 31, 2019, Southern Company Gas had assets and liabilities held for sale on its balance sheet. Unless
otherwise noted, the disclosures herein related to specific asset and liability balances at December 31, 2019 and 2018 exclude assets
and liabilities held for sale. See Note 15 under "Assets Held for Sale" for additional information including major classes of assets
and liabilities classified as held for sale by Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas.
Recently Adopted Accounting Standards
See Note 4 for information on the Registrants' adoption of ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (ASC 606) effective
January 1, 2018.
II-176
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
In 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842) (ASU 2016-02). ASU 2016-02 requires lessees to recognize on the
balance sheet a lease liability and a right-of-use asset for all leases. ASU 2016-02 also changes the recognition, measurement, and
presentation of expense associated with leases and provides clarification regarding the identification of certain components of
contracts that would represent a lease. The accounting required by lessors is relatively unchanged and there is no change to the
accounting for existing leveraged leases. The Registrants adopted the new standard effective January 1, 2019. See Note 9 for
additional information and related disclosures.
Affiliate Transactions
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas have agreements with SCS under which
certain of the following services are rendered to them at direct or allocated cost: general executive and advisory, general and design
engineering, operations, purchasing, accounting, finance, treasury, legal, tax, information technology, marketing, auditing,
insurance and pension administration, human resources, systems and procedures, digital wireless communications, cellular tower
space, and other services with respect to business and operations, construction management, and Southern Company power pool
transactions. These costs are primarily included in other operations and maintenance expenses or capitalized to property, plant, and
equipment. Costs for these services from SCS in 2019, 2018, and 2017 were as follows:
 Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power(*)Southern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
2019 $ 527$ 704$ 118$ 90$ 183
2018 508 653 104 98 194
2017 479 625 140 218 63
(*)Prior to December 2017, Southern Power had no employees but was billed for employee-related costs from SCS.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power also have agreements with Southern Nuclear under which Southern Nuclear renders the
following nuclear-related services at cost: general executive and advisory services; general operations, management, and technical
services; administrative services including procurement, accounting, employee relations, systems, and procedures services;
strategic planning and budgeting services; other services with respect to business and operations; and, for Georgia Power,
construction management. These costs are primarily included in other operations and maintenance expenses or capitalized to
property, plant, and equipment. Costs for these services in 2019, 2018, and 2017 amounted to $256 million, $247 million, and $248
million, respectively, for Alabama Power and $760 million, $780 million, and $675 million, respectively, for Georgia Power. See
Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information regarding Southern Nuclear's construction
management of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 for Georgia Power.
Cost allocation methodologies used by SCS and Southern Nuclear prior to the repeal of the Public Utility Holding Company Act of
1935, as amended, were approved by the SEC. Subsequently, additional cost allocation methodologies have been reported to the
FERC and management believes they are reasonable. The FERC permits services to be rendered at cost by system service
companies.
Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's power purchases from affiliates through the Southern Company power pool are included in
purchased power, affiliates on their respective statements of income. Mississippi Power's and Southern Power's power purchases
from affiliates through the Southern Company power pool are included in purchased power on their respective statements of
income and were as follows:
 Mississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
2019 $ 3$ 14
2018 15 41
2017 16 27
Georgia Power has entered into several PPAs with Southern Power for capacity and energy. Georgia Power's total expenses
associated with these PPAs were $177 million, $216 million, and $235 million in 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. Southern
Power's total revenues from all PPAs with Georgia Power, included in wholesale revenue affiliates on Southern Power's
consolidated statements of income, were $174 million, $215 million, and $233 million for 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
II-177
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Included within these revenues were affiliate PPAs accounted for as operating leases, which totaled $116 million, $65 million, and
$81 million for 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. See Note 9 for additional information.
SCS (as agent for Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Southern Power) and Southern Company Gas have long-term interstate
natural gas transportation agreements with SNG. The interstate transportation service provided to Alabama Power, Georgia Power,
Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas by SNG pursuant to these agreements is governed by the terms and conditions of
SNG's natural gas tariff and is subject to FERC regulation. See Note 7 under "Southern Company Gas – Equity Method
Investments – SNG" for additional information. Transportation costs under these agreements in 2019, 2018, and 2017 were as
follows:
 Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
2019 $ 17$ 99$ 28$ 31
2018 8 101 25 32
2017 9 102 25 32
In November 2018, SNG purchased the natural gas lateral pipeline serving Plant McDonough Units 4 through 6 from Georgia
Power at net book value, as approved by the Georgia PSC. In January 2020, SNG paid Georgia Power $142 million, which
included $71 million contributed to SNG by Southern Company Gas for its proportionate share. During the interim period, Georgia
Power received a discounted shipping rate to reflect the deferred consideration and SNG constructed an extension to the pipeline.
SCS, as agent for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power, has agreements with certain subsidiaries of
Southern Company Gas to purchase natural gas. Natural gas purchases made under these agreements were immaterial for Alabama
Power and Mississippi Power and as follows for Georgia Power and Southern Power in 2019, 2018, and 2017:
 Georgia
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
2019 $ 4$ 64
2018 21 119
2017 22 119
Alabama Power and Mississippi Power jointly own Plant Greene County. The companies have an agreement under which Alabama
Power operates Plant Greene County and Mississippi Power reimburses Alabama Power for its proportionate share of non-fuel
operations and maintenance expenses, which totaled $9 million, $8 million, and $9 million in 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
See Note 5 under "Joint Ownership Agreements" for additional information.
Alabama Power has an agreement with Gulf Power under which Alabama Power made transmission system upgrades to ensure firm
delivery of energy under a non-affiliate PPA from a combined cycle plant located in Autauga County, Alabama. Under a related
tariff, Alabama Power received $11 million in each of 2018 and 2017. See Note 15 under "Southern Company" for information
regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
Alabama Power has agreements with PowerSecure for services related to utility infrastructure construction, distributed energy, and
energy efficiency projects. Costs for these services amounted to approximately $7 million, $24 million, and $11 million in 2019,
2018, and 2017, respectively.
See Note 7 under "SEGCO" for information regarding Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's equity method investment in SEGCO
and related affiliate purchased power costs, as well as Alabama Power's gas pipeline ownership agreement with SEGCO.
Georgia Power has a joint ownership agreement with Gulf Power under which Gulf Power owns a 25% portion of Plant Scherer
Unit 3. Under this agreement, Georgia Power operates Plant Scherer Unit 3 and Gulf Power reimburses Georgia Power for its 25%
proportionate share of the related non-fuel expenses, which were $8 million and $11 million in 2018 and 2017, respectively. See
Note 5 under "Joint Ownership Agreements" and Note 15 under "Southern Company" for additional information.
Mississippi Power has an agreement with Gulf Power under which Gulf Power owns a portion of Plant Daniel. Mississippi Power
operates Plant Daniel and Gulf Power reimburses Mississippi Power for its proportionate share of all associated non-fuel
II-178
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
operations and maintenance expenses, which totaled $31 million in each of 2018 and 2017. See Note 5 under "Joint Ownership
Agreements" and Note 15 under "Southern Company" for additional information.
Southern Power has several agreements with SCS for transmission services. Transmission services purchased by Southern Power
from SCS totaled $15 million, $12 million, and $13 million for 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively, and were charged to other
operations and maintenance expenses in Southern Power's consolidated statements of income. All charges were billed to Southern
Power based on the Southern Company Open Access Transmission Tariff as filed with the FERC.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power may jointly enter into various types of wholesale energy, natural
gas, and certain other contracts, either directly or through SCS as agent. Each participating company may be jointly and severally
liable for the obligations incurred under these agreements. See Note 14 under "Contingent Features" for additional information.
Southern Power and the traditional electric operating companies generally settle amounts related to the above transactions on a
monthly basis in the month following the performance of such services or the purchase or sale of electricity. See "Revenues –
Southern Power" herein for additional information.
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas provide incidental services to and
receive such services from other Southern Company subsidiaries which are generally minor in duration and amount. Except as
described herein, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas neither provided nor
received any material services to or from affiliates in any year presented.
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities are subject to accounting requirements for the
effects of rate regulation. Regulatory assets represent probable future revenues associated with certain costs that are expected to be
recovered from customers through the ratemaking process. Regulatory liabilities represent probable future reductions in revenues
associated with amounts that are expected to be credited to customers through the ratemaking process.
In the event that a portion of a traditional electric operating company's or a natural gas distribution utility's operations is no longer
subject to applicable accounting rules for rate regulation, such company would be required to write off to income or reclassify to
AOCI related regulatory assets and liabilities that are not specifically recoverable through regulated rates. In addition, the
traditional electric operating company or natural gas distribution utility would be required to determine if any impairment to other
assets, including plant, exists and write down the assets, if impaired, to their fair values. All regulatory assets and liabilities are to
be reflected in rates. See Note 2 for additional information including details of regulatory assets and liabilities reflected in the
balance sheets for Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Company Gas.
Revenues
The Registrants generate revenues from a variety of sources which are accounted for under various revenue accounting guidance,
including ASC 606, lease, derivative, and regulatory accounting. Other than the timing of recognition of guaranteed and fixed
billing arrangements at Southern Company Gas, the adoption of ASC 606 in 2018 had no impact on the timing or amount of
revenue recognized under previous guidance. See Note 4 for information regarding the Registrants' adoption of ASC 606 and
related disclosures.
Traditional Electric Operating Companies
The majority of the revenues of the traditional electric operating companies are generated from contracts with retail electric
customers. Retail revenues recognized under ASC 606 are consistent with prior revenue recognition policies. These revenues,
generated from the integrated service to deliver electricity when and if called upon by the customer, are recognized as a single
performance obligation satisfied over time, at a tariff rate, and as electricity is delivered to the customer during the month. Unbilled
revenues related to retail sales are accrued at the end of each fiscal period. Retail rates may include provisions to adjust billings for
fluctuations in fuel costs, fuel hedging, the energy component of purchased power costs, and certain other costs. Revenues are
adjusted for differences between these actual costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. Under or over recovered
regulatory clause revenues are recorded in the balance sheets and are recovered from or returned to customers, respectively, through
adjustments to the billing factors. See Note 2 for additional information regarding regulatory matters of the traditional electric
operating companies.
Wholesale capacity revenues from PPAs are recognized either on a levelized basis over the appropriate contract period or the
amount billable under the contract terms. Energy and other revenues are generally recognized as services are provided. The
accounting for these revenues under ASC 606 is consistent with prior revenue recognition policies. The contracts for capacity and
energy in a wholesale PPA have multiple performance obligations where the contract's total transaction price is allocated to each
performance obligation based on the standalone selling price. The standalone selling price is primarily determined by the price
II-179
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
charged to customers for the specific goods or services transferred with the performance obligations. Generally, the traditional
electric operating companies recognize revenue as the performance obligations are satisfied over time as electricity is delivered to
the customer or as generation capacity is available to the customer.
For both retail and wholesale revenues, the traditional electric operating companies generally have a right to consideration in an
amount that corresponds directly with the value to the customer of the entity's performance completed to date and may recognize
revenue in the amount to which the entity has a right to invoice and has elected to recognize revenue for its sales of electricity and
capacity using the invoice practical expedient. In addition, payment for goods and services rendered is typically due in the
subsequent month following satisfaction of the Registrants' performance obligation.
Southern Power
Southern Power sells capacity and energy at rates specified under contractual terms in long-term PPAs. These PPAs are accounted
for as operating leases, non-derivatives, or normal sale derivatives. Capacity revenues from PPAs classified as operating leases are
recognized on a straight-line basis over the term of the agreement. Energy revenues are recognized in the period the energy is
delivered.
Southern Power's non-lease contracts commonly include capacity and energy which are considered separate performance
obligations. In these contracts, the total transaction price is allocated to each performance obligation based on the standalone selling
price. The standalone selling price is primarily determined by the price charged to customers for the specific goods or services
transferred with the performance obligations. Generally, Southern Power recognizes revenue as the performance obligations are
satisfied over time, as electricity is delivered to the customer or as generation capacity is made available to the customer.
Southern Power generally has a right to consideration in an amount that corresponds directly with the value to the customer of the
entity's performance completed to date and may recognize revenue in the amount to which the entity has a right to invoice. In
addition, payment for goods and services rendered is typically due in the subsequent month following satisfaction of Southern
Power's performance obligation.
When multiple contracts exist with the same counterparty, the revenues from each contract are accounted for as separate
arrangements.
Southern Power may also enter into contracts to sell short-term capacity in the wholesale electricity markets. These sales are
generally classified as mark-to-market derivatives and net unrealized gains and losses on such contracts are recorded in wholesale
revenues. See Note 14 and "Financial Instruments" herein for additional information.
Southern Company Gas
Gas Distribution Operations
Southern Company Gas records revenues when goods or services are provided to customers. Those revenues are based on rates
approved by the state regulatory agencies of the natural gas distribution utilities. The natural gas market for Atlanta Gas Light was
deregulated in 1997. Accordingly, Marketers, rather than a traditional utility, sell natural gas to end-use customers in Georgia and
handle customer billing functions. As required by the Georgia PSC, Atlanta Gas Light bills Marketers in equal monthly installments
for each residential, commercial, and industrial end-use customer's distribution costs as well as for capacity costs utilizing a
seasonal rate design for the calculation of each residential end-use customer's annual straight-fixed-variable charge, which reflects
the historic volumetric usage pattern for the entire residential class.
The majority of the revenues of Southern Company Gas are generated from contracts with natural gas distribution customers.
Revenues from this integrated service to deliver gas when and if called upon by the customer is recognized as a single performance
obligation satisfied over time and is recognized at a tariff rate as gas is delivered to the customer during the month.
The standalone selling price is primarily determined by the price charged to customers for the specific goods or services transferred
with the performance obligations. Generally, Southern Company Gas recognizes revenue as the performance obligations are
satisfied over time as natural gas is delivered to the customer. The performance obligations related to wholesale gas services are
satisfied, and revenue is recognized, at a point in time when natural gas is delivered to the customer.
Southern Company Gas generally has a right to consideration in an amount that corresponds directly with the value to the customer
of the entity's performance completed to date and may recognize revenue in the amount to which the entity has a right to invoice
and has elected to recognize revenue for its sales of natural gas using the invoice practical expedient. In addition, payment for
goods and services rendered is typically due in the subsequent month following satisfaction of Southern Company Gas'
performance obligation.
II-180
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, the natural gas distribution utilities have rate structures that include volumetric rate
designs that allow the opportunity to recover certain costs based on gas usage. Revenues from sales and transportation services are
recognized in the same period in which the related volumes are delivered to customers. Revenues from residential and certain
commercial and industrial customers are recognized on the basis of scheduled meter readings. Additionally, unbilled revenues are
recognized for estimated deliveries of gas not yet billed to these customers, from the last bill date to the end of the accounting
period. For other commercial and industrial customers and for all wholesale customers, revenues are based on actual deliveries
through the end of the period.
The tariffs for several of the natural gas distribution utilities include provisions which allow for the recognition of certain revenues
prior to the time such revenues are billed to customers. These provisions are referred to as alternative revenue programs and
provide for the recognition of certain revenues prior to billing, as long as the amounts recognized will be collected from customers
within 24 months of recognition. These programs are as follows:
•Weather normalization adjustments – reduce customer bills when winter weather is colder than normal and increase
customer bills when weather is warmer than normal and are included in the tariffs for Virginia Natural Gas, Chattanooga
Gas, and, prior to its sale, Elizabethtown Gas;
•Revenue normalization mechanisms – mitigate the impact of conservation and declining customer usage and are contained
in the tariffs for Virginia Natural Gas, Chattanooga Gas, Nicor Gas (effective November 1, 2019), and, prior to its sale,
Elkton Gas; and
•Revenue true-up adjustment – included within the provisions of the GRAM program in which Atlanta Gas Light
participates as a short-term alternative to formal rate case filings, the revenue true-up feature provides for a monthly
positive (or negative) adjustment to record revenue in the amount of any variance to budgeted revenues, which are
submitted and approved annually as a requirement of GRAM. Such adjustments are reflected in customer billings in a
subsequent program year.
Wholesale Gas Services
Southern Company Gas nets revenues from energy and risk management activities with the associated costs. Profits from sales
between segments are eliminated and are recognized as goods or services sold to end-use customers. Southern Company Gas
records transactions that qualify as derivatives at fair value with changes in fair value recognized in earnings in the period of
change and characterized as unrealized gains or losses. Gains and losses on derivatives held for energy trading purposes are
presented on a net basis in revenue.
Gas Marketing Services
Southern Company Gas recognizes revenues from natural gas sales and transportation services in the same period in which the
related volumes are delivered to customers and recognizes sales revenues from residential and certain commercial and industrial
customers on the basis of scheduled meter readings. Southern Company Gas also recognizes unbilled revenues for estimated
deliveries of gas not yet billed to these customers from the most recent meter reading date to the end of the accounting period. For
other commercial and industrial customers and for all wholesale customers, revenues are based on actual deliveries during the
period.
Southern Company Gas recognizes revenues on 12-month utility-bill management contracts as the lesser of cumulative earned or
cumulative billed amounts. Prior to the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions in 2018, revenues for warranty and repair contracts were
recognized on a straight-line basis over the contract term while revenues for maintenance services were recognized at the time such
services were performed. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions" for additional
information.
Concentration of Revenue
Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power (with the exception of its cost-based MRA electric tariffs
described below), and Southern Company Gas each have a diversified base of customers and no single customer or industry
comprises 10% or more of each company's revenues.
Mississippi Power serves long-term contracts with rural electric cooperative associations and municipalities located in southeastern
Mississippi under cost-based MRA electric tariffs, which are subject to regulation by the FERC. The contracts with these wholesale
customers represented 15.7% of Mississippi Power's total operating revenues in 2019 and are generally subject to 10-year rolling
cancellation notices. Historically, these wholesale customers have acted as a group and any changes in contractual relationships for
one customer are likely to be followed by the other wholesale customers.
II-181
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Significant portions of Southern Power's revenues have been derived from certain customers pursuant to PPAs. The following table
shows the percentage of total revenues for Southern Power's top three customers for each of the years presented:
 2019 2018 2017
Georgia Power 9.0% 9.8% 11.3%
Duke Energy Corporation N/A 6.8% 6.7%
Southern California Edison 6.8% 6.2% N/A
Morgan Stanley Capital Group 4.9% N/A 4.5%
On January 29, 2019, Pacific Gas & Electric Company (PG&E) filed petitions to reorganize under Chapter 11 of the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code. Southern Power, together with its noncontrolling partners, owns four solar facilities where PG&E is the energy
off-taker for approximately 207 MWs of capacity under long-term PPAs. PG&E is also the transmission provider for these four
facilities and two of Southern Power's other solar facilities. At December 31, 2019, Southern Power had outstanding accounts
receivables due from PG&E of $2 million related to the PPAs and $33 million related to the transmission interconnections (of
which $27 million is classified in receivables – other and $6 million is classified in other deferred charges and assets). Subsequent
to December 31, 2019, Southern Power received $15 million in accordance with a November 2019 bankruptcy court order granting
payment of transmission interconnections for amounts due and owing. Southern Power continues to evaluate the recoverability of
its investments in these solar facilities under various scenarios, including selling the related energy into the competitive markets,
and has concluded that these solar facilities are not impaired. PG&E has continued to perform under the terms of the PPAs.
Southern Power does not expect a material impact to its financial statements if, as a result of the bankruptcy proceedings, PG&E
does not perform in accordance with the PPAs or the terms of the PPAs are renegotiated; however, the ultimate outcome of this
matter cannot be determined at this time.
Fuel Costs
Fuel costs for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power are expensed as the fuel is used. Fuel expense
generally includes fuel transportation costs and the cost of purchased emissions allowances as they are used. For Alabama Power
and Georgia Power, fuel expense also includes the amortization of the cost of nuclear fuel. For the traditional electric operating
companies, fuel costs also include gains and/or losses from fuel-hedging programs as approved by their respective state PSCs.
Cost of Natural Gas
Excluding Atlanta Gas Light, which does not sell natural gas to end-use customers, Southern Company Gas charges its utility
customers for natural gas consumed using natural gas cost recovery mechanisms set by the applicable state regulatory agencies.
Under these mechanisms, all prudently-incurred natural gas costs are passed through to customers without markup, subject to
regulatory review. Southern Company Gas defers or accrues the difference between the actual cost of natural gas and the amount of
commodity revenue earned in a given period such that no operating income is recognized related to these costs. The deferred or
accrued amount is either billed or refunded to customers prospectively through adjustments to the commodity rate. Deferred and
accrued natural gas costs are included in the balance sheets as regulatory assets and regulatory liabilities, respectively.
Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services' customers are charged for actual or estimated natural gas consumed. Within cost of
natural gas, Southern Company Gas also includes costs of lost and unaccounted for gas, adjustments to reduce the value of
inventories to market value, and gains and losses associated with certain derivatives.
Income Taxes
The Registrants use the liability method of accounting for deferred income taxes and provide deferred income taxes for all
significant income tax temporary differences. In accordance with regulatory requirements, deferred federal ITCs for the traditional
electric operating companies are deferred and amortized over the average life of the related property, with such amortization
normally applied as a credit to reduce depreciation and amortization in the statements of income. Southern Power's and the natural
gas distribution utilities' deferred federal ITCs, as well as certain state ITCs for Nicor Gas, are deferred and amortized to income
tax expense over the life of the respective asset.
Under current tax law, certain projects at Southern Power related to the construction of renewable facilities are eligible for federal
ITCs. Southern Power estimates eligible costs which, as they relate to acquisitions, may not be finalized until the allocation of the
purchase price to assets has been finalized. Southern Power applies the deferred method to ITCs. Under the deferred method, the
ITCs are recorded as a deferred credit and amortized to income tax expense over the life of the respective asset. Furthermore, the
tax basis of the asset is reduced by 50% of the ITCs received, resulting in a net deferred tax asset. Southern Power has elected to
II-182
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
recognize the tax benefit of this basis difference as a reduction to income tax expense in the year in which the plant reaches
commercial operation. State ITCs are recognized as an income tax benefit in the period in which the credits are generated. In
addition, certain projects are eligible for federal and state PTCs, which are recognized as an income tax benefit based on KWH
production.
Federal ITCs and PTCs, as well as state ITCs and other state tax credits available to reduce income taxes payable, were not fully
utilized in 2019 and will be carried forward and utilized in future years. In addition, Southern Company is expected to have various
state net operating loss (NOL) carryforwards for certain of its subsidiaries, which would result in income tax benefits in the future,
if utilized. See Note 10 under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes – Tax Credit Carryforwards" and " – Net Operating Loss
Carryforwards" for additional information.
The Registrants recognize tax positions that are "more likely than not" of being sustained upon examination by the appropriate
taxing authorities. See Note 10 under "Unrecognized Tax Benefits" for additional information.
Other Taxes
Taxes imposed on and collected from customers on behalf of governmental agencies are presented net on the Registrants'
statements of income and are excluded from the transaction price in determining the revenue related to contracts with a customer
accounted for under ASC 606.
Southern Company Gas is taxed on its gas revenues by various governmental authorities, but is allowed to recover these taxes from
its customers. Revenue taxes imposed on the natural gas distribution utilities are recorded at the amount charged to customers,
which may include a small administrative fee, as operating revenues, and the related taxes imposed on Southern Company Gas are
recorded as operating expenses on the statements of income. Revenue taxes included in operating expenses were $114 million, $111
million, and $98 million in 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
Allowance for Funds Used During Construction and Interest Capitalized
The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities, with the exception of Elizabethtown Gas and
Elkton Gas prior to their sales, record AFUDC, which represents the estimated debt and equity costs of capital funds that are
necessary to finance the construction of new regulated facilities. While cash is not realized currently, AFUDC increases the revenue
requirement and is recovered over the service life of the asset through a higher rate base and higher depreciation. The equity
component of AFUDC is not taxable.
Interest related to financing the construction of new facilities at Southern Power and new facilities not included in the traditional
electric operating companies' and Southern Company Gas' regulated rates is capitalized in accordance with standard interest
capitalization requirements.
Total AFUDC and interest capitalized for the Registrants in 2019, 2018, and 2017 was as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
Power(*)Mississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
2019 $ 202$ 71$ 103$ —$ 15$ 13
2018 210 84 94 — 17 14
2017 249 54 63 72 11 19
(*)See Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for information on the inclusion of a portion of construction costs related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4 in Georgia Power's rate base.
II-183
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The average AFUDC composite rates for 2019, 2018, and 2017 for the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas
distribution utilities were as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
Alabama Power 8.4% 8.3% 8.3%
Georgia Power(*)6.9% 7.3% 5.6%
Mississippi Power 7.3% 3.3% 6.7%
Southern Company Gas:  
Atlanta Gas Light 7.8% 7.9% 8.1%
Chattanooga Gas 7.1% 7.4% 7.4%
Nicor Gas 2.3% 2.1% 1.2%
(*)Excludes AFUDC related to the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional
information.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets
The Registrants evaluate long-lived assets and finite-lived intangible assets for impairment when events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the carrying value of such assets may not be recoverable. The determination of whether an impairment
has occurred is based on either a specific regulatory disallowance, a sales transaction price that is less than the asset group's
carrying value, or an estimate of undiscounted future cash flows attributable to the asset group, as compared with the carrying value
of the assets. If an impairment has occurred, the amount of the impairment recognized is determined by either the amount of
regulatory disallowance or by estimating the fair value of the assets and recording a loss if the carrying value is greater than the fair
value. For assets identified as held for sale, the carrying value is compared to the estimated fair value less the cost to sell in order to
determine if an impairment loss is required. Until the assets are disposed of, their estimated fair value is re-evaluated when
circumstances or events change. See Note 3 under "Other Matters – Southern Company" and " – Southern Company Gas" and Note
15 under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline" for information regarding
impairment charges recorded in 2019 and Note 15 under "Southern Power" for information regarding impairment charges recorded
at Southern Power in 2018. Also see "Revenues" herein for additional information.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets and Liabilities
Southern Power's intangible assets consist primarily of certain PPAs acquired, which are amortized over the term of the respective
PPA. Southern Company Gas' goodwill and other intangible assets and liabilities primarily relate to its 2016 acquisition by
Southern Company. In addition to these items, Southern Company's goodwill and other intangible assets also relate to its 2016
acquisition of PowerSecure.
Goodwill is not amortized, but is subject to an annual impairment test during the fourth quarter of each year, or more frequently if
impairment indicators arise, as discussed below. Southern Company and Southern Company Gas each evaluated its goodwill in the
fourth quarter 2019 and determined no additional impairment was required.
A goodwill impairment charge of $32 million was recorded in the second quarter 2019 in contemplation of the July 22, 2019 sale of
PowerSecure's utility infrastructure services business. In the third quarter 2019, impairment charges of $2 million and $3 million
were recorded to goodwill and other intangible assets, net, respectively, in contemplation of the December 31, 2019 sale of
PowerSecure's lighting business. See Note 15 under "Southern Company" for additional information.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, goodwill was as follows:
 At December 31,
2019At December 31,
2018
 (in millions)
Southern Company $ 5,280$ 5,315
Southern Company Gas:  
Gas distribution operations $ 4,034$ 4,034
Gas marketing services 981 981
Southern Company Gas total $ 5,015$ 5,015
II-184
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, other intangible assets were as follows:
 At December 31, 2019  At December 31, 2018
 Gross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationOther
Intangible
Assets, Net Gross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationOther
Intangible
Assets, Net
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Southern Company     
Other intangible assets subject to
amortization:     
Customer relationships(a)$ 212$ (116)$ 96 $ 223$ (94)$ 129
Trade names(a)64 (25) 39 70 (21) 49
Storage and transportation
contracts 64 (62) 2 64 (54) 10
PPA fair value adjustments(b)390 (69) 321 405 (61) 344
Other 11 (8) 3 11 (5) 6
Total other intangible assets
subject to amortization $ 741$ (280)$ 461$ 773$ (235)$ 538
Other intangible assets not
subject to amortization:     
Federal Communications
Commission licenses 75 — 75 75 — 75
Total other intangible assets $ 816$ (280)$ 536$ 848$ (235)$ 613
     
Southern Power     
Other intangible assets subject to
amortization:     
PPA fair value adjustments(b)$ 390$ (69)$ 321 $ 405$ (61)$ 344
     
Southern Company Gas     
Other intangible assets subject to
amortization:     
Gas marketing services     
Customer relationships $ 156$ (104)$ 52 $ 156$ (84)$ 72
Trade names 26 (10) 16 26 (7) 19
Wholesale gas services     
Storage and transportation
contracts 64 (62) 2 64 (54) 10
Total other intangible assets
subject to amortization $ 246$ (176)$ 70 $ 246$ (145)$ 101
(a)The decrease in the gross carrying amount during 2019 primarily reflects the sales of two PowerSecure business units. See Note 15 for additional information.
(b)The decrease in the gross carrying amount during 2019 reflects the sale of Plant Nacogdoches, partially offset by additional PPA fair value adjustments related
to the acquisition of DSGP. See Note 15 under "Southern Power" for additional information.
II-185
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Amortization associated with other intangible assets in 2019, 2018, and 2017 was as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Southern Company(a)$ 61$ 89$ 124
Southern Power(b)19 25 25
Southern Company Gas:  
Gas marketing services $ 23$ 32$ 54
Wholesale gas services(b)8 20 32
Southern Company Gas total $ 31$ 52$ 86
(a)Includes $27 million, $45 million, and $57 million in 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively, recorded as a reduction to operating revenues.
(b)Recorded as a reduction to operating revenues.
At December 31, 2019, the estimated amortization associated with other intangible assets for the next five years is as follows:
 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024
 (in millions)
Southern Company(*)$ 48$ 42$ 38$ 37$ 35
Southern Power(*)20 20 20 20 20
Southern Company Gas 19 13 10 9 7
(*)Excludes amounts related to held for sale assets. See Note 15 under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" for additional information.
Intangible liabilities of $91 million recorded under acquisition accounting for transportation contracts at Southern Company Gas
were fully amortized as of December 31, 2019.
Acquisition Accounting
At the time of an acquisition, management will assess whether acquired assets and activities meet the definition of a business. For
acquisitions that meet the definition of a business, operating results from the date of acquisition are included in the acquiring
entity's financial statements. The purchase price, including any contingent consideration, is allocated based on the fair value of the
identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed (including any intangible assets). Assets acquired that do not meet the definition
of a business are accounted for as an asset acquisition. The purchase price of each asset acquisition is allocated based on the
relative fair value of assets acquired.
Determining the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed requires management judgment and management may engage
independent valuation experts to assist in this process. Fair values are determined by using market participant assumptions and
typically include the timing and amounts of future cash flows, incurred construction costs, the nature of acquired contracts,
discount rates, power market prices, and expected asset lives. Any due diligence or transition costs incurred for potential or
successful acquisitions are expensed as incurred.
Historically, contingent consideration primarily relates to fixed amounts due to the seller once an acquired construction project is
placed in service. For contingent consideration with variable payments, management fair values the arrangement with any changes
recorded in the statements of income. See Note 13 for additional fair value information.
Development Costs
For Southern Power, development costs are capitalized once a project is probable of completion, primarily based on a review of its
economics and operational feasibility, as well as the status of power off-take agreements and regulatory approvals, if applicable.
Southern Power's capitalized development costs are included in CWIP on the balance sheets. All of Southern Power's development
costs incurred prior to the determination that a project is probable of completion are expensed as incurred and included in other
operations and maintenance expense in the statements of income. If it is determined that a project is no longer probable of
completion, any of Southern Power's capitalized development costs are expensed and included in other operations and maintenance
expense in the statements of income.
II-186
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Long-Term Service Agreements
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power have entered into LTSAs for the purpose of securing maintenance
support for certain of their generating facilities. The LTSAs cover all planned inspections on the covered equipment, which
generally includes the cost of all labor and materials. The LTSAs also obligate the counterparties to cover the costs of unplanned
maintenance on the covered equipment subject to limits and scope specified in each contract.
Payments made under the LTSAs for the performance of any planned inspections or unplanned capital maintenance are recorded in
the statements of cash flows as investing activities. Receipts of major parts into materials and supplies inventory prior to planned
inspections are treated as noncash transactions in the statements of cash flows. Any payments made prior to the work being
performed are recorded as prepayments in other current assets and noncurrent assets on the balance sheets. At the time work is
performed, an appropriate amount is accrued for future payments or transferred from the prepayment and recorded as property,
plant, and equipment or expensed.
Transmission Receivables/Prepayments
As a result of Southern Power's acquisition and construction of generating facilities, Southern Power has transmission receivables
and/or prepayments representing the portion of interconnection network and transmission upgrades that will be reimbursed to
Southern Power. Upon completion of the related project, transmission costs are generally reimbursed by the interconnection
provider within a five-year period and the receivable/prepayments are reduced as payments or services are received.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
For purposes of the financial statements, temporary cash investments are considered cash equivalents. Temporary cash investments
are securities with original maturities of 90 days or less.
Restricted Cash
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, Southern Company Gas had restricted cash held as collateral for worker's compensation, life
insurance, and long-term disability insurance. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had restricted cash related to the redemption
of certain pollution control revenue bonds in January 2019. See Note 8 under "Long-term Debt" for additional information.
The following tables provide a reconciliation of cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash reported within the balance sheets that
total to the amounts shown in the statements of cash flows for the Registrants that had restricted cash at December 31, 2019 and/or
2018:
 Southern
CompanySouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
At December 31, 2019  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,975$ 46
Restricted cash:
Other accounts and notes receivable 3 3
Total cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash $ 1,978$ 49
 Southern
CompanyGeorgia
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
At December 31, 2018   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,396$ 4$ 64
Cash and cash equivalents classified as assets held for sale 9 — —
Restricted cash:   
Restricted cash — 108 —
Other accounts and notes receivable 114 — 6
Total cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash $ 1,519$ 112$ 70
II-187
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Storm Damage Reserves
Each traditional electric operating company maintains a reserve to cover or is allowed to defer and recover the cost of damages
from major storms to its transmission and distribution lines and, for Mississippi Power, the cost of uninsured damages to its
generation facilities and other property. Alabama Power and Mississippi Power also have authority based on orders from their state
PSCs to accrue certain additional amounts as circumstances warrant. Alabama Power recorded an additional accrual of $84 million
in 2019 and no such additional accruals in 2018 or 2017. There were no such additional accruals for Mississippi Power in any year
presented. In accordance with their respective state PSC orders, the traditional electric operating companies accrued the following
amounts related to storm damage reserves in 2019, 2018, and 2017:
 Southern
   Company(a)(b)Alabama
Power(b)Georgia
PowerMississippi
Power
 (in millions)
2019 $ 170$ 139$ 30$ 1
2018 74 16 30 1
2017 41 4 30 3
(a)Includes accruals at Gulf Power of $26.9 million in 2018 and $3.5 million in 2017. See Note 15 under "Southern Company" for information regarding the sale
of Gulf Power.
(b)Includes $39 million applied in 2019 to Alabama Power's NDR from its remaining excess deferred income tax regulatory liability balance in accordance with an
Alabama PSC order.
See Note 2 under "Alabama Power – Rate NDR," "Georgia Power – Storm Damage Recovery," and "Mississippi Power – System
Restoration Rider" for additional information regarding each company's storm damage reserve.
Leveraged Leases
A subsidiary of Southern Holdings has several leveraged lease agreements, with original terms ranging up to 45 years, which relate
to international and domestic energy generation, distribution, and transportation assets. Southern Company receives federal income
tax deductions for depreciation and amortization, as well as interest on long-term debt related to these investments. Southern
Company reviews all important lease assumptions at least annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances
indicate that a change in assumptions has occurred or may occur. These assumptions include the effective tax rate, the residual
value, the credit quality of the lessees, and the timing of expected tax cash flows. See Note 3 under "Other Matters – Southern
Company" for information regarding an impairment charge associated with one of the leveraged leases.
On December 30, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of one of its leveraged lease investments for approximately $20
million.
Southern Company's net investment in domestic and international leveraged leases consists of the following at December 31:
 2019  2018
 (in millions)
Net rentals receivable $ 1,410 $ 1,563
Unearned income (622) (765)
Investment in leveraged leases 788 798
Deferred taxes from leveraged leases (238) (255)
Net investment in leveraged leases $ 550 $ 543
II-188
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
A summary of the components of income from the leveraged leases follows:
 2019  2018 2017
 (in millions)
Pretax leveraged lease income $ 11 $ 25 $ 25
Net impact of Tax Reform Legislation — — 48
Income tax expense — (6) (9)
Net leveraged lease income $ 11 $ 19 $ 64
Materials and Supplies
Materials and supplies for the traditional electric operating companies generally includes the average cost of transmission,
distribution, and generating plant materials. Materials and supplies for Southern Company Gas generally includes propane gas
inventory, fleet fuel, and other materials and supplies. Materials and supplies for Southern Power generally includes the average
cost of generating plant materials.
Materials are recorded to inventory when purchased and then expensed or capitalized to property, plant, and equipment, as
appropriate, at weighted average cost when installed. In addition, certain major parts are recorded as inventory when acquired and
then capitalized at cost when installed to property, plant, and equipment.
Fuel Inventory
Fuel inventory for the traditional electric operating companies includes the average cost of coal, natural gas, oil, transportation, and
emissions allowances. Fuel inventory for Southern Power, which is included in other current assets, includes the average cost of oil,
natural gas, biomass, and emissions allowances. Fuel is recorded to inventory when purchased and then expensed, at weighted
average cost, as used. Emissions allowances granted by the EPA are included in inventory at zero cost. The traditional electric
operating companies recover fuel expense through fuel cost recovery rates approved by each state PSC or, for wholesale rates, the
FERC.
Natural Gas for Sale
With the exception of Nicor Gas, the natural gas distribution utilities record natural gas inventories on a WACOG basis. In
Georgia's deregulated, competitive environment, Marketers sell natural gas to firm end-use customers at market-based prices. On a
monthly basis, Atlanta Gas Light assigns to Marketers the majority of the pipeline storage services that it has under contract, along
with a corresponding amount of inventory. Atlanta Gas Light retains and manages a portion of its pipeline storage assets and related
natural gas inventories for system balancing and to serve system demand.
Nicor Gas' natural gas inventory is carried at cost on a LIFO basis. Inventory decrements occurring during the year that are restored
prior to year end are charged to cost of natural gas at the estimated annual replacement cost. Inventory decrements that are not
restored prior to year end are charged to cost of natural gas at the actual LIFO cost of the inventory layers liquidated. The cost of
natural gas, including inventory costs, is recovered from customers under a purchased gas recovery mechanism adjusted for
differences between actual costs and amounts billed; therefore, LIFO liquidations have no impact on Southern Company's or
Southern Company Gas' net income. At December 31, 2019, the Nicor Gas LIFO inventory balance was $161 million. Based on the
average cost of gas purchased in December 2019, the estimated replacement cost of Nicor Gas' inventory at December 31, 2019
was $214 million.
Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services, wholesale gas services, and all other segments record inventory at LOCOM, with
cost determined on a WACOG basis. For these segments, Southern Company Gas evaluates the weighted average cost of its natural
gas inventories against market prices to determine whether any declines in market prices below the WACOG are other than
temporary. For any declines considered to be other than temporary, Southern Company Gas recorded LOCOM adjustments to cost
of natural gas to reduce the value of its natural gas inventories to market value. LOCOM adjustments for wholesale gas services
were $21 million and $10 million during 2019 and 2018, respectively, and immaterial for 2017.
Energy Marketing Receivables and Payables
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services provides services to retail gas marketers, wholesale gas marketers, utility
companies, and industrial customers. These counterparties utilize netting agreements that enable wholesale gas services to net
receivables and payables by counterparty upon settlement. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services also nets across product
lines and against cash collateral, provided the netting and cash collateral agreements include such provisions. While the
II-189
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
amounts due from, or owed to, wholesale gas services' counterparties are settled net, they are recorded on a gross basis in the
balance sheets as energy marketing receivables and energy marketing payables.
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services has trade and credit contracts that contain minimum credit rating requirements.
These credit rating requirements typically give counterparties the right to suspend or terminate credit if Southern Company Gas'
credit ratings are downgraded to non-investment grade status. Under such circumstances, Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas
services would need to post collateral to continue transacting business with some of its counterparties. As of December 31, 2019
and 2018, the required collateral in the event of a credit rating downgrade was $11 million and $30 million, respectively.
Credit policies were established to determine and monitor the creditworthiness of counterparties, including requirements to post
collateral or other credit security, as well as the quality of pledged collateral. Collateral or credit security is most often in the form
of cash or letters of credit from an investment-grade financial institution, but may also include cash or U.S. government securities
held by a trustee. When Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services is engaged in more than one outstanding derivative
transaction with the same counterparty and it also has a legally enforceable netting agreement with that counterparty, the "net"
mark-to-market exposure represents the netting of the positive and negative exposures with that counterparty combined with a
reasonable measure of Southern Company Gas' credit risk. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services also uses other netting
agreements with certain counterparties with whom it conducts significant transactions.
See "Concentration of Credit Risk" herein for additional information.
Provision for Uncollectible Accounts
The customers of the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities are billed monthly. For the
majority of receivables, a provision for uncollectible accounts is established based on historical collection experience and other
factors. For the remaining receivables, if the company is aware of a specific customer's inability to pay, a provision for
uncollectible accounts is recorded to reduce the receivable balance to the amount reasonably expected to be collected. If
circumstances change, the estimate of the recoverability of accounts receivable could change as well. Circumstances that could
affect this estimate include, but are not limited to, customer credit issues, customer deposits, and general economic conditions.
Customers' accounts are written off once they are deemed to be uncollectible. For all periods presented, uncollectible accounts
averaged less than 1% of revenues for each Registrant.
Credit risk exposure at Nicor Gas is mitigated by a bad debt rider approved by the Illinois Commission. The bad debt rider provides
for the recovery from (or refund to) customers of the difference between Nicor Gas' actual bad debt experience on an annual basis
and the benchmark bad debt expense used to establish its base rates for the respective year.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services business has a concentration of credit risk for services it provides to its
counterparties. This credit risk is generally concentrated in 20 of its counterparties and is measured by 30-day receivable exposure
plus forward exposure. Counterparty credit risk is evaluated using a S&P equivalent credit rating, which is determined by a process
of converting the lower of the S&P or Moody's rating to an internal rating ranging from 9 to 1, with 9 being equivalent to AAA/Aaa
by S&P and Moody's, respectively, and 1 being equivalent to D/Default by S&P and Moody's, respectively. A counterparty that
does not have an external rating is assigned an internal rating based on the strength of its financial ratios. As of December 31, 2019,
the top 20 counterparties represented 59%, or $218 million, of the total counterparty exposure and had a weighted average S&P
equivalent rating of A-.
Concentration of credit risk occurs at Atlanta Gas Light for amounts billed for services and other costs to its customers, which
consist of 16 Marketers in Georgia (including SouthStar). The credit risk exposure to Marketers varies seasonally, with the lowest
exposure in the non-peak summer months and the highest exposure in the peak winter months. Marketers are responsible for the
retail sale of natural gas to end-use customers in Georgia. The functions of the retail sale of gas include the purchase and sale of
natural gas, customer service, billings, and collections. The provisions of Atlanta Gas Light's tariff allow Atlanta Gas Light to
obtain credit security support in an amount equal to a minimum of two times a Marketer's highest month's estimated bill from
Atlanta Gas Light.
Financial Instruments
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power use derivative financial instruments to limit exposure to
fluctuations in interest rates, the prices of certain fuel purchases, electricity purchases and sales, and occasionally foreign currency
exchange rates. Southern Company Gas uses derivative financial instruments to limit exposure to fluctuations in natural gas prices,
weather, interest rates, and commodity prices. All derivative financial instruments are recognized as either assets or liabilities on the
balance sheets (included in "Other" or shown separately as "Risk Management Activities") and are measured at
II-190
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
fair value. See Note 13 for additional information regarding fair value. Substantially all of the traditional electric operating
companies' and Southern Power's bulk energy purchases and sales contracts that meet the definition of a derivative are excluded
from fair value accounting requirements because they qualify for the "normal" scope exception, and are accounted for under the
accrual method. Derivative contracts that qualify as cash flow hedges of anticipated transactions or are recoverable through the
traditional electric operating companies' and the natural gas distribution utilities' fuel-hedging programs result in the deferral of
related gains and losses in AOCI or regulatory assets and liabilities, respectively, until the hedged transactions occur. For 2017,
ineffectiveness arising from cash flow hedges was recognized in net income. Upon the adoption of ASU No. 2017-12, Derivatives
and Hedging (Topic 815): Targeted Improvements to Accounting for Hedging Activities (ASU 2017-12) in 2018, ineffectiveness is
no longer separately measured and recorded in earnings. Other derivative contracts that qualify as fair value hedges are marked to
market through current period income and are recorded on a net basis in the statements of income. Cash flows from derivatives are
classified on the statements of cash flows in the same category as the hedged item. See Note 14 for additional information
regarding derivatives.
The Registrants offset fair value amounts recognized for multiple derivative instruments executed with the same counterparty under
netting arrangements. The Registrants had no outstanding collateral repayment obligations or rights to reclaim collateral arising
from derivative instruments recognized at December 31, 2019.
The Registrants are exposed to potential losses related to financial instruments in the event of counterparties' nonperformance. The
Registrants have established risk management policies and controls to determine and monitor the creditworthiness of counterparties
in order to mitigate their exposure to counterparty credit risk.
Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas enters into weather derivative contracts as economic hedges of natural gas revenues in the event of
warmer-than-normal weather in the Heating Season. Exchange-traded options are carried at fair value, with changes reflected in
natural gas revenues. Non-exchange-traded options are accounted for using the intrinsic value method. Changes in the intrinsic
value for non-exchange-traded contracts are also reflected in natural gas revenues in the statements of income.
Wholesale gas services purchases natural gas for storage when the current market price paid to buy and transport natural gas plus
the cost to store and finance the natural gas is less than the market price that can be received in the future, resulting in positive net
natural gas revenues. NYMEX futures and OTC contracts are used to sell natural gas at that future price to substantially protect the
natural gas revenues that will ultimately be realized when the stored natural gas is sold. Southern Company Gas enters into
transactions to secure transportation capacity between delivery points in order to serve its customers and various markets. NYMEX
futures and OTC contracts are used to capture the price differential or spread between the locations served by the capacity in order
to substantially protect the natural gas revenues that will ultimately be realized when the physical flow of natural gas between
delivery points occurs. These contracts generally meet the definition of derivatives and are carried at fair value on the balance
sheets, with changes in fair value recorded in natural gas revenues on the statements of income in the period of change. These
contracts are not designated as hedges for accounting purposes.
The purchase, transportation, storage, and sale of natural gas are accounted for on a weighted average cost or accrual basis, as
appropriate, rather than on the fair value basis utilized for the derivatives used to mitigate the natural gas price risk associated with
the storage and transportation portfolio. Monthly demand charges are incurred for the contracted storage and transportation
capacity and payments associated with asset management agreements, and these demand charges and payments are recognized on
the statements of income in the period they are incurred. This difference in accounting methods can result in volatility in reported
earnings, even though the economic margin is substantially unchanged from the dates the transactions were consummated.
Comprehensive Income
The objective of comprehensive income is to report a measure of all changes in common stock equity of an enterprise that result
from transactions and other economic events of the period other than transactions with owners. Comprehensive income consists of
net income attributable to the Registrant, changes in the fair value of qualifying cash flow hedges, and reclassifications for amounts
included in net income. Comprehensive income also consists of certain changes in pension and other postretirement benefit plans
for Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas.
II-191
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
AOCI (loss) balances, net of tax effects, for Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas were as follows:
 Qualifying
HedgesPension and Other
Postretirement
Benefit Plans  Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
 (in millions)
Southern Company     
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ (121)$ (82) $ (203)
Current period change (58) (60) (118)
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ (179)$ (142) $ (321)
     
Southern Power     
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 36$ (20) $ 16
Current period change (25) (17) (42)
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 11$ (37) $ (26)
     
Southern Company Gas     
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ (3)$ 29 $ 26
Current period change (3) (16) (19)
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ (6)$ 13 $ 7
Variable Interest Entities
The Registrants may hold ownership interests in a number of business ventures with varying ownership structures. Partnership
interests and other variable interests are evaluated to determine if each entity is a VIE. The primary beneficiary of a VIE is required
to consolidate the VIE when it has both the power to direct the activities of the VIE that most significantly impact the VIE's
economic performance and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits from the VIE that could potentially be
significant to the VIE. See Note 7 for additional information regarding VIEs.
Alabama Power has established a wholly-owned trust to issue preferred securities. See Note 8 under "Long-term Debt" for
additional information. However, Alabama Power is not considered the primary beneficiary of the trust. Therefore, the investment
in the trust is reflected as other investments, and the related loan from the trust is reflected as long-term debt in Alabama Power's
balance sheets.
II-192
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
2. REGULATORY MATTERS
Southern Company
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the consolidated balance sheets of Southern Company at December 31, 2019 and
2018 relate to:
 2019  2018 Note
 (in millions)
Retiree benefit plans $ 4,423 $ 3,658 (a,o)
Asset retirement obligations-asset 4,381 2,933 (b,o)
Remaining net book value of retired assets 1,275 211 (c)
Deferred income tax charges 803 799 (b,n)
Property damage reserves-asset 410 416 (d)
Environmental remediation-asset 349 366 (e,o)
Loss on reacquired debt 323 346 (f)
Under recovered regulatory clause revenues 254 407 (g)
Vacation pay 186 182 (h,o)
Long-term debt fair value adjustment 107 121 (i)
Other regulatory assets 492 581 (j)
Deferred income tax credits (6,301) (6,455) (b,n)
Other cost of removal obligations (2,084) (2,297) (b)
Customer refunds (285) (293) (k)
Over recovered regulatory clause revenues (205) (47) (g)
Property damage reserves-liability (204) (76) (l)
Other regulatory liabilities (86) (132) (m)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ 3,838 $ 720
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) are approved by the respective PSC or regulatory
agency and are as follows:
(a)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period, which may range up to 15 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(b)AROs and other cost of removal obligations are recorded, deferred income tax assets are recovered, and deferred income tax liabilities are amortized over the
related property lives, which may range up to 80 years. Asset retirement and removal liabilities will be settled and trued up following completion of the related
activities. Included in the deferred income tax assets is $23 million for the retiree Medicare drug subsidy, which is being recovered and amortized through 2027.
(c)Amortized over periods not exceeding 18 years.
(d)Effective January 1, 2020, Georgia Power is recovering approximately $213 million annually for storm damage. See "Georgia Power – Rate Plans – 2019 ARP"
and " – Storm Damage Recovery" herein for additional information.
(e)Recovered through environmental cost recovery mechanisms when the remediation work is performed. See Note 3 for additional information.
(f)Recovered over either the remaining life of the original issue or, if refinanced, over the remaining life of the new issue. At December 31, 2019, the remaining
amortization periods do not exceed 34 years.
(g)Recorded and recovered or amortized over periods generally not exceeding six years.
(h)Recorded as earned by employees and recovered as paid, generally within one year.
(i)Recovered over the remaining life of the original debt issuances at acquisition, which range up to 19 years as of December 31, 2019.
(j)Comprised of numerous immaterial components including nuclear outage costs, fuel-hedging losses, cancelled construction projects, property tax, and other
miscellaneous assets. These costs are amortized over remaining periods generally not exceeding eight years as of December 31, 2019.
(k)At December 31, 2019 and 2018, primarily includes approximately $53 million and $109 million, respectively, at Alabama Power and $110 million and $100
million, respectively, at Georgia Power as a result of each company exceeding its allowed retail return range, as well as approximately $105 million and $55
million, respectively, pursuant to the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. See "Alabama Power – Rate RSE" and "Georgia Power – Rate Plans"
herein for additional information.
(l)Amortized as related expenses are incurred. See "Alabama Power – Rate NDR" and "Mississippi Power – System Restoration Rider" herein for additional
information.
(m)Comprised of numerous components including building leases, fuel-hedging gains, and other liabilities that are recovered over remaining periods not exceeding
20 years.
(n)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, these accounts include certain deferred income tax assets and liabilities not subject to normalization, including $778
million of liabilities being amortized over periods not exceeding six years as of December 31, 2019. See "Georgia Power," "Mississippi Power," and "Southern
Company Gas" herein and Note 10 for additional information.
(o)Not earning a return as offset in rate base by a corresponding asset or liability.
II-193
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Gulf Power
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed its sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy. See Note 15 under "Southern
Company" for additional information.
In accordance with a Florida PSC-approved settlement agreement, Gulf Power's rates effective for the first billing cycle in July
2017 increased by approximately $54 million annually (2017 Gulf Power Rate Case Settlement Agreement), including a $62
million increase in base revenues, less an $8 million purchased power capacity cost recovery clause credit. The 2017 Gulf Power
Rate Case Settlement Agreement also resulted in a $32.5 million write-down of Gulf Power's ownership of Plant Scherer Unit 3,
which was recorded in the first quarter 2017.
As a continuation of the 2017 Gulf Power Rate Case Settlement Agreement, in March 2018, the Florida PSC approved a stipulation
and settlement agreement addressing Gulf Power's retail revenue requirement effects of the Tax Reform Legislation (Gulf Power
Tax Reform Settlement Agreement). Beginning on April 1, 2018, the Gulf Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement resulted in
annual reductions of approximately $18 million to Gulf Power's base rates and approximately $16 million to Gulf Power's
environmental cost recovery rates and a one-time refund of approximately $69 million for the retail portion of unprotected (not
subject to normalization) deferred tax liabilities, which was credited to customers through Gulf Power's fuel cost recovery rates
over the remainder of 2018.
II-194
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Alabama Power
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the balance sheets of Alabama Power at December 31, 2019 and 2018 relate to:
 2019  2018  Note
 (in millions)  
Retiree benefit plans $ 1,131 $ 947 (a,o)
Asset retirement obligations 1,043 147 (b)
Deferred income tax charges 245 241 (b,c,d)
(Over) under recovered regulatory clause revenues (72) 176 (e)
Regulatory clauses 142 142 (f)
Vacation pay 72 71 (g,o)
Loss on reacquired debt 52 56 (h)
Nuclear outage 78 49 (i)
Remaining net book value of retired assets 649 43 (j)
Other regulatory assets 67 57 (k,l)
Deferred income tax credits (1,960) (2,027) (b,d)
Other cost of removal obligations (412) (497) (b)
Customer refunds (56) (142) (m)
Natural disaster reserve (150) (20) (n)
Other regulatory liabilities (19) (12) (l)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ 810 $ (769) 
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) have been accepted or approved by the Alabama
PSC and are as follows:
(a)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period which may range up to 14 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(b)Asset retirement and removal assets and liabilities are recorded, deferred income tax assets are recovered, and deferred income tax credits are amortized over the
related property lives, which may range up to 53 years. Asset retirement and other cost of removal assets and liabilities will be settled and trued up following
completion of the related activities.
(c)Included in the deferred income tax charges are $9 million for 2019 and $10 million for 2018 for the retiree Medicare drug subsidy, which is being recovered
and amortized through 2027.
(d)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, these accounts include certain deferred income tax assets and liabilities not subject to normalization. The recovery
and amortization of these amounts will occur ratably over the related property lives, which may range up to 53 years. See Note 10 for additional information.
(e)Recorded monthly and expected to be recovered or returned within three years. See "Rate CNP PPA," "Rate CNP Compliance," and" Rate ECR" herein for
additional information.
(f)In accordance with an accounting order issued in 2017 by the Alabama PSC, these regulatory assets will be amortized concurrently with the effective date of
Alabama Power's next depreciation study, which is expected to occur no later than 2022.
(g)Recorded as earned by employees and recovered as paid, generally within one year. This includes both vacation and banked holiday pay.
(h)Recovered over either the remaining life of the original issue or, if refinanced, over the remaining life of the new issue. At December 31, 2019, the remaining
amortization periods do not exceed 30 years.
(i)Nuclear outage costs are deferred to a regulatory asset when incurred and amortized over a subsequent 18-month period.
(j)Recorded and amortized over remaining periods not exceeding 18 years.
(k)Comprised of components including generation site selection/evaluation costs, which are capitalized upon initiation of related construction projects, if
applicable, and PPA capacity costs, which are to be recovered over the next 12 months.
(l)Fuel-hedging assets and liabilities are recorded over the life of the underlying hedged purchase contracts, which generally do not exceed three and a half years.
Upon final settlement, actual costs incurred are recovered through the energy cost recovery clause.
(m)Includes $53 million for 2019 and $109 million for 2018 due to the retail return exceeding the allowed range. The December 31, 2018 balance also includes a
$33 million excess deferred tax liability used to increase the Rate NDR balance in 2019. See "Rate RSE," "Rate NDR," and "Tax Reform Accounting Order"
herein for additional information.
(n)Amortized as expenses are incurred. See "Rate NDR" herein for additional information.
(o)Not earning a return as offset in rate base by a corresponding asset or liability.
II-195
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Petition for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity
On September 6, 2019, Alabama Power filed a petition for a CCN with the Alabama PSC for authorization to procure additional
generating capacity through the turnkey construction of a new combined cycle facility and long-term contracts for the purchase of
power from others, both as more fully described below, as well as the acquisition of an existing combined cycle facility in Autauga
County, Alabama (Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition). In addition, Alabama Power will pursue approximately 200 MWs of
certain demand side management and distributed energy resource programs. This filing was predicated on the results of Alabama
Power's 2019 IRP provided to the Alabama PSC, which identified an approximately 2,400-MW resource need for Alabama Power,
driven by the need for additional winter reserve capacity. See Note 15 under "Alabama Power" for additional information regarding
the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition.
The procurement of these resources is subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, including, among other customary
conditions, approval by the Alabama PSC. The completion of the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition is also subject to approval
by the FERC. Alabama Power expects to obtain all regulatory approvals by the end of the third quarter 2020.
On May 8, 2019, Alabama Power entered into an Agreement for Engineering, Procurement, and Construction with Mitsubishi
Hitachi Power Systems Americas, Inc. and Black & Veatch Construction, Inc. to construct an approximately 720-MW combined
cycle facility at Plant Barry (Plant Barry Unit 8), which is expected to be placed in service by the end of 2023.
The capital investment associated with the construction of Plant Barry Unit 8 and the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition is
currently estimated to total approximately $1.1 billion.
Alabama Power entered into additional long-term PPAs totaling approximately 640 MWs of generating capacity consisting of
approximately 240 MWs of combined cycle generation expected to begin later in 2020 and approximately 400 MWs of solar
generation coupled with battery energy storage systems (solar/battery systems) expected to begin in 2022 through 2024. The terms
of the agreements for the solar/battery systems permit Alabama Power to use the energy and retire the associated renewable energy
credits (REC) in service of customers or to sell RECs, separately or bundled with energy.
Upon certification, Alabama Power expects to recover costs associated with Plant Barry Unit 8 pursuant to its Rate CNP New Plant.
Additionally, Alabama Power expects to recover costs associated with the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition through the
inclusion in Rate RSE of revenues from the existing power sales agreement and, on expiration of that agreement, pursuant to Rate
CNP New Plant. The recovery of costs associated with laws, regulations, and other such mandates directed at the utility industry are
expected to be recovered through Rate CNP Compliance. Alabama Power expects to recover the capacity-related costs associated
with the PPAs through its Rate CNP PPA. In addition, fuel and energy-related costs are expected to be recovered through Rate
ECR. Any remaining costs associated with the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition and Plant Barry Unit 8 will be incorporated
through the annual filing of Rate RSE.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Construction Work in Progress Accounting Order
On October 1, 2019, the Alabama PSC acknowledged that Alabama Power would begin certain limited preparatory activities
associated with Plant Barry Unit 8 construction to meet the target in-service date by authorizing Alabama Power to record the
related costs as CWIP prior to the issuance of an order on the CCN petition. Should a CCN not be granted and Alabama Power does
not proceed with the related construction of Plant Barry Unit 8, Alabama Power may transfer those costs and any costs that directly
result from the non-issuance of the CCN to a regulatory asset which would be amortized over a five-year period. If the balance of
incurred costs reaches 5% of the estimated in-service cost of the total project prior to issuance of an order on the CCN petition,
Alabama Power will confer with the Alabama PSC regarding the appropriateness of additional authorization. The Sierra Club
subsequently filed a petition for reconsideration of the accounting order. The Alabama PSC voted to deny the petition for
reconsideration on January 7, 2020.
Rate RSE
The Alabama PSC has adopted Rate RSE that provides for periodic annual adjustments based upon Alabama Power's projected
weighted common equity return (WCER) compared to an allowable range. Rate RSE adjustments are based on forward-looking
information for the applicable upcoming calendar year. Rate RSE adjustments for any two-year period, when averaged together,
cannot exceed 4.0% and any annual adjustment is limited to 5.0%. When the projected WCER is under the allowed range, there is
an adjusting point of 5.98% and eligibility for a performance-based adder of seven basis points, or 0.07%, to the WCER adjusting
point if Alabama Power (i) has an "A" credit rating equivalent with at least one of the recognized rating agencies or (ii) is in the top
one-third of a designated customer value benchmark survey. If Alabama Power's actual retail return is above the allowed WCER
range, the excess will be refunded to customers unless otherwise directed by the Alabama PSC; however, there is no
II-196
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
provision for additional customer billings should the actual retail return fall below the WCER range. Prior to January 2019, retail
rates remained unchanged when the WCER range was between 5.75% and 6.21%.
Effective in January 2017, Rate RSE increased 4.48%, or $245 million annually. At December 31, 2017, Alabama Power's actual
retail return was within the allowed WCER range. Retail rates under Rate RSE were unchanged for 2018.
In conjunction with Rate RSE, Alabama Power has an established retail tariff that provides for an adjustment to customer billings to
recognize the impact of a change in the statutory income tax rate. In accordance with this tariff, Alabama Power returned $267
million to retail customers through bill credits during 2018 as a result of the change in the federal income tax rate under the Tax
Reform Legislation.
In May 2018, the Alabama PSC approved modifications to Rate RSE and other commitments designed to position Alabama Power
to address the growing pressure on its credit quality resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation, without increasing retail rates under
Rate RSE in the near term. Alabama Power plans to reduce growth in total debt by increasing equity, with corresponding reductions
in debt issuances, thereby de-leveraging its capital structure. Alabama Power's goal is to achieve an equity ratio of approximately
55% by the end of 2025. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, Alabama Power's equity ratio was approximately 50% and 47%,
respectively.
The approved modifications to Rate RSE began for billings in January 2019. The modifications include reducing the top of the
allowed WCER range from 6.21% to 6.15% and modifications to the refund mechanism applicable to prior year actual results. The
modifications to the refund mechanism allow Alabama Power to retain a portion of the revenue that causes the actual WCER for a
given year to exceed the allowed range.
Generally, during a year without a Rate RSE upward adjustment, if Alabama Power's actual WCER is between 6.15% and 7.65%,
customers will receive 25% of the amount between 6.15% and 6.65%, 40% of the amount between 6.65% and 7.15%, and 75% of
the amount between 7.15% and 7.65%. Customers will receive all amounts in excess of an actual WCER of 7.65%. During a year
with a Rate RSE upward adjustment, if Alabama Power's actual WCER exceeds 6.15%, customers receive 50% of the amount
between 6.15% and 6.90% and all amounts in excess of an actual WCER of 6.90%.
In conjunction with these modifications to Rate RSE, in May 2018, Alabama Power consented to a moratorium on any upward
adjustments under Rate RSE for 2019 and 2020 and to return $50 million to customers through bill credits in 2019.
At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's retail return exceeded the allowed WCER range, which resulted in Alabama Power
establishing a regulatory liability of $109 million for Rate RSE refunds. In accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued on
February 5, 2019, Alabama Power applied $78 million to reduce the Rate ECR under recovered balance and the remaining $31
million was refunded to customers through bill credits starting in July 2019.
On November 27, 2019, Alabama Power made its required annual Rate RSE submission to the Alabama PSC of projected data for
calendar year 2020. Projected earnings were within the specified range; therefore, retail rates under Rate RSE remain unchanged
for 2020.
During 2019, Alabama Power provided to the Alabama PSC and the Alabama Office of the Attorney General information related to
the operation and utilization of Rate RSE, in accordance with the rules governing the operation of Rate RSE. The ultimate outcome
of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
At December 31, 2019, Alabama Power's WCER exceeded 6.15%, resulting in Alabama Power establishing a current regulatory
liability of $53 million for Rate RSE refunds, which will be refunded to customers through bill credits in April 2020.
Rate CNP New Plant
Rate CNP New Plant allows for recovery of Alabama Power's retail costs associated with newly developed or acquired certificated
generating facilities placed into retail service. No adjustments to Rate CNP New Plant occurred during the period 2017 through
2019. See "Petition for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity" herein for additional information.
Rate CNP PPA
Rate CNP PPA allows for the recovery of Alabama Power's retail costs associated with certificated PPAs. No adjustments to Rate
CNP PPA occurred during the period 2017 through 2019 and no adjustment is expected for 2020. At December 31, 2019 and 2018,
Alabama Power had an under recovered Rate CNP PPA balance of $40 million and $25 million, respectively, which is included in
other regulatory assets, deferred on Southern Company's balance sheets and deferred under recovered regulatory clause revenues on
Alabama Power's balance sheets.
II-197
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Rate CNP Compliance
Rate CNP Compliance allows for the recovery of Alabama Power's retail costs associated with laws, regulations, and other such
mandates directed at the utility industry involving the environment, security, reliability, safety, sustainability, or similar
considerations impacting Alabama Power's facilities or operations. Rate CNP Compliance is based on forward-looking information
and provides for the recovery of these costs pursuant to factors that are calculated and submitted to the Alabama PSC by December
1 with rates effective for the following calendar year. Compliance costs to be recovered include operations and maintenance
expenses, depreciation, and a return on certain invested capital. Revenues for Rate CNP Compliance, as recorded on the financial
statements, are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. Accordingly,
changes in the billing factor will have no significant effect on Southern Company's or Alabama Power's revenues or net income, but
will affect annual cash flow. Changes in Rate CNP Compliance-related operations and maintenance expenses and depreciation
generally will have no effect on net income.
In November 2018, Alabama Power submitted calculations associated with its cost of complying with governmental mandates, as
provided under Rate CNP Compliance. The filing reflected a projected under recovered retail revenue requirement for
governmental mandates of approximately $205 million, which was recovered in the billing months of January 2019 through
December 2019.
On November 27, 2019, Alabama Power submitted calculations associated with its cost of complying with governmental mandates,
as provided under Rate CNP Compliance. The filing reflected a projected over recovered retail revenue requirement for
governmental mandates, which resulted in a rate decrease of approximately $68 million that became effective for the billing month
of January 2020.
At December 31, 2019, Alabama Power had an over recovered Rate CNP Compliance balance of $62 million, of which $55 million
is included in other regulatory liabilities, current and $7 million is included in other regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance
sheet, compared to an under recovered balance of $42 million at December 31, 2018 included in customer accounts receivable on
the balance sheet.
Rate ECR
Rate ECR recovers Alabama Power's retail energy costs based on an estimate of future energy costs and the current over or under
recovered balance. Revenues recognized under Rate ECR and recorded on the financial statements are adjusted for the difference in
actual recoverable fuel costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. The difference in the recoverable fuel costs and amounts
billed gives rise to the over or under recovered amounts recorded as regulatory assets or liabilities. Alabama Power, along with the
Alabama PSC, continually monitors the over or under recovered cost balance to determine whether an adjustment to billing rates is
required. Changes in the Rate ECR factor have no significant effect on Southern Company's or Alabama Power's net income but
will impact operating cash flows. The Alabama PSC may approve billing rates under Rate ECR of up to 5.910 cents per KWH.
In May 2018, the Alabama PSC approved an increase to Rate ECR from 2.015 cents per KWH to 2.353 cents per KWH effective
July 2018 through December 2018. In December 2018, the Alabama PSC issued a consent order to leave this rate in effect through
December 31, 2019.
As discussed herein under "Rate RSE," in accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued on February 5, 2019, Alabama Power
utilized $78 million of the 2018 Rate RSE refund liability to reduce the Rate ECR under recovered balance.
On December 3, 2019, the Alabama PSC approved a decrease to Rate ECR from 2.353 to 2.160 cents per KWH, equal to 1.82%, or
approximately $102 million annually, effective January 1, 2020. The rate will adjust to 5.910 cents per KWH in January 2021
absent a further order from the Alabama PSC.
At December 31, 2019, Alabama Power's over recovered fuel costs totaled $49 million, of which $32 million is included in other
regulatory liabilities, current and $17 million is included in other regulatory liabilities, deferred on Southern Company's and
Alabama Power's balance sheets. At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's under recovered fuel costs totaled $109 million, of
which $18 million is included in customer accounts receivable and $91 million is included in deferred under recovered regulatory
clause revenues on Southern Company's and Alabama Power's balance sheets. These classifications are based on estimates, which
include such factors as weather, generation availability, energy demand, and the price of energy. A change in any of these factors
could have a material impact on the timing of any recovery or return of fuel costs.
Tax Reform Accounting Order
In May 2018, the Alabama PSC approved an accounting order that authorized Alabama Power to defer the benefits of federal
excess deferred income taxes associated with the Tax Reform Legislation for the year ended December 31, 2018 as a regulatory
II-198
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
liability and to use up to $30 million of such deferrals to offset under recovered amounts under Rate ECR. The final excess deferred
tax liability for the year ended December 31, 2018 totaled approximately $69 million, of which $30 million was used to offset the
Rate ECR under recovered balance. On December 3, 2019, the Alabama PSC issued an order authorizing Alabama Power to apply
the remaining deferred balance of approximately $39 million to increase the balance in the NDR. See "Rate NDR" herein and Note
10 under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
Software Accounting Order
On February 5, 2019, the Alabama PSC approved an accounting order that authorizes Alabama Power to establish a regulatory asset
for operations and maintenance costs associated with software implementation projects. The regulatory asset will be amortized
ratably over the life of the related software.
Rate NDR
Based on an order from the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power maintains a reserve for operations and maintenance expenses to cover
the cost of damages from major storms to its transmission and distribution facilities. The order approves a separate monthly Rate
NDR charge to customers consisting of two components. The first component is intended to establish and maintain a reserve
balance for future storms and is an on-going part of customer billing. When the reserve balance falls below $50 million, a reserve
establishment charge will be activated (and the on-going reserve maintenance charge concurrently suspended) until the reserve
balance reaches $75 million.
The second component of the Rate NDR charge is intended to allow recovery of any existing deferred storm-related operations and
maintenance costs and any future reserve deficits over a 24-month period. The Alabama PSC order gives Alabama Power authority
to record a deficit balance in the NDR when costs of storm damage exceed any established reserve balance. Absent further Alabama
PSC approval, the maximum total Rate NDR charge consisting of both components is $10 per month per non-residential customer
account and $5 per month per residential customer account. Alabama Power has the authority, based on an order from the Alabama
PSC, to accrue certain additional amounts as circumstances warrant. The order allows for reliability-related expenditures to be
charged against the additional accruals when the NDR balance exceeds $75 million. Alabama Power may designate a portion of the
NDR to reliability-related expenditures as a part of an annual budget process for the following year or during the current year for
identified unbudgeted reliability-related expenditures that are incurred. Accruals that have not been designated can be used to offset
storm charges. Additional accruals to the NDR enhance Alabama Power's ability to mitigate the financial effects of future natural
disasters, promote system reliability, and offset costs retail customers would otherwise bear. There were no such accruals in 2017
and 2018.
As discussed herein under "Tax Reform Accounting Order," in accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued on December 3,
2019, Alabama Power applied the remaining excess deferred income tax regulatory liability balance of approximately $39 million
to increase the balance in the NDR. Alabama Power also accrued an additional $84 million to the NDR in December 2019 resulting
in an accumulated balance of $150 million at December 31, 2019. Of this amount, Alabama Power designated $37 million to be
applied to budgeted reliability-related expenditures for 2020, which is included in other regulatory liabilities, current. The
remaining NDR balance of $113 million is included in other regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance sheet.
In December 2017, the reserve maintenance charge was suspended and the reserve establishment charge was activated and
collected approximately $16 million annually through 2019. Effective with the March 2020 billings, the reserve establishment
charge will be suspended and the reserve maintenance charge will be activated as a result of the NDR balance exceeding $75
million. Alabama Power expects to collect approximately $5 million in 2020 and $3 million annually thereafter unless the NDR
balance falls below $50 million.
As revenue from the Rate NDR charge is recognized, an equal amount of operations and maintenance expenses related to the NDR
will also be recognized. As a result, the Rate NDR charge will not have an effect on net income but will impact operating cash
flows.
Environmental Accounting Order
Based on an order from the Alabama PSC (Environmental Accounting Order), Alabama Power is allowed to establish a regulatory
asset to record the unrecovered investment costs, including the unrecovered plant asset balance and the unrecovered costs
associated with site removal and closure associated with future unit retirements caused by environmental regulations. The
regulatory asset is being amortized and recovered over the affected unit's remaining useful life, as established prior to the decision
regarding early retirement through Rate CNP Compliance.
On April 15, 2019, Alabama Power retired Plant Gorgas Units 8, 9, and 10 and reclassified approximately $654 million of the
unrecovered asset balances to regulatory assets, which are being recovered over the units' remaining useful lives, the latest being
II-199
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
through 2037, as established prior to the decision to retire. At December 31, 2019, the related regulatory assets totaled $649
million, of which $63 million is included in other regulatory assets, current and $586 million is included in other regulatory assets,
deferred on the balance sheet. Additionally, approximately $700 million of net capitalized asset retirement costs were reclassified to
a regulatory asset in accordance with accounting guidance provided by the Alabama PSC. The asset retirement costs are being
recovered through 2055.
II-200
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Georgia Power
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the balance sheets of Georgia Power at December 31, 2019 and 2018 relate to:
 2019  2018 Note
 (in millions)
Retiree benefit plans $ 1,516 $ 1,295 (a, m)
Asset retirement obligations 3,119 2,644 (b, m)
Deferred income tax charges 523 522 (b, c, m)
Storm damage reserves 410 416 (d)
Remaining net book value of retired assets 596 127 (e)
Loss on reacquired debt 262 277 (f, m)
Vacation pay 93 91 (g, m)
Other cost of removal obligations 156 68 (b)
Environmental remediation 52 55 (h)
Fuel-hedging (realized and unrealized) losses 53 15 (i, m)
Other regulatory assets 50 120 (j)
Deferred income tax credits (3,078) (3,080) (b, c)
Customer refunds (229) (165) (k)
Other regulatory liabilities (16) (7) (l, m)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ 3,507 $ 2,378
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) are approved by the Georgia PSC and are as follows:
(a)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period which may range up to 13 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(b)Effective January 1, 2020, Georgia Power is recovering CCR AROs through its Environmental Compliance Cost Recovery (ECCR) tariff and approximately $5
million annually for other AROs through its traditional base tariffs. See "Rate Plans – 2019 ARP" and "Integrated Resource Plan" herein for additional
information on recovery of compliance costs for CCR AROs. Other cost of removal obligations, non-CCR AROs, and deferred income tax assets are recovered
and deferred income tax liabilities are amortized over the related property lives, which may range up to 60 years. Included in the deferred income tax assets is
$13 million for the retiree Medicare drug subsidy, which is being recovered and amortized through 2022. See Note 6 for additional information on AROs.
(c)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, these balances include $145 million of deferred income tax assets related to CWIP for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 and
approximately $660 million of deferred income tax liabilities, neither of which are subject to normalization. The recovery of deferred income tax assets related
to CWIP for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is expected to be determined in a future regulatory proceeding. Effective January 1, 2020, the deferred income tax
liabilities are being amortized through 2022. See "Rate Plans" herein and Note 10 for additional information.
(d)Effective January 1, 2020, Georgia Power is recovering $213 million annually for storm damage. See "Rate Plans – 2019 ARP" and "Storm Damage Recovery"
herein and Note 1 under "Storm Damage Reserves" for additional information.
(e)The net book values of Plant Hammond Units 1 through 4 ($488 million at December 31, 2019) and Plant Branch Units 1 through 4 ($69 million and $87
million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively) are being amortized over the units' remaining useful lives, which vary between 2020 and 2035. The net
book values of Plant McIntosh Unit 1 ($30 million at December 31, 2019) and Plant Mitchell Unit 3 ($8 million and $9 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018,
respectively) are being amortized through 2022. The balance at December 31, 2018 also includes $31 million related to obsolete inventories of certain retired
units, which was fully amortized under the 2019 ARP. See "Rate Plans – 2019 ARP" and "Integrated Resource Plan" herein for additional information.
(f)Recovered over either the remaining life of the original issue or, if refinanced, over the remaining life of the new issue. At December 31, 2019, the amortization
periods do not exceed 33 years.
(g)Recorded as earned by employees and recovered as paid, generally within one year.
(h)Effective January 1, 2020, Georgia Power is recovering $12 million annually for environmental remediation. See Note 3 under "Environmental Remediation"
for additional information.
(i)Recovered through Georgia Power's fuel cost recovery mechanism upon final settlement, within four years.
(j)Comprised of several components including deferred nuclear outage costs and cancelled construction projects. Nuclear outage costs are recorded as incurred and
recovered over the outage cycles of each nuclear unit, which do not exceed 24 months. Approximately $22 million of costs associated with construction of
environmental controls that will not be completed as a result of unit retirements are being amortized through 2022.
(k)At December 31, 2019 and 2018, includes approximately $110 million and $100 million, respectively, as a result of the retail ROE exceeding the allowed retail
ROE range and approximately $105 million and $55 million, respectively, related to the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. See "Rate Plans"
herein for additional information.
(l)Comprised of Demand-Side Management (DSM) tariffs over recovery, building lease, and fuel-hedging gains. DSM tariffs over recovery of $10 million at
December 31, 2019 is being amortized through 2022. The building lease is being amortized through 2030. Fuel-hedging gains are refunded through Georgia
Power's fuel cost recovery mechanism upon final settlement, within four years.
(m)Generally not earning a return as they are excluded from rate base or are offset in rate base by a corresponding asset or liability.
II-201
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Rate Plans
2019 ARP
On December 17, 2019, the Georgia PSC voted to approve the 2019 ARP, under which Georgia Power increased its rates on
January 1, 2020 and will increase rates annually for 2021 and 2022 as detailed below based on compliance filings to be made at
least 90 days prior to the effective date. Georgia Power will recover estimated increases through its existing tariffs as follows:
Tariff 2020 2021 2022
 (in millions)
Traditional base $ —$ 120$ 192
ECCR(a)318 55 184
DSM 12 1 1
Municipal Franchise Fee 12 4 9
Total(b)$ 342$ 181$ 386
(a)Effective January 1, 2020, CCR AROs will be recovered through the ECCR tariff. See "Integrated Resource Plan" herein for additional information on recovery
of compliance costs for CCR AROs.
(b)Totals may not add due to rounding.
Further, under the 2019 ARP, Georgia Power's retail ROE is set at 10.50%, and earnings will be evaluated against a retail ROE
range of 9.50% to 12.00%. The Georgia PSC also approved an increase in the retail equity ratio to 56% from 55%. Any retail
earnings above 12.00% will be shared, with 40% being applied to reduce regulatory assets, 40% directly refunded to customers,
and the remaining 20% retained by Georgia Power. There will be no recovery of any earnings shortfall below 9.50% on an actual
basis. However, if at any time during the term of the 2019 ARP, Georgia Power projects that its retail earnings will be below 9.50%
for any calendar year, it could petition the Georgia PSC for implementation of the Interim Cost Recovery (ICR) tariff to adjust
Georgia Power's retail rates to achieve a 9.50% ROE. The Georgia PSC would have 90 days to rule on Georgia Power's request.
The ICR tariff would expire at the earlier of January 1, 2023 or the end of the calendar year in which the ICR tariff becomes
effective. In lieu of requesting implementation of an ICR tariff, or if the Georgia PSC chooses not to implement the ICR tariff,
Georgia Power may file a full rate case.
Additionally, under the 2019 ARP and pursuant to the sharing mechanism approved in the 2013 ARP whereby two-thirds of any
earnings above the top of the allowed ROE range are shared with Georgia Power's customers, (i) Georgia Power used 50%
(approximately $50 million) of the customer share of earnings above the band in 2018 to reduce regulatory assets and 50%
(approximately $50 million) will be refunded to customers in 2020 and (ii) Georgia Power will forgo its share of 2019 earnings in
excess of the earnings band so that 50% (approximately $60 million) of all earnings over the 2019 band will be refunded to
customers and 50% (approximately $60 million) were used to reduce regulatory assets.
Except as provided above, Georgia Power will not file for a general base rate increase while the 2019 ARP is in effect. Georgia
Power is required to file a general base rate case by July 1, 2022, in response to which the Georgia PSC would be expected to
determine whether the 2019 ARP should be continued, modified, or discontinued.
2013 ARP
Pursuant to the terms and conditions of a settlement agreement related to Southern Company's acquisition of Southern Company
Gas approved by the Georgia PSC in 2016, the 2013 ARP continued in effect until December 31, 2019. Furthermore, through
December 31, 2019, Georgia Power retained its merger savings, net of transition costs, as defined in the settlement agreement;
through December 31, 2022, such net merger savings will be shared on a 60/40 basis with customers; thereafter, all merger savings
will be retained by customers.
There were no changes to Georgia Power's traditional base tariffs, ECCR tariff, DSM tariffs, or Municipal Franchise Fee tariffs in
2017, 2018, or 2019.
Under the 2013 ARP, Georgia Power's retail ROE was set at 10.95% and earnings were evaluated against a retail ROE range of
10.00% to 12.00%. Two-thirds of any earnings above 12.00% were to be directly refunded to customers, with the remaining one-
third retained by Georgia Power. On February 5, 2019, the Georgia PSC approved a settlement between Georgia Power and the
staff of the Georgia PSC under which Georgia Power's retail ROE for 2017 was stipulated to exceed 12.00% and Georgia Power
reduced certain regulatory assets by approximately $4 million in lieu of providing refunds to retail customers. In 2019 and 2018,
Georgia Power's retail ROE exceeded 12.00% and, under the modified sharing mechanism pursuant to the 2019 ARP, Georgia
II-202
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Power has reduced regulatory assets by a total of approximately $110 million and expects to refund a total of approximately $110
million to customers, subject to review and approval by the Georgia PSC. See "2019 ARP" and "Integrated Resource Plan" herein
for additional information.
Tax Reform Settlement Agreement
In April 2018, the Georgia PSC approved the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. To reflect the federal income tax
rate reduction impact of the Tax Reform Legislation, Georgia Power issued bill credits of approximately $95 million and $130
million in 2019 and 2018, respectively, and is issuing bill credits of approximately $105 million in February 2020, for a total of
$330 million. In addition, Georgia Power deferred as a regulatory liability (i) the revenue equivalent of the tax expense reduction
resulting from legislation lowering the Georgia state income tax rate from 6.00% to 5.75% in 2019 and (ii) the entire benefit of
federal and state excess accumulated deferred income taxes. At December 31, 2019, the related regulatory liability balance totaled
$659 million, which is being amortized over a three-year period ending December 31, 2022 in accordance with the 2019 ARP.
To address some of the negative cash flow and credit quality impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation, the Georgia PSC also
approved an increase in Georgia Power's retail equity ratio to the lower of (i) Georgia Power's actual common equity weight in its
capital structure or (ii) 55%, until the Georgia PSC approved the 2019 ARP. Benefits from reduced federal income tax rates in
excess of the amounts refunded to customers were retained by Georgia Power to cover the carrying costs of the incremental equity
in 2018 and 2019.
See "2019 ARP" herein for additional information.
Integrated Resource Plan
On July 16, 2019, the Georgia PSC voted to approve Georgia Power's modified triennial IRP (Georgia Power 2019 IRP). In the
Georgia Power 2019 IRP, the Georgia PSC approved the decertification and retirement of Plant Hammond Units 1 through 4 (840
MWs) and Plant McIntosh Unit 1 (142.5 MWs) effective July 29, 2019. In accordance with the 2019 ARP, the remaining net book
values at December 31, 2019 of $488 million for the Plant Hammond units are being recovered over a period equal to the
respective unit's remaining useful life, which varies between 2024 and 2035, and $30 million for Plant McIntosh Unit 1 is being
recovered over a three-year period ending December 31, 2022. In addition, approximately $20 million of related unusable materials
and supplies inventory balances and approximately $295 million of net capitalized asset retirement costs were reclassified to a
regulatory asset. In accordance with the modifications to the earnings sharing mechanism approved in the 2019 ARP, Georgia
Power fully amortized the regulatory assets associated with these unusable materials and supplies inventory balances as well as a
regulatory asset of approximately $50 million related to costs for a future generation site in Stewart County, Georgia. See "Rate
Plans – 2019 ARP" herein for additional information.
Also in the Georgia Power 2019 IRP, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's proposed environmental compliance strategy
associated with ash pond and certain landfill closures and post-closure care in compliance with the CCR Rule and the related state
rule. In the 2019 ARP, the Georgia PSC approved recovery of the estimated under recovered balance of these compliance costs at
December 31, 2019 over a three-year period ending December 31, 2022 and recovery of estimated compliance costs for 2020,
2021, and 2022 over three-year periods ending December 31, 2022, 2023, and 2024, respectively, with recovery of construction
contingency beginning in the year following actual expenditure. The under recovered balance at December 31, 2019 was $175
million and the estimated compliance costs expected to be incurred in 2020, 2021, and 2022 are $265 million, $290 million, and
$390 million, respectively. The ECCR tariff is expected to be revised for actual expenditures and updated estimates through future
annual compliance filings. See Note 6 for additional information regarding Georgia Power's AROs.
On February 4, 2020, the Georgia PSC voted to deny a motion for reconsideration filed by the Sierra Club regarding the Georgia
PSC's decision in the 2019 ARP allowing Georgia Power to recover compliance costs for CCR AROs.
Additionally, the Georgia PSC rejected a request to certify approximately 25 MWs of capacity at Plant Scherer Unit 3 for the retail
jurisdiction beginning January 1, 2020 following the expiration of a wholesale PPA. Georgia Power may offer such capacity in the
wholesale market or to the retail jurisdiction in a future IRP.
The Georgia PSC also approved Georgia Power to (i) issue requests for proposals (RFP) for capacity beginning in 2022 or 2023
and in 2026, 2027, or 2028; (ii) procure up to an additional 2,210 MWs of renewable resources through competitive RFPs; and (iii)
invest in a portfolio of up to 80 MWs of battery energy storage technologies.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Georgia Power has established fuel cost recovery rates approved by the Georgia PSC. In 2016, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia
Power's request to lower annual billings under an interim fuel rider by approximately $313 million which was in effect
II-203
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
from June 1, 2016 through December 31, 2017. Georgia Power is scheduled to file its next fuel case no later than March 16, 2020,
with new rates, if any, to be effective June 1, 2020. Georgia Power continues to be allowed to adjust its fuel cost recovery rates
under an interim fuel rider prior to the next fuel case if the under or over recovered fuel balance exceeds $200 million. Georgia
Power's over recovered fuel balance totaled $73 million at December 31, 2019 and is included in other deferred credits and
liabilities on Southern Company's and Georgia Power's balance sheets. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power's under recovered
fuel balance totaled $115 million and is included in under recovered fuel clause revenues on Southern Company's and Georgia
Power's balance sheets.
Georgia Power's fuel cost recovery mechanism includes costs associated with a natural gas hedging program, as revised and
approved by the Georgia PSC, allowing the use of an array of derivative instruments within a 48-month time horizon.
Fuel cost recovery revenues as recorded on the financial statements are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel costs and
amounts billed in current regulated rates. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor will not have a significant effect on Southern
Company's or Georgia Power's revenues or net income but will affect operating cash flows.
Storm Damage Recovery
Georgia Power defers and recovers certain costs related to damages from major storms as mandated by the Georgia PSC. Beginning
January 1, 2020, Georgia Power is recovering $213 million annually under the 2019 ARP. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the
balance in the regulatory asset related to storm damage was $410 million and $416 million, respectively, with $213 million and $30
million, respectively, included in other regulatory assets, current on Southern Company's balance sheets and regulatory assets –
storm damage reserves on Georgia Power's balance sheets and $197 million and $386 million, respectively, included in other
regulatory assets, deferred on Southern Company's and Georgia Power's balance sheets. The rate of storm damage cost recovery is
expected to be adjusted in future regulatory proceedings as necessary. As a result of this regulatory treatment, costs related to
storms are not expected to have a material impact on Southern Company's or Georgia Power's financial statements.
Nuclear Construction
In 2009, the Georgia PSC certified construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Georgia Power holds a 45.7% ownership interest in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In 2012, the NRC issued the related combined construction and operating licenses, which allowed full
construction of the two AP1000 nuclear units (with electric generating capacity of approximately 1,100 MWs each) and related
facilities to begin. Until March 2017, construction on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 continued under the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement,
which was a substantially fixed price agreement. In March 2017, the EPC Contractor filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter
11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.
In connection with the EPC Contractor's bankruptcy filing, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle
Owners, entered into several transitional arrangements to allow construction to continue. In July 2017, Georgia Power, acting for
itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, entered into the Vogtle Services Agreement, whereby Westinghouse provides
facility design and engineering services, procurement and technical support, and staff augmentation on a time and materials cost
basis. The Vogtle Services Agreement provides that it will continue until the start-up and testing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are
complete and electricity is generated and sold from both units. The Vogtle Services Agreement is terminable by the Vogtle Owners
upon 30 days' written notice.
In October 2017, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, executed the Bechtel Agreement, a cost
reimbursable plus fee arrangement, whereby Bechtel is reimbursed for actual costs plus a base fee and an at-risk fee, which is
subject to adjustment based on Bechtel's performance against cost and schedule targets. Each Vogtle Owner is severally (not
jointly) liable for its proportionate share, based on its ownership interest, of all amounts owed to Bechtel under the Bechtel
Agreement. The Vogtle Owners may terminate the Bechtel Agreement at any time for their convenience, provided that the Vogtle
Owners will be required to pay amounts related to work performed prior to the termination (including the applicable portion of the
base fee), certain termination-related costs, and, at certain stages of the work, the applicable portion of the at-risk fee. Bechtel may
terminate the Bechtel Agreement under certain circumstances, including certain Vogtle Owner suspensions of work, certain
breaches of the Bechtel Agreement by the Vogtle Owners, Vogtle Owner insolvency, and certain other events.
See Note 8 under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" for information on the Amended and Restated Loan
Guarantee Agreement, including applicable covenants, events of default, mandatory prepayment events, and conditions to
borrowing.
II-204
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Cost and Schedule
Georgia Power's approximate proportionate share of the remaining estimated capital cost to complete Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 by
the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, is as follows:
(in billions)
Base project capital cost forecast(a)(b)$ 8.2
Construction contingency estimate 0.2
Total project capital cost forecast(a)(b)8.4
Net investment as of December 31, 2019(b)(5.9)
Remaining estimate to complete(a)$ 2.5
(a)Excludes financing costs expected to be capitalized through AFUDC of approximately $300 million, of which $23 million had been accrued through
December 31, 2019.
(b)Net of $1.7 billion received from Toshiba under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related customer refunds.
As of December 31, 2019, approximately $140 million of the $366 million construction contingency estimate established in the
second quarter 2018 was allocated to the base capital cost forecast for cost risks including, among other factors, construction
productivity; craft labor incentives; adding resources for supervision, field support, project management, initial test program, start-
up, and operations and engineering support; subcontracts; and procurement. As and when construction contingency is spent,
Georgia Power may request the Georgia PSC to evaluate those expenditures for rate recovery.
Georgia Power estimates that its financing costs for construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will total approximately $3.1 billion,
of which $2.2 billion had been incurred through December 31, 2019.
As part of its ongoing processes, Southern Nuclear continues to evaluate cost and schedule forecasts on a regular basis to
incorporate current information available, particularly in the areas of commodity installation, system turnovers, and workforce
statistics.
In April 2019, Southern Nuclear established aggressive target values for monthly construction production and system turnover
activities as part of a strategy to maintain and, where possible, build margin to the regulatory-approved in-service dates of
November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4. The project has faced challenges with the April 2019 aggressive strategy
targets, including, but not limited to, electrical and pipefitting labor productivity and closure rates for work packages, which
resulted in a backlog of activities and completion percentages below the April 2019 aggressive strategy targets. However, Southern
Nuclear and Georgia Power believe that existing productivity levels and pace of activity completion are sufficient to meet the
regulatory-approved in-service dates.
In February 2020, Southern Nuclear updated its cost and schedule forecast, which did not change the projected overall capital cost
forecast and confirmed the expected in-service dates of November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4. This update
included initiatives to improve productivity while refining and extending system turnover plans and certain near-term milestone
dates. Other milestone dates did not change. Achievement of the aggressive site work plan relies on meeting increased monthly
production and activity target values during 2020. To meet these 2020 targets, existing craft, including subcontractors, construction
productivity must improve and be sustained above historical average levels, appropriate levels of craft laborers, particularly
electrical and pipefitter craft labor, must be maintained, and additional supervision and other field support resources must be
retained. Southern Nuclear and Georgia Power continue to believe that pursuit of an aggressive site work plan is an appropriate
strategy to achieve completion of the units by their regulatory-approved in-service dates.
As construction, including subcontract work, continues and testing and system turnover activities increase, challenges with
management of contractors and vendors; subcontractor performance; supervision of craft labor and related craft labor productivity,
particularly in the installation of electrical and mechanical commodities, ability to attract and retain craft labor, and/or related cost
escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, installation, system turnover, and the initial testing and start-up, including
any required engineering changes or any remediation related thereto, of plant systems, structures, or components (some of which
are based on new technology that only within the last few years began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale),
or regional transmission upgrades, any of which may require additional labor and/or materials; or other issues could arise and
change the projected schedule and estimated cost.
There have been technical and procedural challenges to the construction and licensing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at the federal
and state level and additional challenges may arise. Processes are in place that are designed to assure compliance with the
requirements specified in the Westinghouse Design Control Document and the combined construction and operating licenses,
including inspections by Southern Nuclear and the NRC that occur throughout construction. As a result of such compliance
II-205
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
processes, certain license amendment requests have been filed and approved or are pending before the NRC. Various design and
other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely submittal by Southern Nuclear of the ITAAC documentation for
each unit and the related reviews and approvals by the NRC necessary to support NRC authorization to load fuel, may arise, which
may result in additional license amendments or require other resolution. As part of the aggressive site work plan, in January 2020,
Southern Nuclear notified the NRC of its intent to load fuel in 2020. If any license amendment requests or other licensing-based
compliance issues are not resolved in a timely manner, there may be delays in the project schedule that could result in increased
costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. However, any extension of the regulatory-approved
project schedule is currently estimated to result in additional base capital costs of approximately $50 million per month, based on
Georgia Power's ownership interests, and AFUDC of approximately $12 million per month. While Georgia Power is not precluded
from seeking recovery of any future capital cost forecast increase, management will ultimately determine whether or not to seek
recovery. Any further changes to the capital cost forecast that are not expected to be recoverable through regulated rates will be
required to be charged to income and such charges could be material.
Joint Owner Contracts
In November 2017, the Vogtle Owners entered into an amendment to their joint ownership agreements for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4 to provide for, among other conditions, additional Vogtle Owner approval requirements. Effective in August 2018, the Vogtle
Owners further amended the joint ownership agreements to clarify and provide procedures for certain provisions of the joint
ownership agreements related to adverse events that require the vote of the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to continue construction (as amended, and together with the November 2017 amendment, the Vogtle
Joint Ownership Agreements). The Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements also confirm that the Vogtle Owners' sole recourse against
Georgia Power or Southern Nuclear for any action or inaction in connection with their performance as agent for the Vogtle Owners
is limited to removal of Georgia Power and/or Southern Nuclear as agent, except in cases of willful misconduct.
As a result of an increase in the total project capital cost forecast and Georgia Power's decision not to seek rate recovery of the
increase in the base capital costs in conjunction with the nineteenth VCM report in 2018, the holders of at least 90% of the
ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 were required to vote to continue construction. In September 2018, the Vogtle
Owners unanimously voted to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
In connection with the vote to continue construction, Georgia Power entered into (i) a binding term sheet (Vogtle Owner Term
Sheet) with the other Vogtle Owners and MEAG Power's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC (MEAG SPVJ),
MEAG Power SPVM, LLC (MEAG SPVM), and MEAG Power SPVP, LLC (MEAG SPVP) to take certain actions which partially
mitigate potential financial exposure for the other Vogtle Owners, including additional amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements and the purchase of PTCs from the other Vogtle Owners at pre-established prices, and (ii) a term sheet (MEAG Term
Sheet) with MEAG Power and MEAG SPVJ to provide funding with respect to MEAG SPVJ's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 under certain circumstances. On January 14, 2019, Georgia Power, MEAG Power, and MEAG SPVJ entered into an
agreement to implement the provisions of the MEAG Term Sheet. On February 18, 2019, Georgia Power, the other Vogtle Owners,
and MEAG Power's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG SPVJ, MEAG SPVM, and MEAG SPVP entered into certain amendments
to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements to implement the provisions of the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Regulatory Matters
In 2009, the Georgia PSC voted to certify construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 with a certified capital cost of $4.418 billion.
In addition, in 2009 the Georgia PSC approved inclusion of the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 related CWIP accounts in rate base, and
the State of Georgia enacted the Georgia Nuclear Energy Financing Act, which allows Georgia Power to recover financing costs for
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Financing costs are recovered on all applicable certified costs through annual adjustments to the NCCR
tariff up to the certified capital cost of $4.418 billion. At December 31, 2019, Georgia Power had recovered approximately $2.2
billion of financing costs. Financing costs related to capital costs above $4.418 billion are being recognized through AFUDC and
are expected to be recovered through retail rates over the life of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4; however, Georgia Power will not record
AFUDC related to any capital costs in excess of the total deemed reasonable by the Georgia PSC (currently $7.3 billion) and not
requested for rate recovery. On December 17, 2019, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's request to decrease the NCCR
tariff by $62 million annually, effective January 1, 2020.
II-206
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Georgia Power is required to file semi-annual VCM reports with the Georgia PSC by February 28 and August 31 of each year. In
2013, in connection with the eighth VCM report, the Georgia PSC approved a stipulation between Georgia Power and the staff of
the Georgia PSC to waive the requirement to amend the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 certificate in accordance with the 2009
certification order until the completion of Plant Vogtle Unit 3, or earlier if deemed appropriate by the Georgia PSC and Georgia
Power.
In 2016, the Georgia PSC voted to approve a settlement agreement (Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement) resolving certain prudency
matters in connection with the fifteenth VCM report. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC voted to approve (and issued its related
order on January 11, 2018) Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM report and modified the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement. The
Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, as modified by the January 11, 2018 order, resolved the following regulatory matters related to
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4: (i) none of the $3.3 billion of costs incurred through December 31, 2015 and reflected in the fourteenth
VCM report should be disallowed from rate base on the basis of imprudence; (ii) the Contractor Settlement Agreement was
reasonable and prudent and none of the amounts paid pursuant to the Contractor Settlement Agreement should be disallowed from
rate base on the basis of imprudence; (iii) (a) capital costs incurred up to $5.68 billion would be presumed to be reasonable and
prudent with the burden of proof on any party challenging such costs, (b) Georgia Power would have the burden to show that any
capital costs above $5.68 billion were prudent, and (c) a revised capital cost forecast of $7.3 billion (after reflecting the impact of
payments received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and related customer refunds) was found reasonable; (iv)
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 should be completed, with Southern Nuclear serving as project manager and Bechtel as
primary contractor; (v) approved and deemed reasonable Georgia Power's revised schedule placing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 in
service in November 2021 and November 2022, respectively; (vi) confirmed that the revised cost forecast does not represent a cost
cap and that prudence decisions on cost recovery will be made at a later date, consistent with applicable Georgia law; (vii) reduced
the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff (a) from 10.95% (the ROE rate setting point authorized by the Georgia PSC in the 2013
ARP) to 10.00% effective January 1, 2016, (b) from 10.00% to 8.30%, effective January 1, 2020, and (c) from 8.30% to 5.30%,
effective January 1, 2021 (provided that the ROE in no case will be less than Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt);
(viii) reduced the ROE used for AFUDC equity for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 from 10.00% to Georgia Power's average cost of
long-term debt, effective January 1, 2018; and (ix) agreed that upon Unit 3 reaching commercial operation, retail base rates would
be adjusted to include carrying costs on those capital costs deemed prudent in the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement. The January
11, 2018 order also stated that if Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are not commercially operational by June 1, 2021 and June 1, 2022,
respectively, the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff will be further reduced by 10 basis points each month (but not lower than
Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt) until the respective Unit is commercially operational. The ROE reductions
negatively impacted earnings by approximately $75 million, $100 million, and $25 million in 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively,
and are estimated to have negative earnings impacts of approximately $140 million, $240 million, and $190 million in 2020, 2021,
and 2022, respectively. In its January 11, 2018 order, the Georgia PSC also stated if other conditions change and assumptions upon
which Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM report are based do not materialize, the Georgia PSC reserved the right to reconsider the
decision to continue construction.
In February 2018, Georgia Interfaith Power & Light, Inc. (GIPL) and Partnership for Southern Equity, Inc. (PSE) filed a petition
appealing the Georgia PSC's January 11, 2018 order with the Fulton County Superior Court. In March 2018, Georgia Watch filed a
similar appeal to the Fulton County Superior Court for judicial review of the Georgia PSC's decision and denial of Georgia Watch's
motion for reconsideration. In December 2018, the Fulton County Superior Court granted Georgia Power's motion to dismiss the
two appeals. On January 9, 2019, GIPL, PSE, and Georgia Watch filed an appeal of this decision with the Georgia Court of
Appeals. On October 29, 2019, the Georgia Court of Appeals issued an opinion affirming the Fulton County Superior Court's ruling
that the Georgia PSC's January 11, 2018 order was not a final, appealable decision. In addition, the Georgia Court of Appeals
remanded the case to the Fulton County Superior Court to clarify its ruling as to whether the petitioners showed that review of the
Georgia PSC's final order would not provide them an adequate remedy. Georgia Power believes the petitions have no merit;
however, an adverse outcome in the litigation combined with subsequent adverse action by the Georgia PSC could have a material
impact on Southern Company's and Georgia Power's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
On February 18, 2020, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's twentieth VCM report and its concurrently-filed twenty-first
VCM report, including approval of (i) $1.2 billion of construction capital costs incurred from July 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019
and (ii) $21.5 million of expenditures related to Georgia Power's portion of an administrative claim filed in the Westinghouse
bankruptcy proceedings (which expenditures had previously been deferred by the Georgia PSC for later approval). Through the
twenty-first VCM, the Georgia PSC has approved total construction capital costs incurred through June 30, 2019 of $6.7 billion
(before $1.7 billion of payments received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related
customer refunds). On February 19, 2020, Georgia Power filed its twenty-second VCM report with the Georgia PSC covering the
period from July 1, 2019 through December 31, 2019, requesting approval of $674 million of construction capital costs incurred
during that period.
II-207
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Mississippi Power
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the balance sheets of Mississippi Power at December 31, 2019 and 2018 relate to:
 2019 2018 Note
 (in millions)
Retiree benefit plans – regulatory assets $ 213$ 171 (a)
Asset retirement obligations 210 143 (b)
Kemper County energy facility assets, net 61 69 (c)
Remaining net book value of retired assets 30 41 (d)
Property tax 47 44 (e)
Deferred charges related to income taxes 33 34 (b)
Plant Daniel Units 3 and 4 34 36 (f)
ECO Plan carryforward — 26 (g)
Other regulatory assets 48 28 (h)
Deferred credits related to income taxes (358) (377) (i)
Other cost of removal obligations (189) (185) (b)
Property damage (55) (56) (j)
Other regulatory liabilities (10) (9) (k)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ 64$ (35)
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) are approved by the Mississippi PSC and are as
follows:
(a)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period which may range up to 14 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(b)Asset retirement and other cost of removal obligations will be settled and trued up upon completion of removal activities over a period to be determined by the
Mississippi PSC. Asset retirement and other cost of removal obligations and deferred charges related to income taxes are generally recovered over the related
property lives, which may range up to 48 years.
(c)Includes $78 million of regulatory assets and $18 million of regulatory liabilities that are expected to be fully amortized by 2025 and 2023, respectively. For
additional information, see "Kemper County Energy Facility – Rate Recovery" herein.
(d)Retail portion includes approximately $16 million being recovered over a five-year period through 2021 and 2022 for Plant Watson and Plant Greene County,
respectively. Wholesale portion includes approximately $14 million being recovered over a 12-year period through 2031 for Plant Watson and Plant Greene
County.
(e)Recovered through the ad valorem tax adjustment clause over a 12-month period beginning in April of the following year. See "Ad Valorem Tax Adjustment"
herein for additional information.
(f)Represents the difference between the revenue requirement under purchase accounting and operating lease accounting, which will be amortized over a 10-year
period beginning October 2021.
(g)Generally recovered through the ECO Plan clause in the year following the deferral. See "Environmental Compliance Overview Plan" herein.
(h)Includes $9 million related to vacation pay and $5 million related to other miscellaneous assets, all of which are recorded and recovered over periods not
exceeding one year; $6 million related to loss on reacquired debt, which is recorded and amortized over either the remaining life of the original issue, or if
refinanced, over the remaining life of the new issue (at December 31, 2019, the amortization periods did not exceed 22 years); and $27 million related to fuel-
hedging assets, which are recorded over the life of the underlying hedged purchase contracts, which generally do not exceed three years, and are recovered
through Mississippi Power's energy cost management clause upon settlement.
(i)Includes excess deferred income taxes primarily associated with Tax Reform Legislation of $358 million, of which $252 million is related to protected deferred
income taxes being recovered over the related property lives, which may range up to 48 years, and $106 million related to unprotected deferred income taxes
(not subject to normalization). The unprotected retail portion includes $28 million associated with the Kemper County energy facility being amortized over an
eight-year period through 2025. The unprotected wholesale portion includes $18 million of excess deferred income taxes being amortized over three-year
periods through 2022. An additional $8 million associated with the System Restoration Rider is being amortized over an eight-year period through 2025. The
amortization period for the remaining unprotected deferred income taxes is expected to be determined in the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. See
"Kemper County Energy Facility" and "Municipal and Rural Associations Tariff" herein and Note 10 for additional information.
(j)See "System Restoration Rider" herein.
(k)Refunded or amortized generally over periods not exceeding one year.
II-208
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
2019 Base Rate Case
On November 26, 2019, Mississippi Power filed a base rate case (Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case) with the Mississippi
PSC. The filing includes a requested annual decrease in Mississippi Power's retail rates of $5.8 million, or 0.6%, which is driven
primarily by changes in the amortization rates of certain regulatory assets and liabilities and cost reductions, partially offset by an
increase in Mississippi Power's requested return on investment and depreciation associated with the filing of an updated
depreciation study. The revenue requirements included in the filing are based on a projected test year period of January 1, 2020
through December 31, 2020, a 53% average equity ratio, and a 7.728% return on investment. The filing reflects the elimination of
separate rates for costs associated with the Kemper County energy facility and energy efficiency initiatives; those costs are
proposed to be included in the PEP, ECO Plan, and ad valorem tax adjustment factor, as applicable. On December 10, 2019, the
Mississippi PSC suspended the base rate case filing through no later than March 25, 2020. If no further action is taken by the
Mississippi PSC, the proposed rates may be effective beginning on March 26, 2020. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
Operations Review
In August 2018, the Mississippi PSC began an operations review of Mississippi Power, for which the final report is expected prior
to the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The review includes, but is not limited to, a comparative analysis
of its costs, its cost recovery framework, and ways in which it may streamline management operations for the reasonable benefit of
ratepayers. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Reserve Margin Plan
On December 31, 2019, Mississippi Power updated its proposed Reserve Margin Plan (RMP), originally filed in August 2018, as
required by the Mississippi PSC. In 2018, Mississippi Power had proposed alternatives to reduce its reserve margin and lower or
avoid operating costs, with the most economic alternatives being the two-year and seven-year acceleration of the retirement of
Plant Watson Units 4 and 5, respectively, to the first quarter 2022 and the four-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Greene
County Units 1 and 2 to the third quarter 2021 and the third quarter 2022, respectively. The December 2019 update noted that Plant
Daniel Units 1 and 2 currently have long-term economics similar to Plant Watson Unit 5. The Plant Greene County unit retirements
would require the completion by Alabama Power of proposed transmission and system reliability improvements, as well as
agreement by Alabama Power. The RMP filing also states that, in the event the Mississippi PSC ultimately approves an alternative
that includes an accelerated retirement, Mississippi Power would require authorization to defer in a regulatory asset for future
recovery the remaining net book value of the units at the time of retirement. A decision by the Mississippi PSC that does not
include recovery of the remaining book value of any generating units retired could have a material impact on Southern Company's
and Mississippi Power's financial statements. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time. See Note 3
under "Other Matters – Mississippi Power" for additional information on Plant Daniel Units 1 and 2.
Performance Evaluation Plan
Mississippi Power's retail base rates generally are set under the PEP, a rate plan approved by the Mississippi PSC. Typically, two
PEP filings are made for each calendar year: the PEP projected filing, which is typically filed prior to the beginning of the year
based on a projected revenue requirement, and the PEP lookback filing, which is filed after the end of the year and allows for
review of the actual revenue requirement compared to the projected filing.
In February 2018, Mississippi Power revised its annual projected PEP filing for 2018 to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform
Legislation. The revised filing requested an increase of $26 million in annual revenues, based on a performance adjusted ROE of
9.33% and an increased equity ratio of 55%. In July 2018, Mississippi Power and the MPUS entered into a settlement agreement,
which was approved by the Mississippi PSC in August 2018, with respect to the 2018 PEP filing and all unresolved PEP filings for
prior years (PEP Settlement Agreement). Rates under the PEP Settlement Agreement became effective with the first billing cycle of
September 2018. The PEP Settlement Agreement provided for an increase of approximately $21.6 million in annual base retail
revenues, which excluded certain compensation costs contested by the MPUS, as well as approximately $2 million subsequently
approved for recovery through the 2018 Energy Efficiency Cost Rider. Under the PEP Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power
deferred a portion of the contested compensation costs for 2018 and 2019 as a regulatory asset, which totaled $4 million as of
December 31, 2019 and is included in other regulatory assets, deferred on the balance sheet. The Mississippi PSC is expected to
rule on the appropriate treatment for such costs in connection with the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The ultimate
outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Pursuant to the PEP Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power's performance-adjusted allowed ROE is 9.31% and its allowed
equity ratio is capped at 51%, pending further review by the Mississippi PSC. In lieu of the requested equity ratio increase,
Mississippi Power retained $44 million of excess accumulated deferred income taxes resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation
II-209
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
until the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Further, Mississippi Power agreed to seek equity contributions
sufficient to restore its equity ratio to 50% by December 31, 2018. Since Mississippi Power's actual average equity ratio for 2018
was more than 1% lower than the 50% target, Mississippi Power deferred the corresponding difference in its revenue requirement
of approximately $4 million as a regulatory liability for resolution in the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Pursuant to the
PEP Settlement Agreement, PEP proceedings are suspended until after the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate
Case and Mississippi Power was not required to make any PEP filings for regulatory years 2018, 2019, and 2020. The PEP
Settlement Agreement also resolved all open PEP filings with no change to customer rates.
Energy Efficiency
In May 2018, the Mississippi PSC issued an order approving Mississippi Power's revised annual projected Energy Efficiency Cost
Rider 2018 compliance filing, which increased annual retail revenues by approximately $3 million effective with the first billing
cycle for June 2018.
On February 5, 2019, the Mississippi PSC issued an order approving Mississippi Power's Energy Efficiency Cost Rider 2019
compliance filing, which included a slight decrease in annual retail revenues, effective with the first billing cycle in March 2019.
As part of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case, Mississippi Power has proposed that the Energy Efficiency Cost Rider be
eliminated and those costs be included in the PEP. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Environmental Compliance Overview Plan
In accordance with a 2011 accounting order from the Mississippi PSC, Mississippi Power has the authority to defer in a regulatory
asset for future recovery all plant retirement- or partial retirement-related costs resulting from environmental regulations. The
Mississippi PSC approved $41 million and $17 million of costs that were reclassified to regulatory assets associated with the fuel
conversion of Plant Watson and Plant Greene County, respectively, for amortization over five-year periods ending in July 2021 and
July 2022, respectively.
In August 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved an annual increase in revenues related to the ECO Plan of approximately $17
million, effective with the first billing cycle for September 2018. This increase represented the maximum 2% annual increase in
revenues and primarily related to the carryforward from the prior year.
The increase was the result of Mississippi PSC approval of an agreement between Mississippi Power and the MPUS to settle the
2018 ECO Plan filing (ECO Settlement Agreement) and was sufficient to recover costs through 2019, including remaining amounts
deferred from prior years along with the related carrying costs. In accordance with the ECO Settlement Agreement, ECO Plan
proceedings are suspended until after the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case and Mississippi Power was not
required to make any ECO Plan filings for 2018, 2019, and 2020, with any necessary adjustments reflected in the Mississippi
Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The ECO Settlement Agreement contains the same terms as the PEP Settlement Agreement described
herein with respect to allowed ROE and equity ratio. At December 31, 2019, Mississippi Power has recorded $2 million in other
regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance sheet related to the actual December 31, 2018 average equity ratio differential from
target applicable to the ECO Plan.
On October 24, 2019, the Mississippi PSC approved Mississippi Power's July 9, 2019 request for a CPCN to complete certain
environmental compliance projects, primarily associated with the Plant Daniel coal units co-owned 50% with Gulf Power. The total
estimated cost is approximately $125 million, with Mississippi Power's share of approximately $66 million being proposed for
recovery through its ECO Plan. Approximately $17 million of Mississippi Power's share is associated with ash pond closure and is
reflected in Mississippi Power's ARO liabilities. See Note 6 for additional information on AROs and Note 3 under "Other Matters –
Mississippi Power" for additional information on Gulf Power's ownership in Plant Daniel.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Mississippi Power annually establishes and is required to file for an adjustment to the retail fuel cost recovery factor that is
approved by the Mississippi PSC. The Mississippi PSC approved an increase of $39 million effective February 2018 and decreases
of $35 million and $24 million, effective in February 2019 and 2020, respectively. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, over recovered
retail fuel costs included in other current liabilities on Southern Company's balance sheets and over recovered regulatory clause
liabilities on Mississippi Power's balance sheets were approximately $23 million and $8 million, respectively.
Mississippi Power has wholesale MRA and Market Based (MB) fuel cost recovery factors. Effective with the first billing cycle for
January 2019, the wholesale MRA fuel rate increased $16 million annually and the wholesale MB fuel rate decreased by an
immaterial amount. Effective January 1, 2020, the wholesale MRA fuel rate increased $1 million annually and the wholesale MB
fuel rate decreased by an immaterial amount. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, over recovered wholesale MRA fuel costs included
in other current liabilities on Southern Company's balance sheets and over recovered regulatory clause liabilities on
II-210
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Mississippi Power's balance sheets were approximately $6 million. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, over/under recovered
wholesale MB fuel costs included in the balance sheets were immaterial.
Mississippi Power's operating revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel cost and amounts billed in accordance
with the currently approved cost recovery rate. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor should have no significant effect on
Mississippi Power's revenues or net income but will affect operating cash flows.
Ad Valorem Tax Adjustment
Mississippi Power establishes annually an ad valorem tax adjustment factor that is approved by the Mississippi PSC to collect the
ad valorem taxes paid by Mississippi Power. In 2019, 2018, and 2017, the Mississippi PSC approved Mississippi Power's annual ad
valorem tax adjustment factor filing, which included rate increases of $2 million, $7 million, and $8 million in 2019, 2018, and
2017, respectively.
System Restoration Rider
Mississippi Power carries insurance for the cost of certain types of damage to generation plants and general property. However,
Mississippi Power is self-insured for the cost of storm, fire, and other uninsured casualty damage to its property, including
transmission and distribution facilities. As permitted by the Mississippi PSC and the FERC, Mississippi Power accrues for the cost
of such damage through an annual expense accrual credited to regulatory liability accounts for the retail and wholesale
jurisdictions. The cost of repairing actual damage resulting from such events that individually exceed $50,000 is charged to the
reserve. Every three years the Mississippi PSC, the MPUS, and Mississippi Power agree on SRR revenue level(s) for the ensuing
period, based on historical data, expected exposure, type and amount of insurance coverage, excluding insurance cost, and any
other relevant information. The accrual amount and the reserve balance are determined based on the SRR revenue level(s). If a
significant change in circumstances occurs, then the SRR revenue level can be adjusted more frequently if Mississippi Power and
the MPUS or the Mississippi PSC deem the change appropriate. The property damage reserve accrual will be the difference
between the approved SRR revenues and the SRR revenue requirement, excluding any accrual to the reserve. In addition, SRR
allows Mississippi Power to set up a regulatory asset, pending review, if the allowable actual retail property damage costs exceed
the amount in the retail property damage reserve. Mississippi Power made retail accruals of $1 million, $1 million, and $3 million
for 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. Mississippi Power also accrued $0.3 million annually in 2019, 2018, and 2017 for the
wholesale jurisdiction. As of December 31, 2019, the property damage reserve balances were $54 million and $1 million for retail
and wholesale, respectively.
The SRR rate was zero for all years presented and Mississippi Power accrued $1 million, $2 million, and $4 million to the property
damage reserve in 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
Kemper County Energy Facility
Overview
The Kemper County energy facility was designed to utilize IGCC technology with an expected output capacity of 582 MWs and to
be fueled by locally mined lignite (an abundant, lower heating value coal) from a mine owned by Mississippi Power and situated
adjacent to the Kemper County energy facility.
Schedule and Cost Estimate
In 2012, the Mississippi PSC issued an order confirming the CPCN originally approved by the Mississippi PSC in 2010 authorizing
the acquisition, construction, and operation of the Kemper County energy facility. The order approved a construction cost cap of up
to $2.88 billion, with recovery of prudently-incurred costs subject to approval by the Mississippi PSC. The Kemper County energy
facility was originally projected to be placed in service in May 2014. Mississippi Power placed the combined cycle and the
associated common facilities portion of the Kemper County energy facility in service in August 2014. The combined cycle and
associated common facilities portions of the Kemper County energy facility were dedicated as Plant Ratcliffe in April 2018.
In June 2017, the Mississippi PSC stated its intent to issue an order, which occurred in July 2017, directing Mississippi Power to
pursue a settlement under which the Kemper County energy facility would be operated as a natural gas plant, rather than an IGCC
plant, and address all issues associated with the Kemper County energy facility. The order established a new docket for the purpose
of pursuing a global settlement of the related costs (Kemper Settlement Docket). In June 2017, Mississippi Power notified the
Mississippi PSC that it would begin a process to suspend operations and start-up activities on the gasifier portion of the Kemper
County energy facility, given the uncertainty as to its future.
At the time of project suspension in June 2017, the total cost estimate for the Kemper County energy facility was approximately
$7.38 billion, including approximately $5.95 billion of costs subject to the construction cost cap, net of $137 million in additional
II-211
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
grants from the DOE received in April 2016. In the aggregate, Mississippi Power had recorded charges to income of $3.07 billion
($1.89 billion after tax) as a result of changes in the cost estimate above the cost cap for the Kemper IGCC through May 2017.
Given the Mississippi PSC's stated intent regarding no further rate increase for the Kemper County energy facility and the
subsequent suspension, cost recovery of the gasifier portions became no longer probable; therefore, Mississippi Power recorded an
additional charge to income in June 2017 of $2.8 billion ($2.0 billion after tax), which included estimated costs associated with the
gasification portions of the plant and lignite mine. During the third and fourth quarters of 2017, Mississippi Power recorded charges
to income of $242 million ($206 million after tax), including $164 million for ongoing project costs, estimated mine and gasifier-
related costs, and certain termination costs during the suspension period prior to conclusion of the Kemper Settlement Docket, as
well as the charge associated with the Kemper Settlement Agreement discussed below.
In 2019, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax and after-tax charges to income of $24 million, primarily associated with the expected
close out of a related DOE contract, as well as other abandonment and related closure costs and ongoing period costs, net of salvage
proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets. The after-tax amount for 2019 includes an adjustment related to the tax
abandonment of the Kemper IGCC following the filing of the 2018 tax return. In 2018, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax charges
to income of $37 million ($68 million benefit after tax), primarily associated with abandonment and related closure costs and
ongoing period costs, net of salvage proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets, as well as the impact of a change in the
valuation allowance for the related state income tax NOL carryforward.
Mississippi Power expects to substantially complete mine reclamation activities in 2020 and dismantlement of the abandoned
gasifier-related assets and site restoration activities are expected to be completed in 2024. The additional pre-tax period costs
associated with dismantlement and site restoration activities, including related costs for compliance and safety, ARO accretion, and
property taxes, are estimated to total $17 million in 2020, $15 million to $16 million annually in 2021 through 2023, and $5 million
in 2024.
See Note 10 for additional information.
Rate Recovery
In February 2018, the Mississippi PSC voted to approve a settlement agreement related to cost recovery for the Kemper County
energy facility among Mississippi Power, the MPUS, and certain intervenors (Kemper Settlement Agreement), which resolved all
cost recovery issues, modified the CPCN to limit the Kemper County energy facility to natural gas combined cycle operation, and
provided for an annual revenue requirement of approximately $99.3 million for costs related to the Kemper County energy facility,
which included the impact of the Tax Reform Legislation. The revenue requirement was based on (i) a fixed ROE for 2018 of 8.6%
excluding any performance adjustment, (ii) a ROE for 2019 calculated in accordance with PEP, excluding the performance
adjustment, (iii) for future years, a performance-based ROE calculated pursuant to PEP, and (iv) amortization periods for the related
regulatory assets and liabilities of eight years and six years, respectively. The revenue requirement also reflects a disallowance
related to a portion of Mississippi Power's investment in the Kemper County energy facility requested for inclusion in rate base,
which was recorded in the fourth quarter 2017 as an additional charge to income of approximately $78 million ($85 million net of
accumulated depreciation of $7 million) pre-tax ($48 million after tax).
Under the Kemper Settlement Agreement, retail customer rates were reduced by approximately $26.8 million annually, effective
with the first billing cycle of April 2018, and include no recovery for costs associated with the gasifier portion of the Kemper
County energy facility in 2018 or at any future date.
On November 26, 2019, Mississippi Power filed the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case, which reflects the elimination of
separate rates for costs associated with the Kemper County energy facility; these costs are proposed to be included in rates for PEP,
ECO Plan, and ad valorem tax adjustment factor, as applicable. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this
time.
Lignite Mine and CO2 Pipeline Facilities
Mississippi Power owns the lignite mine and equipment and mineral reserves located around the Kemper County energy facility
site. The mine started commercial operation in June 2013. In connection with the Kemper County energy facility construction,
Mississippi Power also constructed a pipeline for the transport of captured CO2.
In 2010, Mississippi Power executed a management fee contract with Liberty Fuels Company, LLC (Liberty Fuels), a wholly-
owned subsidiary of The North American Coal Corporation, which developed, constructed, and is responsible for the mining
operations through the end of the mine reclamation. As the mining permit holder, Liberty Fuels has a legal obligation to perform
mine reclamation and Mississippi Power has a contractual obligation to fund all reclamation activities. As a result of the
II-212
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
abandonment of the Kemper IGCC, final mine reclamation began in 2018 and is expected to be substantially completed in 2020,
with monitoring expected to continue through 2027. See Note 6 for additional information.
On December 31, 2019, Mississippi Power transferred ownership of the CO2 pipeline to an unrelated gas pipeline company, with no
resulting impact on income. In conjunction with the transfer of the CO2 pipeline, the parties agreed to enter into a 15-year firm
transportation agreement, which is expected to be signed by March 2020, providing for the conversion by the pipeline company of
the CO2 pipeline to a natural gas pipeline to be used for the delivery of natural gas to Plant Ratcliffe. The agreement will be treated
as a finance lease for accounting purposes upon commencement, which is expected to occur by August 2020. See Note 9 for
additional information.
Government Grants
In 2010, the DOE, through a cooperative agreement with SCS, agreed to fund $270 million of the Kemper County energy facility
through the grants awarded to the project by the DOE under the Clean Coal Power Initiative Round 2. In 2016, additional DOE
grants in the amount of $137 million were awarded to the Kemper County energy facility. Through December 31, 2018, Mississippi
Power received total DOE grants of $387 million, of which $382 million reduced the construction costs of the Kemper County
energy facility and $5 million reimbursed Mississippi Power for expenses associated with DOE reporting. In December 2018,
Mississippi Power filed with the DOE its request for property closeout certification under the contract related to the $387 million of
grants received. Mississippi Power expects to close out the DOE contract related to the Kemper County energy facility in 2020. In
connection with the DOE closeout discussions, on April 29, 2019, the Civil Division of the Department of Justice informed
Southern Company and Mississippi Power of an investigation related to the Kemper County energy facility. The ultimate outcome
of this matter cannot be determined at this time; however, it could have a material impact on Southern Company's and Mississippi
Power's financial statements.
Municipal and Rural Associations Tariff
Mississippi Power provides wholesale electric service to Cooperative Energy, East Mississippi Electric Power Association, and the
City of Collins, all located in southeastern Mississippi, under a long-term, cost-based, FERC-regulated MRA tariff.
In 2017, Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy executed, and the FERC accepted, a Shared Service Agreement (SSA), as part
of the MRA tariff, under which Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy will share in providing electricity to the Cooperative
Energy delivery points under the tariff, effective January 1, 2018. The SSA may be cancelled by Cooperative Energy with 10 years
notice after December 31, 2020. As of December 31, 2019, Cooperative Energy has the option to decrease its use of Mississippi
Power's generation services under the MRA tariff up to 2.5% annually, with required notice, up to a maximum total reduction of
11%, or approximately $9 million in cumulative annual base revenues.
On May 7, 2019, the FERC accepted Mississippi Power's requested $3.7 million annual decrease in MRA base rates effective
January 1, 2019, as agreed upon in a settlement agreement reached with its wholesale customers resolving all matters related to the
Kemper County energy facility, similar to the retail rate settlement agreement approved by the Mississippi PSC in February 2018,
and reflecting the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation.
II-213
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the balance sheets of Southern Company Gas at December 31, 2019 and 2018 relate
to:
 2019  2018 Note
 (in millions)
Environmental remediation $ 296 $ 311 (a,b)
Retiree benefit plans 167 161 (a,c)
Long-term debt fair value adjustment 107 121 (d)
Under recovered regulatory clause revenues 72 90 (e)
Other regulatory assets 68 59 (f)
Other cost of removal obligations (1,606) (1,585) (g)
Deferred income tax credits (874) (940) (g,i)
Over recovered regulatory clause revenues (82) (43) (e)
Other regulatory liabilities (22) (46) (h)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ (1,874) $ (1,872)
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) have been approved or accepted by the relevant state
PSC or other regulatory body and are as follows:
(a)Not earning a return as offset in rate base by a corresponding asset or liability.
(b)Recovered through environmental cost recovery mechanisms when the remediation work is performed. See Note 3 for additional information.
(c)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period which range up to 15 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(d)Recovered over the remaining life of the original debt issuances at acquisition, which range up to 19 years as of December 31, 2019.
(e)Recorded and recovered or amortized over periods generally not exceeding six years. In addition to natural gas cost recovery mechanisms, the natural gas
distribution utilities have various other cost recovery mechanisms for the recovery of costs, including those related to infrastructure replacement programs.
(f)Includes financial instrument-hedging assets totaling $11 million and $8 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, which are recorded over the life
of the underlying hedged purchase contracts generally not exceeding two years, vacation pay assets totaling $11 million at both December 31, 2019 and 2018,
which are recorded as earned by employees and recovered as paid, generally within one year, and several other miscellaneous components, which are recovered
or amortized over periods generally not exceeding eight years.
(g)Other cost of removal obligations are recorded and deferred income tax liabilities are amortized over the related property lives, which may range up to 80 years.
Cost of removal liabilities will be settled and trued up following completion of the related activities.
(h)Comprised of numerous components, including amounts to be refunded to customers as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation and energy efficiency programs,
which are recovered or amortized over remaining periods generally not exceeding 20 years. Upon final settlement, actual energy efficiency program costs
incurred are recovered, and actual income earned is refunded through the energy cost recovery clause. See "Rate Proceedings" herein for additional information
regarding customer refunds resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation.
(i)As of December 31, 2019, includes $12 million of excess deferred income tax liabilities not subject to normalization as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation
which are being amortized through 2024. See "Rate Proceedings" herein and Note 10 for additional details.
Infrastructure Replacement Programs and Capital Projects
In addition to capital expenditures recovered through base rates by each of the natural gas distribution utilities, Nicor Gas and
Virginia Natural Gas have separate rate riders that provide timely recovery of capital expenditures for specific infrastructure
replacement programs. Descriptions of the infrastructure replacement programs and capital projects at the natural gas distribution
utilities follow.
Nicor Gas
In 2013, Illinois enacted legislation that allows Nicor Gas to provide more widespread safety and reliability enhancements to its
distribution system. The legislation stipulates that rate increases to customers as a result of any infrastructure investments shall not
exceed a cumulative annual average of 4.0% or, in any given year, 5.5% of base rate revenues. In 2014, the Illinois Commission
approved the nine-year regulatory infrastructure program, Investing in Illinois, subject to annual review. In conjunction with the
base rate case order issued by the Illinois Commission in January 2018, Nicor Gas is recovering program costs incurred prior to
December 31, 2017 through base rates. Additionally, the Illinois Commission's approval of Nicor Gas' rate case on October 2, 2019
included $65 million in annual revenues related to the recovery of program costs from January 1, 2018 through September 30, 2019
under the Investing in Illinois program. See "Rate Proceedings" herein for additional information.
II-214
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Virginia Natural Gas
In 2012, the Virginia Commission approved the Steps to Advance Virginia's Energy (SAVE) program, an accelerated infrastructure
replacement program. In 2016 and on September 25, 2019, the Virginia Commission approved amendments and extensions to the
SAVE program. The latest extension allows Virginia Natural Gas to continue replacing aging pipeline infrastructure through 2024
and increases its authorized investment under the previously-approved plan from $35 million to $40 million in 2019 with additional
annual investments of $50 million in 2020, $60 million in 2021, $70 million in each year from 2022 through 2024, and a total
potential variance of up to $5 million allowed for the program, for a maximum total investment over the six-year term (2019
through 2024) of $365 million.
The SAVE program is subject to annual review by the Virginia Commission. In accordance with the base rate case order issued by
the Virginia Commission in 2017, Virginia Natural Gas is recovering program costs incurred prior to September 1, 2017 through
base rates. Program costs incurred subsequent to September 1, 2017 are currently recovered through a separate rider and are subject
to future base rate case proceedings.
On December 6, 2019, Virginia Natural Gas filed an application with the Virginia Commission for a 24.1-mile header improvement
project to improve resiliency and increase the supply of natural gas delivered to energy suppliers, including Virginia Natural Gas.
The cost of the project is expected to total $346 million. The Virginia Commission is expected to rule on this application in the
second quarter 2020. Construction is expected to begin in June 2021 and the project is expected to be placed in service in the fourth
quarter 2022. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Atlanta Gas Light
GRAM
In December 2019, the Georgia PSC approved the continuation of GRAM as part of Atlanta Gas Light's 2019 rate case order.
Various infrastructure programs previously authorized by the Georgia PSC, including the Integrated Vintage Plastic Replacement
Program to replace aging plastic pipe and the Integrated System Reinforcement Program to upgrade Atlanta Gas Light's distribution
system and LNG facilities in Georgia, continue under GRAM and the recovery of and return on the infrastructure program
investments are included in annual base rate adjustments. The future expected costs to be recovered through rates related to
allowed, but not incurred, costs are recognized in an unrecognized ratemaking amount that is not reflected on the balance sheets.
This allowed cost is primarily the equity return on the capital investment under the infrastructure programs in place prior to
GRAM. See "Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts" herein for additional information. The Georgia PSC reviews Atlanta Gas Light's
performance annually under GRAM. See "Rate Proceedings" herein for additional information.
Pursuant to the GRAM approval, Atlanta Gas Light and the staff of the Georgia PSC agreed to a variation of the Integrated
Customer Growth Program to extend pipeline facilities to serve customers in areas without pipeline access and create new
economic development opportunities in Georgia. As a result, a new tariff was created, effective October 10, 2017, to provide up to
$15 million annually for Atlanta Gas Light to commit to strategic economic development projects. Projects under this tariff must be
approved by the Georgia PSC.
PRP
Atlanta Gas Light previously recovered PRP costs through a PRP surcharge established in 2015 to address recovery of the under
recovered PRP balance and the related carrying costs. The under recovered balance at December 31, 2019 was $135 million,
including $70 million of unrecognized equity return. Effective January 2018, PRP costs are being recovered through GRAM and
base rates until the earlier of the full recovery of the under recovered amount or December 31, 2025.
One of the capital projects under the PRP experienced construction issues and Atlanta Gas Light was required to complete
mitigation work prior to placing it in service. These mitigation costs were included in base rates in 2018. In 2017, Atlanta Gas Light
recovered $20 million from the settlement of contractor litigation claims and recovered an additional $7 million from the final
settlement of contractor litigation claims during the first quarter 2018. Mitigation costs recovered through the legal process are
retained by Atlanta Gas Light.
Natural Gas Cost Recovery
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, the natural gas distribution utilities are authorized by the relevant regulatory agencies in
the states in which they serve to use natural gas cost recovery mechanisms that adjust rates to reflect changes in the wholesale cost
of natural gas and ensure recovery of all costs prudently incurred in purchasing natural gas for customers. Natural gas cost recovery
revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable natural gas costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. Changes
in the billing factor will not have a significant effect on Southern Company's or Southern Company Gas' revenues or net income,
but will affect cash flows. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the over recovered balances were $74 million and
II-215
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
$15 million, respectively, which were included in other regulatory liabilities on Southern Company's and Southern Company Gas'
balance sheets.
Rate Proceedings
Nicor Gas
In January 2018, the Illinois Commission approved a $137 million increase in annual base rate revenues, including $93 million
related to the recovery of investments under the Investing in Illinois program, effective in February 2018, based on a ROE of 9.8%.
In May 2018, the Illinois Commission approved Nicor Gas' rehearing request for revised base rates to incorporate the reduction in
the federal income tax rate as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. The resulting decrease of approximately $44 million in annual
base rate revenues became effective May 5, 2018. The benefits of the Tax Reform Legislation from January 25, 2018 through May
4, 2018 were refunded to customers via bill credits and concluded in the second quarter 2019.
In November 2018, Nicor Gas filed a general base rate case with the Illinois Commission. On October 2, 2019, the Illinois
Commission approved a $168 million annual base rate increase effective October 8, 2019. The base rate increase included $65
million related to the recovery of program costs under the Investing in Illinois program and was based on a ROE of 9.73% and an
equity ratio of 54.2%. Additionally, the Illinois Commission approved a volume balancing adjustment, a revenue decoupling
mechanism for residential customers that provides a monthly benchmark level of revenue per rate class for recovery.
Atlanta Gas Light
In February 2018, Atlanta Gas Light revised its annual base rate filing to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation and
requested a $16 million rate reduction. In May 2018, the Georgia PSC approved a stipulation for Atlanta Gas Light's annual base
rates to remain at the 2017 level for 2018 and 2019, with customer credits of $8 million in each of July 2018 and October 2018 to
reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. The Georgia PSC maintained Atlanta Gas Light's previously authorized earnings
band based on a ROE between 10.55% and 10.95% and increased the allowed equity ratio by 4% to an equity ratio of 55% to
address the negative cash flow and credit metric impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation.
On June 3, 2019, Atlanta Gas Light filed a general base rate case with the Georgia PSC. On December 19, 2019, the Georgia PSC
approved a $65 million annual base rate increase, effective January 1, 2020, based on a ROE of 10.25% and an equity ratio of 56%.
Earnings will be evaluated against a ROE range of 10.05% to 10.45%, with disposition of any earnings above 10.45% to be
determined by the Georgia PSC. Additionally, the Georgia PSC approved continuation of the previously authorized inclusion in
base rates of the recovery of and return on the infrastructure program investments, including, but not limited to, GRAM
adjustments, and a reauthorization and continuation of GRAM until terminated by the Georgia PSC. GRAM filing rate adjustments
will be based on the authorized ROE of 10.25%. GRAM adjustments for 2021 may not exceed 5% of 2020 base rates. The 5%
limitation does not set a precedent in any future rate proceedings by Atlanta Gas Light.
On January 31, 2020, in accordance with the Georgia PSC's order for the 2019 rate case, Atlanta Gas Light filed a recommended
notice of proposed rulemaking for a long-range planning tool. The proposal provides for participating natural gas utilities to file a
comprehensive capacity supply and related infrastructure delivery plan for a 10-year period, including capital and related
operations and maintenance expense budgets. Participating natural gas utilities would file an updated 10-year plan at least once
every third year under the proposal. Related costs of implementing an approved comprehensive plan would be included in the
utility's next rate case or GRAM filing. The rulemaking process is expected to be completed during 2020.
Virginia Natural Gas
In 2017, the Virginia Commission approved a settlement for a $34 million increase in annual base rate revenues, effective
September 1, 2017, including $13 million related to the recovery of investments under the SAVE program. See "Infrastructure
Replacement Programs and Capital Projects" herein for additional information. An authorized ROE range of 9.0% to 10.0% with a
midpoint of 9.5% will be used to determine the revenue requirement in any filing, other than for a change in base rates.
In December 2018, the Virginia Commission approved Virginia Natural Gas' annual information form filing, which reduced annual
base rates by $14 million effective January 1, 2019 due to lower tax expense as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, along with
customer refunds, via bill credits, for $14 million related to 2018 tax benefits deferred as a regulatory liability at December 31,
2018. These customer refunds were completed in the first quarter 2019.
On February 3, 2020, Virginia Natural Gas filed a notice of intent with the Virginia Commission as required prior to the filing of a
base rate case, which will occur between April 3, 2020 and April 30, 2020. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
II-216
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts
The following table illustrates Southern Company Gas' authorized ratemaking amounts that are not recognized on its balance
sheets. These amounts are primarily composed of an allowed equity rate of return on assets associated with certain regulatory
infrastructure programs. These amounts will be recognized as revenues in Southern Company Gas' financial statements in the
periods they are billable to customers, the majority of which will be recovered by 2025.
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
 (in millions)
Atlanta Gas Light $ 70$ 95
Virginia Natural Gas 10 11
Nicor Gas 2 4
Total $ 82$ 110
3. CONTINGENCIES, COMMITMENTS, AND GUARANTEES
General Litigation Matters
The Registrants are involved in various other matters being litigated and regulatory matters. The ultimate outcome of such pending
or potential litigation or regulatory matters against each Registrant and any subsidiaries cannot be determined at this time; however,
for current proceedings not specifically reported herein, management does not anticipate that the ultimate liabilities, if any, arising
from such current proceedings would have a material effect on such Registrant's financial statements.
The Registrants believe the pending legal challenges discussed below have no merit; however, the ultimate outcome of these
matters cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Company
In January 2017, a securities class action complaint was filed against Southern Company, certain of its officers, and certain former
Mississippi Power officers in the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia by Monroe County Employees'
Retirement System on behalf of all persons who purchased shares of Southern Company's common stock between April 25, 2012
and October 29, 2013. The complaint alleges that Southern Company, certain of its officers, and certain former Mississippi Power
officers made materially false and misleading statements regarding the Kemper County energy facility in violation of certain
provisions under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. The complaint seeks, among other things, compensatory
damages and litigation costs and attorneys' fees. In 2017, the plaintiffs filed an amended complaint that provided additional detail
about their claims, increased the purported class period by one day, and added certain other former Mississippi Power officers as
defendants. Also in 2017, the defendants filed a motion to dismiss the plaintiffs' amended complaint with prejudice, to which the
plaintiffs filed an opposition. In March 2018, the court issued an order granting, in part, the defendants' motion to dismiss. The
court dismissed certain claims against certain officers of Southern Company and Mississippi Power and dismissed the allegations
related to a number of the statements that plaintiffs challenged as being false or misleading. In April 2018, the defendants filed a
motion for reconsideration of the court's order, seeking dismissal of the remaining claims in the lawsuit. In August 2018, the court
denied the motion for reconsideration and denied a motion to certify the issue for interlocutory appeal. On August 22, 2019, the
court certified the plaintiffs' proposed class. On September 5, 2019, the defendants filed a petition for interlocutory appeal of the
class certification order with the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Eleventh Circuit. On December 19, 2019, the U.S. District Court for
the Northern District of Georgia entered an order staying all deadlines in the case pending mediation. The stay automatically
expires on March 31, 2020.
In February 2017, Jean Vineyard and Judy Mesirov each filed a shareholder derivative lawsuit in the U.S. District Court for the
Northern District of Georgia. Each of these lawsuits names as defendants Southern Company, certain of its directors, certain of its
officers, and certain former Mississippi Power officers. In 2017, these two shareholder derivative lawsuits were consolidated in the
U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia. The complaints allege that the defendants caused Southern Company to
make false or misleading statements regarding the Kemper County energy facility cost and schedule. Further, the complaints allege
that the defendants were unjustly enriched and caused the waste of corporate assets and also allege that the individual defendants
violated their fiduciary duties. Each plaintiff seeks to recover, on behalf of Southern Company, unspecified actual damages and, on
each plaintiff's own behalf, attorneys' fees and costs in bringing the lawsuit. Each plaintiff also seeks certain changes to Southern
Company's corporate governance and internal processes. In April 2018, the court entered an order staying this lawsuit until 30 days
after the resolution of any dispositive motions or any settlement, whichever is earlier, in the securities class action.
II-217
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
In May 2017, Helen E. Piper Survivor's Trust filed a shareholder derivative lawsuit in the Superior Court of Gwinnett County,
Georgia that names as defendants Southern Company, certain of its directors, certain of its officers, and certain former Mississippi
Power officers. The complaint alleges that the individual defendants, among other things, breached their fiduciary duties in
connection with schedule delays and cost overruns associated with the construction of the Kemper County energy facility. The
complaint further alleges that the individual defendants authorized or failed to correct false and misleading statements regarding the
Kemper County energy facility schedule and cost and failed to implement necessary internal controls to prevent harm to Southern
Company. The plaintiff seeks to recover, on behalf of Southern Company, unspecified actual damages and disgorgement of profits
and, on its behalf, attorneys' fees and costs in bringing the lawsuit. The plaintiff also seeks certain unspecified changes to Southern
Company's corporate governance and internal processes. In May 2018, the court entered an order staying this lawsuit until 30 days
after the resolution of any dispositive motions or any settlement, whichever is earlier, in the securities class action. On August 5,
2019, the court granted a motion filed by the plaintiff on July 17, 2019 to substitute a new named plaintiff, Martin J. Kobuck, in
place of Helen E. Piper Survivor's Trust.
Georgia Power
In 2011, plaintiffs filed a putative class action against Georgia Power in the Superior Court of Fulton County, Georgia alleging that
Georgia Power's collection in rates of amounts for municipal franchise fees (which fees are paid to municipalities) exceeded the
amounts allowed in orders of the Georgia PSC and alleging certain state tort law claims. In 2016, the Georgia Court of Appeals
reversed the trial court's previous dismissal of the case and remanded the case to the trial court. Georgia Power filed a petition for
writ of certiorari with the Georgia Supreme Court, which was granted in 2017. In June 2018, the Georgia Supreme Court affirmed
the judgment of the Georgia Court of Appeals and remanded the case to the trial court for further proceedings. Following a motion
by Georgia Power, on February 13, 2019, the Superior Court of Fulton County ordered the parties to submit petitions to the Georgia
PSC for a declaratory ruling to address certain terms the court previously held were ambiguous as used in the Georgia PSC's orders.
The order entered by the Superior Court of Fulton County also conditionally certified the proposed class. In March 2019, Georgia
Power and the plaintiffs filed petitions with the Georgia PSC seeking confirmation of the proper application of the municipal
franchise fee schedule pursuant to the Georgia PSC's orders. On October 23, 2019, the Georgia PSC issued an order that found and
concluded that Georgia Power has appropriately implemented the municipal franchise fee schedule. On March 6, 2019, Georgia
Power filed a notice of appeal with the Georgia Court of Appeals regarding the Superior Court of Fulton County's February 2019
order. The amount of any possible losses cannot be calculated at this time because, among other factors, it is unknown whether
conditional class certification will be upheld and the ultimate composition of any class and whether any losses would be subject to
recovery from any municipalities.
Mississippi Power
In May 2018, Southern Company and Mississippi Power received a notice of dispute and arbitration demand filed by Martin
Product Sales, LLC (Martin) based on two agreements, both related to Kemper IGCC byproducts for which Mississippi Power
provided termination notices in 2017. Martin alleges breach of contract, breach of good faith and fair dealing, fraud and
misrepresentation, and civil conspiracy and makes a claim for damages in the amount of approximately $143 million, as well as
additional unspecified damages, attorney's fees, costs, and interest. A portion of the claim for damages was on behalf of Martin
Transport, Inc. (Martin Transport), an affiliate of Martin. In the first quarter 2019, Mississippi Power and Southern Company filed
motions to dismiss, which were denied by the arbitration panel on May 10, 2019. On September 27, 2019, Martin Transport filed a
separate complaint against Mississippi Power in the Circuit Court of Kemper County, Mississippi alleging claims of fraud,
negligent misrepresentation, promissory estoppel, and equitable estoppel, each arising out of the same alleged facts and
circumstances that underlie Martin's arbitration demand. Martin Transport seeks compensatory damages of $5 million and punitive
damages of $50 million. In November 2019, Martin Transport's claim was combined with the Martin arbitration case and the
separate court case was dismissed. On December 16, 2019, Southern Company and Mississippi Power each filed motions for
summary judgment on all claims. On February 17, 2020, the arbitration panel granted Southern Company's motion and dismissed
Southern Company from the arbitration. An adverse outcome in this proceeding could have a material impact on Southern
Company's and Mississippi Power's financial statements.
In November 2018, Ray C. Turnage and 10 other individual plaintiffs filed a putative class action complaint against Mississippi
Power and three members of the Mississippi PSC in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of Mississippi. Mississippi
Power received Mississippi PSC approval in 2013 to charge a mirror CWIP rate premised upon including in its rate base pre-
construction and construction costs for the Kemper IGCC prior to placing the Kemper IGCC into service. The Mississippi Supreme
Court reversed that approval and ordered Mississippi Power to refund the amounts paid by customers under the previously-
approved mirror CWIP rate. The plaintiffs allege that the initial approval process, and the amount approved, were improper. They
also allege that Mississippi Power underpaid customers by up to $23.5 million in the refund process by applying an incorrect
interest rate. The plaintiffs seek to recover, on behalf of themselves and their putative class, actual damages, punitive
II-218
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
damages, pre-judgment interest, post-judgment interest, attorney's fees, and costs. In response to Mississippi Power and the
Mississippi PSC each filing a motion to dismiss, the plaintiffs filed an amended complaint on March 14, 2019. The amended
complaint included four additional plaintiffs and additional claims for gross negligence, reckless conduct, and intentional
wrongdoing. Mississippi Power and the Mississippi PSC have each filed a motion to dismiss the amended complaint. An adverse
outcome in this proceeding could have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial statements.
See Note 2 under "Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
Southern Power
Southern Power indirectly owns a 51% membership interest in RE Roserock LLC (Roserock), the owner of the Roserock facility in
Pecos County, Texas. Prior to the facility being placed in service in 2016, certain solar panels were damaged during installation by
the construction contractor, McCarthy Building Companies, Inc. (McCarthy), and certain solar panels were damaged by a hail event
that also occurred during construction. In connection therewith, Southern Power withheld payment of approximately $26 million to
the construction contractor, which placed a lien on the Roserock facility for the same amount. In 2017, Roserock filed a lawsuit in
the state district court in Pecos County, Texas against XL Insurance America, Inc. and North American Elite Insurance Company
seeking recovery from an insurance policy for damages resulting from the hail event and McCarthy's installation practices. In June
2018, the court granted Roserock's motion for partial summary judgment, finding that the insurers were in breach of contract and in
violation of the Texas Insurance Code for failing to pay any monies owed for the hail claim. Separate lawsuits were filed between
Roserock and McCarthy, as well as other parties, and that litigation was consolidated in the U.S. District Court for the Western
District of Texas. On April 18, 2019, Roserock and the parties to the state and federal lawsuits executed a settlement agreement and
mutual release that resolved both lawsuits. Following execution of the agreement, the lawsuits were dismissed, Southern Power
paid McCarthy the amounts previously withheld, and McCarthy released its lien. As part of the settlement, Roserock received funds
that covered all related legal costs, damages, and the replacement costs of certain solar panels. Funds received by Southern Power
in excess of the initial replacement costs were recognized as a gain and included in other income (expense), net, with a portion
allocated to noncontrolling interests. As a result, Southern Power recognized a $12 million after-tax gain in the second quarter
2019.
Environmental Remediation
The Southern Company system must comply with environmental laws and regulations governing the handling and disposal of
waste and releases of hazardous substances. Under these various laws and regulations, the Southern Company system could incur
substantial costs to clean up affected sites. The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities
conduct studies to determine the extent of any required cleanup and have recognized the estimated costs to clean up known
impacted sites in the financial statements. A liability for environmental remediation costs is recognized only when a loss is
determined to be probable and reasonably estimable. The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution
utilities in Illinois and Georgia have each received authority from their respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory
agencies to recover approved environmental compliance costs through regulatory mechanisms. These regulatory mechanisms are
adjusted annually or as necessary within limits approved by the state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies. At
December 31, 2019 and 2018, the environmental remediation liabilities of Alabama Power and Mississippi Power were immaterial.
Georgia Power has been designated or identified as a potentially responsible party at sites governed by the Georgia Hazardous Site
Response Act and/or by the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act, and assessment and
potential cleanup of such sites is expected. For all years presented, Georgia Power recovered approximately $2 million annually
through the ECCR tariff. Effective January 1, 2020, Georgia Power is recovering approximately $12 million annually through the
ECCR tariff under the 2019 ARP. Georgia Power recognizes a liability for environmental remediation costs only when it determines
a loss is probable and reasonably estimable and reduces the reserve as expenditures are incurred. Any difference between the
liabilities accrued and costs recovered through rates is deferred as a regulatory asset or liability. The annual recovery amount is
expected to be adjusted in future regulatory proceedings.
On December 23, 2019, Mississippi Power entered into an agreement with the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality
related to groundwater conditions arising from the closed ash pond at Plant Watson. Mississippi Power paid a civil penalty of
$200,000 and will complete an assessment and remediation consistent with the requirements of the agreement and the CCR Rule. It
is anticipated that corrective action will be needed; however, an estimate of remedial costs will not be available until further site
assessment is completed. Mississippi Power expects to recover the retail portion of remedial costs through the ECO Plan and the
wholesale portion through MRA rates.
Southern Company Gas is subject to environmental remediation liabilities associated with 40 former MGP sites in four different
states. Southern Company Gas' accrued environmental remediation liability at December 31, 2019 and 2018 was based on the
II-219
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
estimated cost of environmental investigation and remediation associated with known current and former MGP operating sites.
These environmental remediation expenditures are generally recoverable from customers through rate mechanisms approved by the
applicable state regulatory agencies of the natural gas distribution utilities.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the environmental remediation liability and the balance of under recovered environmental
remediation costs were reflected in the balance sheets as follows:
 Southern
CompanyGeorgia
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
December 31, 2019:    
Environmental remediation liability:    
Other current liabilities $ 51$ 15$ 36
Accrued environmental remediation 234 — 233
Under recovered environmental remediation costs:    
Other regulatory assets, current $ 49$ 12$ 37
Other regulatory assets, deferred 300 40 260
    
December 31, 2018:    
Environmental remediation liability:    
Other current liabilities $ 49$ 23$ 26
Accrued environmental remediation 268 — 268
Under recovered environmental remediation costs:    
Other regulatory assets, current $ 21$ 2$ 19
Other regulatory assets, deferred 345 53 292
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time; however, as a result of the regulatory treatment for
environmental remediation expenses described above, the final disposition of these matters is not expected to have a material
impact on the financial statements of the applicable Registrants.
Nuclear Fuel Disposal Costs
Acting through the DOE and pursuant to the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, the U.S. government entered into contracts with
Alabama Power and Georgia Power that require the DOE to dispose of spent nuclear fuel and high level radioactive waste
generated at Plants Farley, Hatch, and Vogtle Units 1 and 2 beginning no later than January 31, 1998. The DOE has yet to
commence the performance of its contractual and statutory obligation to dispose of spent nuclear fuel. Consequently, Alabama
Power and Georgia Power pursued and continue to pursue legal remedies against the U.S. government for its partial breach of
contract.
In 2014, Alabama Power and Georgia Power filed lawsuits against the U.S. government for the costs of continuing to store spent
nuclear fuel at Plants Farley, Hatch, and Vogtle Units 1 and 2 for the period from January 1, 2011 through December 31, 2013. The
damage period was subsequently extended to December 31, 2014. On June 12, 2019, the Court of Federal Claims granted Alabama
Power's and Georgia Power's motion for summary judgment on damages not disputed by the U.S. government, awarding those
undisputed damages to Alabama Power and Georgia Power. However, those undisputed damages are not collectible and no amounts
will be recognized in the financial statements until the court enters final judgment on the remaining damages.
In 2017, Alabama Power and Georgia Power filed additional lawsuits against the U.S. government in the Court of Federal Claims
for the costs of continuing to store spent nuclear fuel at Plants Farley, Hatch, and Vogtle Units 1 and 2 for the period from January
1, 2015 through December 31, 2017. Damages will continue to accumulate until the issue is resolved, the U.S. government disposes
of Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's spent nuclear fuel pursuant to its contractual obligations, or alternative storage is
otherwise provided. No amounts have been recognized in the financial statements as of December 31, 2019 for any potential
recoveries from the pending lawsuits.
II-220
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The final outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. However, Alabama Power and Georgia Power expect to credit
any recoveries for the benefit of customers in accordance with direction from their respective PSC; therefore, no material impact on
Southern Company's, Alabama Power's, or Georgia Power's net income is expected.
On-site dry spent fuel storage facilities are operational at all three plants and can be expanded to accommodate spent fuel through
the expected life of each plant.
Nuclear Insurance
Under the Price-Anderson Amendments Act (Act), Alabama Power and Georgia Power maintain agreements of indemnity with the
NRC that, together with private insurance, cover third-party liability arising from any nuclear incident occurring at the companies'
nuclear power plants. The Act provides funds up to $13.9 billion for public liability claims that could arise from a single nuclear
incident. Each nuclear plant is insured against this liability to a maximum of $450 million by American Nuclear Insurers (ANI),
with the remaining coverage provided by a mandatory program of deferred premiums that could be assessed, after a nuclear
incident, against all owners of commercial nuclear reactors. A company could be assessed up to $138 million per incident for each
licensed reactor it operates but not more than an aggregate of $20 million per incident to be paid in a calendar year for each reactor.
Such maximum assessment, excluding any applicable state premium taxes, for Alabama Power and Georgia Power, based on its
ownership and buyback interests in all licensed reactors, is $275 million and $267 million, respectively, per incident, but not more
than an aggregate of $41 million and $40 million, respectively, to be paid for each incident in any one year. Both the maximum
assessment per reactor and the maximum yearly assessment are adjusted for inflation at least every five years. The next scheduled
adjustment is due no later than November 1, 2023. See Note 5 under "Joint Ownership Agreements" for additional information on
joint ownership agreements.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power are members of Nuclear Electric Insurance Limited (NEIL), a mutual insurer established to
provide property damage insurance in an amount up to $1.5 billion for members' operating nuclear generating facilities.
Additionally, both companies have NEIL policies that currently provide decontamination, excess property insurance, and premature
decommissioning coverage up to $1.25 billion for nuclear losses and policies providing coverage up to $750 million for non-
nuclear losses in excess of the $1.5 billion primary coverage.
NEIL also covers the additional costs that would be incurred in obtaining replacement power during a prolonged accidental outage
at a member's nuclear plant. Members can purchase this coverage, subject to a deductible waiting period of up to 26 weeks, with a
maximum per occurrence per unit limit of $490 million. After the deductible period, weekly indemnity payments would be received
until either the unit is operational or until the limit is exhausted. Alabama Power and Georgia Power each purchase limits based on
the projected full cost of replacement power, subject to ownership limitations, and have each elected a 12-week deductible waiting
period for each nuclear plant.
A builders' risk property insurance policy has been purchased from NEIL for the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. This
policy provides the Vogtle Owners up to $2.75 billion for accidental property damage occurring during construction.
Under each of the NEIL policies, members are subject to assessments each year if losses exceed the accumulated funds available to
the insurer. The maximum annual assessments for Alabama Power and Georgia Power as of December 31, 2019 under the NEIL
policies would be $58 million and $85 million, respectively.
Claims resulting from terrorist acts are covered under both the ANI and NEIL policies (subject to normal policy limits). The
aggregate that NEIL will pay for all claims resulting from terrorist acts in any 12-month period is $3.2 billion plus such additional
amounts NEIL can recover through reinsurance, indemnity, or other sources.
For all on-site property damage insurance policies for commercial nuclear power plants, the NRC requires that the proceeds of such
policies shall be dedicated first for the sole purpose of placing the reactor in a safe and stable condition after an accident. Any
remaining proceeds are to be applied next toward the costs of decontamination and debris removal operations ordered by the NRC,
and any further remaining proceeds are to be paid either to the applicable company or to its debt trustees as may be appropriate
under the policies and applicable trust indentures. In the event of a loss, the amount of insurance available might not be adequate to
cover property damage and other expenses incurred. Uninsured losses and other expenses, to the extent not recovered from
customers, would be borne by Alabama Power or Georgia Power, as applicable, and could have a material effect on Southern
Company's, Alabama Power's, and Georgia Power's financial condition and results of operations.
All retrospective assessments, whether generated for liability, property, or replacement power, may be subject to applicable state
premium taxes.
II-221
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Other Matters
Southern Company
As discussed in Note 1 under "Leveraged Leases," a subsidiary of Southern Holdings has several leveraged lease agreements. The
ability of the lessees to make required payments to the Southern Holdings subsidiary is dependent on the operational performance
of the assets. In 2017, the financial and operational performance of one of the lessees and the associated generation assets raised
significant concerns about the short-term ability of the generation assets to produce cash flows sufficient to support ongoing
operations and the lessee's contractual obligations and its ability to make the remaining semi-annual lease payments through the
end of the lease term in 2047. In addition, following the expiration of the existing power offtake agreement in 2032, the lessee also
is exposed to remarketing risk, which encompasses the price and availability of alternative sources of generation. While all lease
payments through December 31, 2019 have been paid in full due to recent operational improvements, operational and remarketing
risks and the resulting cash liquidity challenges persist, and significant concerns continue regarding the lessee's ability to make the
remaining semi-annual lease payments. These challenges may also impact the expected residual value of the generation assets.
Southern Company has evaluated the recoverability of the lease receivable and the expected residual value of the generation assets
under various scenarios. Based on current forecasts of energy prices in the years following the expiration of the existing PPA,
Southern Company concluded that it is no longer probable that all of the associated rental payments will be received over the term
of the lease. As a result, during the fourth quarter 2019, Southern Company revised the estimate of cash flows to be received under
the leveraged lease, which resulted in an impairment charge of $17 million ($13 million after tax). If any future lease payment is
not paid in full, the Southern Holdings subsidiary may be unable to make its corresponding payment to the holders of the
underlying non-recourse debt related to the generation assets. Failure to make the required payment to the debtholders could
represent an event of default that would give the debtholders the right to foreclose on, and take ownership of, the generation assets
from the Southern Holdings subsidiary, in effect terminating the lease and resulting in the write-off of the related lease receivable,
which totaled approximately $76 million at December 31, 2019. Southern Company will continue to monitor the operational
performance of the underlying assets and evaluate the ability of the lessee to continue to make the required lease payments. The
ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Alabama Power
On October 16, 2019, Alabama Power agreed to a consent order regarding a fish kill investigation. The consent order required
Alabama Power to pay approximately $50,000 to the Alabama Department of Environmental Management in civil penalties and
approximately $172,000 to the Alabama Department of Conservation and Natural Resources in fish restocking costs. Alabama
Power paid the penalties and restocking costs during the fourth quarter 2019.
Mississippi Power
In 2013, Mississippi Power submitted a lost revenue claim under the Deepwater Horizon Economic and Property Damages
Settlement Agreement associated with the oil spill that occurred in the Gulf of Mexico in 2010. In May 2018, Mississippi Power's
claim was settled. The settlement proceeds of $18 million, net of expenses and income tax, were included in Mississippi Power's
earnings for 2018. Mississippi Power received half of the settlement proceeds in 2018 and half in 2019.
In conjunction with Southern Company's sale of Gulf Power, NextEra Energy held back $75 million of the purchase price pending
Mississippi Power and Gulf Power negotiating a mutually acceptable revised operating agreement for Plant Daniel. In addition,
Mississippi Power and Gulf Power committed to seek a restructuring of their 50% undivided ownership interests in Plant Daniel
such that each of them would, after the restructuring, own 100% of a generating unit. On January 15, 2019, Gulf Power provided
notice to Mississippi Power that Gulf Power will retire its share of the generating capacity of Plant Daniel on January 15, 2024.
Mississippi Power has the option to purchase Gulf Power's ownership interest for $1 on January 15, 2024, provided that Mississippi
Power exercises the option no later than 120 days prior to that date. Mississippi Power is assessing the potential operational and
economic effects of Gulf Power's notice. The ultimate outcome of these matters remains subject to completion of Mississippi
Power's evaluations and applicable regulatory approvals, including by the FERC and the Mississippi PSC, and cannot be
determined at this time. See Note 15 under "Southern Company" for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
Southern Company Gas
Gas Pipeline Projects
At December 31, 2019, Southern Company Gas was involved in two gas pipeline construction projects, the Atlantic Coast Pipeline
project and the PennEast Pipeline project.
II-222
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The Atlantic Coast Pipeline has experienced challenges to its permits since construction began in 2018. During the third and fourth
quarters 2018, a FERC stop work order, together with delays in obtaining permits necessary for construction and construction
delays due to judicial actions, impacted the cost and schedule for the project. Project cost estimates are approximately $8.0 billion
($400 million for Southern Company Gas), excluding financing costs. On October 4, 2019, the U.S. Supreme Court agreed to hear
Atlantic Coast Pipeline's appeal of a lower court ruling that overturned a key permit for the project. On January 7, 2020, the U.S.
Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit vacated another key permit. The operator of the joint venture has indicated that it currently
expects to complete construction by the end of 2021 and place the project in service shortly thereafter.
On February 7, 2020, Southern Company Gas entered into an agreement with Dominion Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC for the sale
of its interest in Atlantic Coast Pipeline. The transaction is expected to be completed in the first half of 2020; however, the ultimate
outcome cannot be determined at this time. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and
Atlantic Coast Pipeline" for additional information.
Expected project costs related to the PennEast Pipeline for Southern Company Gas total approximately $300 million, excluding
financing costs. In January 2018, the PennEast Pipeline received initial FERC approval. Work continues with state and federal
agencies to obtain the required permits to begin construction on the PennEast Pipeline. On September 10, 2019, an appellate court
ruled that the PennEast Pipeline does not have federal eminent domain authority over lands in which a state has property rights
interests. On February 18, 2020, PennEast Pipeline filed a petition for a writ of certiorari to seek U.S. Supreme Court review of the
appellate court decision. On December 30, 2019, PennEast Pipeline filed a two-year extension request with the FERC to complete
the project by January 19, 2022.
Additionally, on January 30, 2020, PennEast Pipeline filed an amendment with the FERC to construct the pipeline project in two
phases. The first phase would consist of 68 miles of pipe, constructed entirely within Pennsylvania, which is expected to be
completed by November 2021. The second phase would include the remaining route in Pennsylvania and New Jersey and is
targeted for completion in 2023. FERC approval of the amended plan is required prior to beginning the first phase.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time; however, any work delays, whether caused by judicial or
regulatory action, abnormal weather, or other conditions, may result in additional cost or schedule modifications or, ultimately, in
project cancellation, any of which could result in an impairment of one or both of Southern Company Gas' investments and could
have a material impact on Southern Company's and Southern Company Gas' financial statements. Southern Company Gas
evaluated its investments and determined there was no impairment as of December 31, 2019.
See Note 3 under "Guarantees" and Note 7 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Natural Gas Storage Facilities
A wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas owns and operates a natural gas storage facility consisting of two salt dome
caverns in Louisiana. Periodic integrity tests are required in accordance with rules of the Louisiana Department of Natural
Resources (DNR). In 2017, in connection with an ongoing integrity project, updated seismic mapping indicated the proximity of
one of the caverns to the edge of the salt dome may be less than the required minimum and could result in Southern Company Gas
retiring the cavern early.
In the third quarter 2019, management determined that it no longer planned to obtain the core samples during 2020 that are
necessary to determine the composition of the sheath surrounding the edge of the salt dome. Core sampling is a requirement of the
Louisiana DNR to put the cavern back in service; as a result, the cavern will not return to service by 2021. This change in plan,
which affects the future operation of the entire storage facility, resulted in a pre-tax impairment charge of $91 million ($69 million
after-tax) recorded by Southern Company Gas in 2019. Southern Company Gas continues to monitor the pressure and overall
structural integrity of the entire facility pending any future decisions regarding decommissioning.
Southern Company Gas has two other natural gas storage facilities located in California and Texas, which could be impacted by
ongoing changes in the U.S. natural gas storage market. Recent sales of natural gas storage facilities have resulted in losses for the
sellers and may imply an impact on future rates and/or asset values. Sustained diminished natural gas storage values could trigger
impairment of either or both of these natural gas storage facilities, which have a combined net book value of $326 million at
December 31, 2019.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time, but could have a material impact on the financial
statements of Southern Company and Southern Company Gas.
II-223
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Commitments
To supply a portion of the fuel requirements of the Southern Company system's electric generating plants, the Southern Company
system has entered into various long-term commitments not recognized on the balance sheets for the procurement and delivery of
fossil fuel and, for Alabama Power and Georgia Power, nuclear fuel. The majority of the Registrants' fuel expense for the periods
presented was purchased under long-term commitments. Each Registrant expects that a substantial amount of its future fuel needs
will continue to be purchased under long-term commitments.
Georgia Power has commitments, in the form of capacity purchases, regarding a portion of a 5% interest in the original cost of
Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 owned by MEAG Power that are in effect until the later of the retirement of the plant or the latest stated
maturity date of MEAG Power's bonds issued to finance such ownership interest. The payments for capacity are required whether
or not any capacity is available. Portions of the capacity payments made to MEAG Power for its Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2
investment relate to costs in excess of Georgia Power's allowed investment for ratemaking purposes. The present value of these
portions at the time of the disallowance was written off. Generally, the cost of such capacity is included in purchased power in
Southern Company's statements of income and in purchased power, non-affiliates in Georgia Power's statements of income.
Georgia Power's capacity payments related to this commitment totaled $6 million, $8 million, and $9 million in 2019, 2018, and
2017, respectively. At December 31, 2019, Georgia Power's estimated long-term obligations related to this commitment totaled $56
million, consisting of $5 million for 2020, $5 million for 2021, $4 million for 2022, $3 million for 2023, $4 million for 2024, and
$35 million for 2025 and thereafter.
See Note 9 for information regarding PPAs accounted for as leases.
Southern Company Gas has commitments for pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas supply, including charges recoverable
through natural gas cost recovery mechanisms or, alternatively, billed to marketers selling retail natural gas, as well as demand
charges associated with Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services. Gas supply commitments include amounts for gas
commodity purchases associated with Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services of 45 million mmBtu at floating gas prices
calculated using forward natural gas prices at December 31, 2019 and valued at $84 million. Southern Company Gas provides
guarantees to certain gas suppliers for certain of its subsidiaries in support of payment obligations. Southern Company Gas'
expected future contractual obligations for pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas supply that are not recognized on the balance
sheets at December 31, 2019 were as follows:
 Pipeline Charges, Storage
Capacity, and Gas Supply
 (in millions)
2020 $ 725
2021 559
2022 526
2023 454
2024 330
2025 and thereafter 1,677
Total $ 4,271
Guarantees
SCS may enter into various types of wholesale energy and natural gas contracts acting as an agent for the traditional electric
operating companies and Southern Power. Under these agreements, each of the traditional electric operating companies and
Southern Power may be jointly and severally liable. Accordingly, Southern Company has entered into keep-well agreements with
each of the traditional electric operating companies to ensure they will not subsidize or be responsible for any costs, losses,
liabilities, or damages resulting from the inclusion of Southern Power as a contracting party under these agreements.
Alabama Power has guaranteed a $100 million principal amount long-term bank loan entered into by SEGCO in November 2018.
Georgia Power has agreed to reimburse Alabama Power for the portion of such obligation corresponding to Georgia Power's
proportionate ownership of SEGCO's stock if Alabama Power is called upon to make such payment under its guarantee. At
December 31, 2019, the capitalization of SEGCO consisted of $87 million of equity and $100 million of long-term debt, on which
the annual interest requirement is derived from a variable rate index. In addition, SEGCO had short-term debt outstanding of $26
million. See Note 7 under "SEGCO" for additional information.
II-224
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
In 2017, Atlantic Coast Pipeline executed a $3.4 billion revolving credit facility with a stated maturity date of October 2021.
Southern Company Gas entered into a guarantee agreement to support its share of the revolving credit facility. Southern Company
Gas' maximum exposure to loss under the terms of the guarantee is limited to 5% of the outstanding borrowings under the credit
facility, and totaled $88 million as of December 31, 2019. See "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas – Gas Pipeline Projects"
herein and Note 7 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information regarding the Atlantic Coast Pipeline.
As discussed in Note 9, Alabama Power and Georgia Power have entered into certain residual value guarantees related to railcar
leases.
4. REVENUE FROM CONTRACTS WITH CUSTOMERS
The Registrants generate revenues from a variety of sources, some of which are not accounted for as revenue from contracts with
customers, such as leases, derivatives, and certain cost recovery mechanisms. ASC 606 became effective on January 1, 2018 and
the Registrants adopted it using the modified retrospective method applied to open contracts and only to the version of contracts in
effect as of January 1, 2018. In accordance with the modified retrospective method, the Registrants' previously issued financial
statements have not been restated to comply with ASC 606 and the Registrants did not have a cumulative-effect adjustment to
retained earnings. See Note 1 under "Revenues" for additional information on the revenue policies of the Registrants. See Notes 9
and 14 for additional information on revenue accounted for under lease and derivative accounting guidance, respectively.
II-225
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The following tables disaggregate revenue from contracts with customers for 2019 and 2018:
2019Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Operating revenues    
Retail electric revenues    
Residential $ 6,164$ 2,509$ 3,377$ 278$ —$ —
Commercial 5,065 1,677 3,097 291 — —
Industrial 3,126 1,460 1,360 306 — —
Other 90 25 54 11 — —
Total retail electric revenues 14,445 5,671 7,888 886 — —
Natural gas distribution revenues    
Residential 1,413 — — — — 1,413
Commercial 389 — — — — 389
Transportation 907 — — — — 907
Industrial 35 — — — — 35
Other 245 — — — — 245
Total natural gas distribution revenues 2,989 — — — — 2,989
Wholesale electric revenues    
PPA energy revenues 833 145 60 11 648 —
PPA capacity revenues 453 102 54 3 322 —
Non-PPA revenues 232 81 9 352 238 —
Total wholesale electric revenues 1,518 328 123 366 1,208 —
Other natural gas revenues    
Gas pipeline investments 32 — — — — 32
Wholesale gas services 2,095 — — — — 2,095
Gas marketing services 440 — — — — 440
Other natural gas revenues 42 — — — — 42
Total natural gas revenues 2,609 — — — — 2,609
Other revenues 1,035 153 407 19 12 —
Total revenue from contracts with
customers 22,596 6,152 8,418 1,271 1,220 5,598
Other revenue sources(a)4,266 (27) (10) (7) 718 3,637
Other adjustments(b)(5,443) — — — — (5,443)
Total operating revenues $ 21,419$ 6,125$ 8,408$ 1,264$ 1,938$ 3,792
(a)Other revenue sources primarily relate to revenues from customers accounted for as derivatives and leases, as well as alternative revenues program at Southern
Company Gas and other cost recovery mechanisms at the traditional electric operating companies.
(b)Other adjustments relate to the cost of Southern Company Gas' energy and risk management activities. Wholesale gas services revenues are presented net of the
related costs of those activities on the statement of income. See Note 16 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information on the components of
wholesale gas services' operating revenues.
II-226
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
2018Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Operating revenues   
Retail electric revenues   
Residential $ 6,586$ 2,285$ 3,295$ 277$ —$ —
Commercial 5,255 1,541 3,025 290 — —
Industrial 3,152 1,364 1,321 326 — —
Other 94 25 56 9 — —
Total retail electric revenues 15,087 5,215 7,697 902 — —
Natural gas distribution revenues   
Residential 1,525 — — — — 1,525
Commercial 436 — — — — 436
Transportation 944 — — — — 944
Industrial 40 — — — — 40
Other 230 — — — — 230
Total natural gas distribution revenues 3,175 — — — — 3,175
Wholesale electric revenues   
PPA energy revenues 950 158 81 15 727 —
PPA capacity revenues 498 101 53 6 394 —
Non-PPA revenues 263 119 24 329 230 —
Total wholesale electric revenues 1,711 378 158 350 1,351 —
Other natural gas revenues   
Gas pipeline investments 32 — — — — 32
Wholesale gas services 3,083 — — — — 3,083
Gas marketing services 571 — — — — 571
Other natural gas revenues 53 — — — — 53
Total other natural gas revenues 3,739 — — — — 3,739
Other revenues 1,529 210 236 22 13 —
Total revenue from contracts with
customers 25,241 5,803 8,091 1,274 1,364 6,914
Other revenue sources(a)5,108 229 329 (9) 841 3,849
Other adjustments(b)(6,854) — — — — (6,854)
Total operating revenues $ 23,495$ 6,032$ 8,420$ 1,265$ 2,205$ 3,909
(a)Other revenue sources primarily relate to revenues from customers accounted for as derivatives and leases, as well as alternative revenues program at Southern
Company Gas and other cost recovery mechanisms at the traditional electric operating companies.
(b)Other adjustments relate to the cost of Southern Company Gas' energy and risk management activities. Wholesale gas services revenues are presented net of the
related costs of those activities on the statement of income. See Note 16 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information on the components of
wholesale gas services' operating revenues.
II-227
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Contract Balances
The following table reflects the closing balances of receivables, contract assets, and contract liabilities related to revenues from
contracts with customers at December 31, 2019 and 2018:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Accounts Receivables     
As of December 31, 2019 $ 2,413$ 586$ 688$ 79$ 97$ 749
As of December 31, 2018 2,630 520 721 100 118 952
Contract Assets     
As of December 31, 2019 $ 117$ —$ 69$ —$ —$ —
As of December 31, 2018 102 — 58 — — —
Contract Liabilities     
As of December 31, 2019 $ 52$ 10$ 13$ —$ 1$ 1
As of December 31, 2018 32 12 7 — 11 2
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, Georgia Power had contract assets primarily related to fixed retail customer bill programs,
where the payment is contingent upon Georgia Power's continued performance and the customer's continued participation in the
program over the one-year contract term, and unregulated service agreements, where payment is contingent on project completion.
Alabama Power had contract liabilities for outstanding performance obligations primarily related to extended service agreements.
Contract liabilities for Georgia Power and Southern Power relate to cash collections recognized in advance of revenue for certain
unregulated service agreements and certain levelized PPAs, respectively. Southern Company's unregulated distributed generation
business had contract assets of $40 million and $39 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, and contract liabilities of
$28 million and $11 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, for outstanding performance obligations.
The following table reflects revenue from contracts with customers recognized in 2019 included in the contract liability at
December 31, 2018:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Revenue Recognized    
2019 $ 30$ 11$ 6$ 11$ 2
II-228
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Remaining Performance Obligations
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power have long-term contracts with customers in which revenues are
recognized as performance obligations are satisfied over the contract term. These contracts primarily relate to PPAs whereby the
traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power provide electricity and generation capacity to a customer. The revenue
recognized for the delivery of electricity is variable; however, certain PPAs include a fixed payment for fixed generation capacity
over the term of the contract. Southern Company's unregulated distributed generation business also has partially satisfied
performance obligations related to certain fixed price contracts. Revenues from contracts with customers related to these
performance obligations remaining at December 31, 2019 are expected to be recognized as follows:
 2020 2021 2022 2023 20242025 and
Thereafter
 (in millions)
Southern Company $ 490$ 430$ 336$ 324$ 323$ 2,108
Alabama Power 21 25 22 22 22 118
Georgia Power 60 49 32 32 23 61
Southern Power 287 280 281 271 279 1,948
Revenue expected to be recognized for performance obligations remaining at December 31, 2019 was immaterial for Mississippi
Power.
5. PROPERTY, PLANT, AND EQUIPMENT
Property, plant, and equipment is stated at original cost or fair value at acquisition, as appropriate, less any regulatory disallowances
and impairments. Original cost may include: materials; labor; minor items of property; appropriate administrative and general
costs; payroll-related costs such as taxes, pensions, and other benefits; and the interest capitalized and/or cost of equity funds used
during construction.
The Registrants' property, plant, and equipment in service consisted of the following at December 31, 2019 and 2018:
At December 31, 2019:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
(in millions)
Electric utilities:   
Generation $ 50,329$ 15,329$ 18,341$ 2,786$ 13,241$ —
Transmission 12,157 4,719 6,590 808 — —
Distribution 19,846 7,798 11,024 1,024 — —
General/other 4,650 2,177 2,182 239 29 —
Electric utilities' plant in service 86,982 30,023 38,137 4,857 13,270 —
Southern Company Gas:   
Natural gas distribution utilities
transportation and distribution 13,518 — — — — 13,518
Storage facilities 1,634 — — — — 1,634
Other 1,192 — — — — 1,192
Southern Company Gas plant in service 16,344 — — — — 16,344
Other plant in service 1,788 — — — — —
Total plant in service $ 105,114$ 30,023$ 38,137$ 4,857$ 13,270$ 16,344
II-229
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Electric utilities:   
Generation $ 52,324$ 16,533$ 19,145$ 2,849$ 13,246$ —
Transmission 11,344 4,380 6,156 769 — —
Distribution 18,746 7,389 10,389 968 — —
General/other 4,446 2,100 1,985 314 25 —
Electric utilities' plant in service 86,860 30,402 37,675 4,900 13,271 —
Southern Company Gas:  
Natural gas distribution utilities
transportation and distribution 12,409 — — — — 12,409
Storage facilities 1,640 — — — — 1,640
Other 1,128 — — — — 1,128
Southern Company Gas plant in service 15,177 — — — — 15,177
Other plant in service 1,669 — — — — —
Total plant in service $ 103,706$ 30,402$ 37,675$ 4,900$ 13,271$ 15,177
The cost of replacements of property, exclusive of minor items of property, is capitalized. The cost of maintenance, repairs, and
replacement of minor items of property is charged to other operations and maintenance expenses as incurred or performed with the
exception of nuclear refueling costs and certain maintenance costs including those described below.
In accordance with orders from their respective state PSCs, Alabama Power and Georgia Power defer nuclear outage operations and
maintenance expenses to a regulatory asset when the charges are incurred. Alabama Power amortizes the costs over a subsequent
18-month period with Plant Farley's fall outage cost amortization beginning in January of the following year and spring outage cost
amortization beginning in July of the same year. Georgia Power amortizes its costs over each unit's operating cycle, or 18 months
for Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 and 24 months for Plant Hatch Units 1 and 2.
A portion of Mississippi Power's railway track maintenance costs is charged to fuel stock and recovered through Mississippi
Power's fuel clause.
The portion of Southern Company Gas' non-working gas used to maintain the structural integrity of natural gas storage facilities
that is considered to be non-recoverable is depreciated, while the recoverable or retained portion is not depreciated.
Finance Leases
Assets acquired under a finance lease (previously referred to as a capital lease) are included in property, plant, and equipment and
are further detailed in the table below for the applicable Registrants at December 31, 2018:
At December 31, 2018:Southern
CompanyGeorgia
Power
 (in millions)
Office buildings $ 216$ 61
PPAs(*)— 144
Computer-related equipment 43 —
Gas pipeline 7 —
Less: Accumulated amortization (75) (84)
Balance, net of amortization $ 191$ 121
(*)Represents Georgia Power's affiliate PPAs with Southern Power. See Note 1 under "Affiliate Transactions" for additional information.
See Note 9 for additional information, including finance lease right-of-use (ROU) assets, net included in property, plant, and
equipment at December 31, 2019.
II-230
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Depreciation and Amortization
The traditional electric operating companies' and Southern Company Gas' depreciation of the original cost of utility plant in service
is provided primarily by using composite straight-line rates. The approximate rates for 2019, 2018, and 2017 are as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
Alabama Power 3.1% 3.0% 2.9%
Georgia Power 2.6% 2.6% 2.7%
Mississippi Power 3.7% 4.2% 3.4%
Southern Company Gas 2.9% 2.9% 2.9%
Depreciation studies are conducted periodically to update the composite rates. These studies are filed with the respective state PSC
and/or other applicable state and federal regulatory agencies for the traditional electric operating companies and natural gas
distribution utilities. Effective January 1, 2020, Georgia Power's and Atlanta Gas Light's depreciation rates were revised by the
Georgia PSC in connection with their respective base rate cases. On November 26, 2019, an updated depreciation study was filed
with the Mississippi PSC in conjunction with the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case requesting a $16 million increase in total
annual depreciation. See Note 2 for additional information.
When property, plant, and equipment subject to composite depreciation is retired or otherwise disposed of in the normal course of
business, its original cost, together with the cost of removal, less salvage, is charged to accumulated depreciation. For other
property dispositions, the applicable cost and accumulated depreciation are removed from the balance sheet accounts, and a gain or
loss is recognized. Minor items of property included in the original cost of the asset are retired when the related property unit is
retired.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, accumulated depreciation for utility plant in service totaled $30.0 billion and $30.3 billion,
respectively, for Southern Company and $4.5 billion and $4.3 billion, respectively, for Southern Company Gas.
Depreciation of the original cost of other plant in service is provided primarily on a straight-line basis over estimated useful lives,
which for Southern Company range up to 65 years and for Southern Company Gas range from five to 15 years for transportation
equipment, 40 to 60 years for storage facilities, and up to 65 years for other assets. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, accumulated
depreciation for other plant in service totaled $732 million and $766 million, respectively, for Southern Company and $155 million
and $129 million, respectively, for Southern Company Gas.
Southern Power
Southern Power applies component depreciation, where depreciation is computed principally by the straight-line method over the
estimated useful life of the asset. Certain of Southern Power's generation assets related to natural gas-fired facilities are depreciated
on a units-of-production basis, using hours or starts, to better match outage and maintenance costs to the usage of, and revenues
from, these assets. The primary assets in Southern Power's property, plant, and equipment are generating facilities, which generally
have estimated useful lives as follows:
Southern Power Generating Facility Useful life
Natural gas Up to 45 years
Biomass(*)Up to 40 years
Solar Up to 35 years
Wind Up to 30 years
(*)See Note 15 under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" for information on Southern Power's sale of its biomass facility on June 13,
2019.
Southern Power reviews its estimated useful lives and salvage values on an ongoing basis. The results of these reviews could result
in changes which could have a material impact on Southern Power's net income in the near term.
When Southern Power's depreciable property, plant, and equipment is retired, or otherwise disposed of in the normal course of
business, the applicable cost and accumulated depreciation is removed and a gain or loss is recognized in the statements of income.
II-231
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Joint Ownership Agreements
At December 31, 2019, the Registrants' percentage ownership and investment (exclusive of nuclear fuel) in jointly-owned facilities
in commercial operation were as follows:
Facility (Type)Percent
Ownership Plant in Service Accumulated
Depreciation CWIP
  (in millions)
Alabama Power      
Greene County (natural gas) Units 1 and 2 60.0%(a) $ 182 $ 71 $ 1
Plant Miller (coal) Units 1 and 2 91.8(b) 2,058 630 65
      
Georgia Power      
Plant Hatch (nuclear) 50.1%(c) $ 1,316 $ 603 $ 40
Plant Vogtle (nuclear) Units 1 and 2 45.7(c) 3,565 2,177 96
Plant Scherer (coal) Units 1 and 2 8.4(c) 266 94 14
Plant Scherer (coal) Unit 3 75.0(c) 1,267 492 47
Plant Wansley (coal) 53.5(c) 1,059 367 10
Rocky Mountain (pumped storage) 25.4(d) 182 139 —
      
Mississippi Power      
Greene County (natural gas) Units 1 and 2 40.0%(a) $ 118 $ 46 $ 1
Plant Daniel (coal) Units 1 and 2 50.0(e) 750 214 11
      
Southern Company Gas      
Dalton Pipeline (natural gas pipeline) 50.0%(f) $ 271 $ 10 $ —
(a)Jointly owned by Alabama Power and Mississippi Power and operated and maintained by Alabama Power.
(b)Jointly owned with PowerSouth and operated and maintained by Alabama Power.
(c)Georgia Power owns undivided interests in Plants Hatch, Vogtle Units 1 and 2, Scherer, and Wansley in varying amounts jointly with one or more of the
following entities: OPC, MEAG Power, Dalton, Florida Power & Light Company, JEA, and Gulf Power. Georgia Power has been contracted to operate and
maintain the plants as agent for the co-owners and is jointly and severally liable for third party claims related to these plants.
(d)Jointly owned with OPC, which is the operator of the plant.
(e)Jointly owned by Gulf Power and Mississippi Power. In accordance with the operating agreement, Mississippi Power acts as Gulf Power's agent with respect to
the operation and maintenance of these units. See Note 3 under "Other Matters – Mississippi Power" for information regarding a commitment between
Mississippi Power and Gulf Power to seek a restructuring of their 50% undivided ownership interests in Plant Daniel.
(f)Jointly owned with The Williams Companies, Inc., The Dalton Pipeline is a 115-mile natural gas pipeline that serves as an extension of the Transco natural gas
pipeline system into northwest Georgia. Southern Company Gas leases its 50% undivided ownership for approximately $26 million annually for an initial term
through 2042. The lessee is responsible for maintaining the pipeline during the lease term and for providing service to transportation customers under its FERC-
regulated tariff.
Georgia Power also owns 45.7% of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which are currently under construction and had a CWIP balance of
$5.8 billion at December 31, 2019. See Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
The Registrants' proportionate share of their jointly-owned facility operating expenses is included in the corresponding operating
expenses in the statements of income and each Registrant is responsible for providing its own financing.
Assets Subject to Lien
In October 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved executed agreements between Mississippi Power and its largest retail customer,
Chevron Products Company (Chevron), for Mississippi Power to continue providing retail service to the Chevron refinery in
Pascagoula, Mississippi through 2038. The agreements grant Chevron a security interest in the co-generation assets, with a lease
receivable balance of $118 million at December 31, 2019, located at the refinery that is exercisable upon the occurrence of (i)
certain bankruptcy events or (ii) other events of default coupled with specific reductions in steam output at the facility and a
downgrade of Mississippi Power's credit rating to below investment grade by two of the three rating agencies.
II-232
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
On January 17, 2020, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Mankato to a subsidiary of Xcel. As of
December 31, 2019, under the terms of the PPA and the expansion PPA for Plant Mankato, approximately $547 million of assets,
primarily related to property, plant, and equipment, were subject to lien. See Note 15 under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas
and Biomass Plants" for additional information.
See Note 8 under "Secured Debt" for information regarding debt secured by certain assets of Georgia Power, Mississippi Power,
and Southern Company Gas.
6. ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATIONS
AROs are computed as the present value of the estimated costs for an asset's future retirement and are recorded in the period in
which the liability is incurred. The estimated costs are capitalized as part of the related long-lived asset and depreciated over the
asset's useful life. In the absence of quoted market prices, AROs are estimated using present value techniques in which estimates of
future cash outlays associated with the asset retirements are discounted using a credit-adjusted risk-free rate. Estimates of the
timing and amounts of future cash outlays are based on projections of when and how the assets will be retired and the cost of future
removal activities. Each traditional electric operating company and natural gas distribution utility has received accounting guidance
from its state PSC or applicable state regulatory agency allowing the continued accrual or recovery of other retirement costs for
long-lived assets that it does not have a legal obligation to retire. Accordingly, the accumulated removal costs for these obligations
are reflected in the balance sheets as regulatory liabilities and amounts to be recovered are reflected in the balance sheets as
regulatory assets.
The ARO liabilities for the traditional electric operating companies primarily relate to facilities that are subject to the CCR Rule
and the related state rules, principally ash ponds. In addition, Alabama Power and Georgia Power have retirement obligations
related to the decommissioning of nuclear facilities (Alabama Power's Plant Farley and Georgia Power's ownership interests in
Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2). See "Nuclear Decommissioning" herein for additional information. The traditional
electric operating companies also have AROs related to various landfill sites, asbestos removal, and underground storage tanks, as
well as, for Alabama Power, disposal of polychlorinated biphenyls in certain transformers and sulfur hexafluoride gas in certain
substation breakers, for Georgia Power, gypsum cells and restoration of land at the end of long-term land leases for solar facilities,
and, for Mississippi Power, mine reclamation and water wells. The ARO liability for Southern Power primarily relates to Southern
Power's solar and wind facilities, which are located on long-term land leases requiring the restoration of land at the end of the lease.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas also have identified other retirement obligations, such as
obligations related to certain electric transmission and distribution facilities, certain asbestos-containing material within long-term
assets not subject to ongoing repair and maintenance activities, certain wireless communication towers, the disposal of
polychlorinated biphenyls in certain transformers, leasehold improvements, equipment on customer property, and property
associated with the Southern Company system's rail lines and natural gas pipelines. However, liabilities for the removal of these
assets have not been recorded because the settlement timing for certain retirement obligations related to these assets is
indeterminable and, therefore, the fair value of the retirement obligations cannot be reasonably estimated. A liability for these
retirement obligations will be recognized when sufficient information becomes available to support a reasonable estimation of the
ARO.
Southern Company and the traditional electric operating companies will continue to recognize in their respective statements of
income allowed removal costs in accordance with regulatory treatment. Any differences between costs recognized in accordance
with accounting standards related to asset retirement and environmental obligations and those reflected in rates are recognized as
either a regulatory asset or liability in the balance sheets as ordered by the various state PSCs.
II-233
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Details of the AROs included in the balance sheets are as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power(*)
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 4,824$ 1,709$ 2,638$ 174$ 78
Liabilities incurred 29 — 27 — 2
Liabilities settled (244) (55) (116) (35) —
Accretion 217 106 94 5 4
Cash flow revisions 4,737 1,450 3,186 16 —
Reclassification to held for sale (169) — — — —
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 9,394$ 3,210$ 5,829$ 160$ 84
Liabilities incurred 37 — 35 1 1
Liabilities settled (328) (127) (151) (35) —
Accretion 402 145 243 7 4
Cash flow revisions 281 312 (172) 57 —
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 9,786$ 3,540$ 5,784$ 190$ 89
(*)Included in other deferred credits and liabilities on Southern Power's consolidated balance sheets.
In June 2018, Alabama Power recorded an increase of approximately $1.2 billion to its AROs related to the CCR Rule. Mississippi
Power also recorded an increase of approximately $11 million to its AROs related to an ash pond at Plant Greene County, which is
jointly-owned with Alabama Power. The revised cost estimates were based on information from feasibility studies performed on
ash ponds in use at plants operated by Alabama Power, including Plant Greene County. During the second quarter 2018, Alabama
Power's management completed its analysis of these studies which indicated that additional closure costs, primarily related to
increases in estimated ash volume, water management requirements, and design revisions, will be required to close these ash ponds
under the planned closure-in-place methodology.
Also in June 2018, Alabama Power completed an updated decommissioning cost site study for Plant Farley. The estimated cost of
decommissioning based on the study resulted in an increase in Alabama Power's ARO liability of approximately $300 million. In
December 2018, Georgia Power completed updated decommissioning cost site studies for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and
2. The estimated cost of decommissioning based on the studies resulted in an increase in Georgia Power's ARO liability of
approximately $130 million. See "Nuclear Decommissioning" below for additional information.
In December 2018, Georgia Power recorded an increase of approximately $3.1 billion to its AROs related to the CCR Rule and the
related state rule. During the second half of 2018, Georgia Power completed a strategic assessment related to its plans to close the
ash ponds at all of its generating plants in compliance with the CCR Rule and the related state rule. This assessment included
engineering and constructability studies related to design assumptions for ash pond closures and advanced engineering methods.
The results indicated that additional closure costs will be required to close these ash ponds, primarily due to changes in closure
strategies, the estimated amount of ash to be excavated, and additional water management requirements necessary to support
closure strategies. These factors also impact the estimated timing of future cash outlays.
The 2018 reclassification of a portion of the ARO liability to liabilities held for sale by Southern Company represents the AROs
related to Gulf Power. See Note 15 under "Southern Company" and "Assets Held for Sale" for additional information.
During 2019, Alabama Power recorded increases totaling approximately $312 million to its AROs primarily related to the CCR
Rule and the related state rule based on management's completion of closure designs during the second and third quarters 2019
under the planned closure-in-place methodology for all but one of its ash pond facilities. During 2019, Mississippi Power recorded
an increase of approximately $57 million to its AROs related to the CCR Rule, primarily associated with the ash pond facility at
Plant Greene County, which is jointly owned with Alabama Power. The additional estimated costs to close these ash ponds under
the planned closure-in-place methodology primarily relate to cost inputs from contractor bids, internal drainage and dewatering
system designs, and increases in the estimated ash volumes. Alabama Power anticipates increasing the ARO for its remaining ash
pond facility within the next nine months upon completion of a feasibility study and the related cost estimate, and the increase
could be material.
During the second half of 2019, Georgia Power completed an assessment of its plans to close the ash ponds at all of its generating
plants in compliance with the CCR Rule and the related state rule. Cost estimates were revised to reflect further refined costs for
II-234
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
closure plans and updates to the timing of future cash outlays. As a result, in December 2019, Georgia Power recorded a decrease
of approximately $174 million to its AROs related to the CCR Rule and the related state rule.
The cost estimates for AROs related to the CCR Rule and related state rules are based on information at December 31, 2019 using
various assumptions related to closure and post-closure costs, timing of future cash outlays, inflation and discount rates, and the
potential methods for complying with the CCR Rule and related state requirements for closure. The traditional electric operating
companies expect to continue to update their cost estimates and ARO liabilities periodically as additional information related to
these assumptions becomes available. Additionally, the closure designs and plans in the States of Alabama and Georgia are subject
to approval by environmental regulatory agencies. Absent continued recovery of ARO costs through regulated rates, Southern
Company's and the traditional electric operating companies' results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition could be
materially impacted. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Nuclear Decommissioning
The NRC requires licensees of commercial nuclear power reactors to establish a plan for providing reasonable assurance of funds
for future decommissioning. Alabama Power and Georgia Power have external trust funds (Funds) to comply with the NRC's
regulations. Use of the Funds is restricted to nuclear decommissioning activities. The Funds are managed and invested in
accordance with applicable requirements of various regulatory bodies, including the NRC, the FERC, and state PSCs, as well as the
IRS. While Alabama Power and Georgia Power are allowed to prescribe an overall investment policy to the Funds' managers,
neither Southern Company nor its subsidiaries or affiliates are allowed to engage in the day-to-day management of the Funds or to
mandate individual investment decisions. Day-to-day management of the investments in the Funds is delegated to unrelated third-
party managers with oversight by the management of Alabama Power and Georgia Power. The Funds' managers are authorized,
within certain investment guidelines, to actively buy and sell securities at their own discretion in order to maximize the return on
the Funds' investments. The Funds are invested in a tax-efficient manner in a diversified mix of equity and fixed income securities
and are reported as trading securities.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power record the investment securities held in the Funds at fair value, as disclosed in Note 13, as
management believes that fair value best represents the nature of the Funds. Gains and losses, whether realized or unrealized, are
recorded in the regulatory liability for AROs in the balance sheets and are not included in net income or OCI. Fair value
adjustments and realized gains and losses are determined on a specific identification basis.
The Funds at Georgia Power participate in a securities lending program through the managers of the Funds. Under this program,
Georgia Power's Funds' investment securities are loaned to institutional investors for a fee. Securities loaned are fully collateralized
by cash, letters of credit, and/or securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S. government or its agencies or instrumentalities. At
December 31, 2019 and 2018, approximately $28 million and $27 million, respectively, of the fair market value of Georgia Power's
Funds' securities were on loan and pledged to creditors under the Funds' managers' securities lending program. The fair value of the
collateral received was approximately $29 million and $28 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, and can only be
sold by the borrower upon the return of the loaned securities. The collateral received is treated as a non-cash item in the statements
of cash flows.
Investment securities in the Funds for December 31, 2019 and 2018 were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
Power
 (in millions)
At December 31, 2019:   
Equity securities $ 1,159$ 743$ 416
Debt securities 798 218 580
Other securities 77 60 17
Total investment securities in the Funds $ 2,034$ 1,021$ 1,013
At December 31, 2018:   
Equity securities $ 919$ 594$ 325
Debt securities 726 201 525
Other securities 74 51 23
Total investment securities in the Funds $ 1,719$ 846$ 873
II-235
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
These amounts exclude receivables related to investment income and pending investment sales and payables related to pending
investment purchases. For Southern Company and Georgia Power, these amounts include Georgia Power's investment securities
pledged to creditors and collateral received and excludes payables related to Georgia Power's securities lending program.
The fair value increases (decreases) of the Funds, including unrealized gains (losses) and reinvested interest and dividends and
excluding the Funds' expenses, for 2019, 2018, and 2017 are shown in the table below.
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
Power
 (in millions)
Fair value increases (decreases)   
2019 $ 344$ 194$ 150
2018 (67) (38) (29)
2017 233 125 108
Unrealized gains (losses)   
At December 31, 2019 $ 259$ 149$ 110
At December 31, 2018 (183) (96) (87)
At December 31, 2017 181 98 83
The investment securities held in the Funds continue to be managed with a long-term focus. Accordingly, all purchases and sales
within the Funds are presented separately in the statements of cash flows as investing cash flows, consistent with the nature of the
securities and purpose for which the securities were acquired.
For Alabama Power, approximately $16 million and $17 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, previously recorded
in internal reserves is being transferred into the Funds through 2040 as approved by the Alabama PSC. The NRC's minimum
external funding requirements are based on a generic estimate of the cost to decommission only the radioactive portions of a
nuclear unit based on the size and type of reactor. Alabama Power and Georgia Power have filed plans with the NRC designed to
ensure that, over time, the deposits and earnings of the Funds will provide the minimum funding amounts prescribed by the NRC.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the accumulated provisions for the external decommissioning trust funds were as follows:
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Alabama Power   
Plant Farley $ 1,021$ 846
Georgia Power   
Plant Hatch $ 634$ 547
Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 379 326
Total $ 1,013$ 873
II-236
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Site study cost is the estimate to decommission a specific facility as of the site study year. The decommissioning cost estimates are
based on prompt dismantlement and removal of the plant from service. The actual decommissioning costs may vary from these
estimates because of changes in the assumed date of decommissioning, changes in NRC requirements, or changes in the
assumptions used in making these estimates. The estimated costs of decommissioning at December 31, 2019 based on the most
current studies, which were each performed in 2018, were as follows:
 Plant
Farley  Plant
 Hatch(*)Plant Vogtle
 Units 1 and 2(*)
Decommissioning periods:    
Beginning year 2037 2034 2047
Completion year 2076 2075 2079
 (in millions)
Site study costs:    
Radiated structures $ 1,234 $ 734$ 601
Spent fuel management 387 172 162
Non-radiated structures 99 56 79
Total site study costs $ 1,720 $ 962$ 842
(*)Based on Georgia Power's ownership interests.
For ratemaking purposes, Alabama Power's decommissioning costs are based on the site study and Georgia Power's
decommissioning costs are based on the NRC generic estimate to decommission the radioactive portion of the facilities and the site
study estimate for spent fuel management as of 2018. Significant assumptions used to determine these costs for ratemaking were an
estimated inflation rate of 4.5% and 2.75% for Alabama Power and Georgia Power, respectively, and an estimated trust earnings
rate of 7.0% and 4.75% for Alabama Power and Georgia Power, respectively.
Amounts previously contributed to the Funds for Plant Farley are currently projected to be adequate to meet the decommissioning
obligations. Alabama Power will continue to provide site-specific estimates of the decommissioning costs and related projections of
funds in the external trust to the Alabama PSC and, if necessary, would seek the Alabama PSC's approval to address any changes in
a manner consistent with NRC and other applicable requirements.
Under the 2013 ARP, Georgia Power's annual decommissioning cost for ratemaking was a total of $5 million for Plant Hatch and
Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2. Effective January 1, 2020, in connection with the 2019 ARP, this total annual amount was reduced to $4
million. See Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Rate Plans – 2019 ARP" for additional information.
7. CONSOLIDATED ENTITIES AND EQUITY METHOD INVESTMENTS
The Registrants may hold ownership interests in a number of business ventures with varying ownership structures. Partnership
interests and other variable interests are evaluated to determine if each entity is a VIE. If a venture is a VIE for which a Registrant
is the primary beneficiary, the assets, liabilities, and results of operations of the entity are consolidated. The Registrants reassess the
conclusion as to whether an entity is a VIE upon certain occurrences, which are deemed reconsideration events.
For entities that are not determined to be VIEs, the Registrants evaluate whether they have control or significant influence over the
investee to determine the appropriate consolidation and presentation. Generally, entities under the control of a Registrant are
consolidated, and entities over which a Registrant can exert significant influence, but which a Registrant does not control, are
accounted for under the equity method of accounting. However, the Registrants may also invest in partnerships and limited liability
companies that maintain separate ownership accounts. All such investments are required to be accounted for under the equity
method unless the interest is so minor that there is virtually no influence over operating and financial policies, as are all investments
in joint ventures.
Investments accounted for under the equity method are recorded within equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries in the
balance sheets and, for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas, the equity income is recorded within earnings from equity
method investments in the statements of income. See "SEGCO" and "Southern Company Gas" herein for additional information.
SEGCO
Alabama Power and Georgia Power own equally all of the outstanding capital stock of SEGCO, which owns electric generating
units with a total rated capacity of 1,020 MWs, as well as associated transmission facilities. Alabama Power and Georgia Power
II-237
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
account for SEGCO using the equity method; Southern Company consolidates SEGCO. The capacity of these units is sold equally
to Alabama Power and Georgia Power. Alabama Power and Georgia Power make payments sufficient to provide for the operating
expenses, taxes, interest expense, and a ROE. The share of purchased power included in purchased power, affiliates in the
statements of income totaled $93 million in 2019, $102 million in 2018, and $76 million in 2017 for Alabama Power and $95
million in 2019, $105 million in 2018, and $78 million in 2017 for Georgia Power.
SEGCO paid $14 million of dividends in 2019, $18 million in 2018, and $24 million in 2017, of which one-half of each was paid to
each of Alabama Power and Georgia Power. In addition, Alabama Power and Georgia Power each recognize 50% of SEGCO's net
income.
Alabama Power, which owns and operates a generating unit adjacent to the SEGCO generating units, has a joint ownership
agreement with SEGCO for the ownership of an associated gas pipeline. Alabama Power owns 14% of the pipeline with the
remaining 86% owned by SEGCO.
See Note 3 under "Guarantees" for additional information regarding guarantees of Alabama Power and Georgia Power related to
SEGCO.
Southern Power
Variable Interest Entities
Southern Power has certain subsidiaries that are determined to be VIEs. Southern Power is considered the primary beneficiary of
these VIEs because it controls the most significant activities of the VIEs, including operating and maintaining the respective assets,
and has the obligation to absorb expected losses of these VIEs to the extent of its equity interests.
SP Solar and SP Wind
In May 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling 33% limited partnership interest in SP Solar to Global Atlantic Financial
Group Limited (Global Atlantic). See Note 15 under "Southern Power" for additional information. A wholly-owned subsidiary of
Southern Power is the general partner and holds a 1% ownership interest in SP Solar and another wholly-owned subsidiary of
Southern Power owns the remaining 66% ownership in SP Solar. SP Solar qualifies as a VIE since the arrangement is structured as
a limited partnership and the 33% limited partner does not have substantive kick-out rights against the general partner.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, SP Solar had total assets of $6.4 billion and $6.3 billion, respectively, total liabilities of $381
million and $113 million, respectively, and noncontrolling interests of $1.1 billion and $1.2 billion, respectively. Cash distributions
from SP Solar are allocated 67% to Southern Power and 33% to Global Atlantic in accordance with their partnership interest
percentage. Under the terms of the limited partnership agreement, distributions without limited partner consent are limited to
available cash and SP Solar is obligated to distribute all such available cash to its partners each quarter. Available cash includes all
cash generated in the quarter subject to the maintenance of appropriate operating reserves.
In December 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling tax-equity interest in SP Wind to three financial investors. SP Wind owns
eight operating wind farms. See Note 15 under "Southern Power" for additional information. Southern Power owns 100% of the
Class B membership interests and the three financial investors own 100% of the Class A membership interests. SP Wind qualifies as
a VIE since the structure of the arrangement is similar to a limited partnership and the Class A members do not have substantive
kick-out rights against Southern Power.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, SP Wind had total assets of $2.5 billion and $2.5 billion, respectively, total liabilities of $128
million and $51 million, respectively, and noncontrolling interests of $45 million and $47 million, respectively. Under the terms of
the limited liability agreement, distributions without Class A member consent are limited to available cash and SP Wind is obligated
to distribute all such available cash to its members each quarter. Available cash includes all cash generated in the quarter subject to
the maintenance of appropriate operating reserves. Cash distributions from SP Wind are generally allocated 60% to Southern Power
and 40% to the three financial investors in accordance with the limited liability agreement.
Southern Power consolidates both SP Solar and SP Wind, as the primary beneficiary, since it controls the most significant activities
of each entity, including operating and maintaining their assets. Certain transfers and sales of the assets in the VIEs are subject to
partner consent and the liabilities are non-recourse to the general credit of Southern Power. Liabilities consist of customary working
capital items and do not include any long-term debt.
Other Variable Interest Entities
Southern Power has other consolidated VIEs that relate to certain subsidiaries that have either sold noncontrolling interests to tax-
equity investors or acquired less than a 100% interest from facility developers. These entities are considered VIEs because the
II-238
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
arrangements are structured similar to a limited partnership and the noncontrolling members do not have substantive kick-out
rights.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the other VIEs had total assets of $1.1 billion and $858 million, respectively, total liabilities of
$104 million and $80 million, respectively, and noncontrolling interests of $409 million and $241 million, respectively. Under the
terms of the partnership agreements, distributions of all available cash are required each month or quarter and additional
distributions require partner consent.
In August 2019, Southern Power completed the acquisition of a majority interest in DSGP and gained control of its most significant
activities. As a result, Southern Power became the primary beneficiary of this VIE and began accounting for it as a consolidated
entity. Upon consolidation of DSGP, Southern Power recorded an additional $107 million in assets, $51 million in liabilities, and
$56 million in noncontrolling interest. There was no cash transferred as a result of this consolidation. From the date of Southern
Power's first investment in June 2019 until gaining control in August 2019, Southern Power applied the equity method of
accounting. See Note 15 under "Southern Power" for additional information.
Equity Method Investments
At December 31, 2019, Southern Power had equity method investments in several wind and battery storage projects totaling $28
million.
Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests
In 2017, Southern Power reclassified approximately $114 million from redeemable noncontrolling interests to non-redeemable
noncontrolling interests due to the expiration of an option allowing SunPower Corporation to require Southern Power to purchase
its redeemable noncontrolling interest at fair market value. In addition, in 2017, Turner Renewable Energy, LLC redeemed at fair
value its 10% interest of redeemable noncontrolling interest in certain of Southern Power's solar facilities. At December 31, 2019,
2018, and 2017, there were no outstanding redeemable noncontrolling interests.
The following table presents the changes in Southern Power's redeemable noncontrolling interests for the year ended December 31,
2017:
 2017
 (in millions)
Beginning balance $ 164
Net income attributable to redeemable noncontrolling interests 2
Distributions to redeemable noncontrolling interests (2)
Capital contributions from redeemable noncontrolling interests 2
Redemption of redeemable noncontrolling interests (59)
Reclassification to non-redeemable noncontrolling interests (114)
Change in fair value of redeemable noncontrolling interests 7
Ending balance $ —
The following table presents the attribution of net income to Southern Power and the noncontrolling interests for the year ended
December 31, 2017:
 2017
 (in millions)
Net income $ 1,117
Less: Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 44
Less: Net income attributable to redeemable noncontrolling interests 2
Net income attributable to Southern Power $ 1,071
II-239
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas
Equity Method Investments
The carrying amounts of Southern Company Gas' equity method investments at December 31, 2019 and 2018 and related income
from those investments for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 were as follows:
Investment Balance 2019 2018
 (in millions)
SNG(a)$ 1,137$ 1,261
Atlantic Coast Pipeline(b)— 83
PennEast Pipeline 82 71
Pivotal JAX LNG(b)— 53
Other(c)32 70
Total $ 1,251$ 1,538
(a)Decrease primarily relates to the continued amortization of deferred tax assets established upon acquisition, as well as distributions in excess of earnings.
(b)As a result of the proposed sale of Southern Company Gas' interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline, these amounts are classified as held for sale at
December 31, 2019. See Note 3 under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas" and Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG
and Atlantic Coast Pipeline" and "Assets Held for Sale," respectively, for additional information.
(c)Decrease primarily relates to the sale of Triton. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Earnings from Equity Method Investments 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
SNG $ 141$ 131 $ 88
Atlantic Coast Pipeline(a)13 7 6
PennEast Pipeline(a)6 5 6
Other(b)(3) 5 6
Total $ 157$ 148 $ 106
(a)Amounts primarily result from AFUDC equity recorded by the project entity.
(b)Decrease primarily relates to the sale of Triton. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
SNG
In 2016, Southern Company Gas, through a wholly-owned, indirect subsidiary, acquired a 50% equity interest in SNG, which is
accounted for as an equity method investment. Selected financial information of SNG at December 31, 2019 and 2018 and for the
years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 is as follows:
Balance Sheet Information 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Current assets $ 85$ 104
Property, plant, and equipment 2,570 2,606
Deferred charges and other assets 158 121
Total Assets $ 2,813$ 2,831
   
Current liabilities $ 227$ 103
Long-term debt 1,214 1,103
Other deferred charges and other liabilities 86 212
Total Liabilities $ 1,527$ 1,418
   
Total Stockholders' Equity $ 1,286$ 1,413
Total Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity $ 2,813$ 2,831
II-240
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Income Statement Information 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Revenues $ 630$ 604 $ 544
Operating income 335 310 242
Net income 280 261 175
Atlantic Coast and PennEast Pipelines
In 2014, Southern Company Gas entered into a joint venture, whereby it holds a 5% ownership interest in the Atlantic Coast
Pipeline, an interstate pipeline company formed to develop and operate an approximate 605-mile natural gas pipeline in North
Carolina, Virginia, and West Virginia with expected initial transportation capacity of 1.5 Bcf per day. On February 7, 2020,
Southern Company Gas entered into an agreement with Dominion Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC for the sale of its interest in
Atlantic Coast Pipeline. The transaction is expected to be completed in the first half of 2020; however, the ultimate outcome cannot
be determined at this time. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast
Pipeline" for additional information.
Also in 2014, Southern Company Gas entered into a partnership in which it holds a 20% ownership interest in the PennEast
Pipeline, an interstate pipeline company formed to develop and operate an approximate 118-mile natural gas pipeline between New
Jersey and Pennsylvania. The expected initial transportation capacity of 1.0 Bcf per day is under long-term contracts, mainly with
public utilities and other market-serving entities, such as electric generation companies, in New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and New
York.
See Note 3 under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas – Gas Pipeline Projects" and "Guarantees" for additional information on
these pipeline projects.
Other
On May 29, 2019, Southern Company Gas sold its investment in Triton, a cargo container leasing company that was aggregated
into Southern Company Gas' all other segment. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Southern Company Gas owns a 50% equity method investment in a LNG liquefaction and storage facility in Jacksonville, Florida,
which was placed in service in October 2018. This facility is outfitted with a 2.0 million gallon storage tank with the capacity to
produce in excess of 120,000 gallons of LNG per day. During 2019, net loss from this investment was $2 million. On February 7,
2020, Southern Company Gas entered into an agreement with Dominion Modular LNG Holdings, Inc. for the sale of its interest in
Pivotal LNG, which includes the investment in this facility in Jacksonville, Florida. The transaction is expected to be completed in
the first half of 2020; however, the ultimate outcome cannot be determined at this time. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas
– Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline" for additional information.
8. FINANCING
Long-term Debt
Maturities of long-term debt for the next five years are as follows:
 Southern
Company(a)(b)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
Power(a)Mississippi
PowerSouthern
Power(b)Southern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2020 $ 2,991$ 251$ 1,025$ 281$ 825$ —
2021 3,214 311 397 270 300 330
2022 2,003 751 527 — 677 46
2023 2,413 301 175 — 290 400
2024 492 22 477 — — —
(a)Amounts include principal amortization related to the FFB borrowings beginning in February 2020; however, the final maturity date is February 20, 2044. See
"DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" herein for additional information.
(b)Southern Power's 2022 maturity represents euro-denominated debt at the U.S. dollar denominated hedge settlement amount.
II-241
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
In addition to the items described herein, long-term debt at December 31, 2019 and 2018 consists of senior notes (for all
Registrants), junior subordinated notes (for Southern Company and Georgia Power), first mortgage bonds and medium-term notes
(for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas), and bank term loans (for Southern Company and Alabama Power).
The traditional electric operating companies also have pollution control revenue bond obligations, which represent loans to the
traditional electric operating companies from public authorities of funds derived from sales by such authorities of revenue bonds
issued to finance pollution control and solid waste disposal facilities. In some cases, the pollution control revenue bond obligations
represent obligations under installment sales agreements with respect to facilities constructed with the proceeds of revenue bonds
issued by public authorities. The traditional electric operating companies are required to make payments sufficient for the
authorities to meet principal and interest requirements of such bonds. Proceeds from certain issuances are restricted until qualifying
expenditures are incurred.
Alabama Power has formed a wholly-owned trust subsidiary for the purpose of issuing preferred securities. The proceeds of the
related equity investments and preferred security sales were loaned back to Alabama Power through the issuance of junior
subordinated notes totaling $206 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, which constitute substantially all of the assets of this
trust and are reflected in the balance sheets as long-term debt payable. Alabama Power considers that the mechanisms and
obligations relating to the preferred securities issued for its benefit, taken together, constitute a full and unconditional guarantee by
it of the trust's payment obligations with respect to these securities. See Note 1 under "Variable Interest Entities" for additional
information on the accounting treatment for this trust and the related securities.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, Mississippi Power had $270 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of Mississippi
Business Finance Corporation Taxable Revenue Bonds, 7.13% Series 1999A due October 20, 2021. Mississippi Power assumed the
obligations in 2011 in connection with its election under its operating lease of Plant Daniel Units 3 and 4 to purchase the assets.
The bonds were recorded at fair value at the date of assumption, or $346 million, reflecting a premium of $76 million. See "Secured
Debt" herein for additional information. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, Mississippi Power also had $50 million of tax-exempt
revenue bond obligations outstanding representing loans to Mississippi Power from a public authority of funds derived from the
sale by such authority of revenue bonds issued to finance a portion of the costs of constructing the Kemper County energy facility.
See Note 9 for information related to finance lease obligations.
DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings
Pursuant to the loan guarantee program established under Title XVII of the Energy Policy Act of 2005 (Title XVII Loan Guarantee
Program), Georgia Power and the DOE entered into a loan guarantee agreement in 2014 and the Amended and Restated Loan
Guarantee Agreement in March 2019. Under the Amended and Restated Loan Guarantee Agreement, the DOE agreed to guarantee
the obligations of Georgia Power under note purchase agreements among the DOE, Georgia Power, and the FFB and related
promissory notes which provide for two multi-advance term loan facilities (FFB Credit Facilities). Under the FFB Credit Facilities,
Georgia Power may make term loan borrowings through the FFB in an amount up to approximately $5.130 billion, provided that
total aggregate borrowings under the FFB Credit Facilities may not exceed 70% of (i) Eligible Project Costs minus (ii)
approximately $1.492 billion (reflecting the amounts received by Georgia Power under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement less
the related customer refunds).
In March and December 2019, Georgia Power made borrowings under the FFB Credit Facilities in an aggregate principal amount
of $835 million and $383 million, respectively, with applicable interest rates of 3.213% and 2.537%, respectively, both for an
interest period that extends to the final maturity date of February 20, 2044. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, Georgia Power had
$3.8 billion and $2.6 billion of borrowings outstanding under the FFB Credit Facilities, respectively.
All borrowings under the FFB Credit Facilities are full recourse to Georgia Power, and Georgia Power is obligated to reimburse the
DOE for any payments the DOE is required to make to the FFB under its guarantee. Georgia Power's reimbursement obligations to
the DOE are full recourse and secured by a first priority lien on (i) Georgia Power's 45.7% undivided ownership interest in Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (primarily the units under construction, the related real property, and any nuclear fuel loaded in the reactor
core) and (ii) Georgia Power's rights and obligations under the principal contracts relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. There are
no restrictions on Georgia Power's ability to grant liens on other property.
In addition to the conditions described above, future advances are subject to satisfaction of customary conditions, as well as
certification of compliance with the requirements of the Title XVII Loan Guarantee Program, including accuracy of project-related
representations and warranties, delivery of updated project-related information, and evidence of compliance with the prevailing
wage requirements of the Davis-Bacon Act of 1931, as amended, and certification from the DOE's consulting engineer that
proceeds of the advances are used to reimburse Eligible Project Costs.
II-242
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Upon satisfaction of all conditions described above, advances may be requested on a quarterly basis through 2023. The final
maturity date for each advance under the FFB Credit Facilities is February 20, 2044. Interest is payable quarterly and principal
payments will begin on February 20, 2020. Borrowings under the FFB Credit Facilities will bear interest at the applicable U.S.
Treasury rate plus a spread equal to 0.375%.
Under the Amended and Restated Loan Guarantee Agreement, Georgia Power is subject to customary borrower affirmative and
negative covenants and events of default. In addition, Georgia Power is subject to project-related reporting requirements and other
project-specific covenants and events of default.
In the event certain mandatory prepayment events occur, the FFB's commitment to make further advances under the FFB Credit
Facilities will terminate and Georgia Power will be required to prepay the outstanding principal amount of all borrowings under the
FFB Credit Facilities over a period of five years (with level principal amortization). Among other things, these mandatory
prepayment events include (i) the termination of the Vogtle Services Agreement or rejection of the Vogtle Services Agreement in
any Westinghouse bankruptcy if Georgia Power does not maintain access to intellectual property rights under the related
intellectual property licenses; (ii) termination of the Bechtel Agreement, unless the Vogtle Owners enter into a replacement
agreement; (iii) cancellation of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 by the Georgia PSC or by Georgia Power; (iv) failure of the holders of
90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to vote to continue construction following certain schedule extensions;
(v) cost disallowances by the Georgia PSC that could have a material adverse effect on completion of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 or
Georgia Power's ability to repay the outstanding borrowings under the FFB Credit Facilities; or (vi) loss of or failure to receive
necessary regulatory approvals. Under certain circumstances, insurance proceeds and any proceeds from an event of taking must be
applied to immediately prepay outstanding borrowings under the FFB Credit Facilities. Georgia Power also may voluntarily prepay
outstanding borrowings under the FFB Credit Facilities. Under the FFB Credit Facilities, any prepayment (whether mandatory or
optional) will be made with a make-whole premium or discount, as applicable.
In connection with any cancellation of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, the DOE may elect to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units
3 and 4. In such an event, the DOE will have the right to assume Georgia Power's rights and obligations under the principal
agreements relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 and to acquire all or a portion of Georgia Power's ownership interest in Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Secured Debt
Each of Southern Company's subsidiaries is organized as a legal entity, separate and apart from Southern Company and its other
subsidiaries. There are no agreements or other arrangements among the Southern Company system companies under which the
assets of one company have been pledged or otherwise made available to satisfy obligations of Southern Company or any of its
other subsidiaries.
Outstanding secured debt at December 31, 2019 and 2018 for the applicable Registrants was as follows:
 Georgia
Power(a)Mississippi
 Power(b)Southern
Company
 Gas(c)
 (in millions)
December 31, 2019 $ 3,999$ 270$ 1,575
December 31, 2018 2,767 270 1,325
(a)Includes Georgia Power's FFB loans that are secured by a first priority lien on (i) Georgia Power's 45.7% undivided ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4 (primarily the units under construction, the related real property, and any nuclear fuel loaded in the reactor core) and (ii) Georgia Power's rights and
obligations under the principal contracts relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" herein for additional
information. Also includes finance lease obligations of $156 million and $142 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. See Note 9 for additional
information on finance lease obligations.
(b)Represents revenue bonds assumed in conjunction with Mississippi Power's purchase of Plant Daniel Units 3 and 4 that are secured by Plant Daniel Units 3 and
4 and certain related personal property. See "Long-term Debt" herein for additional information.
(c)Nicor Gas' first mortgage bonds are secured by substantially all of Nicor Gas' properties.
Each Registrant's senior notes, junior subordinated notes, pollution control and other revenue bond obligations, bank term loans,
credit facility borrowings, and notes payable are effectively subordinated to all secured debt of each respective Registrant.
Equity Units
In August 2019, Southern Company issued 34.5 million 2019 Series A Equity Units (Equity Units), initially in the form of
corporate units (Corporate Units), at a stated amount of $50 per Corporate Unit, for a total stated amount of $1.725 billion. Net
II-243
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
proceeds from the issuance were approximately $1.682 billion. The proceeds were used to repay short-term indebtedness and for
other general corporate purposes, including investments in Southern Company's subsidiaries.
Each Corporate Unit is comprised of (i) a 1/40 undivided beneficial ownership interest in $1,000 principal amount of Southern
Company's Series 2019A Remarketable Junior Subordinated Notes (Series 2019A RSNs) due 2024, (ii) a 1/40 undivided beneficial
ownership interest in $1,000 principal amount of Southern Company's Series 2019B Remarketable Junior Subordinated Notes
(together with the Series 2019A RSNs, the RSNs) due 2027, and (iii) a stock purchase contract, which obligates the holder to
purchase from Southern Company, no later than August 1, 2022, a certain number of shares of Southern Company's common stock
for $50 in cash (Stock Purchase Contract). Southern Company has agreed to remarket the RSNs in 2022, at which time each
interest rate on the RSNs will reset at the applicable market rate. Holders may choose to either remarket their RSNs, receive the
proceeds, and use those funds to settle the related Stock Purchase Contract or retain the RSNs and use other funds to settle the
related Stock Purchase Contract. If the remarketing is unsuccessful, holders will have the right to put their RSNs to Southern
Company at a price equal to the principal amount. The Corporate Units carry an annual distribution rate of 6.75% of the stated
amount, which is comprised of a quarterly interest payment on the RSNs of 2.70% per year and a quarterly purchase contract
adjustment payment of 4.05% per year.
Each Stock Purchase Contract obligates the holder to purchase, and Southern Company to sell, for $50 a number of shares of
Southern Company common stock determined based on the applicable market value (as determined under the related Stock
Purchase Contract) in accordance with the conversion ratios set forth below (subject to anti-dilution adjustments):
•If the applicable market value is equal to or greater than $68.64, 0.7284 shares.
•If the applicable market value is less than $68.64 but greater than $57.20, a number of shares equal to $50 divided by the
applicable market value.
•If the applicable market value is less than or equal to $57.20, 0.8741 shares.
A holder's ownership interest in the RSNs is pledged to Southern Company to secure the holder's obligation under the related Stock
Purchase Contract. If a holder of a Stock Purchase Contract chooses at any time to have its RSNs released from the pledge, such
holder's obligation under such Stock Purchase Contract must be secured by a U.S. Treasury security equal to the aggregate principal
amount of the RSNs. At the time of issuance, the RSNs were recorded on Southern Company's consolidated balance sheet as long-
term debt and the present value of the contract adjustment payments of $198 million was recorded as a liability, representing the
obligation to make contract adjustment payments, with an offsetting reduction to paid-in capital. The liability balance at
December 31, 2019 was $185 million, of which $66 million was classified as current. The difference between the face value and
present value of the contract adjustment payments will be accreted to interest expense on the consolidated statements of income
over the three-year period ending in 2022. The liability recorded for the contract adjustment payments is considered non-cash and
excluded from the consolidated statements of cash flows. To settle the Stock Purchase Contracts, Southern Company will be
required to issue a maximum of 30.2 million shares of common stock (subject to anti-dilution adjustments and a make-whole
adjustment if certain fundamental changes occur).
II-244
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Bank Credit Arrangements
At December 31, 2019, committed credit arrangements with banks were as follows:
 Expires   
Company 2020  2022 2024 Total Unused  Due within
One Year
 (in millions)
Southern Company parent $ — $ — $ 2,000$ 2,000$ 1,999 $ —
Alabama Power 3 525 800 1,328 1,328 3
Georgia Power — — 1,750 1,750 1,733 —
Mississippi Power — 150 — 150 150 —
Southern Power(a)— — 600 600 591 —
Southern Company Gas(b)— — 1,750 1,750 1,745 —
SEGCO 30 — — 30 30 30
Southern Company $ 33 $ 675$ 6,900$ 7,608$ 7,576 $ 33
(a)Southern Power's subsidiaries are not parties to its bank credit arrangement.
(b)Southern Company Gas, as the parent entity, guarantees the obligations of Southern Company Gas Capital, which is the borrower of $1.25 billion of this
arrangement. Southern Company Gas' committed credit arrangement also includes $500 million for which Nicor Gas is the borrower and which is restricted for
working capital needs of Nicor Gas. Pursuant to this multi-year credit arrangement, the allocations between Southern Company Gas Capital and Nicor Gas may
be adjusted. See "Structural Considerations" herein for additional information.
The bank credit arrangements require payment of commitment fees based on the unused portion of the commitments or the
maintenance of compensating balances with the banks. Commitment fees average less than 1/4 of 1% for Southern Company, the
traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, Southern Company Gas, and Nicor Gas. Compensating balances are not
legally restricted from withdrawal.
Subject to applicable market conditions, Southern Company and its subsidiaries expect to renew or replace their bank credit
arrangements as needed, prior to expiration. In connection therewith, Southern Company and its subsidiaries may extend the
maturity dates and/or increase or decrease the lending commitments thereunder.
These bank credit arrangements, as well as the term loan arrangements of Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Southern Power, and
SEGCO, contain covenants that limit debt levels and contain cross-acceleration or, in the case of Southern Power, cross-default
provisions to other indebtedness (including guarantee obligations) that are restricted only to the indebtedness of the individual
company. Such cross-default provisions to other indebtedness would trigger an event of default if Southern Power defaulted on
indebtedness or guarantee obligations over a specified threshold. Such cross-acceleration provisions to other indebtedness would
trigger an event of default if the applicable borrower defaulted on indebtedness, the payment of which was then accelerated.
Southern Company's, Southern Company Gas', and Nicor Gas' credit arrangements contain covenants that limit debt levels to 70%
of total capitalization, as defined in the agreements, and the other subsidiaries' bank credit arrangements contain covenants that
limit debt levels to 65% of total capitalization, as defined in the agreements. For purposes of these definitions, debt excludes the
long-term debt payable to affiliated trusts and, in certain arrangements, other hybrid securities. Additionally, for Southern Company
and Southern Power, for purposes of these definitions, debt excludes any project debt incurred by certain subsidiaries of Southern
Power to the extent such debt is non-recourse to Southern Power and capitalization excludes the capital stock or other equity
attributable to such subsidiaries. At December 31, 2019, the Registrants, Nicor Gas, and SEGCO were in compliance with all such
covenants. None of the bank credit arrangements contain material adverse change clauses at the time of borrowings.
A portion of the unused credit with banks is allocated to provide liquidity support to the revenue bonds of the traditional electric
operating companies and the commercial paper programs of the Registrants and Nicor Gas. The amount of variable rate revenue
bonds of the traditional electric operating companies outstanding requiring liquidity support at December 31, 2019 was
approximately $1.4 billion (comprised of approximately $854 million at Alabama Power, $550 million at Georgia Power, and $40
million at Mississippi Power). In addition, at December 31, 2019, the traditional electric operating companies had approximately
$275 million (comprised of approximately $87 million at Alabama Power and $188 million at Georgia Power) of revenue bonds
outstanding that are required to be remarketed within the next 12 months.
In addition to its credit arrangement described above, at December 31, 2019, Southern Power also had a $120 million continuing
letter of credit facility expiring in 2021 for standby letters of credit. At December 31, 2019, $97 million had been used for letters of
credit, primarily as credit support for PPA requirements, and $23 million was unused. At December 31, 2018, the total amount
II-245
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
used under this facility was $103 million. Subsequent to December 31, 2019, Southern Power entered into an additional $60
million continuing letter of credit facility expiring in 2023 for standby letters of credit. Southern Power's subsidiaries are not parties
to these letter of credit facilities. Also, at December 31, 2019 and 2018, Southern Power had $104 million and $103 million,
respectively, of cash collateral posted related to PPA requirements, which is included in other deferred charges and assets in
Southern Power's consolidated balance sheets.
Notes Payable
The Registrants, Nicor Gas, and SEGCO make short-term borrowings primarily through commercial paper programs that have the
liquidity support of the committed bank credit arrangements described above under "Bank Credit Arrangements." Southern Power's
subsidiaries are not parties or obligors to its commercial paper program. Southern Company Gas maintains commercial paper
programs at Southern Company Gas Capital and at Nicor Gas. Nicor Gas' commercial paper program supports working capital
needs at Nicor Gas as Nicor Gas is not permitted to make money pool loans to affiliates. All of Southern Company Gas' other
subsidiaries benefit from Southern Company Gas Capital's commercial paper program. See "Structural Considerations" herein for
additional information.
In addition, Southern Company and certain of its subsidiaries have entered into various bank term loan agreements. Unless
otherwise stated, the proceeds of these loans were used to repay existing indebtedness and for general corporate purposes, including
working capital and, for the subsidiaries, their continuous construction programs.
Commercial paper and short-term bank term loans are included in notes payable in the balance sheets. Details of short-term
borrowings for the applicable Registrants were as follows:
 Notes Payable at December 31, 2019 Notes Payable at December 31, 2018
 Amount
Outstanding  Weighted Average
Interest RateAmount
Outstanding  Weighted Average
Interest Rate
 (in millions)  (in millions)  
Southern Company     
Commercial paper $ 1,705 2.1% $ 1,064 3.0%
Short-term bank debt 350 2.3% 1,851 3.1%
Total $ 2,055 2.1% $ 2,915 3.1%
     
Georgia Power     
Commercial paper $ 115 2.1% $ 294 3.1%
Short-term bank debt 250 2.2% — —%
Total $ 365 2.2% $ 294 3.1%
     
Southern Power     
Commercial paper $ 449 2.1% $ — —%
Short-term bank debt 100 2.6% 100 3.1%
Total $ 549 2.2% $ 100 3.1%
     
Southern Company Gas     
Commercial paper:     
Southern Company Gas Capital$ 372 2.1% $ 403 3.1%
Nicor Gas 278 1.8% 247 3.0%
Total $ 650 2.0% $ 650 3.0%
See "Bank Credit Arrangements" herein for information on bank term loan covenants that limit debt levels and cross-acceleration or
cross-default provisions.
II-246
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Outstanding Classes of Capital Stock
Southern Company
Common Stock
Stock Issued
During 2019, Southern Company issued approximately 19.5 million shares of common stock through employee equity
compensation plans and received proceeds of approximately $844 million.
See "Equity Units" herein for additional information.
Shares Reserved
At December 31, 2019, a total of 104 million shares were reserved for issuance pursuant to the Southern Investment Plan,
employee savings plans, the Outside Directors Stock Plan, the Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan (which includes stock
options and performance share units as discussed in Note 12), and an at-the-market program. Of the total 104 million shares
reserved, 9 million shares are available for awards under the Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan at December 31, 2019.
Diluted Earnings Per Share
For Southern Company, the only difference in computing basic and diluted earnings per share (EPS) is attributable to awards
outstanding under stock-based compensation plans and the Equity Units. Earnings per share dilution resulting from stock-based
compensation plans and the Equity Units issuance is determined using the treasury stock method. Shares used to compute diluted
EPS were as follows:
 Average Common Stock Shares
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
As reported shares 1,046 1,020 1,000
Effect of stock-based compensation 8 5 8
Diluted shares 1,054 1,025 1,008
Stock-based compensation awards that were not included in the diluted EPS calculation because they were anti-dilutive were
immaterial in all years presented.
The Equity Units issued in August 2019 were excluded from the calculation of diluted EPS for 2019 as the dilutive stock price
threshold was not met.
Redeemable Preferred Stock of Subsidiaries
The preferred stock of Alabama Power contains a feature that allows the holders to elect a majority of such subsidiary's board of
directors if preferred dividends are not paid for four consecutive quarters. Because such a potential redemption-triggering event is
not solely within the control of Alabama Power, this preferred stock is presented as "Redeemable Preferred Stock of Subsidiaries"
on Southern Company's balance sheets and statements of capitalization in a manner consistent with temporary equity under
applicable accounting standards.
II-247
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The following table presents changes during the year in redeemable preferred stock of subsidiaries for Southern Company:
 Redeemable Preferred
Stock of Subsidiaries
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2016: $ 118
Issued(a)250
Redeemed(a)(38)
Issuance costs(a)(6)
Balance at December 31, 2017: 324
Redeemed(b)(33)
Balance at December 31, 2018 and 2019: $ 291
(a)See "Alabama Power" herein for additional information.
(b)See "Mississippi Power" herein for additional information.
Alabama Power
Alabama Power has preferred stock, Class A preferred stock, and common stock outstanding. Alabama Power also has authorized
preference stock, none of which is outstanding. Alabama Power's preferred stock and Class A preferred stock, without preference
between classes, rank senior to Alabama Power's common stock with respect to payment of dividends and voluntary and
involuntary dissolution. The preferred stock and Class A preferred stock of Alabama Power contain a feature that allows the holders
to elect a majority of Alabama Power's board of directors if preferred dividends are not paid for four consecutive quarters. Because
such a potential redemption-triggering event is not solely within the control of Alabama Power, the preferred stock and Class A
preferred stock is presented as "Redeemable Preferred Stock" on Alabama Power's balance sheets and statements of capitalization
in a manner consistent with temporary equity under applicable accounting standards.
Alabama Power's preferred stock is subject to redemption at a price equal to the par value plus a premium. Alabama Power's Class
A preferred stock is subject to redemption at a price equal to the stated capital. All series of Alabama Power's preferred stock
currently are subject to redemption at the option of Alabama Power. The Class A preferred stock is subject to redemption on or after
October 1, 2022, or following the occurrence of a rating agency event. Information for each outstanding series is in the table below:
Preferred StockPar Value/Stated
Capital Per Share Shares Outstanding Redemption
Price Per Share
4.92% Preferred Stock $100  80,000 $103.23
4.72% Preferred Stock $100  50,000 $102.18
4.64% Preferred Stock $100  60,000 $103.14
4.60% Preferred Stock $100  100,000 $104.20
4.52% Preferred Stock $100  50,000 $102.93
4.20% Preferred Stock $100  135,115 $105.00
5.00% Class A Preferred Stock $25  10,000,000 Stated Capital(*)
(*)Prior to October 1, 2022: $25.50; on or after October 1, 2022: Stated Capital
In 2017, Alabama Power issued 10 million shares ($250 million aggregate stated capital) of 5.00% Class A Preferred Stock,
Cumulative, Par Value $1 Per Share (Stated Capital $25 Per Share). The proceeds were used in 2017 to redeem all 2 million shares
($50 million aggregate stated capital) of 6.50% Series Preference Stock, 6 million shares ($150 million aggregate stated capital) of
6.45% Series Preference Stock, and 1.52 million shares ($38 million aggregate stated capital) of 5.83% Class A Preferred Stock and
for other general corporate purposes, including Alabama Power's continuous construction program.
There were no changes for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 in redeemable preferred stock of Alabama Power.
II-248
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Georgia Power
Georgia Power has preferred stock, Class A preferred stock, preference stock, and common stock authorized, but only common
stock outstanding as of December 31, 2019 and 2018. In 2017, Georgia Power redeemed all of its outstanding shares of Class A
preferred stock and preference stock.
Mississippi Power
Mississippi Power has preferred stock and common stock authorized, but only common stock outstanding as of December 31,
2019. In October 2018, Mississippi Power completed the redemption of all outstanding shares and depository shares of its Preferred
Stock that contained a feature allowing the holders to elect a majority of Mississippi Power's board of directors if preferred
dividends were not paid for four consecutive quarters. Because such a potential redemption-triggering event was not solely within
the control of Mississippi Power, this preferred stock was presented as "Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock" on Mississippi
Power's balance sheets and statements of capitalization in a manner consistent with temporary equity under applicable accounting
standards.
Dividend Restrictions
The income of Southern Company is derived primarily from equity in earnings of its subsidiaries. At December 31, 2019,
consolidated retained earnings included $5.3 billion of undistributed retained earnings of the subsidiaries.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power can only pay dividends to Southern Company out of retained
earnings or paid-in-capital.
See Note 7 under "Southern Power" for information regarding the distribution requirements for certain Southern Power
subsidiaries.
By regulation, Nicor Gas is restricted, to the extent of its retained earnings balance, in the amount it can dividend or loan to
affiliates and is not permitted to make money pool loans to affiliates. At December 31, 2019, the amount of Southern Company
Gas' subsidiary retained earnings restricted for dividend payment totaled $951 million.
Structural Considerations
Since Southern Company and Southern Company Gas are holding companies, the right of Southern Company and Southern
Company Gas and, hence, the right of creditors of Southern Company or Southern Company Gas to participate in any distribution
of the assets of any respective subsidiary of Southern Company or Southern Company Gas, whether upon liquidation,
reorganization or otherwise, is subject to prior claims of creditors and preferred stockholders of such subsidiary.
Southern Company Gas' 100%-owned subsidiary, Southern Company Gas Capital, was established to provide for certain of
Southern Company Gas' ongoing financing needs through a commercial paper program, the issuance of various debt, hybrid
securities, and other financing arrangements. Southern Company Gas fully and unconditionally guarantees all debt issued by
Southern Company Gas Capital. Nicor Gas is not permitted by regulation to make loans to affiliates or utilize Southern Company
Gas Capital for its financing needs.
Southern Power Company's senior notes, bank term loan, commercial paper, and bank credit arrangement are unsecured senior
indebtedness, which rank equally with all other unsecured and unsubordinated debt of Southern Power Company. Southern Power's
subsidiaries are not issuers, borrowers, or obligors, as applicable, under any of these unsecured senior debt arrangements, which are
effectively subordinated to any future secured debt of Southern Power Company and any potential claims of creditors of Southern
Power's subsidiaries.
9. LEASES
On January 1, 2019, the Registrants adopted the provisions of FASB ASC Topic 842 (as amended), Leases (ASC 842), which
require lessees to recognize leases with a term of greater than 12 months on the balance sheet as lease obligations, representing the
discounted future fixed payments due, along with ROU assets that will be amortized over the term of each lease.
The Registrants elected the transition methodology provided by ASC 842, whereby the applicable requirements were applied on a
prospective basis as of the adoption date of January 1, 2019, without restating prior periods. The Registrants also elected the
package of practical expedients provided by ASC 842 that allows prior determinations of whether existing contracts are, or contain,
leases and the classification of existing leases to continue without reassessment. Additionally, the Registrants applied the use-of-
hindsight practical expedient in determining lease terms as of the date of adoption and elected the practical expedient that allows
existing land easements not previously accounted for as leases not to be reassessed.
II-249
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Lessee
As lessee, the Registrants lease certain electric generating units (including renewable energy facilities), real estate/land,
communication towers, railcars, and other equipment and vehicles. The major categories of lease obligations are as follows:
As of December 31, 2019
Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Electric generating units $ 990$ 125$ 1,487$ —$ —$ —
Real estate/land 782 4 54 2 398 74
Communication towers 154 2 3 — — 18
Railcars 51 21 26 3 — —
Other 93 8 12 1 — —
Total $ 2,070$ 160$ 1,582$ 6$ 398$ 92
Real estate/land leases primarily consist of commercial real estate leases at Southern Company, Georgia Power, and Southern
Company Gas and various land leases primarily associated with renewable energy facilities at Southern Power. The commercial
real estate leases have remaining terms of up to 25 years while the land leases have remaining terms of up to 47 years, including
renewal periods.
Communication towers are leased for the installation of equipment to provide cellular phone service to customers and to support
the automated meter infrastructure programs at the traditional electric operating companies and Nicor Gas. Communication tower
leases have terms of up to 15 years with options to renew for periods up to 20 years.
While renewal options exist in many of the leases, other than for land leases associated with renewable energy facilities at Southern
Power and for communication tower leases at Southern Company Gas, the expected term used in calculating the lease obligation
generally reflects only the noncancelable period of the lease as it is not considered reasonably certain that the lease will be
extended. The expected term of land leases associated with renewable energy facilities includes renewal periods reasonably certain
of exercise resulting in an expected lease term at least equal to the expected life of the renewable energy facilities.
Contracts that Contain a Lease
While not specifically structured as a lease, some of the PPAs at Alabama Power and Georgia Power are deemed to represent a
lease of the underlying electric generating units when the terms of the PPA convey the right to control the use of the underlying
assets. Amounts recorded for leases of electric generating units are generally based on the amount of scheduled capacity payments
due over the remaining term of the PPA, which varies between three and 18 years. Georgia Power has several PPAs with Southern
Power that Georgia Power accounts for as leases with a lease obligation of $624 million at December 31, 2019. The amount paid
for energy under these affiliate PPAs reflects a price that would be paid in an arm's-length transaction as those amounts have been
reviewed and approved by the Georgia PSC.
During 2019, Alabama Power entered into additional long-term PPAs totaling approximately 640 MWs of additional generating
capacity consisting of combined cycle generation expected to commence later in 2020 and solar generation coupled with battery
energy storage systems expected to commence in 2022 through 2024. Both the combined cycle PPA and the 20-year term battery
energy storage systems of the solar generation PPAs are deemed operating leases. The 28-year term battery energy storage systems
of the solar generation PPAs are deemed finance leases. The estimated minimum lease payments for these agreements, which are
contingent upon approval by the Alabama PSC, total $95 million. See Note 2 under "Alabama Power – Petition for Certificate of
Convenience and Necessity" for additional information.
Short-term Leases
Leases with an initial term of 12 months or less are not recorded on the balance sheet; the Registrants generally recognize lease
expense for these leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
Residual Value Guarantees
Residual value guarantees exist primarily in railcar leases at Alabama Power and Georgia Power and the amounts probable of being
paid under those guarantees are included in the lease payments. All such amounts are immaterial as of December 31, 2019.
II-250
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Lease and Nonlease Components
For all asset categories, with the exception of electric generating units, gas pipelines, and real estate leases, the Registrants combine
lease payments and any nonlease components, such as asset maintenance, for purposes of calculating the lease obligation and the
right-of-use asset.
Balance sheet amounts recorded for operating and finance leases are as follows:
 As of December 31, 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Operating Leases     
Operating lease ROU assets, net $ 1,800$ 132$ 1,428$ 6$ 369$ 93
Operating lease obligations - current $ 229$ 49$ 144$ 2$ 22$ 14
Operating lease obligations - non-current 1,615 107 1,282 4 376 78
Total operating lease obligations $ 1,844$ 156$ 1,426$ 6$ 398$ 92
Finance Leases     
Finance lease ROU assets, net $ 216$ 4$ 130$ —$ —$ —
Finance lease obligations - current $ 21$ 1$ 11$ —$ —$ —
Finance lease obligations - non-current 205 3 145 — — —
Total finance lease obligations $ 226$ 4$ 156$ —$ —$ —
Lease costs for the year ended December 31, 2019, which includes both amounts recognized as operations and maintenance
expense and amounts capitalized as part of the cost of another asset, are as follows:
Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2019     
Lease cost     
Operating lease cost $ 310$ 54$ 206$ 3$ 28$ 18
Finance lease cost:     
Amortization of ROU assets 28 1 15 — — —
Interest on lease obligations 12 — 18 — — —
Total finance lease cost 40 1 33 — — —
Short-term lease costs 48 19 22 — — —
Variable lease cost 105 6 85 — 7 —
Sublease income — (1) — — — —
Total lease cost $ 503$ 79$ 346$ 3$ 35$ 18
II-251
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Georgia Power has variable lease payments that are based on the amount of energy produced by certain renewable generating
facilities subject to PPAs.
Rent expense and PPA capacity expense related to leases for 2018 and 2017, prior to the adoption of ASC 842, were as follows:
 Southern
Company(a)(b)(c)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
Power(a)Mississippi
Power(b)Southern
Power(c)Southern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2018:    
Rent expense $ 192$ 23$ 34$ 4$ 31$ 15
PPA capacity expense 231 44 206 — — —
2017:    
Rent expense $ 176$ 25$ 31$ 3$ 29$ 15
PPA capacity expense 235 41 225 — — —
(a)Georgia Power's energy-only solar PPAs accounted for as leases contained contingent rent expense of $72 million and $73 million for 2018 and 2017,
respectively, of which $29 million in each of 2018 and 2017 related to solar PPAs with Southern Power.
(b)Mississippi Power's energy-only solar PPAs accounted for as operating leases contained contingent rent expense of $10 million and $5 million in 2018 and
2017, respectively.
(c)Rent expense includes contingent rent expense related to Southern Power's land leases based on wind production and escalation in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers.
Other information with respect to cash and noncash activities related to leases, as well as weighted-average lease terms and
discount rates, is as follows:
 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Other information     
Cash paid for amounts included in the
measurements of lease obligations:     
Operating cash flows from operating leases$ 323$ 54$ 210$ 3$ 27$ 18
Operating cash flows from finance leases 10 — 19 — — —
Financing cash flows from finance leases 32 1 13 — — —
ROU assets obtained in exchange for new
operating lease obligations 118 7 21 — 2 19
ROU assets obtained in exchange for new
finance lease obligations 35 2 24 — — —
 As of December 31, 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Weighted-average remaining lease term in
years:     
Operating leases 14.2 3.1 10.2 7.0 32.8 9.9
Finance leases 18.8 12.1 10.5 N/A N/A N/A
Weighted-average discount rate:     
Operating leases 4.53% 3.33% 4.46% 4.02% 5.66% 3.70%
Finance leases 5.04% 3.60% 10.76% N/A N/A N/A
II-252
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Maturities of lease liabilities are as follows:
 As of December 31, 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Maturity Analysis     
Operating leases:     
2020 $ 289$ 54$ 205$ 2$ 26$ 18
2021 268 52 198 1 23 17
2022 260 53 197 1 23 14
2023 208 4 198 1 24 11
2024 163 1 161 — 24 10
Thereafter 1,514 1 831 2 812 44
Total 2,702 165 1,790 7 932 114
Less: Present value discount 858 9 364 1 534 22
Operating lease obligations $ 1,844$ 156$ 1,426$ 6$ 398$ 92
Finance leases:     
2020 $ 31$ 1$ 28$ —$ —$ —
2021 25 1 24 — — —
2022 22 1 25 — — —
2023 18 1 25 — — —
2024 15 — 25 — — —
Thereafter 246 — 134 — — —
Total 357 4 261 — — —
Less: Present value discount 131 — 105 —
Finance lease obligations $ 226$ 4$ 156$ —$ —$ —
Payments made under PPAs at Georgia Power for energy generated from certain renewable energy facilities accounted for as
operating and finance leases are considered variable lease costs and are therefore not reflected in the above maturity analysis.
As of December 31, 2019, Southern Company, Alabama Power, Mississippi Power, and Southern Power have additional leases that
have not yet commenced, as detailed in the following table:
Southern
CompanyAlabama
Power(a)Mississippi
Power(b)Southern
Power
Lease categoryPPAs, land, pipelines,
 and aircraft PPAs Pipelines Land
Expected commencement date 2020-2024 2020-2024 2020 2020
Longest lease term expiration 40 years 28 years 15 years 40 years
Estimated total obligations (in millions) $248 $95 $23 $87
(a)See Note 2 under "Alabama Power – Petition for Certificate of Convenience and Necessity" for additional information. Alabama Power will have variable
operating lease payments and variable finance lease payments that are based on the amount of energy produced by certain renewable generating facilities subject
to PPAs.
(b)See Note 2 under "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility – Lignite Mine and CO2 Pipeline Facilities" for additional information. Estimated total
obligations include non-lease components.
Lessor
The Registrants are each considered lessors in various arrangements that have been determined to contain a lease due to the
customer's ability to control the use of the underlying asset owned by the applicable Registrant. For the traditional electric
II-253
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
operating companies, these arrangements consist of outdoor lighting contracts accounted for as operating leases with initial terms of
up to seven years, after which the contracts renew on a month-to-month basis at the customer's option. For Mississippi Power, these
arrangements also include a tolling arrangement related to an electric generating unit accounted for as a sales-type lease with a term
of 20 years. For Southern Power, these arrangements consist of PPAs related to electric generating units, including renewable
energy facilities, accounted for as operating leases with terms of up to 27 years. For Southern Company, these arrangements also
include PPAs related to fuel cells accounted for as operating leases with terms of up to 15 years. Southern Company Gas is the
lessor in operating leases related to gas pipelines with remaining terms of up to 23 years.
Lease income for the year ended December 31, 2019 is as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2019   
Lease income - interest income on sales-type leases$ 9$ —$ —$ 9$ —$ —
Lease income - operating leases 273 24 71 — 160 35
Variable lease income 403 — — — 434 —
Total lease income $ 685$ 24$ 71$ 9$ 594$ 35
Lease income for Southern Power is included in wholesale revenues. Lease payments received under tolling arrangements and
PPAs consist of either scheduled payments or variable payments based on the amount of energy produced by the underlying electric
generating units. Scheduled payments to be received under outdoor lighting contracts, tolling arrangements, and PPAs accounted
for as leases are presented in the following maturity analyses.
No profit or loss was recognized by Mississippi Power upon commencement of a tolling arrangement accounted for as a sales-type
lease during the first quarter 2019. The undiscounted cash flows to be received under the lease are as follows:
 At December 31, 2019
 Southern
CompanyMississippi
Power
 (in millions)
2020 $ 17$ 17
2021 15 15
2022 15 15
2023 14 14
2024 14 14
Thereafter 138 138
Total undiscounted cash flows $ 213$ 213
Lease receivable(*)118 118
Difference between undiscounted cash flows and discounted cash flows $ 95$ 95
(*)Included in other current assets and other property and investments on the balance sheets.
II-254
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The undiscounted cash flows to be received under operating leases and contracts accounted for as operating leases (adjusted for
intercompany eliminations) are as follows:
 At December 31, 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2020 $ 155$ 26$ 26$ 84$ 35
2021 141 23 19 86 35
2022 125 16 8 87 35
2023 110 7 2 88 34
2024 103 3 — 90 33
Thereafter 1,063 20 — 387 463
Total $ 1,697$ 95$ 55$ 822$ 635
Southern Power receives payments for renewable energy under PPAs accounted for as operating leases that are considered
contingent rents and are therefore not reflected in the table above. Southern Power allocates revenue to the nonlease components of
PPAs based on the stand-alone selling price of capacity and energy. The undiscounted cash flows to be received under outdoor
lighting contracts accounted for as operating leases at Mississippi Power are immaterial.
10. INCOME TAXES
Southern Company files a consolidated federal income tax return and the Registrants file various state income tax returns, some of
which are combined or unitary. Under a joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement, each Southern Company subsidiary's
current and deferred tax expense is computed on a stand-alone basis and no subsidiary is allocated more current expense than
would be paid if it filed a separate income tax return. In accordance with IRS regulations, each company is jointly and severally
liable for the federal tax liability.
Federal Tax Reform Legislation
Following the enactment of the Tax Reform Legislation, the SEC staff issued Staff Accounting Bulletin 118 – "Income Tax
Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act" (SAB 118), which provided for a measurement period of up to one year
from the enactment date to complete accounting under GAAP for the tax effects of the legislation. Due to the complex and
comprehensive nature of the enacted tax law changes and their application under GAAP, the Registrants considered all amounts
recorded in the financial statements as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation "provisional" as discussed in SAB 118 and subject to
revision prior to filing the 2017 tax return in the fourth quarter 2018. As of December 31, 2018, each of the Registrants considered
the measurement of impacts from the Tax Reform Legislation on deferred income tax assets and liabilities, primarily due to the
impact of the reduction of the corporate income tax rate, to be complete.
II-255
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Current and Deferred Income Taxes
Details of income tax provisions are as follows:
 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Federal —  
Current $ 156$ 61$ 264$ (6)$ (717)$ (120)
Deferred 1,237 125 180 26 647 195
 1,393 186 444 20 (70) 75
State —  
Current 275 12 6 (1) 1 37
Deferred 130 72 22 11 13 18
 405 84 28 10 14 55
Total $ 1,798$ 270$ 472$ 30$ (56)$ 130
 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Federal —    
Current $ 167$ 91$ 393$ (567)$ 85$ 334
Deferred 231 123 (249) 575 (154) 33
 398 214 144 8 (69) 367
State —    
Current 188 26 81 (10) (9) 131
Deferred (137) 51 (11) (100) (86) (34)
 51 77 70 (110) (95) 97
Total $ 449$ 291$ 214$ (102)$ (164)$ 464
 2017
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Federal —     
Current $ (62)$ 136$ 256$ 194$ (566)$ 103
Deferred (6) 336 504 (753) (312) 170
 (68) 472 760 (559) (878) 273
State —     
Current 37 23 116 — (110) 27
Deferred 173 73 (46) 27 49 67
 210 96 70 27 (61) 94
Total $ 142$ 568$ 830$ (532)$ (939)$ 367
Southern Company's and Southern Power's ITCs and PTCs generated in the current tax year and carried forward from prior tax
years that cannot be utilized in the current tax year are reclassified from current to deferred taxes in federal income tax expense in
the tables above. Southern Power's ITCs and PTCs reclassified in this manner include $51 million for 2019, $128 million for
II-256
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
2018, and $316 million for 2017. Southern Power received $734 million and $5 million of cash related to federal ITCs under
renewable energy initiatives in 2019 and 2018, respectively. No cash was received in 2017. See "Deferred Tax Assets and
Liabilities" and "Tax Credit Carryforwards" herein for additional information.
In accordance with regulatory requirements, deferred federal ITCs for the traditional electric operating companies are deferred and
amortized over the average life of the related property, with such amortization normally applied as a credit to reduce depreciation
and amortization in the statements of income. Southern Power's and the natural gas distribution utilities' deferred federal ITCs, as
well as certain state ITCs for Nicor Gas, are deferred and amortized to income tax expense over the life of the respective asset.
ITCs amortized in 2019, 2018, and 2017 were immaterial for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company
Gas and were as follows for Southern Company and Southern Power:
 Southern Company Southern Power
 (in millions)
2019 $ 181$ 151
2018 87 58
2017 79 57
Southern Power recognized tax credits and reduced the tax basis of the asset by 50% of the ITCs received, resulting in a net
deferred tax asset. Southern Power has elected to recognize the tax benefit of this basis difference as a reduction to income tax
expense in the year in which the plant reaches commercial operation. The tax benefit of the related basis differences reduced
income tax expense by $5 million in 2019, $1 million in 2018, and $18 million in 2017. See "Unrecognized Tax Benefits" herein
for further information.
State ITCs and other state credits, which are recognized in the period in which the credits are generated, reduced Georgia Power's
income tax expense by $51 million in 2019, $21 million in 2018, and $37 million in 2017 and reduced Southern Power's income
tax expense by $32 million in 2017.
Southern Power's federal and state PTCs, which are recognized in the period in which the credits are generated, reduced Southern
Power's income tax expense by $12 million in 2019, $141 million in 2018, and $139 million in 2017.
Legal Entity Reorganizations
In April 2018, Southern Power completed the final stage of a legal entity reorganization of various direct and indirect subsidiaries
that own and operate substantially all of its solar facilities, including certain subsidiaries owned in partnership with various third
parties. In September 2018, Southern Power also completed a legal entity reorganization of eight operating wind facilities under a
new holding company, SP Wind. The reorganizations resulted in net state tax benefits related to certain changes in apportionment
rates totaling approximately $65 million, which were recorded in 2018.
Effective Tax Rate
Southern Company's effective tax rate is typically lower than the statutory rate due to employee stock plans' dividend deduction,
non-taxable AFUDC equity at the traditional electric operating companies, flowback of excess deferred income taxes at the
regulated utilities, and federal income tax benefits from ITCs and PTCs primarily at Southern Power. Each Registrant's effective tax
rate for 2018 varied significantly as compared to 2017 due to the 14% lower 2018 federal tax rate resulting from the Tax Reform
Legislation.
II-257
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
A reconciliation of the federal statutory income tax rate to the effective income tax rate is as follows:
 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Federal statutory rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 %
State income tax, net of federal
deduction 4.9 4.9 1.0 4.3 4.0 6.1
Employee stock plans'
dividend deduction (0.4) — — — — —
Non-deductible book depreciation 0.3 0.6 0.5 0.4 — —
Flowback of excess deferred income
taxes (2.1) (5.3) — (12.6) — (6.0)
AFUDC-Equity (0.4) (0.8) (0.6) (0.1) — —
ITC basis difference (0.1) — — — (1.9) —
Amortization of ITC (0.8) (0.1) (0.1) (0.1) (16.1) (0.1)
Tax impact from sale of subsidiaries 5.1 — — — (27.6) (1.4)
Noncontrolling interests — — — — 0.8 —
Other — (0.4) (0.3) 4.9 (0.6) (1.4)
Effective income tax (benefit) rate 27.5 % 19.9 % 21.5 % 17.8 % (20.4)% 18.2 %
 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Federal statutory rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 %
State income tax, net of federal
deduction 1.8 5.0 5.5 (65.1) (90.8) 9.2
Employee stock plans'
dividend deduction (1.0) — — — — —
Non-deductible book depreciation 0.8 0.6 1.2 0.7 — —
Flowback of excess deferred income
taxes (4.0) (1.8) — (4.1) — (3.0)
AFUDC-Equity (1.0) (1.0) (1.4) — — —
ITC basis difference (0.6) — — — (0.2) —
Federal PTCs (4.7) — — — (156.6) —
Amortization of ITC (2.0) (0.1) (0.2) (0.2) (55.4) (0.1)
Tax impact from sale of subsidiaries 8.6 — — — — 28.5
Tax Reform Legislation (1.4) — (4.9) (26.3) 96.1 (0.4)
Noncontrolling interests (0.4) — — — (14.9) —
Other (0.8) (0.1) 0.1 (1.4) 2.0 0.3
Effective income tax (benefit) rate 16.3 % 23.6 % 21.3 % (75.4)% (198.8)% 55.5 %
II-258
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2017
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power(*)Southern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Federal statutory rate 35.0 % 35.0 % 35.0 % (35.0)% 35.0 % 35.0 %
State income tax, net of federal
deduction 12.5 4.5 2.0 0.6 (22.2) 10.0
Employee stock plans'
dividend deduction (4.0) — — — — —
Non-deductible book depreciation 3.1 0.9 0.7 0.1 — —
Flowback of excess deferred income
taxes (0.3) — (0.1) — — (0.2)
AFUDC-Equity (2.6) (1.0) (0.6) — — —
AFUDC-Equity portion of Kemper
IGCC charge 15.7 — — 5.3 — —
ITC basis difference (1.7) — — — (10.0) —
Federal PTCs (12.1) — — — (72.5) —
Amortization of ITC (4.2) (0.2) (0.1) — (20.6) (0.2)
Tax Reform Legislation (25.6) 0.3 (0.4) 11.9 (416.1) 15.0
Noncontrolling interests (1.4) — — — (8.6) —
Other (1.1) 0.1 0.2 — (10.7) 0.6
Effective income tax (benefit) rate 13.3 % 39.6 % 36.7 % (17.1)% (525.7)% 60.2 %
(*)Represents effective income tax benefit rate for Mississippi Power due to a loss before income taxes in 2017.
II-259
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities
The tax effects of temporary differences between the carrying amounts of assets and liabilities in the financial statements of the
Registrants and their respective tax bases, which give rise to deferred tax assets and liabilities, are as follows:
 December 31, 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Deferred tax liabilities —  
Accelerated depreciation $ 8,711$ 2,402 $ 3,058 $ 315 $ 1,422 $ 1,288
Property basis dif ferences 1,843 912 643 143 — 133
Federal ef fect of net state deferred tax assets — — — 24 — —
Leveraged lease basis dif ferences 236 — — — — —
Employee benefit obligations 704 242 351 38 12 12
Premium on reacquired debt 83 13 70 — — —
Regulatory assets –   
Storm damage reserves 109 — 109 — — —
Employee benefit obligations 1,174 311 403 55 — 45
Remaining book value of retired assets 341 174 159 8 — —
AROs 1,723 613 1,066 44 — —
AROs 814 360 405 — — —
Other 523 134 81 68 11 198
Total deferred income tax liabilities 16,261 5,161 6,345 695 1,445 1,676
Deferred tax assets —   
Federal ef fect of net state deferred tax liabilities 277 162 63 — 24 56
Employee benefit obligations 1,385 334 488 72 5 111
Other property basis dif ferences 230 — 65 — 146 —
ITC and PTC carryforward 2,098 11 435 — 1,445 —
Other partnership basis dif ference 169 — — — 169 —
Other comprehensive losses 112 8 18 — 10 —
AROs 2,537 973 1,471 44 — —
Estimated loss on plants under construction 283 — 283 — — —
Other deferred state tax attributes 402 — 13 251 72 8
Regulatory liability associated with the Tax Reform
Legislation (not subject to normalization) 401 240 133 28 — —
Other 786 173 154 56 46 287
Total deferred income tax assets 8,680 1,901 3,123 451 1,917 462
Valuation allowance (137) — (35) (41) (36) (5)
Net deferred income tax assets 8,543 1,901 3,088 410 1,881 457
Net deferred income taxes (assets)/liabilities $ 7,718 $ 3,260 $ 3,257 $ 285 $ (436)$ 1,219
  
Recognized in the balance sheets:  
Accumulated deferred income taxes – assets $ (170)$ —$ —$ (139)$ (551)$ —
Accumulated deferred income taxes – liabilities $ 7,888 $ 3,260 $ 3,257 $ 424 $ 115$ 1,219
II-260
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 December 31, 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Deferred tax liabilities —     
Accelerated depreciation $ 8,461 $ 2,236 $ 3,005 $ 335 $ 1,483 $ 1,176
Property basis dif ferences 1,807 865 633 162 — 134
Federal ef fect of net state deferred tax assets — — — 36 — —
Leveraged lease basis dif ferences 253 — — — — —
Employee benefit obligations 477 149 290 25 6 6
Premium on reacquired debt 88 14 74 — — —
Regulatory assets –     
Storm damage reserves 111 — 111 — — —
Employee benefit obligations 975 260 344 45 — 45
Remaining book value of retired assets 56 6 39 11 — —
AROs 1,232 276 925 31 — —
AROs 1,210 607 575 — — —
Other 537 171 102 57 34 132
Total deferred income tax liabilities 15,207 4,584 6,098 702 1,523 1,493
Deferred tax assets —     
Federal ef fect of net state deferred tax liabilities 260 155 71 — 22 46
Employee benefit obligations 1,273 286 444 62 7 150
Other property basis dif ferences 251 — 61 — 172 —
ITC and PTC carryforward 2,730 11 430 — 2,128 —
Alternative minimum tax carryforward 62 — — 32 21 —
Other partnership basis dif ference 162 — — — 162 —
Other comprehensive losses 82 10 3 — — —
AROs 2,442 883 1,500 31 — —
Estimated loss on plants under construction 346 — 283 63 — —
Other deferred state tax attributes 415 — 19 251 72 —
Regulatory liability associated with the Tax Reform
Legislation (not subject to normalization) 294 130 127 29 — 8
Other 731 147 140 47 47 285
Total deferred income tax assets 9,048 1,622 3,078 515 2,631 489
Valuation allowance (123) — (42) (41) (27) (12)
Net deferred income tax assets 8,925 1,622 3,036 474 2,604 477
Net deferred income taxes (assets)/liabilities $ 6,282 $ 2,962 $ 3,062 $ 228 $ (1,081 )$ 1,016
     
Recognized in the balance sheets:     
Accumulated deferred income
taxes – assets $ (276)$ —$ —$ (150)$ (1,186 )$ —
Accumulated deferred income
taxes – liabilities $ 6,558 $ 2,962 $ 3,062 $ 378 $ 105 $ 1,016
The traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities have tax-related regulatory assets (deferred income
tax charges) and regulatory liabilities (deferred income tax credits). The regulatory assets are primarily attributable to tax benefits
flowed through to customers in prior years, deferred taxes previously recognized at rates lower than the current enacted tax law, and
taxes applicable to capitalized interest. The regulatory liabilities are primarily attributable to deferred taxes previously recognized at
rates higher than the current enacted tax law and to unamortized ITCs. See Note 2 for each Registrant's related balances at
December 31, 2019 and 2018.
II-261
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Tax Credit Carryforwards
Federal ITC/PTC carryforwards at December 31, 2019 were as follows:
Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerSouthern
Power
(in millions)
Federal ITC/PTC carryforwards $ 1,751$ 11$ 88$ 1,445
Year in which federal ITC/PTC carryforwards
begin expiring 2032 2033 2032 2036
Year by which federal ITC/PTC carryforwards are
expected to be utilized 2024 2022 2022 2024
The estimated tax credit utilization reflects the various sale transactions described in Note 15 and could be further delayed by
numerous factors, including the acquisition of additional renewable projects, the purchase of rights to additional PTCs of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 pursuant to certain joint ownership agreements, and changes in taxable income projections. See Note 2 under
"Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
At December 31, 2019, Georgia Power also had approximately $360 million in state investment and other state tax credit
carryforwards for the State of Georgia that will expire between 2020 and 2029 and are not expected to be fully utilized. Georgia
Power has a net state valuation allowance of $28 million associated with these carryforwards.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Net Operating Loss Carryforwards
Southern Company has fully utilized the carryforward from federal NOLs generated in 2016 and 2017. At December 31, 2019, the
state and local NOL carryforwards for Southern Company's subsidiaries were as follows:
Company/JurisdictionApproximate NOL
CarryforwardsApproximate Net State
Income Tax BenefitTax Year NOL
Begins Expiring
(in millions)
Mississippi Power  
Mississippi $ 5,099$ 201 2031
 
Southern Power  
Oklahoma 830 39 2035
Florida 258 11 2033
South Carolina 56 2 2034
Other states 21 2 Various
Southern Power Total $ 1,165$ 54
 
Other(*) 
Georgia 171 7 2020
New York 220 11 2035
New York City 207 15 2035
Other states 368 18 Various
Southern Company Total $ 7,230$ 306
(*)Represents other Southern Company subsidiaries. Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Southern Company Gas did not have material state or local NOL
carryforwards at December 31, 2019.
State NOLs for Mississippi, Oklahoma, and Florida are not expected to be fully utilized prior to expiration. At December 31, 2019,
Mississippi Power had a net state valuation allowance of $32 million for the Mississippi NOL and Southern Power had net state
valuation allowances of $16 million for the Oklahoma NOL and $11 million for the Florida NOL.
II-262
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Unrecognized Tax Benefits
The Registrants had no material changes in unrecognized tax benefits during 2019. Unrecognized tax benefits changes in 2018 and
2017 for Southern Company, Mississippi Power, and Southern Power are provided below. The remaining Registrants did not have
any material unrecognized tax benefits for the periods presented.
Southern
CompanyMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
(in millions)
Unrecognized tax benefits at December 31, 2016 $ 484$ 465$ 17
Tax positions changes –  
Increase from current periods 10 — —
Increase from prior periods 10 2 —
Decrease from prior periods (196) (177) (17)
Reductions due to settlements (290) (290) —
Unrecognized tax benefits at December 31, 2017 18 — —
Tax positions changes –  
Decrease from prior periods (18) — —
Unrecognized tax benefits at December 31, 2018 $ —$ —$ —
Mississippi Power's tax positions changes from prior periods and reductions due to settlements for 2017 related to state tax benefits,
deductions for R&E expenditures, and charitable contribution carryforwards that were impacted as a result of the settlement of
R&E expenditures associated with the Kemper County energy facility, as well as federal income tax benefits from deferred ITCs.
See Note 2 under "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility" and "Section 174 Research and Experimental Deduction"
herein for more information.
Southern Power's decrease from prior periods for 2017 primarily relates to federal income tax benefits from deferred ITCs.
The impact on the effective tax rate of Southern Company, if recognized, was as follows for 2017:
 Southern
Company
 (in millions)
2017
Tax positions impacting the effective tax rate $ 18
Tax positions not impacting the effective tax rate —
Balance of unrecognized tax benefits $ 18
All of the Registrants classify interest on tax uncertainties as interest expense. Accrued interest for all tax positions other than the
Section 174 R&E deductions was immaterial for all years presented. None of the Registrants accrued any penalties on uncertain tax
positions.
It is reasonably possible that the amount of the unrecognized tax benefits could change within 12 months. New audit findings or
settlements associated with ongoing audits could result in significant unrecognized tax benefits. At this time, a range of reasonably
possible outcomes cannot be determined.
The IRS has finalized its audits of Southern Company's consolidated federal income tax returns through 2018. Southern Company
is a participant in the Compliance Assurance Process of the IRS. The audits for the Registrants' state income tax returns have either
been concluded, or the statute of limitations has expired, for years prior to 2015.
II-263
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Section 174 Research and Experimental Deduction
Southern Company, on behalf of Mississippi Power, reflected deductions for R&E expenditures related to the Kemper County
energy facility in its federal income tax returns, as amended, since 2008. In 2017, the U.S. Congress Joint Committee on Taxation
approved a settlement between Southern Company and the IRS, resolving a methodology for these deductions. As a result of this
approval, Mississippi Power recognized $176 million in 2017 of previously unrecognized tax benefits and reversed $36 million of
associated accrued interest.
11. RETIREMENT BENEFITS
The Southern Company system has a qualified defined benefit, trusteed pension plan covering substantially all employees, with the
exception of PowerSecure employees. The qualified pension plan is funded in accordance with requirements of the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (ERISA). In December 2019, the Registrants voluntarily contributed the
following amounts to the qualified pension plan:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Contributions to qualified
pension plan $ 1,136$ 362$ 200$ 54$ 24$ 145
No mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plan are anticipated for the year ending December 31, 2020. The Southern
Company system also provides certain non-qualified defined benefits for a select group of management and highly compensated
employees, which are funded on a cash basis. In addition, the Southern Company system provides certain medical care and life
insurance benefits for retired employees through other postretirement benefit plans. The traditional electric operating companies
fund other postretirement trusts to the extent required by their respective regulatory commissions. Southern Company Gas has a
separate unfunded supplemental retirement health care plan that provides medical care and life insurance benefits to employees of
discontinued businesses. For the year ending December 31, 2020, no contributions to any other postretirement trusts are expected.
In January 2018, the qualified defined benefit pension plan of Southern Company Gas was merged into the Southern Company
system's qualified defined benefit pension plan and the pension plan was reopened to all non-union employees of Southern
Company Gas. Prior to January 2018, Southern Company Gas had a separate qualified defined benefit, trusteed pension plan
covering certain eligible employees, which was closed in 2012 to new employees. Also in January 2018, Southern Company Gas'
non-qualified retirement plans were merged into the Southern Company system's non-qualified retirement plan (defined benefit and
defined contribution).
Effective in December 2017, 538 employees transferred from SCS to Southern Power. Accordingly, Southern Power assumed
various compensation and benefit plans including participation in the Southern Company system's qualified defined benefit,
trusteed pension plan covering substantially all employees. With the transfer of employees, Southern Power assumed the related
benefit obligations from SCS of $139 million for the qualified pension plan (along with trust assets of $138 million) and $11
million for other postretirement benefit plans, together with $36 million in prior service costs and net gains/losses in OCI. In 2018,
Southern Power also began providing certain defined benefits under the non-qualified pension plan for a select group of
management and highly compensated employees. No obligation related to these benefits was assumed in the employee transfer;
however, obligations for services rendered by employees following the transfer are being recognized by Southern Power and are
funded on a cash basis. In addition, Southern Power provides certain medical care and life insurance benefits for retired employees
through other postretirement benefit plans that are funded on a cash basis. Prior to the transfer of employees in December 2017,
substantially all expenses charged by SCS, including pension and other postretirement benefit costs, were recorded in Southern
Power's other operations and maintenance expense. The disclosures included herein exclude Southern Power for periods prior to the
transfer of employees in December 2017.
II-264
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy. See Note 15 under "Southern
Company" for additional information. The portion of the Southern Company system's pension and other postretirement benefit
plans attributable to Gulf Power reflected in Southern Company's consolidated balance sheet as held for sale at December 31, 2018
consisted of:
Pension
PlansOther Postretirement
Benefit Plans
(in millions)
Projected benefit obligation $ 526$ 69
Plan assets 492 17
Accrued liability $ (34)$ (52)
All amounts presented in the remainder of this note reflect the benefit plan obligations and related plan assets for the Southern
Company system's pension and other postretirement benefit plans, including the amounts attributable to Gulf Power prior to
January 1, 2019.
Actuarial Assumptions
The weighted average rates assumed in the actuarial calculations used to determine both the net periodic costs for the pension and
other postretirement benefit plans for the following year and the benefit obligations as of the measurement date are presented
below.
 2019
Assumptions used to determine net
periodic costs:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Pension plans   
Discount rate – benefit obligations 4.49% 4.51% 4.48% 4.49% 4.65% 4.47%
Discount rate – interest costs 4.12 4.14 4.10 4.12 4.35 4.11
Discount rate – service costs 4.70 4.73 4.72 4.73 4.75 4.57
Expected long-term return on plan
assets 7.75 7.75 7.75 7.75 7.75 7.75
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.07
Other postretirement benefit plans   
Discount rate – benefit obligations 4.37% 4.40% 4.36% 4.35% 4.50% 4.32%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.98 4.01 3.97 3.95 4.14 3.91
Discount rate – service costs 4.63 4.67 4.64 4.64 4.65 4.56
Expected long-term return on plan
assets 6.86 6.76 6.85 6.79 — 6.49
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.07
II-265
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2018
Assumptions used to determine net
periodic costs:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Pension plans       
Discount rate – benefit obligations 3.80% 3.81% 3.79% 3.80% 3.94% 3.74%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.45 3.45 3.42 3.46 3.69 3.41
Discount rate – service costs 3.98 4.00 3.99 3.99 4.01 3.84
Expected long-term return on plan
assets 7.95 7.95 7.95 7.95 7.95 7.95
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.07
Other postretirement benefit plans      
Discount rate – benefit obligations 3.68% 3.71% 3.68% 3.68% 3.81% 3.62%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.29 3.31 3.29 3.29 3.47 3.21
Discount rate – service costs 3.91 3.93 3.91 3.91 3.93 3.82
Expected long-term return on plan
assets 6.83 6.83 6.80 6.99 — 5.89
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.07
 2017
Assumptions used to determine net periodic
costs:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
Pension plans    
Discount rate – benefit obligations 4.40% 4.44% 4.40% 4.44% 4.39%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.77 3.76 3.72 3.81 3.76
Discount rate – service costs 4.81 4.85 4.83 4.83 4.64
Expected long-term return on plan assets 7.92 7.95 7.95 7.95 7.60
Annual salary increase 4.37 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.50
Other postretirement benefit plans    
Discount rate – benefit obligations 4.23% 4.27% 4.23% 4.22% 4.15%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.54 3.58 3.55 3.55 3.40
Discount rate – service costs 4.64 4.70 4.63 4.65 4.55
Expected long-term return on plan assets 6.84 6.83 6.79 6.88 6.03
Annual salary increase 4.37 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.50
 2019
Assumptions used to determine
benefit obligations:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Pension plans      
Discount rate 3.41% 3.44% 3.40% 3.41% 3.52% 3.39%
Annual salary increase 4.73 4.73 4.73 4.73 4.73 4.73
Other postretirement benefit plans     
Discount rate 3.24% 3.28% 3.22% 3.22% 3.39% 3.19%
Annual salary increase 4.73 4.73 4.73 4.73 4.73 4.73
II-266
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2018
Assumptions used to determine benefit
obligations:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Pension plans    
Discount rate 4.49% 4.51% 4.48% 4.49% 4.65% 4.47%
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.07
Other postretirement benefit plans    
Discount rate 4.37% 4.40% 4.36% 4.35% 4.50% 4.32%
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.07
The Registrants estimate the expected rate of return on pension plan and other postretirement benefit plan assets using a financial
model to project the expected return on each current investment portfolio. The analysis projects an expected rate of return on each
of the different asset classes in order to arrive at the expected return on the entire portfolio relying on each trust's target asset
allocation and reasonable capital market assumptions. The financial model is based on four key inputs: anticipated returns by asset
class (based in part on historical returns), each trust's target asset allocation, an anticipated inflation rate, and the projected impact
of a periodic rebalancing of each trust's portfolio.
An additional assumption used in measuring the accumulated other postretirement benefit obligations (APBO) was a weighted
average medical care cost trend rate. The weighted average medical care cost trend rates used in measuring the APBO for the
Registrants at December 31, 2019 were as follows:
 Initial Cost
Trend RateUltimate Cost
Trend Rate  Year That
Ultimate Rate is
Reached
Pre-65 6.00% 4.50% 2027
Post-65 medical 5.00 4.50 2027
Post-65 prescription 6.50 4.50 2027
Pension Plans
The total accumulated benefit obligation for the pension plans at December 31, 2019 and 2018 was as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
December 31, 2019$ 13,391$ 3,053$ 4,222$ 615$ 151$ 963
December 31, 2018 11,683 2,550 3,613 513 101 842
The actuarial loss of $2.3 billion recorded in the remeasurement of the Southern Company system pension plans at December 31,
2019 was primarily due to a 108 basis point decrease in the overall discount rate used to calculate the benefit obligation as a result
of lower market interest rates. The actuarial gain of $1.1 billion recorded in the remeasurement of the Southern Company system
pension plans at December 31, 2018 was primarily due to a 69 basis point increase in the overall discount rate used to calculate the
benefit obligation as a result of higher market interest rates.
II-267
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Changes in the projected benefit obligations and the fair value of plan assets during the plan years ended December 31, 2019 and
2018 were as follows:
 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Change in benefit obligation     
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 12,763$ 2,816$ 3,905$ 557$ 123$ 907
Dispositions (509) — — — — —
Service cost 292 69 74 12 7 25
Interest cost 492 114 156 22 5 36
Benefits paid (596) (125) (194) (26) (4) (64)
Actuarial (gain) loss 2,346 530 669 106 54 163
Balance at end of year 14,788 3,404 4,610 671 185 1,067
Change in plan assets     
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of
year 11,611 2,575 3,663 505 123 798
Dispositions (509) — — — — —
Actual return (loss) on plan assets 2,343 524 730 103 43 172
Employer contributions 1,208 383 243 59 7 144
Benefits paid (596) (125) (194) (26) (4) (64)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 14,057 3,357 4,442 641 169 1,050
Accrued liability $ (731)$ (47)$ (168)$ (30)$ (16)$ (17)
 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Change in benefit obligation   
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 13,808$ 2,998$ 4,188$ 602$ 139$ 1,184
Dispositions (107) — — — (3) (104)
Service cost 359 78 87 17 9 34
Interest cost 464 101 139 20 5 39
Benefits paid (618) (124) (191) (24) (3) (98)
Actuarial (gain) loss (1,143) (237) (318) (58) (24) (148)
Balance at end of year 12,763 2,816 3,905 557 123 907
Change in plan assets   
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of
year 12,992 2,836 4,058 563 138 1,068
Dispositions (107) — — — (3) (104)
Actual return (loss) on plan assets (711) (150) (218) (37) (9) (70)
Employer contributions 55 13 14 3 — 2
Benefits paid (618) (124) (191) (24) (3) (98)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 11,611 2,575 3,663 505 123 798
Accrued liability $ (1,152)$ (241)$ (242)$ (52)$ —$ (109)
II-268
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The projected benefit obligations for the qualified and non-qualified pension plans at December 31, 2019 are shown in the
following table. All pension plan assets are related to the qualified pension plan.
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Projected benefit obligations:  
Qualified pension plan $ 14,055$ 3,286$ 4,480$ 639$ 159$ 999
Non-qualified pension plan 733 118 130 31 26 68
Amounts recognized in the balance sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 related to the Registrants' pension plans consist of the
following:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
December 31, 2019:   
Prepaid pension costs $ 2$ 71$ —$ 2$ 10$ —
Other regulatory assets, deferred(*)4,072 1,130 1,416 204 — 172
Other deferred charges and assets — — — — — 82
Other current liabilities (54) (8) (11) (2) (2) (2)
Employee benefit obligations (679) (110) (157) (30) (24) (97)
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred (79) — — — — —
AOCI 185 — — — 46 (14)
December 31, 2018:   
Prepaid pension costs $ —$ —$ —$ — $ 1$ —
Other regulatory assets, deferred(*)3,566 955 1,230 167 — 160
Other deferred charges and assets — — — — — 74
Other current liabilities (55) (12) (15) (3) — (3)
Employee benefit obligations (1,097) (229) (227) (49) (1) (179)
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred (108) — — — — —
AOCI 97 — — — 26 (44)
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $252 million and $268 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, associated with
unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' pension plans prior to its 2016 acquisition by Southern Company.
II-269
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Presented below are the amounts included in regulatory assets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 related to the portion of the defined
benefit pension plan attributable to Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Company Gas
that had not yet been recognized in net periodic pension cost.
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2019   
Regulatory assets:   
Prior service cost $ 13$ 6$ 10$ 2$ (15)
Net (gain) loss 3,980 1,124 1,406 201 113
Regulatory amortization — — — — 74
Total regulatory assets(*)$ 3,993$ 1,130$ 1,416$ 203$ 172
Balance at December 31, 2018   
Regulatory assets:   
Prior service cost $ 17$ 6$ 12$ 2$ (17)
Net (gain) loss 3,441 949 1,218 165 83
Regulatory amortization — — — — 94
Total regulatory assets(*)$ 3,458$ 955$ 1,230$ 167$ 160
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $252 million and $268 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, associated with
unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' pension plans prior to its 2016 acquisition by Southern Company.
II-270
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The changes in the balance of regulatory assets related to the portion of the defined benefit pension plan attributable to Southern
Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Company Gas for the years ended December 31, 2019 and
2018 are presented in the following table:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Regulatory assets (liabilities):(*)    
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 3,155$ 890$ 1,105$ 158$ 217
Net (gain) loss 498 120 196 19 20
Change in prior service costs 1 — — — (18)
Dispositions 12 — — — (34)
Reclassification adjustments:     
Amortization of prior service costs (4) (1) (2) — 2
Amortization of net gain (loss) (204) (54) (69) (10) (12)
Amortization of regulatory assets(*)— — — — (15)
Total reclassification adjustments (208) (55) (71) (10) (25)
Total change 303 65 125 9 (57)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 3,458$ 955$ 1,230$ 167$ 160
Net (gain) loss 801 213 231 42 30
Dispositions (144) — — — —
Reclassification adjustments:     
Amortization of prior service costs (3) (1) (1) — 2
Amortization of net gain (loss) (119) (37) (44) (6) —
Amortization of regulatory assets(*)— — — — (20)
Total reclassification adjustments (122) (38) (45) (6) (18)
Total change 535 175 186 36 12
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 3,993$ 1,130$ 1,416$ 203$ 172
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $252 million and $268 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, associated with
unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' pension plans prior to its 2016 acquisition by Southern Company.
II-271
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Presented below are the amounts included in AOCI at December 31, 2019 and 2018 related to the portion of the defined benefit
pension plan attributable to Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas that had not yet been recognized in
net periodic pension cost.
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2019  
AOCI:  
Prior service cost $ (3)$ —$ (6)
Net (gain) loss 188 46 (8)
Total AOCI $ 185$ 46$ (14)
Balance at December 31, 2018  
AOCI:  
Prior service cost $ (3)$ —$ (6)
Net (gain) loss 100 26 (38)
Total AOCI $ 97$ 26$ (44)
The components of OCI related to the portion of the defined benefit pension plan attributable to Southern Company, Southern
Power, and Southern Company Gas for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 are presented in the following table:
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
AOCI:
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 107$ 33$ (42)
Net (gain) loss 7 (5) 6
Dispositions (8) — (8)
Reclassification adjustments:
Amortization of net gain (loss) (9) (2) —
Total reclassification adjustments (9) (2) —
Total change (10) (7) (2)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 97$ 26$ (44)
Net (gain) loss 88 20 30
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 185$ 46$ (14)
II-272
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Components of net periodic pension cost for the Registrants were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2019   
Service cost $ 292$ 69$ 74$ 12$ 7$ 25
Interest cost 492 114 156 22 5 36
Expected return on plan assets (885) (206) (292) (40) (10) (60)
Recognized net (gain) loss 120 37 44 6 1 2
Net amortization 2 — 1 — — 14
Prior service cost — — — — — (3)
Net periodic pension cost $ 21$ 14$ (17)$ — $ 3$ 14
2018   
Service cost $ 359$ 78$ 87$ 17$ 9$ 34
Interest cost 464 101 139 20 5 39
Expected return on plan assets (943) (207) (296) (41) (10) (75)
Recognized net (gain) loss 213 54 69 10 1 12
Net amortization 4 1 2 — — 15
Prior service cost — — — — — (2)
Net periodic pension cost $ 97$ 27$ 1$ 6$ 5$ 23
2017   
Service cost $ 293$ 63$ 74$ 15 $ 23
Interest cost 455 98 138 20 42
Expected return on plan assets (897) (196) (283) (40) (70)
Recognized net (gain) loss 162 42 57 7 18
Net amortization 12 2 3 1 1
Net periodic pension cost $ 25$ 9$ (11)$ 3 $ 14
The service cost component of net periodic pension cost is included in operations and maintenance expenses and all other
components of net periodic pension cost are included in other income (expense), net in the Registrants' statements of income.
Net periodic pension cost is the sum of service cost, interest cost, and other costs netted against the expected return on plan assets.
The expected return on plan assets is determined by multiplying the expected rate of return on plan assets and the market-related
value of plan assets. In determining the market-related value of plan assets, the Registrants have elected to amortize changes in the
market value of return-seeking plan assets over five years and to recognize the changes in the market value of liability-hedging plan
assets immediately. Given the significant concentration in return-seeking plan assets, the accounting value of plan assets that is
used to calculate the expected return on plan assets differs from the current fair value of the plan assets.
II-273
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Future benefit payments reflect expected future service and are estimated based on assumptions used to measure the projected
benefit obligation for the pension plans. At December 31, 2019, estimated benefit payments were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Benefit Payments:      
2020 $ 628$ 135$ 204$ 27$ 5$ 62
2021 646 141 208 28 6 62
2022 671 147 214 30 6 64
2023 693 153 220 30 6 62
2024 715 157 226 32 7 62
2025 to 2029 3,868 860 1,209 174 36 316
Other Postretirement Benefits
Changes in the APBO and the fair value of the Registrants' plan assets during the plan years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018
were as follows:
 2019
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Change in benefit obligation   
Benefit obligation at beginning of year$ 1,865$ 403$ 675$ 81$ 9$ 244
Dispositions (69) — — — — —
Service cost 18 5 5 1 1 1
Interest cost 69 16 26 3 — 9
Benefits paid (126) (27) (47) (6) (1) (17)
Actuarial (gain) loss 223 63 80 8 2 13
Retiree drug subsidy 5 2 3 — — —
Balance at end of year 1,985 462 742 87 11 250
Change in plan assets   
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of
year 928 360 344 23 — 98
Dispositions (18) — — — — —
Actual return (loss) on plan assets 189 76 68 4 — 21
Employer contributions 83 2 35 5 1 13
Benefits paid (121) (25) (44) (6) (1) (17)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 1,061 413 403 26 — 115
Accrued liability $ (924)$ (49)$ (339)$ (61)$ (11)$ (135)
II-274
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Change in benefit obligation    
Benefit obligation at beginning of year$ 2,339$ 517$ 863$ 97$ 11$ 310
Dispositions (18) — — — — (18)
Service cost 24 6 6 1 1 2
Interest cost 75 17 28 3 — 10
Benefits paid (129) (28) (47) (5) (1) (17)
Actuarial (gain) loss (432) (111) (178) (15) (2) (43)
Retiree drug subsidy 6 2 3 — — —
Balance at end of year 1,865 403 675 81 9 244
Change in plan assets    
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of
year 1,053 406 386 25 — 125
Dispositions (18) — — — — (18)
Actual return (loss) on plan assets (57) (25) (20) (1) — (5)
Employer contributions 73 5 22 4 1 13
Benefits paid (123) (26) (44) (5) (1) (17)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 928 360 344 23 — 98
Accrued liability $ (937)$ (43)$ (331)$ (58)$ (9)$ (146)
Amounts recognized in the balance sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 related to the Registrants' other postretirement benefit
plans consist of the following:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
December 31, 2019:     
Other regulatory assets,
deferred(a)$ 183$ 3$ 96$ 10$ —$ (11)
Other current liabilities (5) — — — — —
Employee benefit obligations(b)(919) (49) (339) (61) (11) (135)
Other regulatory liabilities,
deferred (62) (2) — — — —
AOCI 2 — — — 2 (4)
December 31, 2018:     
Other regulatory assets,
deferred(a)$ 99$ —$ 60$ 6$ —$ (4)
Other current liabilities (6) — — — — —
Employee benefit obligations(b)(931) (43) (331) (58) (9) 146
Other regulatory liabilities,
deferred (77) (8) — (2) — —
AOCI (4) — — — 1 (4)
(a)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $50 million and $57 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, associated with
unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' other postretirement benefit plans prior to its 2016 acquisition by Southern Company.
(b)Included in other deferred credits and liabilities on Southern Power's consolidated balance sheets.
II-275
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Presented below are the amounts included in net regulatory assets (liabilities) at December 31, 2019 and 2018 related to the other
postretirement benefit plans of Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Company Gas that
had not yet been recognized in net periodic other postretirement benefit cost.
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2019:   
Regulatory assets (liabilities):   
Prior service cost $ 11$ 3$ 4$ —$ 1
Net (gain) loss 110 (2) 92 10 (43)
Regulatory amortization — — — — 31
Total regulatory assets (liabilities)(*)$ 121$ 1$ 96$ 10$ (11)
Balance at December 31, 2018:   
Regulatory assets (liabilities):   
Prior service cost $ 14$ 8$ 4$ —$ 2
Net (gain) loss 8 (16) 56 4 (43)
Regulatory amortization — — — — 37
Total regulatory assets (liabilities)(*)$ 22$ (8)$ 60$ 4$ (4)
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $50 million and $57 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, associated with
unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' other postretirement benefit plans prior to its 2016 acquisition by Southern Company.
II-276
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The changes in the balance of net regulatory assets (liabilities) related to the other postretirement benefit plans for the plan years
ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 are presented in the following table:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Net regulatory assets (liabilities):(*)    
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 341$ 56$ 202$ 17$ 46
Net (gain) loss (298) (60) (132) (12) (42)
Change in prior service costs — — — — (2)
Reclassification adjustments:     
Amortization of prior service costs (7) (4) (1) — —
Amortization of net gain (loss) (14) (1) (9) (1) —
Amortization of regulatory assets(*)— — — — (6)
Total reclassification adjustments (21) (5) (10) (1) (6)
Total change (319) (65) (142) (13) (50)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 22$ (9)$ 60$ 4$ (4)
Net (gain) loss 90 14 37 6 (1)
Dispositions 5 — — — —
Change in prior service costs 5 — — — —
Reclassification adjustments:     
Amortization of prior service costs (3) (4) — — —
Amortization of net gain (loss) 2 — (1) — —
Amortization of regulatory assets(*)— — — — (6)
Total reclassification adjustments (1) (4) (1) — (6)
Total change 99 10 36 6 (7)
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 121$ 1$ 96$ 10$ (11)
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $50 million and $57 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, associated with
unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' other postretirement benefit plans prior to its 2016 acquisition by Southern Company.
II-277
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Presented below are the amounts included in AOCI at December 31, 2019 and 2018 related to the other postretirement benefit plans
of Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas that had not yet been recognized in net periodic other
postretirement benefit cost.
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2019   
AOCI:   
Prior service cost $ 1$ —$ 1
Net (gain) loss 1 2 (5)
Total AOCI $ 2$ 2$ (4)
Balance at December 31, 2018   
AOCI:   
Prior service cost $ 1$ —$ 1
Net (gain) loss (5) 1 (5)
Total AOCI $ (4)$ 1$ (4)
The components of OCI related to the other postretirement benefit plans for the plan years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 are
presented in the following table:
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
AOCI:  
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 4$ 3$ (3)
Net (gain) loss (8) (2) (2)
Change from employee transfer — — 1
Total change (8) (2) (1)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ (4)$ 1$ (4)
Net (gain) loss 5 1 —
Reclassification adjustments:  
Amortization of net gain (loss) 1 — —
Total change 6 1 —
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 2$ 2$ (4)
II-278
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Components of the other postretirement benefit plans' net periodic cost for the Registrants were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2019   
Service cost $ 18$ 5$ 5$ 1$ 1$ 1
Interest cost 69 16 26 3 — 9
Expected return on plan assets (65) (26) (25) (2) — (7)
Net amortization — 4 1 — — 6
Net periodic postretirement benefit cost$ 22$ (1)$ 7$ 2$ 1$ 9
2018   
Service cost $ 24$ 6$ 6$ 1$ 1$ 2
Interest cost 75 17 28 3 — 10
Expected return on plan assets (69) (26) (25) (2) — (7)
Net amortization 21 5 10 1 — 6
Net periodic postretirement benefit cost$ 51$ 2$ 19$ 3$ 1$ 11
2017   
Service cost $ 24$ 6$ 7$ 1 $ 2
Interest cost 79 17 29 3 10
Expected return on plan assets (66) (25) (25) (1) (7)
Net amortization 20 5 9 1 1
Net periodic postretirement benefit cost$ 57$ 3$ 20$ 4 $ 6
II-279
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The service cost component of net periodic postretirement benefit cost is included in operations and maintenance expenses and all
other components of net periodic postretirement benefit cost are included in other income (expense), net in the Registrants'
statements of income.
The Registrants' future benefit payments, including prescription drug benefits, reflect expected future service and are estimated
based on assumptions used to measure the APBO for the other postretirement benefit plans. The Registrants' estimated benefit
payments are reduced by drug subsidy receipts expected as a result of the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and
Modernization Act of 2003 as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Benefit payments:  
2020 $ 130$ 29$ 49$ 6$ —$ 18
2021 129 29 49 6 — 18
2022 129 29 49 6 1 18
2023 130 29 49 6 1 19
2024 129 29 48 6 1 18
2025 to 2029 630 145 238 29 3 83
Subsidy receipts:  
2020 $ (5)$ (1)$ (2)$ — $ —$ —
2021 (6) (2) (2) — — —
2022 (6) (2) (3) — — —
2023 (6) (2) (3) — — —
2024 (6) (2) (3) (1) — —
2025 to 2029 (30) (9) (13) (2) — —
Total:  
2020 $ 125$ 28$ 47$ 6$ —$ 18
2021 123 27 47 6 — 18
2022 123 27 46 6 1 18
2023 124 27 46 6 1 19
2024 123 27 45 5 1 18
2025 to 2029 600 136 225 27 3 83
Benefit Plan Assets
Pension plan and other postretirement benefit plan assets are managed and invested in accordance with all applicable requirements,
including ERISA and the Internal Revenue Code. The Registrants' investment policies for both the pension plans and the other
postretirement benefit plans cover a diversified mix of assets as described below. Derivative instruments may be used to gain
efficient exposure to the various asset classes and as hedging tools. Additionally, the Registrants minimize the risk of large losses
primarily through diversification but also monitor and manage other aspects of risk.
The investment strategy for plan assets related to the Southern Company system's qualified pension plan is to be broadly diversified
across major asset classes. The asset allocation is established after consideration of various factors that affect the assets and
liabilities of the pension plan including, but not limited to, historical and expected returns and interest rates, volatility, correlations
of asset classes, the current level of assets and liabilities, and the assumed growth in assets and liabilities. Because a significant
portion of the liability of the pension plan is long-term in nature, the assets are invested consistent with long-term investment
expectations for return and risk. To manage the actual asset class exposures relative to the target asset allocation, the Southern
Company system employs a formal rebalancing program. As additional risk management, external investment managers and
service providers are subject to written guidelines to ensure appropriate and prudent investment practices. Management believes the
portfolio is well-diversified with no significant concentrations of risk.
II-280
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Investment Strategies and Benefit Plan Asset Fair Values
A description of the major asset classes that the pension and other postretirement benefit plans are comprised of, along with the
valuation methods used for fair value measurement, is provided below:
Description Valuation Methodology
Domestic equity: A mix of large and small capitalization stocks
with generally an equal distribution of value and growth
attributes, managed both actively and through passive index
approaches.
International equity: A mix of large and small capitalization
growth and value stocks with developed and emerging markets
exposure, managed both actively and through fundamental
indexing approaches.Domestic and international equities such as common stocks,
American depositary receipts, and real estate investment trusts
that trade on public exchanges are classified as Level 1
investments and are valued at the closing price in the active
market. Equity funds with unpublished prices (such as
commingled/pooled funds) are valued as Level 2 when the
underlying holdings are comprised of Level 1 or Level 2 equity
securities.
Fixed income: A mix of domestic and international bonds.Investments in fixed income securities are generally classified as
Level 2 investments and are valued based on prices reported in
the market place. Additionally, the value of fixed income
securities takes into consideration certain items such as broker
quotes, spreads, yield curves, interest rates, and discount rates
that apply to the term of a specific instrument.
Trust-owned life insurance (TOLI): Investments of taxable
trusts aimed at minimizing the impact of taxes on the portfolio.Investments in TOLI policies are classified as Level 2
investments and are valued based on the underlying investments
held in the policy's separate accounts. The underlying assets are
equity and fixed income pooled funds that are comprised of
Level 1 and Level 2 securities.
Special situations: Investments in opportunistic strategies with
the objective of diversifying and enhancing returns and
exploiting short-term inefficiencies, as well as investments in
promising new strategies of a longer-term nature.
Real estate: Investments in traditional private market, equity-
oriented investments in real properties (indirectly through
pooled funds or partnerships) and in publicly traded real estate
securities.
Private equity: Investments in private partnerships that invest
in private or public securities typically through privately-
negotiated and/or structured transactions, including leveraged
buyouts, venture capital, and distressed debt.Investments in real estate, private equity, and special situations
are generally classified as Net Asset Value as a Practical
Expedient, since the underlying assets typically do not have
publicly available observable inputs. The fund manager values
the assets using various inputs and techniques depending on the
nature of the underlying investments. Techniques may include
purchase multiples for comparable transactions, comparable
public company trading multiples, discounted cash flow
analysis, prevailing market capitalization rates, recent sales of
comparable investments, and independent third-party appraisals.
The fair value of partnerships is determined by aggregating the
value of the underlying assets less liabilities.
The fair values, and actual allocations relative to the target allocations, of the Southern Company system's pension plans at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 are presented below. The fair values presented are prepared in accordance with GAAP. For purposes
of determining the fair value of the pension plan and other postretirement benefit plan assets and the appropriate level designation,
management relies on information provided by the plan's trustee. This information is reviewed and evaluated by management with
changes made to the trustee information as appropriate. The Registrants did not have any investments classified as Level 3 at
December 31, 2019 or 2018.
II-281
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
These fair values exclude cash, receivables related to investment income and pending investment sales, and payables related to
pending investment purchases.
 Fair Value Measurements Using
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
ExpedientTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2019: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company   
Assets:   
Equity:   51% 51%
Domestic equity $ 2,220$ 898$ —$3,118
International equity 2,360 1,286 — 3,646
Fixed income:   23 29
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 965 — 965
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 9 — 9
Corporate bonds — 1,315 — 1,315
Pooled funds — 684 — 684
Cash equivalents and other 1,317 — — 1,317
Real estate investments 539 — 1,418 1,957 14 12
Special situations — — 155 155 3 1
Private equity — — 953 953 9 7
Total $ 6,436$ 5,157$ 2,526$14,119 100% 100%
Liabilities:   
Derivatives (1) — — (1)
Total $ 6,435$ 5,157$ 2,526$14,118 100% 100%
Alabama Power   
Assets:   
Equity:   51% 51%
Domestic equity $ 530$ 214$ —$ 744
International equity 564 307 — 871
Fixed income:   23 29
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 230 — 230
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 2 — 2
Corporate bonds — 314 — 314
Pooled funds — 163 — 163
Cash equivalents and other 315 — — 315
Real estate investments 129 — 339 468 14 12
Special situations — — 37 37 3 1
Private equity — — 228 228 9 7
Total $ 1,538$ 1,230$ 604$3,372 100% 100%
II-282
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient Target
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2019: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Georgia Power     
Assets:     
Equity:     51% 51%
Domestic equity $ 701$ 284$ —$ 985
International equity 746 407 — 1,153
Fixed income:     23 29
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 305 — 305
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 3 — 3
Corporate bonds — 415 — 415
Pooled funds — 216 — 216
Cash equivalents and other 416 — — 416
Real estate investments 170 — 448 618 14 12
Special situations — — 49 49 3 1
Private equity — — 301 301 9 7
Total $ 2,033$ 1,630$ 798$4,461 100% 100%
Mississippi Power     
Assets:     
Equity:     51% 51%
Domestic equity $ 101$ 41$ —$ 142
International equity 108 59 — 167
Fixed income:     23 29
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 44 — 44
Corporate bonds — 60 — 60
Pooled funds — 31 — 31
Cash equivalents and other 60 — — 60
Real estate investments 25 — 65 90 14 12
Special situations — — 7 7 3 1
Private equity — — 43 43 9 7
Total $ 294$ 235$ 115$ 644 100% 100%
II-283
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient Target
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2019: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Southern Power   
Assets:   
Equity:   51% 51%
Domestic equity $ 27$ 11$ —$ 38
International equity 28 16 — 44
Fixed income:   23 29
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 12 — 12
Corporate bonds — 16 — 16
Pooled funds — 8 — 8
Cash equivalents and other 16 — — 16
Real estate investments 6 — 17 23 14 12
Special situations — — 2 2 3 1
Private equity — — 11 11 9 7
Total $ 77$ 63$ 30$ 170 100% 100%
Southern Company Gas   
Assets:   
Equity:   51% 51%
Domestic equity $ 166$ 67$ —$ 233
International equity 176 96 — 272
Fixed income:   23 29
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 72 — 72
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 1 — 1
Corporate bonds — 98 — 98
Pooled funds — 51 — 51
Cash equivalents and other 98 — — 98
Real estate investments 40 — 106 146 14 12
Special situations — — 12 12 3 1
Private equity — — 71 71 9 7
Total $ 480$ 385$ 189$1,054 100% 100%
II-284
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using   
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient Target
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)  
Southern Company    
Assets:    
Equity:   51% 53%
Domestic equity $ 2,102$ 1,030$ —$3,132  
International equity 1,344 1,325 — 2,669  
Fixed income:   23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 930 — 930  
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 7 — 7  
Corporate bonds — 1,195 — 1,195  
Pooled funds — 654 — 654  
Cash equivalents and other 270 2 — 272  
Real estate investments 419 — 1,361 1,780 14 15
Special situations — — 171 171 3 1
Private equity — — 821 821 9 7
Total $ 4,135$ 5,143$ 2,353$11,631 100% 100%
Alabama Power    
Assets:    
Equity:   51% 53%
Domestic equity $ 466$ 228$ —$ 694  
International equity 298 293 — 591  
Fixed income:   23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 206 — 206  
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 2 — 2  
Corporate bonds — 265 — 265  
Pooled funds — 145 — 145  
Cash equivalents and other 60 1 — 61  
Real estate investments 93 — 302 395 14 15
Special situations — — 38 38 3 1
Private equity — — 182 182 9 7
Total $ 917$ 1,140$ 522$2,579 100% 100%
II-285
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using   
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
ExpedientTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)   
Georgia Power    
Assets:    
Equity:  51% 53%
Domestic equity $ 663$ 325$ —$ 988  
International equity 424 418 — 842  
Fixed income:  23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 294 — 294  
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 2 — 2  
Corporate bonds — 377 — 377  
Pooled funds — 206 — 206  
Cash equivalents and other 85 1 — 86  
Real estate investments 132 — 429 561 14 15
Special situations — — 54 54 3 1
Private equity — — 259 259 9 7
Total $ 1,304$ 1,623$ 742$3,669 100% 100%
Mississippi Power    
Assets:    
Equity:  51% 53%
Domestic equity $ 91$ 45$ —$ 136  
International equity 59 59 — 118  
Fixed income:  23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 40 — 40  
Corporate bonds — 52 — 52  
Pooled funds — 28 — 28  
Cash equivalents and other 12 — — 12  
Real estate investments 18 — 59 77 14 15
Special situations — — 7 7 3 1
Private equity — — 36 36 9 7
Total $ 180$ 224$ 102$ 506 100% 100%
II-286
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using   
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient Target
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)  
Southern Power    
Assets:    
Equity:   51% 53%
Domestic equity $ 22$ 11$ —$ 33 
International equity 14 14 — 28 
Fixed income:   23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 10 — 10 
Corporate bonds — 13 — 13 
Pooled funds — 7 — 7 
Cash equivalents and other 3 — — 3 
Real estate investments 4 — 15 19 14 15
Special situations — — 2 2 3 1
Private equity — — 9 9 9 7
Total $ 43$ 55$ 26$ 124 100% 100%
Southern Company Gas    
Assets:    
Equity:   51% 53%
Domestic equity $ 145$ 71$ —$ 216 
International equity 92 91 — 183 
Fixed income: 23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 64 — 64 
Corporate bonds — 82 — 82 
Pooled funds — 45 — 45 
Cash equivalents and other 19 — — 19 
Real estate investments 29 — 94 123 14 15
Special situations — — 12 12 3 1
Private equity — — 56 56 9 7
Total $ 285$ 353$ 162$ 800 100% 100%
II-287
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The fair values of the applicable Registrants' other postretirement benefit plan assets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 are presented
below. The Registrants did not have any investments classified as Level 3 at December 31, 2019 or 2018. These fair value
measurements exclude cash, receivables related to investment income, pending investment sales, and payables related to pending
investment purchases.
 Fair Value Measurements Using
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient
TotalTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2019: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV)
 (in millions)
Southern Company    
Assets:    
Equity:    63% 64%
Domestic equity $ 95$ 81$ —$ 176
International equity 69 80 — 149
Fixed income:    28 30
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 31 — 31
Corporate bonds — 35 — 35
Pooled funds — 82 — 82
Cash equivalents and other 42 — — 42
Trust-owned life insurance — 463 — 463
Real estate investments 15 — 38 53 5 4
Special situations — — 4 4 1 —
Private equity — — 25 25 3 2
Total $ 221$ 772$ 67$1,060 100% 100%
Alabama Power    
Assets:    
Equity:    68% 67%
Domestic equity $ 26$ 8$ —$ 34
International equity 21 11 — 32
Fixed income:    24 27
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 10 — 10
Corporate bonds — 11 — 11
Pooled funds — 6 — 6
Cash equivalents and other 12 — — 12
Trust-owned life insurance — 281 — 281
Real estate investments 5 — 12 17 4 4
Special situations — — 1 1 1 —
Private equity — — 8 8 3 2
Total $ 64$ 327$ 21$ 412 100% 100%
II-288
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient
TotalTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2019: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV)
 (in millions)
Georgia Power
Assets:
Equity: 60% 61%
Domestic equity $ 48$ 7$ —$ 55
International equity 25 36 — 61
Fixed income: 33 34
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 7 — 7
Corporate bonds — 11 — 11
Pooled funds — 45 — 45
Cash equivalents and other 16 — — 16
Trust-owned life insurance — 182 — 182
Real estate investments 5 — 11 16 4 3
Special situations — — 1 1 1 —
Private equity — — 8 8 2 2
Total $ 94$ 288$ 20$ 402 100% 100%
Mississippi Power
Assets:
Equity: 43% 41%
Domestic equity $ 3$ 1$ —$ 4
International equity 4 2 — 6
Fixed income: 37 42
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 6 — 6
Corporate bonds — 2 — 2
Pooled funds — 1 — 1
Cash equivalents and other 2 — — 2
Real estate investments 1 — 2 3 11 10
Special situations — — — — 2 1
Private equity — — 1 1 7 6
Total $ 10$ 12$ 3$ 25 100% 100%
II-289
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient
TotalTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2019: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV)
 (in millions)
Southern Company Gas
Assets:
Equity: 72% 73%
Domestic equity $ 2$ 58$ —$ 60
International equity 2 21 — 23
Fixed income: 26 25
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 1 — 1
Corporate bonds — 1 — 1
Pooled funds — 25 — 25
Cash equivalents and other 2 — — 2
Real estate investments — — 1 1 1 1
Private equity — — 1 1 1 1
Total $ 6$ 106$ 2$ 114 100% 100%
II-290
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
ExpedientTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company  
Assets:  
Equity:  62% 62%
Domestic equity $ 100$ 76$ —$ 176
International equity 45 75 — 120
Fixed income:  29 30
U.S. Treasury, government, and
agency bonds — 34 — 34
Corporate bonds — 35 — 35
Pooled funds — 81 — 81
Cash equivalents and other 13 — — 13
Trust-owned life insurance — 386 — 386
Real estate investments 13 — 40 53 5 5
Special situations — — 4 4 1 —
Private equity — — 24 24 3 3
Total $ 171$ 687$ 68$ 926 100% 100%
Alabama Power  
Assets:  
Equity:  64% 66%
Domestic equity $ 35$ 10$ —$ 45
International equity 12 12 — 24
Fixed income:  28 28
U.S. Treasury, government, and
agency bonds — 10 — 10
Corporate bonds — 11 — 11
Pooled funds — 6 — 6
Cash equivalents and other 3 — — 3
Trust-owned life insurance — 233 — 233
Real estate investments 4 — 13 17 4 4
Special situations — — 2 2 1 —
Private equity — — 8 8 3 2
Total $ 54$ 282$ 23$ 359 100% 100%
II-291
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
ExpedientTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)  
Georgia Power    
Assets:    
Equity:   60% 59%
Domestic equity $ 41$ 9$ —$ 50 
International equity 17 32 — 49 
Fixed income:   33 35
U.S. Treasury, government, and
agency bonds — 7 — 7 
Corporate bonds — 10 — 10 
Pooled funds — 44 — 44 
Cash equivalents and other 5 — — 5 
Trust-owned life insurance — 153 — 153 
Real estate investments 4 — 11 15 4 4
Special situations — — 2 2 1 —
Private equity — — 7 7 2 2
Total $ 67$ 255$ 20$ 342 100% 100%
Mississippi Power    
Assets:    
Equity:   41% 42%
Domestic equity $ 3$ 2$ —$ 5 
International equity 2 2 — 4 
Fixed income:   38 39
U.S. Treasury, government, and
agency bonds — 6 — 6 
Corporate bonds — 2 — 2 
Pooled funds — 1 — 1 
Cash equivalents and other 1 — — 1 
Real estate investments 1 — 2 3 11 12
Special situations — — — — 3 1
Private equity — — 1 1 7 6
Total $ 7$ 13$ 3$ 23 100% 100%
II-292
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using   
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
ExpedientTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)   
Southern Company Gas    
Assets:    
Equity:  71% 69%
Domestic equity $ 2$ 47$ —$ 49  
International equity 1 17 — 18  
Fixed income: 25 28
U.S. Treasury, government, and
agency bonds — 1 — 1
Corporate bonds — 1 — 1
Pooled funds — 24 — 24
Cash equivalents and other 1 — — 1
Real estate investments — — 1 1 2 2
Special situations — — — — 1 —
Private equity — — 1 1 1 1
Total $ 4$ 90$ 2$ 96 100% 100%
Employee Savings Plan
Southern Company and its subsidiaries also sponsor 401(k) defined contribution plans covering substantially all employees and
provide matching contributions up to specified percentages of an employee's eligible pay. Total matching contributions made to the
plans for 2019, 2018, and 2017 were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
2019 $ 113$ 25$ 27$ 4$ 2$ 15
2018 119 24 26 5 3 18
2017 118 23 26 5 N/A 19
12. STOCK COMPENSATION
Stock-Based Compensation
Stock-based compensation primarily in the form of Southern Company performance share units (PSU) and restricted stock units
(RSU) may be granted through the Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan to Southern Company system employees ranging from
line management to executives. Southern Company Gas and Southern Power had no employee participants in the stock-based
compensation plans until 2017 and 2018, respectively. In conjunction with the Merger, stock-based compensation in the form of
Southern Company RSUs and PSUs was granted to certain executives of Southern Company Gas through the Southern Company
Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan.
II-293
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2019, the number of current and former employees participating in stock-based compensation programs for the
Registrants was as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
Power Georgia PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
Number of employees 2,320 307 370 89 50 285
The majority of PSUs and RSUs awarded contain terms where employees become immediately vested in PSUs and RSUs upon
retirement. As a result, compensation expense for employees that are retirement eligible at the grant date is recognized immediately,
while compensation expense for employees that become retirement eligible during the vesting period is recognized over the period
from grant date to the date of retirement eligibility. In addition, the Registrants recognize forfeitures as they occur.
All unvested PSUs and RSUs vest immediately upon a change in control where Southern Company is not the surviving
corporation.
Performance Share Units
PSUs granted to employees vest at the end of a three-year performance period. Shares of Southern Company common stock are
delivered to employees at the end of the performance period with the number of shares issued ranging from 0% to 200% of the
target number of PSUs granted, based on achievement of the performance goals established by the Compensation Committee of the
Southern Company Board of Directors.
Southern Company has issued three types of PSUs, each with a unique performance goal. These types of PSUs include total
shareholder return (TSR) awards based on the TSR for Southern Company common stock during the three-year performance period
as compared to a group of industry peers; ROE awards based on Southern Company's equity-weighted return over the performance
period; and EPS awards based on Southern Company's cumulative EPS over the performance period. EPS awards were last granted
in 2017.
The fair value of TSR awards is determined as of the grant date using a Monte Carlo simulation model to estimate the TSR of
Southern Company's common stock among industry peers over the performance period. In determining the fair value of the TSR
awards issued to employees, the expected volatility is based on the historical volatility of Southern Company's stock over a period
equal to the performance period. The risk-free rate is based on the U.S. Treasury yield curve in effect at the time of grant that
covers the performance period of the awards. The following table shows the assumptions used in the pricing model and the
weighted average grant-date fair value of TSR awards granted:
Year Ended December 31 2019  2018 2017
Expected volatility 15.6%  14.9% 15.6%
Expected term (in years) 3  3 3
Interest rate 2.4%  2.4% 1.4%
Weighted average grant-date fair value $62.71  $43.75 $49.08
The Registrants recognize TSR award compensation expense on a straight-line basis over the three-year performance period
without remeasurement.
The fair values of EPS awards and ROE awards are based on the closing stock price of Southern Company common stock on the
date of the grant. The weighted average grant-date fair value of the awards granted during 2019, 2018, and 2017 was $49.38,
$43.49, and $49.21, respectively. Compensation expense for EPS and ROE awards is generally recognized ratably over the three-
year performance period adjusted for expected changes in EPS and ROE performance. Total compensation cost recognized for
vested EPS awards and ROE awards reflects final performance metrics.
Southern Company had 2.5 million unvested PSUs outstanding at December 31, 2018. In February 2019, the PSUs that vested for
the three-year performance period ended December 31, 2018 were converted into 1.7 million shares outstanding at a share price of
$49.24.
During 2019, Southern Company granted 1.2 million PSUs and 1.2 million PSUs were vested or forfeited, resulting in 2.5 million
unvested PSUs outstanding at December 31, 2019. In February 2020, the PSUs that vested for the three-year performance period
ended December 31, 2019 were converted into 1.8 million shares outstanding at a share price of $68.59.
II-294
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Total PSU compensation cost, and the related tax benefit recognized in income, for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and
2017 are as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Southern Company    
Compensation cost recognized in income $ 77$ 91$ 74
Tax benefit of compensation cost recognized in income 20 24 29
Southern Company Gas    
Compensation cost recognized in income $ 14$ 11$ 8
Tax benefit of compensation cost recognized in income 4 3 3
Total PSU compensation cost and the related tax benefit recognized in income were immaterial for all periods presented for
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, and Southern Power. The compensation cost related to the grant of Southern
Company PSUs to the employees of each Subsidiary Registrant is recognized in each Subsidiary Registrant's financial statements
with a corresponding credit to equity representing a capital contribution from Southern Company.
At December 31, 2019, Southern Company's total unrecognized compensation cost related to PSUs was $31 million and is
expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of approximately 12 months. The total unrecognized compensation cost
related to PSUs as of December 31, 2019 was immaterial for all other Registrants.
Restricted Stock Units
The fair value of RSUs is based on the closing stock price of Southern Company common stock on the date of the grant. The
weighted average grant-date fair values of RSUs granted during 2019, 2018, and 2017 were $50.44, $43.81, and $49.25,
respectively. For most RSU awards, one-third of the RSUs vest each year throughout a three-year service period and compensation
cost for RSUs is generally recognized over the corresponding one-, two-, or three-year vesting period. Shares of Southern Company
common stock are delivered to employees at the end of each vesting period.
Southern Company had 1.1 million RSUs outstanding at December 31, 2018. During 2019, Southern Company granted 0.6 million
RSUs and 0.4 million RSUs were vested or forfeited, resulting in 1.3 million unvested RSUs outstanding at December 31, 2019,
including RSUs related to employee retention agreements.
For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, Southern Company's total compensation cost for RSUs recognized in
income was $28 million, $27 million, and $25 million, respectively. The related tax benefit also recognized in income was $7
million, $7 million, and $10 million for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. Total unrecognized
compensation cost related to RSUs as of December 31, 2019 for Southern Company of $14 million will be recognized over a
weighted-average period of approximately 10 months.
Total RSUs outstanding and total compensation cost and related tax benefit for the RSUs recognized in income for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, as well as the total unrecognized compensation cost as of December 31, 2019, were
immaterial for all other Registrants. The compensation cost related to the grant of Southern Company RSUs to the employees of
each Subsidiary Registrant is recognized in such Subsidiary Registrant's financial statements with a corresponding credit to equity
representing a capital contribution from Southern Company.
Stock Options
In 2015, Southern Company discontinued granting stock options. Stock options expire no later than 10 years after the grant date
and the latest possible exercise will occur by November 2024. As of December 31, 2019, the weighted average remaining
contractual term for the options outstanding and exercisable was approximately three years.
As of December 31, 2017, all stock option awards are vested and compensation cost fully recognized. Total compensation cost for
stock option awards and the related tax benefits recognized in income for the year ended December 31, 2017 were immaterial for
Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power.
II-295
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Southern Company's activity in the stock option program for 2019 is summarized below:
 Shares Subject to
Option  Weighted Average
Exercise Price
 (in millions)  
Outstanding at December 31, 2018 17.5 $ 41.92
Exercised 11.6 41.62
Outstanding and Exercisable at December 31, 2019 5.9 $ 42.52
Southern Company's cash receipts from issuances related to stock options exercised under the share-based payment arrangements
for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 were $482 million, $41 million, and $239 million, respectively.
At December 31, 2019, the aggregate intrinsic value for the options outstanding and exercisable was as follows:
Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power
(in millions)
Total intrinsic value for outstanding and exercisable options $ 124$ 14$ 35$ 6
Total intrinsic value of options exercised, and the related tax benefit, for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 are
presented below:
Year Ended December 31 2019 2018  2017
(in millions)
Southern Company    
Intrinsic value of options exercised $ 167$ 9 $ 64
Tax benefit of options exercised 35 2 25
Alabama Power    
Intrinsic value of options exercised $ 21$ 2 $ 12
Tax benefit of options exercised 4 — 5
Georgia Power    
Intrinsic value of options exercised $ 30$ 2 $ 13
Tax benefit of options exercised 6 — 5
Mississippi Power    
Intrinsic value of options exercised $ 4$ 1 $ 2
Tax benefit of options exercised 1 — 1
Total intrinsic value of options exercised, and the related tax benefit recognized in income, for the years ended December 31, 2019
and 2018 was immaterial for Southern Power and Southern Company Gas.
Merger Stock Compensation
Southern Company Restricted Stock Awards
At the effective time of the Merger, each outstanding award of existing Southern Company Gas PSUs was converted into an award
of Southern Company RSUs. Under the terms of the restricted stock awards, the employees received Southern Company stock
when they satisfied the requisite service period by being continuously employed through the original three-year vesting schedule of
the award being replaced. Southern Company issued 0.7 million RSUs with a grant-date fair value of $53.83, based on the closing
stock price of Southern Company common stock on the date of the grant. Approximately $13 million of the grant date fair value,
which was related to pre-combination service, was accounted for as Merger consideration. Southern Company Gas recognized the
remaining fair value as compensation expense on a straight-line basis over the remaining vesting period. The compensation cost
related to the grant of RSUs to Southern Company Gas employees is recognized in Southern Company Gas' financial statements
with a corresponding credit to equity, representing a capital contribution from Southern Company. As of
II-296
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
December 31, 2018, all RSUs were vested. For the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, total compensation cost for RSUs
recognized in income and the related tax benefit were immaterial.
Southern Company Gas Change in Control Awards
Southern Company awarded PSUs to certain Southern Company Gas employees who continued their employment with the
Southern Company in lieu of certain change in control benefits the employee was entitled to receive following the Merger (change
in control awards). Shares of Southern Company common stock and/or cash equal to the dollar value of the change in control
benefit vested and were issued one-third each year as long as the employee remained in service with Southern Company or its
subsidiaries at each vest date. In addition to the change in control benefit, Southern Company common stock was issued to the
employees at the end of a performance period based on achievement of certain Southern Company common stock price metrics, as
well performance goals established by the Compensation Committee of the Southern Company Board of Directors (achievement
shares).
The change in control benefits were accounted for as a liability award with the fair value equal to the guaranteed dollar value of the
change in control benefit. The compensation cost of the change in control benefit was recognized in Southern Company Gas'
financial statements with a corresponding credit to a liability. The grant-date fair value of the achievement portion of the award was
determined using a Monte Carlo simulation model to estimate the number of achievement shares expected to vest based on the
Southern Company common stock price. The compensation cost of the achievement shares was recognized in Southern Company
Gas' financial statements with a corresponding credit to equity, representing a capital contribution from Southern Company. The
expected payout was reevaluated annually with expense recognized to date increased or decreased proportionately based on the
expected performance. The compensation cost ultimately recognized for the achievement shares was based on the actual
performance. As of December 31, 2019, all change in control awards are vested. For the year ended December 31, 2017, total
compensation cost and the related tax benefit for the change in control awards recognized in income was $12 million and $6
million, respectively. Total compensation cost and the related tax benefit for the change in control awards recognized in income
were immaterial for all other periods presented.
13. FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
Fair value measurements are based on inputs of observable and unobservable market data that a market participant would use in
pricing the asset or liability. The use of observable inputs is maximized where available and the use of unobservable inputs is
minimized for fair value measurement and reflects a three-tier fair value hierarchy that prioritizes inputs to valuation techniques
used for fair value measurement.
•Level 1 consists of observable market data in an active market for identical assets or liabilities.
•Level 2 consists of observable market data, other than that included in Level 1, that is either directly or indirectly observable.
•Level 3 consists of unobservable market data. The input may reflect the assumptions of each Registrant of what a market
participant would use in pricing an asset or liability. If there is little available market data, then each Registrant's own
assumptions are the best available information.
In the case of multiple inputs being used in a fair value measurement, the lowest level input that is significant to the fair value
measurement represents the level in the fair value hierarchy in which the fair value measurement is reported.
Net asset value as a practical expedient is the classification used for assets that do not have readily determinative fair values. Fund
managers value the assets using various inputs and techniques depending on the nature of the underlying investments.
II-297
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2019, assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis during the period, together with their
associated level of the fair value hierarchy, were as follows:
 Fair Value Measurements Using   
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets  Significant
Other
Observable
InputsSignificant
Unobservable
Inputs  Net Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient  
At December 31, 2019: (Level 1)  (Level 2) (Level 3)  (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company       
Assets:       
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 388 $ 267$ 22 $ — $ 677
Interest rate derivatives — 2 — — 2
Foreign currency derivatives — 16 — — 16
Investments in trusts:(c)(d)      
Domestic equity 751 135 — — 886
Foreign equity 68 220 — — 288
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 307 — — 307
Municipal bonds — 85 — — 85
Pooled funds – fixed income — 17 — — 17
Corporate bonds 23 297 — — 320
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 87 — — 87
Private equity — — — 56 56
Cash and cash equivalents 1 — — — 1
Other 17 5 — — 22
Cash equivalents 1,393 2 — — 1,395
Other investments 9 21 — — 30
Total $ 2,650 $ 1,461$ 22 $ 56 $ 4,189
Liabilities:       
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 442 $ 254$ 7 $ — $ 703
Interest rate derivatives — 24 — — 24
Foreign currency derivatives — 24 — — 24
Contingent consideration — — 19 — 19
Total $ 442 $ 302$ 26 $ — $ 770
II-298
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs  Significant
Unobservable
Inputs  Net Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient 
At December 31, 2019: (Level 1) (Level 2)  (Level 3)  (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Alabama Power      
Assets:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 4 $ — $ — $ 4
Nuclear decommissioning trusts:(c)     
Domestic equity 488 123 — — 611
Foreign equity 68 64 — — 132
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 21 — — 21
Municipal bonds — 1 — — 1
Corporate bonds 23 144 — — 167
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 29 — — 29
Private equity — — — 56 56
Other 3 1 — — 4
Cash equivalents 691 2 — — 693
Other investments — 21 — — 21
Total $ 1,273$ 410 $ — $ 56 $ 1,739
Liabilities:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 24 $ — $ — $ 24
      
Georgia Power      
Assets:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 4 $ — $ — $ 4
Nuclear decommissioning trusts:(c)(d)     
Domestic equity 263 1 — — 264
Foreign equity — 152 — — 152
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 286 — — 286
Municipal bonds — 84 — — 84
Corporate bonds — 153 — — 153
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 57 — — 57
Other 13 4 — — 17
Total $ 276$ 741 $ — $ — $ 1,017
Liabilities:    
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 53 $ — $ — $ 53
Interest rate derivatives — 17 — — 17
Total $ — $ 70 $ — $ — $ 70
II-299
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs  Significant
Unobservable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient 
At December 31, 2019: (Level 1) (Level 2)  (Level 3) (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Mississippi Power     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 1 $ — $ — $ 1
Cash equivalents 281 — — — 281
Total $ 281$ 1 $ — $ — $ 282
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 27 $ — $ — $ 27
Southern Power     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 3 $ — $ — $ 3
Foreign currency derivatives — 16 — — 16
Cash equivalents 113 — — — 113
Total $ 113$ 19 $ — $ — $ 132
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 3 $ — $ — $ 3
Foreign currency derivatives — 24 — — 24
Contingent consideration — — 19 — 19
Total $ — $ 27 $ 19$ — $ 46
Southern Company Gas     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 388$ 255 $ 22$ — $ 665
Interest rate derivatives — 2 — — 2
Non-qualified deferred compensation trusts:     
Domestic equity — 11 — — 11
Foreign equity — 4 — — 4
Pooled funds - fixed income — 17 — — 17
Cash equivalents 1 — — — 1
Cash equivalents 8 — — — 8
Total $ 397$ 289 $ 22$ — $ 708
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 442$ 147 $ 7$ — $ 596
(a)Energy-related derivatives exclude $4 million associated with premiums and certain weather derivatives accounted for based on intrinsic value rather than fair
value.
(b)Energy-related derivatives exclude cash collateral of $99 million.
(c)Excludes receivables related to investment income, pending investment sales, payables related to pending investment purchases, and currencies. See Note 6
under "Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
(d)Includes investment securities pledged to creditors and collateral received and excludes payables related to the securities lending program. See Note 6 under
"Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
II-300
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018, assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis during the period, together with their
associated level of the fair value hierarchy, were as follows:
 Fair Value Measurements Using   
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets  Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs  Significant
Unobservable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient  
At December 31, 2018: (Level 1)  (Level 2) (Level 3) (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company       
Assets:       
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 469 $ 292 $ — $ — $ 761
Foreign currency derivatives — 75 — — 75
Investments in trusts:(c)(d)      
Domestic equity 601 107 — — 708
Foreign equity 53 173 — — 226
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 261 — — 261
Municipal bonds — 83 — — 83
Pooled funds – fixed income — 14 — — 14
Corporate bonds 24 290 — — 314
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 68 — — 68
Private equity — — — 45 45
Cash and cash equivalents 16 — — — 16
Other 34 4 — — 38
Cash equivalents 765 1 — — 766
Other investments — 12 — — 12
Total $ 1,962 $ 1,380 $ — $ 45 $ 3,387
Liabilities:       
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 648 $ 316 $ — $ — $ 964
Interest rate derivatives — 49 — — 49
Foreign currency derivatives — 23 — — 23
Contingent consideration — — 21 — 21
Total $ 648 $ 388 $ 21$ — $ 1,057
II-301
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets  Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs  Significant
Unobservable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient
At December 31, 2018: (Level 1)  (Level 2) (Level 3) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Alabama Power     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 6 $ — $ — $ 6
Nuclear decommissioning trusts:(c)  
Domestic equity 396 95 — — 491
Foreign equity 53 50 — — 103
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 18 — — 18
Municipal bonds — 1 — — 1
Corporate bonds 24 135 — — 159
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 23 — — 23
Private equity — — — 45 45
Other 6 — — — 6
Cash equivalents 116 1 — — 117
Other investments — 12 — — 12
Total $ 595 $ 341 $ — $ 45$ 981
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 10 $ — $ — $ 10
     
Georgia Power     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 6 $ — $ — $ 6
Nuclear decommissioning trusts:(c)(d)    
Domestic equity 205 1 — — 206
Foreign equity — 119 — — 119
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 243 — — 243
Municipal bonds — 82 — — 82
Corporate bonds — 155 — — 155
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 45 — — 45
Other 19 4 — — 23
Total $ 224 $ 655 $ — $ — $ 879
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 21 $ — $ — $ 21
Interest rate derivatives — 2 — — 2
Total $ — $ 23 $ — $ — $ 23
II-302
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsSignificant
Unobservable
Inputs  Net Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient 
At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (Level 3)  (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Mississippi Power      
Assets:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 3$ — $ — $ 3
Cash equivalents 255 — — — 255
Total $ 255$ 3$ — $ — $ 258
Liabilities:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 9$ — $ — $ 9
      
Southern Power      
Assets:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 4$ — $ — $ 4
Foreign currency derivatives — 75 — — 75
Cash equivalents 46 — — — 46
Total $ 46$ 79$ — $ — $ 125
Liabilities:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 8$ — $ — $ 8
Foreign currency derivatives — 23 — — 23
Contingent consideration — — 21 — 21
Total $ — $ 31$ 21 $ — $ 52
      
Southern Company Gas      
Assets:      
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 469$ 272$ — $ — $ 741
Non-qualified deferred compensation
trusts:      
Domestic equity — 11 — — 11
Foreign equity — 4 — — 4
Pooled funds - fixed income — 14 — — 14
Cash equivalents 4 — — — 4
Cash equivalents 40 — — — 40
Total $ 513$ 301$ — $ — $ 814
Liabilities:      
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 648$ 261$ — $ — $ 909
(a)Energy-related derivatives exclude $8 million associated with premiums and certain weather derivatives accounted for based on intrinsic value rather than fair
value.
(b)Energy-related derivatives exclude cash collateral of $277 million.
(c)Excludes receivables related to investment income, pending investment sales, payables related to pending investment purchases, and currencies. See Note 6
under "Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
(d)Includes investment securities pledged to creditors and collateral received and excludes payables related to the securities lending program. See Note 6 under
"Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
II-303
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Valuation Methodologies
The energy-related derivatives primarily consist of exchange-traded and over-the-counter financial products for natural gas and
physical power products, including, from time to time, basis swaps. These are standard products used within the energy industry
and are valued using the market approach. The inputs used are mainly from observable market sources, such as forward natural gas
prices, power prices, implied volatility, and overnight index swap interest rates. Interest rate derivatives are also standard over-the-
counter products that are valued using observable market data and assumptions commonly used by market participants. The fair
value of interest rate derivatives reflects the net present value of expected payments and receipts under the swap agreement based
on the market's expectation of future interest rates. Additional inputs to the net present value calculation may include the contract
terms, counterparty credit risk, and occasionally, implied volatility of interest rate options. The fair value of cross-currency swaps
reflects the net present value of expected payments and receipts under the swap agreement based on the market's expectation of
future foreign currency exchange rates. Additional inputs to the net present value calculation may include the contract terms,
counterparty credit risk, and discount rates. The interest rate derivatives and cross-currency swaps are categorized as Level 2 under
Fair Value Measurements as these inputs are based on observable data and valuations of similar instruments. See Note 14 for
additional information on how these derivatives are used.
For fair value measurements of the investments within the nuclear decommissioning trusts and the non-qualified deferred
compensation trusts, external pricing vendors are designated for each asset class with each security specifically assigned a primary
pricing source. For investments held within commingled funds, fair value is determined at the end of each business day through the
net asset value, which is established by obtaining the underlying securities' individual prices from the primary pricing source. A
market price secured from the primary source vendor is then evaluated by management in its valuation of the assets within the
trusts. As a general approach, fixed income market pricing vendors gather market data (including indices and market research
reports) and integrate relative credit information, observed market movements, and sector news into proprietary pricing models,
pricing systems, and mathematical tools. Dealer quotes and other market information, including live trading levels and pricing
analysts' judgments, are also obtained when available.
The NRC requires licensees of commissioned nuclear power reactors to establish a plan for providing reasonable assurance of
funds for future decommissioning. See Note 6 under "Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
Southern Power has contingent payment obligations related to certain acquisitions whereby Southern Power is primarily obligated
to make generation-based payments to the seller, which commenced at the commercial operation of the respective facility and
continue through 2026. The obligation is categorized as Level 3 under Fair Value Measurements as the fair value is determined
using significant unobservable inputs for the forecasted facility generation in MW-hours, as well as other inputs such as a fixed
dollar amount per MW-hour, and a discount rate. The fair value of contingent consideration reflects the net present value of
expected payments and any periodic change arising from forecasted generation is expected to be immaterial.
"Other investments" include investments traded in the open market that have maturities greater than 90 days, which are categorized
as Level 2 under Fair Value Measurements and are comprised of corporate bonds, treasury bonds, and/or agency bonds.
The fair value measurements of private equity investments held in Alabama Power's nuclear decommissioning trusts that are
calculated at net asset value per share (or its equivalent) as a practical expedient totaled $56 million and $45 million at
December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. Unfunded commitments related to the private equity investments totaled $70 million
and $50 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. Private equity investments include high-quality private equity funds
across several market sectors and funds that invest in real estate assets. Private equity funds do not have redemption rights.
Distributions from these funds will be received as the underlying investments in the funds are liquidated.
II-304
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, other financial instruments for which the carrying amount did not equal fair value were as
follows:
 Southern
  Company(a)(b)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas(b)
 (in millions)
At December 31, 2019:    
Long-term debt, including securities
due within one year:    
Carrying amount $ 44,561$ 8,517$ 11,660$ 1,589$ 4,398$ 5,845
Fair value 48,339 9,525 12,680 1,671 4,708 6,509
At December 31, 2018:    
Long-term debt, including securities
due within one year:    
Carrying amount $ 45,023$ 8,120$ 9,838$ 1,579$ 5,017$ 5,940
Fair value 44,824 8,370 9,800 1,546 4,980 5,965
(a)Amounts at December 31, 2018 include long-term debt of Gulf Power, which was classified as liabilities held for sale on Southern Company's balance sheet at
December 31, 2018. See Note 15 under "Southern Company" and "Assets Held for Sale" for additional information.
(b)The long-term debt of Southern Company Gas is recorded at amortized cost, including the fair value adjustments at the effective date of the Merger. Southern
Company Gas amortizes the fair value adjustments over the lives of the respective bonds.
The fair values are determined using Level 2 measurements and are based on quoted market prices for the same or similar issues or
on the current rates available to the Registrants.
Commodity Contracts with Level 3 Valuation Inputs
As of December 31, 2019, the fair value of Southern Company Gas' Level 3 physical natural gas forward contracts was $14
million. Since commodity contracts classified as Level 3 typically include a combination of observable and unobservable
components, the changes in fair value may include amounts due in part to observable market factors, or changes to assumptions on
the unobservable components. The following table includes transfers to Level 3, which represent the fair value of Southern
Company Gas' commodity derivative contracts that include a significant unobservable component for the first time during the
period.
2019
(in millions)
Beginning balance $ —
Transfers to Level 3 (32)
Transfers from Level 3 3
Instruments realized or otherwise settled during period (4)
Changes in fair value 47
Ending balance $ 14
Changes in fair value of Level 3 instruments represent changes in gains and losses for the periods that are reported on Southern
Company Gas' statements of income in natural gas revenues.
The valuation of certain commodity contracts requires the use of certain unobservable inputs. All forward pricing used in the
valuation of such contracts is directly based on third-party market data, such as broker quotes and exchange settlements, when that
data is available. If third-party market data is not available, then industry standard methodologies are used to develop inputs that
maximize the use of relevant observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs. Observable inputs, including some
forward prices used for determining fair value, reflect the best available market information. Unobservable inputs are updated using
industry standard techniques such as extrapolation, combining observable forward inputs supplemented by historical market and
other relevant data. Level 3 physical natural gas forward contracts include unobservable forward price
II-305
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
inputs (ranging from $1.54 to $2.92 per mmBtu). Forward price increases (decreases) as of December 31, 2019 would have resulted
in higher (lower) values on a net basis.
14. DERIVATIVES
Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas are exposed to
market risks, including commodity price risk, interest rate risk, weather risk, and occasionally foreign currency exchange rate risk.
To manage the volatility attributable to these exposures, each company nets its exposures, where possible, to take advantage of
natural offsets and enters into various derivative transactions for the remaining exposures pursuant to each company's policies in
areas such as counterparty exposure and risk management practices. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas operations use various
contracts in its commercial activities that generally meet the definition of derivatives. For the traditional electric operating
companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas' other businesses, each company's policy is that derivatives are to be used
primarily for hedging purposes and mandates strict adherence to all applicable risk management policies. Derivative positions are
monitored using techniques including, but not limited to, market valuation, value at risk, stress testing, and sensitivity analysis.
Derivative instruments are recognized at fair value in the balance sheets as either assets or liabilities and are presented on a net
basis. See Note 13 for additional fair value information. In the statements of cash flows, any cash impacts of settled energy-related
and interest rate derivatives are recorded as operating activities. Any cash impacts of settled foreign currency derivatives are
classified as operating or financing activities to correspond with classification of the hedged interest or principal, respectively. See
Note 1 under "Financial Instruments" for additional information.
Energy-Related Derivatives
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas enter into energy-related derivatives to
hedge exposures to electricity, natural gas, and other fuel price changes. However, due to cost-based rate regulations and other
various cost recovery mechanisms, the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities have limited
exposure to market volatility in energy-related commodity prices. Each of the traditional electric operating companies and certain
of the natural gas distribution utilities of Southern Company Gas manage fuel-hedging programs, implemented per the guidelines of
their respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies, through the use of financial derivative contracts, which are
expected to continue to mitigate price volatility. The traditional electric operating companies (with respect to wholesale generating
capacity) and Southern Power have limited exposure to market volatility in energy-related commodity prices because their long-
term sales contracts shift substantially all fuel cost responsibility to the purchaser. However, the traditional electric operating
companies and Southern Power may be exposed to market volatility in energy-related commodity prices to the extent any
uncontracted capacity is used to sell electricity. Southern Company Gas retains exposure to price changes that can, in a volatile
energy market, be material and can adversely affect its results of operations.
Southern Company Gas also enters into weather derivative contracts as economic hedges of operating margins in the event of
warmer-than-normal weather. Exchange-traded options are carried at fair value, with changes reflected in operating revenues. Non-
exchange-traded options are accounted for using the intrinsic value method. Changes in the intrinsic value for non-exchange-traded
contracts are reflected in operating revenues.
Energy-related derivative contracts are accounted for under one of three methods:
•Regulatory Hedges – Energy-related derivative contracts designated as regulatory hedges relate primarily to the traditional
electric operating companies' and the natural gas distribution utilities' fuel-hedging programs, where gains and losses are
initially recorded as regulatory liabilities and assets, respectively, and then are included in fuel expense as the underlying fuel
is used in operations and ultimately recovered through the respective fuel cost recovery clauses.
•Cash Flow Hedges – Gains and losses on energy-related derivatives designated as cash flow hedges (which are mainly used to
hedge anticipated purchases and sales) are initially deferred in AOCI before being recognized in the statements of income in
the same period and in the same income statement line item as the earnings effect of the hedged transactions.
•Not Designated – Gains and losses on energy-related derivative contracts that are not designated or fail to qualify as hedges are
recognized in the statements of income as incurred.
Some energy-related derivative contracts require physical delivery as opposed to financial settlement, and this type of derivative is
both common and prevalent within the electric and natural gas industries. When an energy-related derivative contract is settled
physically, any cumulative unrealized gain or loss is reversed and the contract price is recognized in the respective line item
representing the actual price of the underlying goods being delivered.
II-306
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2019, the net volume of energy-related derivative contracts for natural gas positions, together with the longest
hedge date over which the respective entity is hedging its exposure to the variability in future cash flows for forecasted transactions
and the longest non-hedge date for derivatives not designated as hedges, were as follows:
 Net
Purchased
mmBtu  Longest
Hedge
DateLongest
Non-Hedge
Date
 (in millions)   
Southern Company(*)589  2023 2029
Alabama Power 88  2022 —
Georgia Power 175  2023 —
Mississippi Power 101  2023 —
Southern Power 7  2020 2020
Southern Company Gas(*)218  2022 2029
(*)Southern Company Gas' derivative instruments include both long and short natural gas positions. A long position is a contract to purchase natural gas and a short
position is a contract to sell natural gas. Southern Company Gas' volume represents the net of long natural gas positions of 4,096 million mmBtu and short
natural gas positions of 3,878 million mmBtu at December 31, 2019, which is also included in Southern Company's total volume.
At December 31, 2019, the net volume of Southern Power's energy-related derivative contracts for power to be sold was 1 million
MWHs, all of which expire in 2020.
In addition to the volumes discussed above, the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power enter into physical
natural gas supply contracts that provide the option to sell back excess natural gas due to operational constraints. The maximum
expected volume of natural gas subject to such a feature is 23 million mmBtu for Southern Company, which includes 6 million
mmBtu for Alabama Power, 7 million mmBtu for Georgia Power, 3 million mmBtu for Mississippi Power, and 7 million mmBtu
for Southern Power.
For cash flow hedges of energy-related derivatives, the estimated pre-tax gains (losses) expected to be reclassified from AOCI to
earnings for the year ending December 31, 2020 are immaterial for Southern Power.
Interest Rate Derivatives
Southern Company and certain subsidiaries may enter into interest rate derivatives to hedge exposure to changes in interest rates.
The derivatives employed as hedging instruments are structured to minimize ineffectiveness. Derivatives related to existing
variable rate securities or forecasted transactions are accounted for as cash flow hedges where the derivatives' fair value gains or
losses are recorded in OCI and are reclassified into earnings at the same time and presented on the same income statement line item
as the earnings effect of the hedged transactions. Derivatives related to existing fixed rate securities are accounted for as fair value
hedges, where the derivatives' fair value gains or losses and hedged items' fair value gains or losses are both recorded directly to
earnings on the same income statement line item. Fair value gains or losses on derivatives that are not designated or fail to qualify
as hedges are recognized in the statements of income as incurred.
II-307
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2019, the following interest rate derivatives were outstanding:
Notional
AmountInterest
Rate
ReceivedWeighted
Average
Interest
Rate PaidHedge
Maturity
DateFair Value
Gain (Loss)
December 31,
2019
(in millions) (in millions)
Cash Flow Hedges of Forecasted Debt
Georgia Power $ 2503-month
LIBOR  2.23% March 2025 $ (6)
Georgia Power 2503-month
LIBOR  2.40% March 2030 (11)
Southern Company Gas 2003-month
LIBOR  1.81%September
2030  2
Fair Value Hedges of Existing Debt
Southern Company parent 300 2.75%  3-month
LIBOR +
0.92% June 2020  —
Southern Company parent 1,500 2.35%  1-month
LIBOR +
0.87% July 2021  (7)
Southern Company $ 2,500     $ (22)
The estimated pre-tax gains (losses) related to interest rate derivatives expected to be reclassified from AOCI to interest expense for
the year ending December 31, 2020 total $(22) million for Southern Company and are immaterial for all other Registrants. Deferred
gains and losses related to interest rate derivatives are expected to be amortized into earnings through 2046 for the Southern
Company parent entity, 2035 for Alabama Power, 2044 for Georgia Power, 2028 for Mississippi Power, and 2046 for Southern
Company Gas.
Foreign Currency Derivatives
Southern Company and certain subsidiaries, including Southern Power, may enter into foreign currency derivatives to hedge
exposure to changes in foreign currency exchange rates, such as that arising from the issuance of debt denominated in a currency
other than U.S. dollars. Derivatives related to forecasted transactions are accounted for as cash flow hedges where the derivatives'
fair value gains or losses are recorded in OCI and are reclassified into earnings at the same time and on the same income statement
line as the earnings effect of the hedged transactions, including foreign currency gains or losses arising from changes in the U.S.
currency exchange rates. The derivatives employed as hedging instruments are structured to minimize ineffectiveness.
At December 31, 2019, the following foreign currency derivatives were outstanding:
 Pay NotionalPay RateReceive
NotionalReceive RateHedge
Maturity DateFair Value
Gain (Loss)
December 31,
2019
 (in millions) (in millions)  (in millions)
Cash Flow Hedges of Existing Debt   
Southern Power $ 677 2.95% € 600 1.00% June 2022 $ (7)
Southern Power 564 3.78% 500 1.85% June 2026 (1)
Total $ 1,241 € 1,100 $ (8)
The estimated pre-tax gains (losses) related to Southern Power's foreign currency derivatives expected to be reclassified from AOCI
to earnings for the year ending December 31, 2020 are $(24) million.
Derivative Financial Statement Presentation and Amounts
Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas enter into derivative
contracts that may contain certain provisions that permit intra-contract netting of derivative receivables and payables for routine
billing and offsets related to events of default and settlements. Southern Company and certain subsidiaries also utilize
II-308
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
master netting agreements to mitigate exposure to counterparty credit risk. These agreements may contain provisions that permit
netting across product lines and against cash collateral. The fair value amounts of derivative assets and liabilities on the balance
sheets are presented net to the extent that there are netting arrangements or similar agreements with the counterparties.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the fair value of energy-related derivatives, interest rate derivatives, and foreign currency
derivatives was reflected in the balance sheets as follows:
 2019 2018
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet Location Assets Liabilities Assets Liabilities
 (in millions)
Southern Company   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 3$ 70$ 8$ 23
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 6 44 9 26
Assets held for sale, current/Liabilities held for sale, current — — — 6
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ 9$ 114$ 17$ 55
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash flow
and fair value hedges   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 1$ 6$ 3$ 7
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities — — 1 2
Interest rate derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities 2 23 — 19
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities — 1 — 30
Foreign currency derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities — 24 — 23
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 16 — 75 —
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash
flow and fair value hedges $ 19$ 54$ 79$ 81
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 461$ 358$ 561$ 575
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 207 225 180 325
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ 668$ 583$ 741$ 900
Gross amounts recognized $ 696$ 751$ 837$ 1,036
Gross amounts offset(a)$ (463)$ (562)$ (524)$ (801)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets(b)$ 233$ 189$ 313$ 235
II-309
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019 2018
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet Location Assets Liabilities Assets Liabilities
 (in millions)
Alabama Power   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 2$ 14$ 3$ 4
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 2 10 3 6
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ 4$ 24$ 6$ 10
Gross amounts recognized $ 4$ 24$ 6$ 10
Gross amounts offset $ (2)$ (2)$ (4)$ (4)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets $ 2$ 22$ 2$ 6
Georgia Power   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 1$ 32$ 2$ 8
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 3 21 4 13
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ 4$ 53$ 6$ 21
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash flow
and fair value hedges  
Interest rate derivatives:  
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ —$ 17$ —$ 2
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash
flow and fair value hedges $ —$ 17$ —$ 2
Gross amounts recognized $ 4$ 70$ 6$ 23
Gross amounts offset $ (3)$ (3)$ (6)$ (6)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets $ 1$ 67$ —$ 17
II-310
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019 2018
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet Location Assets Liabilities Assets Liabilities
 (in millions)
Mississippi Power   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ —$ 15$ 1$ 3
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 1 12 2 6
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ 1$ 27$ 3$ 9
Gross amounts recognized $ 1$ 27$ 3$ 9
Gross amounts offset $ (1)$ (1)$ (2)$ (2)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets $ —$ 26$ 1$ 7
Southern Power   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash flow
and fair value hedges   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 1$ 2$ 3$ 6
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities — — 1 2
Foreign currency derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities — 24 — 23
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 16 — 75 —
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash
flow and fair value hedges $ 17$ 26$ 79$ 31
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 2$ 1$ —$ —
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ 2$ 1$ —$ —
Gross amounts recognized $ 19$ 27$ 79$ 31
Gross amounts offset $ —$ —$ (3)$ (3)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets $ 19$ 27$ 76$ 28
II-311
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 2019 2018
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet Location Assets Liabilities Assets Liabilities
 (in millions)
Southern Company Gas   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Assets from risk management activities/Liabilities from risk
management activities-current $ —$ 9$ 2$ 8
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities — 1 — 1
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ —$ 10$ 2$ 9
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash flow
and fair value hedges   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Assets from risk management activities/Liabilities from risk
management activities-current $ —$ 4$ —$ 1
Interest rate derivatives:   
Assets from risk management activities/Liabilities from risk
management activities-current 2 — — —
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash
flow and fair value hedges $ 2$ 4$ —$ 1
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Assets from risk management activities/Liabilities from risk
management activities-current $ 459$ 357$ 559$ 574
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 207 225 180 325
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ 666$ 582$ 739$ 899
Gross amounts recognized $ 668$ 596$ 741$ 909
Gross amounts offset(a)$ (456)$ (555)$ (508)$ (785)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets (b)$ 212$ 41$ 233$ 124
(a)Gross amounts offset include cash collateral held on deposit in broker margin accounts of $99 million and $277 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018,
respectively.
(b)Net amounts of derivative instruments outstanding exclude premium and intrinsic value associated with weather derivatives of $4 million and $8 million at
December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Energy-related derivatives not designated as hedging instruments were immaterial for the traditional electric operating companies
at December 31, 2019 and 2018.
II-312
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the pre-tax effects of unrealized derivative gains (losses) arising from energy-related derivative
instruments designated as regulatory hedging instruments and deferred were as follows:
Regulatory Hedge Unrealized Gain (Loss) Recognized in the Balance Sheet at December 31, 2019
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet
LocationSouthern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Energy-related derivatives:    
Other regulatory assets, current $ (63)$ (14)$ (31)$ (15)$ (3)
Other regulatory assets, deferred (37) (8) (18) (11) —
Other regulatory liabilities, current 6 2 — — 4
Total energy-related derivative gains
(losses) $ (94)$ (20)$ (49)$ (26)$ 1
Regulatory Hedge Unrealized Gain (Loss) Recognized in the Balance Sheet at December 31, 2018
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet
LocationSouthern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Energy-related derivatives:    
Other regulatory assets, current $ (19)$ (3)$ (6)$ (2)$ (8)
Other regulatory assets, deferred (16) (3) (9) (4) —
Assets held for sale, current (6) — — — —
Other regulatory liabilities, current 1 — — — 1
Total energy-related derivative gains (losses)$ (40)$ (6)$ (15)$ (6)$ (7)
For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, the pre-tax effects of cash flow hedge accounting on AOCI for the
applicable Registrants were as follows:
Gain (Loss) Recognized in OCI on Derivative 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Southern Company   
Energy-related derivatives $ (13)$ 17$ (47)
Interest rate derivatives (57) (1) (2)
Foreign currency derivatives (84) (78) 140
Total $ (154)$ (62)$ 91
Georgia Power   
Interest rate derivatives $ (59)$ —$ 1
Southern Power   
Energy-related derivatives $ (4)$ 10$ (38)
Foreign currency derivatives (84) (78) 140
Total $ (88)$ (68)$ 102
Southern Company Gas   
Energy-related derivatives $ (9)$ 7$ (9)
Interest rate derivatives 2 — —
Total $ (7)$ 7$ (9)
For all years presented, the pre-tax effects of energy-related derivatives and interest rate derivatives designated as cash flow
hedging instruments on AOCI were immaterial for the other Registrants. In addition, for the year ended December 31, 2017, there
II-313
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
was no material ineffectiveness recorded in earnings for any Registrant. Upon the adoption of ASU 2017-12, beginning in 2018,
ineffectiveness was no longer separately measured and recorded in earnings.
The pre-tax effects of cash flow and fair value hedge accounting on income for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and
2017 were as follows:
Location and Amount of Gain (Loss) Recognized in Income on Cash
Flow and Fair Value Hedging Relationships 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Southern Company   
Total cost of natural gas $ 1,319$ 1,539$ 1,601
Gain (loss) on energy-related cash flow hedges(a)(2) 2 (2)
Total depreciation and amortization 3,038 3,131 3,010
Gain (loss) on energy-related cash flow hedges(a)(6) 7 (16)
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (1,736) (1,842) (1,694)
Gain (loss) on interest rate cash flow hedges(a)(20) (21) (21)
Gain (loss) on foreign currency cash flow hedges(a)(24) (24) (23)
Gain (loss) on interest rate fair value hedges(b)42 (12) (22)
Total other income (expense), net 252 114 163
Gain (loss) on foreign currency cash flow hedges(a)(c)(24) (60) 160
Alabama Power   
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized $ (336)$ (323)$ (305)
Gain (loss) on interest rate cash flow hedges(a)(6) (6) (6)
Georgia Power   
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized $ (409)$ (397)$ (419)
Gain (loss) on interest rate cash flow hedges(a)(3) (4) (4)
Gain (loss) on interest rate fair value hedges(b)2 2 (3)
Mississippi Power   
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized $ (69)$ (76)$ (42)
Gain (loss) on interest rate cash flow hedges(a)(2) (2) (2)
Southern Power   
Total depreciation and amortization $ 479$ 493$ 503
Gain (loss) on energy-related cash flow hedges(a)(6) 7 (17)
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (169) (183) (191)
Gain (loss) on foreign currency cash flow hedges(a)(24) (24) (23)
Total other income (expense), net 47 23 1
Gain (loss) on foreign currency cash flow hedges(a)(c)(24) (60) 159
Southern Company Gas   
Total cost of natural gas $ 1,319$ 1,539$ 1,601
Gain (loss) on energy-related cash flow hedges(a)(2) 2 (2)
(a)Reclassified from AOCI into earnings.
(b)For fair value hedges, changes in the fair value of the derivative contracts are generally equal to changes in the fair value of the underlying debt and have no
material impact on income.
(c)The reclassification from AOCI into other income (expense), net completely offsets currency gains and losses arising from changes in the U.S. currency
exchange rates used to record the euro-denominated notes.
The pre-tax effects of cash flow hedge accounting on income for interest rate derivatives were immaterial for Southern Company
Gas for all years presented.
II-314
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the following amounts were recorded on the balance sheets related to cumulative basis
adjustments for fair value hedges:
 Carrying Amount of the Hedged
Item  Cumulative Amount of Fair Value
Hedging Adjustment included in
Carrying Amount of the Hedged Item
Balance Sheet Location of Hedged ItemsAt December 31,
2019At December 31,
2018  At December 31,
2019At December 31,
2018
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Southern Company  
Securities due within one year $ —$ (498) $ —$ 2
Long-term debt (2,093) (2,052) 3 41
Georgia Power  
Securities due within one year $ —$ (498) $ —$ 2
The pre-tax effects of energy-related derivatives not designated as hedging instruments on the statements of income for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 for the applicable Registrants were as follows:
Gain (Loss)
Derivatives in Non-Designated
Hedging RelationshipsStatements of Income
Location 2019 2018 2017
(in millions)
Southern Company      
Energy-related derivatives Natural gas revenues(*)$ 223 $ (122) $ (80)
 Cost of natural gas 10 (6) (2)
 Wholesale electric revenues 2 2 (4)
Total derivatives in non-designated hedging relationships $ 235 $ (126)$ (86)
      
Southern Company Gas      
Energy-related derivatives Natural gas revenues(*)$ 223 $ (122) $ (80)
 Cost of natural gas 10 (6) (2)
Total derivatives in non-designated hedging relationships $ 233 $ (128) $ (82)
(*)Excludes the impact of weather derivatives recorded in natural gas revenues of $3 million, $5 million, and $23 million for the years ended December 31, 2019,
2018, and 2017, respectively, as they are accounted for based on intrinsic value rather than fair value.
The pre-tax effects of energy-related derivatives not designated as hedging instruments were immaterial for all other Registrants for
all years presented.
Contingent Features
Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas do not have any
credit arrangements that would require material changes in payment schedules or terminations as a result of a credit rating
downgrade. There are certain derivatives that could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of various credit
rating changes of certain Southern Company subsidiaries. At December 31, 2019, the Registrants had no collateral posted with
derivative counterparties to satisfy these arrangements.
For the Registrants with interest rate derivatives at December 31, 2019, the fair value of interest rate derivative liabilities with
contingent features and the maximum potential collateral requirements arising from the credit-risk-related contingent features, at a
rating below BBB- and/or Baa3, was immaterial. At December 31, 2019, the fair value of energy-related derivative liabilities with
contingent features and the maximum potential collateral requirements arising from the credit-risk-related contingent features, at a
rating below BBB- and/or Baa3, were immaterial for all Registrants. The maximum potential collateral requirements arising from
the credit-risk-related contingent features for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power include certain
agreements that could require collateral in the event that one or more Southern Company power pool participants has a credit
II-315
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
rating change to below investment grade. Following the sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy, Gulf Power is continuing to
participate in the Southern Company power pool for a defined transition period that, subject to certain potential adjustments, is
scheduled to end on January 1, 2024.
Generally, collateral may be provided by a Southern Company guaranty, letter of credit, or cash. If collateral is required, fair value
amounts recognized for the right to reclaim cash collateral or the obligation to return cash collateral are not offset against fair value
amounts recognized for derivatives executed with the same counterparty.
Alabama Power and Southern Power maintain accounts with certain regional transmission organizations to facilitate financial
derivative transactions. Based on the value of the positions in these accounts and the associated margin requirements, Alabama
Power and Southern Power may be required to post collateral. At December 31, 2019, cash collateral posted in these accounts was
immaterial. Southern Company Gas maintains accounts with brokers or the clearing houses of certain exchanges to facilitate
financial derivative transactions. Based on the value of the positions in these accounts and the associated margin requirements,
Southern Company Gas may be required to deposit cash into these accounts. At December 31, 2019, cash collateral held on deposit
in broker margin accounts was $99 million.
The Registrants are exposed to losses related to financial instruments in the event of counterparties' nonperformance. The
Registrants only enter into agreements and material transactions with counterparties that have investment grade credit ratings by
Moody's and S&P or with counterparties who have posted collateral to cover potential credit exposure. The Registrants have also
established risk management policies and controls to determine and monitor the creditworthiness of counterparties in order to
mitigate their exposure to counterparty credit risk. Prior to entering into a physical transaction, Southern Company Gas assigns
physical wholesale counterparties an internal credit rating and credit limit based on the counterparties' Moody's, S&P, and Fitch
ratings, commercially available credit reports, and audited financial statements. Southern Company Gas may require counterparties
to pledge additional collateral when deemed necessary.
In addition, Southern Company Gas conducts credit evaluations and obtains appropriate internal approvals for the counterparty's
line of credit before any transaction with the counterparty is executed. In most cases, the counterparty must have an investment
grade rating, which includes a minimum long-term debt rating of Baa3 from Moody's and BBB- from S&P. Generally, Southern
Company Gas requires credit enhancements by way of a guaranty, cash deposit, or letter of credit for transaction counterparties that
do not have investment grade ratings.
Southern Company Gas also utilizes master netting agreements whenever possible to mitigate exposure to counterparty credit risk.
When Southern Company Gas is engaged in more than one outstanding derivative transaction with the same counterparty and it
also has a legally enforceable netting agreement with that counterparty, the "net" mark-to-market exposure represents the netting of
the positive and negative exposures with that counterparty and a reasonable measure of Southern Company Gas' credit risk.
Southern Company Gas also uses other netting agreements with certain counterparties with whom it conducts significant
transactions. Master netting agreements enable Southern Company Gas to net certain assets and liabilities by counterparty.
Southern Company Gas also nets across product lines and against cash collateral provided the master netting and cash collateral
agreements include such provisions. Southern Company Gas may require counterparties to pledge additional collateral when
deemed necessary.
The Registrants do not anticipate a material adverse effect on their respective financial statements as a result of counterparty
nonperformance.
15. ACQUISITIONS AND DISPOSITIONS
Southern Company
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of all of the capital stock of Gulf Power to 700 Universe, LLC, a
wholly-owned subsidiary of NextEra Energy, for an aggregate cash purchase price of approximately $5.8 billion (less $1.3 billion
of indebtedness assumed), including the final working capital adjustments. The gain associated with the sale of Gulf Power totaled
$2.6 billion pre-tax ($1.4 billion after tax). The assets and liabilities of Gulf Power were classified as assets held for sale and
liabilities held for sale on Southern Company's balance sheet as of December 31, 2018. See "Assets Held for Sale" herein for
additional information.
On July 22, 2019, PowerSecure completed the sale of its utility infrastructure services business for approximately $65 million,
including the final working capital adjustments. In contemplation of this sale, a goodwill impairment charge of $32 million was
recorded in the second quarter 2019.
On December 30, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of one of its leveraged lease investments for an aggregate cash
purchase price of approximately $20 million. The sale resulted in an immaterial gain.
II-316
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
On December 31, 2019, PowerSecure completed the sale of its lighting business for approximately $9 million, which included cash
of $4 million and a note receivable from the buyer of $5 million. In contemplation of this sale, an impairment charge of $18 million
was recorded in the third quarter 2019 related to goodwill, identifiable intangibles, and other assets.
Alabama Power
On September 6, 2019, Alabama Power entered into the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition, a purchase and sale agreement to
acquire all of the equity interests in Tenaska Alabama II Partners, L.P. Tenaska Alabama II Partners, L.P. owns and operates an
approximately 885-MW combined cycle generation facility in Autauga County, Alabama. The transaction is expected to close by
September 1, 2020. As part of the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition, Alabama Power will assume an existing power sales
agreement under which the full output of the generating facility remains committed to another third party for its remaining term of
approximately three years. The estimated revenues from the power sales agreement are expected to offset the associated costs of
operation during the remaining term.
The completion of the Autauga Combined Cycle Acquisition is subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, including,
among other customary conditions, approval by the Alabama PSC and the FERC. Alabama Power expects to obtain all regulatory
approvals by the end of the third quarter 2020.
The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Power
During 2019 and 2018, Southern Power or one of its wholly-owned subsidiaries acquired, completed, or continued construction of
the facilities discussed below. Acquisition-related costs were expensed as incurred and were not material for any of the years
presented.
Acquisitions During 2019
During 2019, Southern Power acquired a controlling interest in the fuel cell generation facility listed below and acquired the
Skookumchuck wind facility discussed under "Construction Projects" below.
Project Facility Resour ce SellerAppr oximate
Nameplate
Capacity
(MW)  LocationSouthern
Power
Ownership
Percentage CODPPA
Remaining
Period
DSGP(a)Fuel Cell Bloom Ener gy 28  Delaware100% of
Class B N/A(b)15 years
(a)During 2019, Southern Power made a total investment of approximately $167 million in DSGP and now holds a controlling interest and consolidates 100% of
DSGP's operating results. Southern Power records net income attributable to noncontrolling interests for approximately 10 MWs of the facility.
(b)Southern Power's 18-MW share of the facility was repowered between June and August 2019. In December 2019, a Class C member joined the existing
partnership between the Class A member and Southern Power and made an investment to repower the remaining 10 MWs. In connection with the Class C
member joining the partnership, the original fuel cells (before repower), which had a carrying value of approximately $55 million, were distributed to the Class
A member in a non-cash transaction that was excluded from the statements of cash flows.
Acquisitions During 2018
During 2018, Southern Power acquired and completed the project below and acquired the Wildhorse Mountain and Reading wind
facilities discussed under "Construction Projects" below.
Project Facility Resour ce SellerAppr oximate
Nameplate
Capacity
(MW) LocationSouthern
Power
Ownership
Percentage CODPPA Contract
Period
Gaskell West 1 SolarRecurrent Ener gy
Development Holdings,
LLC 20 Kern County , CA100% of
Class B (*) March
2018 20 years
(*)Southern Power owns 100% of the Class B membership interests under a tax equity partnership.
The Gaskell West 1 facility did not have operating revenues or activities prior to being placed in service during March 2018.
II-317
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Construction Projects
During 2019, Southern Power completed construction of and placed in service the 385-MW Plant Mankato expansion and the
Wildhorse Mountain facility, acquired and continued construction of the Skookumchuck facility, and continued construction of the
Reading facility. Total aggregate construction costs, excluding acquisition costs, are expected to be between $490 million and $535
million for the two facilities under construction. At December 31, 2019, total costs of construction incurred for the two facilities
under construction were $417 million and are included in CWIP. The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at
this time.
Project Facility ResourceApproximate
Nameplate
Capacity (MW) LocationActual/Expected
CODPPA
Contract
Period
Projects Completed During the Year Ended December  31, 2019
Mankato expansion(a)Natural Gas 385 Mankato, MN May 2019 20 years
Wildhorse Mountain(b)Wind 100 Pushmataha County , OK December 2019 20 years
Projects Under  Construction at December  31, 2019
Reading(c)Wind 200 Osage and L yon Counties, KS Second quarter 2020 12 years
Skookumchuck(d)Wind 136 Lewis and Thurston Counties, WA Second quarter 2020 20 years
(a)Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Mankato, including the expansion, to a subsidiary of Xcel on January 17, 2020. The expansion
unit started providing energy under a PPA with Northern States Power on June 1, 2019. See "Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" below and "Assets Held
for Sale" herein for additional information.
(b)In May 2018, Southern Power purchased 100% of the membership interests of the Wildhorse Mountain facility. In December 2019, Southern Power entered into
a tax equity partnership and, as a result, owns 100% of the Class B membership interests.
(c)In August 2018, Southern Power purchased 100% of the membership interests of the Reading facility pursuant to a joint development arrangement. Southern
Power may enter into a tax equity partnership, in which case it would then own 100% of the Class B membership interests. The ultimate outcome of this matter
cannot be determined at this time.
(d)In October 2019, Southern Power purchased 100% of the membership interests of the Skookumchuck facility pursuant to a joint development arrangement. In
December 2019, Southern Power entered into a tax equity agreement as the Class B member with funding of the tax equity amounts expected to occur upon
commercial operation. Shortly after commercial operation, Southern Power may sell a noncontrolling interest in these Class B membership interests to another
partner. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Development Projects
Southern Power continues to evaluate and refine the deployment of the remaining wind turbine equipment purchased in 2016 and
2017 to development and construction projects. Wind projects utilizing equipment purchased in 2016 and 2017, and reaching
commercial operation by the end of 2020 and 2021, are expected to qualify for 100% and 80% PTCs, respectively. The significant
majority of this equipment either has been deployed to completed projects, projects under construction, or projects that are probable
of being completed or has been sold to third parties. In 2018, as a result of a review of various options for probable dispositions of
wind turbine equipment not deployed to development or construction projects, Southern Power recorded a $36 million asset
impairment charge on the equipment. Sales during 2019 resulted in gains totaling approximately $17 million.
Sales of Renewable Facility Interests
In May 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership
indirectly owning substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, to Global Atlantic for approximately $1.2 billion. Since
Southern Power retained control of the limited partnership through its wholly-owned general partner, the sale was recorded as an
equity transaction. On the date of the transaction, the noncontrolling interest was increased by $511 million to reflect 33% of the
carrying value of the partnership. This difference, partially offset by the tax impact and other related transaction charges, also
resulted in a $410 million decrease to Southern Power's common stockholder's equity.
In December 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP Wind, which owns a portfolio
of eight operating wind facilities, to three financial investors for approximately $1.2 billion. The tax equity investors together will
generally receive 40% of the cash distributions from available cash and will receive 99% of the tax attributes, including future
PTCs.
Southern Power consolidates each entity, as the primary beneficiary of the VIE, since it controls the most significant activities,
including operating and maintaining the assets.
II-318
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Sales of Natural Gas and Biomass Plants
In December 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of all of its equity interests in the Florida Plants to NextEra Energy for $203
million, including working capital adjustments. In contemplation of this sale transaction, Southern Power recorded an asset
impairment charge of approximately $119 million ($89 million after tax) in May 2018.
On June 13, 2019, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Nacogdoches, a 115-MW biomass facility
located in Nacogdoches County, Texas, to Austin Energy, for a purchase price of approximately $461 million, including working
capital adjustments. Southern Power recorded a gain of $23 million ($88 million after tax) on the sale.
On January 17, 2020, Southern Power completed the sale of its equity interests in Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion
unit completed in May 2019) to a subsidiary of Xcel for a purchase price of approximately $663 million, including estimated
working capital adjustments. The sale resulted in a gain of approximately $39 million ($23 million after tax) in 2020. The assets
and liabilities of Plant Mankato are classified as held for sale on Southern Company's and Southern Power's balance sheets as of
December 31, 2019 and 2018. See "Assets Held for Sale" herein for additional information.
Southern Company Gas
Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions
In June 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the stock sale of Pivotal Home Solutions to American Water Enterprises LLC for
a total cash purchase price of $365 million, which includes the final working capital adjustment. This disposition resulted in a net
loss of $67 million, which includes $34 million of income tax expense. In contemplation of the transaction, a goodwill impairment
charge of $42 million was recorded during the first quarter 2018. The income tax expense included tax on goodwill not deductible
for tax purposes and for which a deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously. Southern Company Gas and American
Water Enterprises LLC entered into a transition services agreement whereby Southern Company Gas provided certain
administrative and operational services through November 4, 2018.
Sales of Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas
In July 2018, a Southern Company Gas subsidiary, Pivotal Utility Holdings, completed the sales of the assets of two of its natural
gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, to South Jersey Industries, Inc. for a total cash purchase price of $1.7
billion, which includes the final working capital and other adjustments. This disposition resulted in a pre-tax gain that was entirely
offset by $205 million of income tax expense, resulting in no material net income impact. The income tax expense included tax on
goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for which a deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously. Southern
Company Gas and South Jersey Industries, Inc. entered into transition services agreements whereby Southern Company Gas will
provide certain administrative and operational services through no later than July 31, 2020.
Sale of Florida City Gas
In July 2018, Southern Company Gas and its wholly-owned direct subsidiary, NUI Corporation, completed the stock sale of Pivotal
Utility Holdings, which primarily consisted of Florida City Gas, to NextEra Energy for a total cash purchase price of $587 million,
which includes the final working capital adjustment. This disposition resulted in a net gain of $16 million, which includes $103
million of income tax expense. The income tax expense included tax on goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for which a
deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously. Southern Company Gas and NextEra Energy entered into a transition
services agreement whereby Southern Company Gas will provide certain administrative and operational services through no later
than July 29, 2020.
Sale of Triton
On May 29, 2019, Southern Company Gas sold its investment in Triton, a cargo container leasing company that was aggregated
into Southern Company Gas' all other segment. This disposition resulted in a pre-tax loss of $6 million and a net after-tax gain of
$7 million as a result of reversing a $13 million federal income tax valuation allowance.
Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline
On February 7, 2020, Southern Company Gas entered into agreements with Dominion Modular LNG Holdings, Inc. and Dominion
Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC for the sale of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline, respectively, for an aggregate
purchase price of $165 million, including estimated working capital and timing adjustments. Southern Company Gas may also
receive two payments of $5 million each, contingent upon certain milestones related to Pivotal LNG being met by Dominion
Modular LNG Holdings, Inc. after the completion of the sale. Based on the terms of these pending transactions, Southern Company
Gas recorded an asset impairment charge, exclusive of the contingent payments, for Pivotal LNG of
II-319
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
approximately $24 million ($17 million after tax) as of December 31, 2019. The completion of each transaction is subject to the
satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, including, among other customary closing conditions, the completion of the other
transaction and, for the sale of the interest in Atlantic Coast Pipeline, the expiration or termination of any applicable waiting period
under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976. The transactions are expected to be completed in the first half of
2020; however, the ultimate outcome cannot be determined at this time. The assets and liabilities of Pivotal LNG and the interest in
Atlantic Coast Pipeline are classified as held for sale as of December 31, 2019. See Notes 3 and 7 under "Southern Company Gas –
Gas Pipeline Projects" and "Southern Company Gas – Equity Method Investments," respectively, and "Assets Held for Sale" herein
for additional information.
Assets Held for Sale
As discussed previously, Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas each have assets and liabilities held for
sale on their balance sheets at December 31, 2019 and/or 2018. Assets and liabilities held for sale have been classified separately on
each company's balance sheet at the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell at the time the criteria for held-for-sale
classification were met. For assets and liabilities held for sale recorded at fair value on a nonrecurring basis, the fair value of assets
held for sale is based primarily on unobservable inputs (Level 3), which includes the agreed upon sales prices in executed sales
agreements.
Since the depreciation of the assets sold in the Gulf Power transaction and Southern Company Gas' Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas,
and Florida City Gas transactions continued to be reflected in customer rates through the closing date of each sale and was reflected
in the carryover basis of the assets when sold, Southern Company and Southern Company Gas continued to record depreciation on
those assets through the respective closing date of each transaction. Upon classification as held for sale in May 2018 for the Florida
Plants, November 2018 for Plant Mankato, and April 2019 for Plant Nacogdoches, Southern Power ceased recognizing depreciation
and amortization on the long-lived assets being sold.
The following table provides the major classes of assets and liabilities classified as held for sale for Southern Company, Southern
Power, and Southern Company Gas at December 31, 2019 and/or 2018:
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 At December 31, At December 31, At December 31,
 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019
 (in millions) (in millions) (in millions)
Assets Held for Sale:     
Current assets $ 19$ 393$ 17$ 8$ 2
Total property, plant, and equipment 565 4,583 547 536 18
Goodwill and other intangible assets 40 40 40 40 —
Equity investments in unconsolidated
subsidiaries 151 — — — 151
Other non-current assets 14 727 14 — —
Total Assets Held for Sale $ 789$ 5,743$ 618$ 584$ 171
Liabilities Held for Sale:     
Current liabilities $ 5$ 425$ 3$ 15$ 2
Long-term debt — 1,286 — — —
Accumulated deferred income taxes — 618 — — —
Other non-current liabilities — 932 — — —
Total Liabilities Held for Sale $ 5$ 3,261$ 3$ 15$ 2
Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas each concluded that the asset sales, both individually and
combined, did not represent a strategic shift in operations that has, or is expected to have, a major effect on its operations and
financial results; therefore, none of the assets related to the sales have been classified as discontinued operations for any of the
periods presented.
II-320
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Gulf Power and Southern Power's Florida Plants, Plant Nacogdoches, and Plant Mankato represented individually significant
components of Southern Company and Southern Power, respectively; therefore, pre-tax income for these components for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 are presented below:
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Earnings before income taxes:(a)  
Gulf Power N/A$ 140$ 229
Southern Power's Florida Plants(b)N/A$ 49$ 37
Southern Power's Plant Nacogdoches(c)$ 13$ 27$ 25
Southern Power's Plant Mankato $ 29 N/M N/M
N/M - Not material
(a)Earnings before income taxes for Southern Power's components reflect the cessation of depreciation and amortization on the long-lived assets being sold upon
classification as held for sale.
(b)Earnings before income taxes for the Florida Plants in 2018 represents the period from January 1, 2018 to December 4, 2018 (the divestiture date).
(c)Earnings before income taxes for Plant Nacogdoches in 2019 represents January 1, 2019 through June 13, 2019 (the divestiture date).
16. SEGMENT AND RELATED INFORMATION
Southern Company
Southern Company's reportable business segments are the sale of electricity by the traditional electric operating companies, the sale
of electricity in the competitive wholesale market by Southern Power, and the sale of natural gas and other complementary products
and services by Southern Company Gas. Revenues from sales by Southern Power to the traditional electric operating companies
were $398 million, $435 million, and $392 million in 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. Revenues from sales of natural gas from
Southern Company Gas to the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power were $14 million and $64 million,
respectively, in 2019, $32 million and $119 million, respectively, in 2018, and $23 million and $119 million, respectively, in 2017.
The "All Other" column includes the Southern Company parent entity, which does not allocate operating expenses to business
segments. Also, this category includes segments below the quantitative threshold for separate disclosure. These segments include
providing energy solutions to electric utilities and their customers in the areas of distributed generation, energy storage and
renewables, and energy efficiency, as well as investments in telecommunications and leveraged lease projects. All other inter-
segment revenues are not material.
II-321
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Financial data for business segments and products and services for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 was as
follows:
 Electric Utilities   
 Traditional
Electric
Operating
CompaniesSouthern
Power Eliminations TotalSouthern
Company
GasAll
Other Eliminations Consolidated
 (in millions)
2019      
Operating r evenues $ 15,569 $1,938 $ (412)$17,095 $ 3,792 $690 $ (158)$ 21,419
Depr eciation and amortization 1,993 479 — 2,472 487 79 — 3,038
Inter est income 38 9 — 47 3 16 (6) 60
Earnings fr om equity method
investments 2 3 — 5 157 — — 162
Inter est expense 818 169 — 987 232 517 — 1,736
Income taxes (benefit) 764 (56) — 708 130 960 — 1,798
Segment net income (loss)(a)(b)(c)(d)
(e) 2,929 339 — 3,268 585 908 (22) 4,739
Goodwill — 2 — 2 5,015 263 — 5,280
Total assets 81,063 14,300 (713)94,650 21,687 3,511 (1,148 ) 118,700
Gross pr operty additions 5,748 489 — 6,237 1,418 159 — 7,814
2018      
Operating revenues $ 16,843 $2,205 $ (477)$18,571 $ 3,909 $1,213 $ (198)$ 23,495
Depreciation and amortization 2,072 493 — 2,565 500 66 — 3,131
Interest income 23 8 — 31 4 8 (5) 38
Earnings from equity method
investments (1) — — (1) 148 2 (1) 148
Interest expense 852 183 — 1,035 228 580 (1) 1,842
Income taxes (benefit) 371 (164) — 207 464 (222) — 449
Segment net income (loss)(a)(b)(f)(g)2,117 187 — 2,304 372 (453) 3 2,226
Goodwill — 2 — 2 5,015 298 — 5,315
Total assets 79,382 14,883 (306)93,959 21,448 3,285 (1,778 ) 116,914
Gross property additions 6,077 315 — 6,392 1,399 414 — 8,205
2017      
Operating revenues $ 16,884 $2,075 $ (419)$18,540 $ 3,920 $741 $ (170)$ 23,031
Depreciation and amortization 1,954 503 — 2,457 501 52 — 3,010
Interest income 14 7 — 21 3 11 (9) 26
Earnings from equity method
investments 1 — — 1 106 (1) — 106
Interest expense 820 191 — 1,011 200 490 (7) 1,694
Income taxes (benefit) 1,021 (939) — 82 367 (307) — 142
Segment net income (loss)(a)(b)(h)(i)(193) 1,071 — 878 243 (279) — 842
Goodwill — 2 — 2 5,967 299 — 6,268
Total assets 72,204 15,206 (325)87,085 22,987 2,552 (1,619 ) 111,005
Gross property additions 3,836 268 — 4,104 1,525 355 — 5,984
(a)Attributable to Southern Company.
(b)Segment net income (loss) for the traditional electric operating companies includes pre-tax charges for estimated losses on plants under construction of $24
million ($24 million after tax) in 2019, $1.1 billion ($722 million after tax) in 2018, and $3.4 billion ($2.4 billion after tax) in 2017. See Note 2 under "Georgia
Power – Nuclear Construction" and "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility – Schedule and Cost Estimate" for additional information.
(c)Segment net income (loss) for Southern Power includes a $23 million pre-tax gain ($88 million gain after tax) on the sale of Plant Nacogdoches in 2019. See
Note 15 under "Southern Power" for additional information.
(d)Segment net income (loss) for Southern Company Gas in 2019 includes pre-tax impairment charges totaling $115 million ($86 million after tax). See Notes 3
and 15 under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas" and "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline,"
respectively, for additional information.
(e)Segment net income (loss) for the "All Other" column in 2019 includes the pre-tax gain associated with the sale of Gulf Power of $2.6 billion ($1.4 billion after
tax), the pre-tax loss, including related impairment charges, on the sales of certain PowerSecure business units totaling $58 million ($52 million after tax), and a
pre-tax impairment charge of $17 million ($13 million after tax) related to a leveraged lease investment. See Notes 3 and 15 under "Other Matters – Southern
Company" and "Southern Company," respectively, for additional information.
II-322
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
(f)Segment net income (loss) for Southern Power includes pre-tax impairment charges of $156 million ($117 million after tax) in 2018. See Note 15 under
"Southern Power" for additional information.
(g)Segment net income (loss) for Southern Company Gas includes a net gain on dispositions of $291 million ($51 million loss after tax) in 2018 related to the
Southern Company Gas Dispositions and a goodwill impairment charge of $42 million in 2018 related to the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. See Note 15 under
"Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
(h)Segment net income (loss) for the traditional electric operating companies includes a pre-tax charge for the write-down of Gulf Power's ownership of Plant
Scherer Unit 3 of $33 million ($20 million after tax) in 2017. See Note 2 under "Southern Company – Gulf Power" for additional information.
(i)Segment net income (loss) includes income tax expense of $367 million for the traditional electric operating companies, income tax benefit of $743 million for
Southern Power, and income tax expense of $93 million for Southern Company Gas in 2017 related to the Tax Reform Legislation.
Products and Services
Electric Utilities' Revenues
Year Retail  Wholesale  Other Total
 (in millions)
2019 $ 14,084 $ 2,152 $ 859 $ 17,095
2018 15,222 2,516 833 18,571
2017 15,330 2,426 784 18,540
Southern Company Gas' Revenues
YearGas
Distribution
OperationsGas
Marketing
Services All Other Total
 (in millions)
2019 $ 3,001 $ 456 $ 335 $ 3,792
2018 3,155 568 186 3,909
2017 3,024 860 36 3,920
Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas manages its business through four reportable segments - gas distribution operations, gas pipeline
investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services. The non-reportable segments are combined and presented as all
other. During 2018, Southern Company Gas changed its reportable segments to further align the way its Chief Operating Decision
Maker reviews operating results and reclassified prior year data to conform to the new reportable segment presentation. This
change resulted in a new reportable segment, gas pipeline investments, which was formerly included in gas midstream operations.
Gas distribution operations is the largest component of Southern Company Gas' business and includes natural gas local distribution
utilities that construct, manage, and maintain intrastate natural gas pipelines and gas distribution facilities in four states. In July
2018, Southern Company Gas sold three of its natural gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, and Florida City
Gas. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Gas pipeline investments consists of joint ventures in natural gas pipeline investments including a 50% interest in SNG, two
significant pipeline construction projects, and a 50% joint ownership interest in the Dalton Pipeline. These natural gas pipelines
enable the provision of diverse sources of natural gas supplies to the customers of Southern Company Gas. See Notes 3, 5, 7, and
15 for additional information.
Wholesale gas services provides natural gas asset management and/or related logistics services for each of Southern Company Gas'
utilities except Nicor Gas as well as for non-affiliated companies. Additionally, wholesale gas services engages in natural gas
storage and gas pipeline arbitrage and related activities.
Gas marketing services provides natural gas marketing to end-use customers primarily in Georgia and Illinois through SouthStar. In
June 2018, Southern Company Gas sold Pivotal Home Solutions, which provided home equipment protection products and
services. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions" for additional information.
The all other column includes segments below the quantitative threshold for separate disclosure, including storage and fuels
operations, Pivotal LNG, the investment in Triton through its sale on May 29, 2019, and other subsidiaries that fall below the
quantitative threshold for separate disclosure. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and
Atlantic Coast Pipeline" for additional information.
II-323
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Financial data for business segments for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 was as follows:
 Gas Distribution
Operations(a)(b)Gas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas
Services(c)Gas Marketing
Services(b)(d) Total All Other(e)EliminationsConsolidated
 (in millions)
2019   
Operating revenues $ 3,028 $ 32$ 294 $ 456 $3,810 $ 44$ (62)$ 3,792
Depreciation and amortization 422 5 1 26 454 33 — 487
Operating income (loss) 573 20 219 112 924 (154) — 770
Earnings from equity method
investments — 162 — — 162 (5) — 157
Interest expense (187) (30) (5) (3) (225) (7) — (232)
Income taxes (benefit) 63 58 52 27 200 (70) — 130
Segment net income (loss) 337 94 163 83 677 (92) — 585
Gross property additions 1,433 1 1 4 1,439 27 — 1,466
Total assets at December 31,
2019 18,204 1,678 850 1,496 22,228 10,759 (11,300 ) 21,687
2018   
Operating revenues $ 3,186 $ 32$ 144 $ 568 $3,930 $ 55$ (76)$ 3,909
Depreciation and amortization 409 5 2 37 453 47 — 500
Operating income (loss) 904 20 70 19 1,013 (98) — 915
Earnings from equity method
investments — 145 — — 145 3 — 148
Interest expense (178) (34) (9) (6) (227) (1) — (228)
Income taxes (benefit) 409 28 4 54 495 (31) — 464
Segment net income (loss) 334 103 38 (40) 435 (63) — 372
Gross property additions 1,429 32 — 6 1,467 54 — 1,521
Total assets at December 31,
2018 17,266 1,763 1,302 1,587 21,918 11,112 (11,582 ) 21,448
2017   
Operating revenues $ 3,207 $ 17$ 6$ 860 $4,090 $ 64$ (234)$ 3,920
Depreciation and amortization 391 2 2 62 457 44 — 501
Operating income (loss) 645 10 (51) 113 717 (57) — 660
Earnings from equity method
investments — 103 — — 103 3 — 106
Interest expense (153) (26) (7) (5) (191) (9) — (200)
Income taxes(f)178 109 — 24 311 56 — 367
Segment net income (loss)(f)353 (22) (57) 84 358 (115) — 243
Gross property additions 1,330 117 1 9 1,457 51 — 1,508
Total assets at December 31,
2017 19,358 1,699 1,096 2,147 24,300 12,726 (14,039 ) 22,987
(a)Operating revenues for the three gas distribution operations dispositions were $244 million and $399 million for 2018 and 2017, respectively. See Note 15 under
"Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
(b)Segment net income for gas distribution operations includes a gain on dispositions of $324 million ($16 million after tax) in 2018. Segment net income for gas
marketing services includes a loss on disposition of $(33) million ($(67) million loss after tax) and a goodwill impairment charge of $42 million in 2018
recorded in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
(c)The revenues for wholesale gas services are netted with costs associated with its energy and risk management activities. A reconciliation of operating revenues
and intercompany revenues is shown in the following table.
II-324
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
 Third Party
Gross RevenuesIntercompany
RevenuesTotal Gross
RevenuesLess Gross
Gas CostsOperating
Revenues
 (in millions)
2019 $ 5,703$ 275$ 5,978$ 5,684$ 294
2018 6,955 451 7,406 7,262 144
2017 6,152 481 6,633 6,627 6
(d)Operating revenues for the gas marketing services disposition were $55 million and $129 million in 2018 and 2017, respectively. See Note 15 under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information.
(e)Segment net income (loss) for the "All Other" column in 2019 includes pre-tax impairment charges totaling $115 million ($86 million after tax). See Notes 3
and 15 under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas" and "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline,"
respectively, for additional information.
(f)Includes the impact of the Tax Reform Legislation and new income tax apportionment factors in several states resulting from Southern Company Gas' inclusion
in the consolidated Southern Company state tax filings.
II-325
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
17. QUARTERLY FINANCIAL INFORMATION (UNAUDITED)
The tables below provide summarized quarterly financial information for each Registrant for 2019 and 2018. Each Registrant's
business is influenced by seasonal weather conditions.
Quarter EndedSouthern
Company(a)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power(b)Southern
Power(c)Southern
Company
Gas(d)
 (in millions)
March 2019    
Operating Revenues $ 5,412$ 1,408$ 1,833$ 287$ 443$ 1,474
Operating Income (Loss) 3,691 338 448 56 60 353
Net Income (Loss) 2,059 217 311 37 27 270
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 2,084 217 311 37 56 270
June 2019    
Operating Revenues $ 5,098$ 1,513$ 2,117$ 313$ 510$ 689
Operating Income (Loss) 1,342 445 647 54 153 134
Net Income (Loss) 931 296 448 37 203 106
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 899 296 448 37 174 106
September 2019    
Operating Revenues $ 5,995$ 1,841$ 2,755$ 370$ 574$ 498
Operating Income (Loss) 2,013 676 1,161 93 167 (35)
Net Income (Loss) 1,345 469 839 65 111 (29)
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 1,316 469 839 65 86 (29)
December 2019    
Operating Revenues $ 4,914$ 1,363$ 1,703$ 294$ 411$ 1,131
Operating Income (Loss) 690 134 205 22 15 318
Net Income (Loss) 409 88 122 — (12) 238
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 440 88 122 — 23 238
(a)Southern Company recorded a preliminary pre-tax gain associated with the sale of Gulf Power of $2.5 billion ($1.3 billion after tax) in the first quarter 2019 and
recorded subsequent adjustments of $(15) million ($(11) million after tax) in the second quarter 2019, $4 million ($4 million after tax) in the third quarter 2019,
and $70 million ($102 million after tax) in the fourth quarter 2019. In addition, Southern Company recorded a pre-tax loss, including related impairment
charges, on the sales of certain PowerSecure business units totaling $32 million in the second quarter 2019, $14 million ($15 million after tax) in the third
quarter 2019, and $12 million ($5 million after tax) in the fourth quarter 2019, as well as a pre-tax impairment charge of $17 million ($13 million after tax) in
the fourth quarter 2019 related to a leveraged lease investment. See Notes 3 and 15 under "Other Matters – Southern Company" and "Southern Company,"
respectively, for additional information. Also see notes (b), (c), and (d) below.
(b)Mississippi Power recorded total pre-tax charges to income of $2 million ($1 million after tax) in the first quarter 2019, $4 million ($3 million after tax) in the
second quarter 2019, $4 million ($3 million after tax) in the third quarter 2019, and $14 million ($17 million after tax) in the fourth quarter 2019 as a result of
abandonment and related closure costs and ongoing period costs, net of salvage proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets at the Kemper County energy
facility. The fourth quarter charges include impacts associated with the expected close out of a DOE contract related to the Kemper County energy facility, as
well as an adjustment related to the tax abandonment of the Kemper IGCC following the filing of the 2018 tax return. See Note 2 under "Mississippi Power –
Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
(c)Southern Power recorded a pre-tax gain of $23 million ($88 million gain after tax) in the second quarter 2019 on the sale of Plant Nacogdoches. See Note 15
under "Southern Power" for additional information.
(d)Southern Company Gas recorded pre-tax impairment charges of $92 million ($65 million after tax) in the third quarter 2019, and a subsequent adjustment of
$(1) million ($4 million after tax) in the fourth quarter 2019, related to a natural gas storage facility in Louisiana and $24 million ($17 million after tax) in the
fourth quarter 2019 in contemplation of the sale of its interests in Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline. See Notes 3 and 15 under "Other Matters – Southern
Company Gas" and "Southern Company Gas – Proposed Sale of Pivotal LNG and Atlantic Coast Pipeline," respectively, for additional information.
II-326
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
Quarter EndedSouthern
  Company(a)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
Power(b)Mississippi
Power(c)Southern
Power(d)Southern
Company
Gas(e)
 (in millions)
March 2018    
Operating Revenues $ 6,372$ 1,473$ 1,961$ 302$ 509$ 1,639
Operating Income (Loss) 1,376 372 513 7 60 388
Net Income (Loss) 936 225 352 (7) 115 279
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 938 225 352 (7) 121 279
June 2018    
Operating Revenues $ 5,627$ 1,503$ 2,048$ 297$ 555$ 730
Operating Income (Loss) 63 380 (472) 54 16 49
Net Income (Loss) (127) 259 (396) 46 45 (31)
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant (154) 259 (396) 46 22 (31)
September 2018    
Operating Revenues $ 6,159$ 1,740$ 2,593$ 358$ 635$ 492
Operating Income (Loss) 2,174 561 991 80 136 374
Net Income (Loss) 1,222 373 664 47 146 46
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 1,164 373 664 47 92 46
December 2018    
Operating Revenues $ 5,337$ 1,316$ 1,818$ 308$ 506$ 1,048
Operating Income (Loss) 578 164 257 52 30 104
Net Income (Loss) 269 73 173 149 (60) 78
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 278 73 173 149 (48) 78
(a)See notes (b), (c), (d), and (e) below.
(b)Georgia Power recorded an estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion in the second quarter 2018 to reflect its revised estimate to complete construction and start-up
of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
(c)As a result of the abandonment and related closure activities for the mine and gasifier-related assets at the Kemper County energy facility, Mississippi Power
recorded total pre-tax charges to income of $44 million ($33 million after tax) in the first quarter 2018, immaterial amounts in the second and third quarters
2018, and a pre-tax credit to income of $9 million in the fourth quarter 2018. In addition, Mississippi Power recorded a credit to earnings of $95 million in the
fourth quarter 2018 primarily resulting from the reduction of a valuation allowance for a state income tax NOL carryforward associated with the Kemper County
energy facility. See Note 2 under "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility" and Note 10 for additional information.
(d)Southern Power recorded pre-tax impairment charges of $119 million ($89 million after tax) in the second quarter 2018 in contemplation of the sale of the
Florida Plants and $36 million ($27 million after tax) in the third quarter 2018 related to wind turbine equipment. See Note 15 under "Southern Power – Sales of
Natural Gas and Biomass Plants" and " – Development Projects" for additional information. As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, Southern Power recorded
income tax expense of $75 million in the fourth quarter 2018. See Note 10 for additional information.
(e)Southern Company Gas recorded a goodwill impairment charge of $42 million in the first quarter 2018 in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions.
Southern Company Gas also recorded gains (losses) on dispositions in the second, third, and fourth quarters 2018 of $(36) million ($(76) million after tax), $353
million ($40 million after tax), and $(27) million ($(15) million after tax), respectively. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
II-327
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The table below provides quarterly earnings per share financial information for Southern Company common stock for 2019 and
2018.
 Earnings Per Common Share(*)
Quarter Ended Basic Diluted
March 2019 $ 2.01 $ 1.99
June 2019 0.86 0.85
September 2019 1.26 1.25
December 2019 0.42 0.42
March 2018 $ 0.93 $ 0.92
June 2018 (0.15) (0.15)
September 2018 1.14 1.13
December 2018 0.27 0.27
(*)See the notes below the two preceding tables for additional information.
II-328
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Item 9.CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
Item 9A.CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures.
As of the end of the period covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K, Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power,
Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas conducted separate evaluations under the supervision and with the
participation of each company's management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the
effectiveness of the design and operation of the disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended). Based upon these evaluations, the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief
Financial Officer, in each case, concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures are effective.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting.
(a) Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting.
 Page
Southern Company II-330
Alabama Power II-331
Georgia Power II-332
Mississippi Power II-333
Southern Power II-334
Southern Company Gas II-335
(b) Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm.
The report of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Southern Company's independent registered public accounting firm, regarding Southern
Company's Internal Control over Financial Reporting is included in Item 8 herein of this Form 10-K. This report is not applicable to
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas as these companies are not
accelerated filers or large accelerated filers.
(c) Changes in internal control over financial reporting.
There have been no changes in Southern Company's, Alabama Power's, Georgia Power's, Mississippi Power's, Southern Power's, or
Southern Company Gas' internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) during the fourth quarter 2019 that have materially affected or are reasonably
likely to materially affect Southern Company's, Alabama Power's, Georgia Power's, Mississippi Power's, Southern Power's, or
Southern Company Gas' internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B.OTHER INFORMATION
None.
II-329
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The management of Southern Company is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Southern Company's internal control over
financial reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that
Southern Company's internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2019.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, as auditors of Southern Company's financial statements, has issued an attestation report on the
effectiveness of Southern Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, which is included herein.
/s/ Thomas A. Fanning
Thomas A. Fanning
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Andrew W. Evans
Andrew W. Evans
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
February 19, 2020
II-330
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Alabama Power Company 2019 Annual Report
The management of Alabama Power is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Alabama Power's internal control over financial
reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that Alabama Power's
internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2019.
/s/ Mark A. Crosswhite
Mark A. Crosswhite
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Philip C. Raymond
Philip C. Raymond
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
February 19, 2020
II-331
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Georgia Power Company 2019 Annual Report
The management of Georgia Power is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Georgia Power's internal control over financial
reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that Georgia Power's
internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2019.
/s/ W. Paul Bowers
W. Paul Bowers
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ David P. Poroch
David P. Poroch
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer, and Comptroller
February 19, 2020
II-332
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Mississippi Power Company 2019 Annual Report
The management of Mississippi Power is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Mississippi Power's internal control over
financial reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that
Mississippi Power's internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2019.
/s/ Anthony L. Wilson
Anthony L. Wilson
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Moses H. Feagin
Moses H. Feagin
Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
February 19, 2020
II-333
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The management of Southern Power is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Southern Power's internal control over financial
reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that Southern Power's
internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2019.
/s/ Mark S. Lantrip
Mark S. Lantrip
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Elliott L. Spencer
Elliott L. Spencer
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
February 19, 2020
II-334
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2019 Annual Report
The management of Southern Company Gas is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control
over financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control
system can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Southern Company Gas' internal control over
financial reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that
Southern Company Gas' internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2019.
/s/ Kimberly S. Greene
Kimberly S. Greene
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Daniel S. Tucker
Daniel S. Tucker
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
February 19, 2020
II-335
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
PART III
Items 10 (other than the information under "Code of Ethics" below), 11, 12, 13, and 14 for Southern Company are incorporated by
reference to Southern Company's Definitive Proxy Statement relating to the 2020 Annual Meeting of Stockholders. Specifically,
reference is made to "Corporate Governance at Southern Company" and "Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports," if required, for
Item 10, "Compensation Discussion and Analysis," "Executive Compensation Tables," and "Director Compensation" for Item 11,
"Stock Ownership Information," "Executive Compensation Tables," and "Equity Compensation Plan Information" for Item 12,
"Southern Company Board" for Item 13, and "Principal Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm Fees" for Item 14.
Items 10 (other than the information under "Code of Ethics" below), 11, 12, 13, and 14 for Alabama Power are incorporated by
reference to Alabama Power's Definitive Proxy Statement relating to its 2020 Annual Meeting of Shareholders. Specifically,
reference is made to "Nominees for Election as Directors," "Corporate Governance," and "Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports," if
required, for Item 10, "Executive Compensation," "Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider Participation," "Director
Compensation," "Director Deferred Compensation Plan," and "Director Compensation Table" for Item 11, "Stock Ownership
Table" and "Executive Compensation" for Item 12, "Certain Relationships and Related Transactions" and "Director Independence"
for Item 13, and "Principal Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm Fees" for Item 14.
Items 10, 11, 12, and 13 for each of Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas are omitted
pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(c) of Form 10-K. Item 14 for each of Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and
Southern Company Gas is contained herein.
Item 10.DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Code of Ethics
The Registrants collectively have adopted a code of business conduct and ethics (Code of Ethics) that applies to each director,
officer, and employee of the Registrants and their subsidiaries. The Code of Ethics can be found on Southern Company's website
located at www.southerncompany.com. The Code of Ethics is also available free of charge in print to any shareholder by requesting
a copy from Myra C. Bierria, Corporate Secretary, Southern Company, 30 Ivan Allen Jr. Boulevard NW, Atlanta, Georgia 30308.
Any amendment to or waiver from the Code of Ethics that applies to executive officers and directors will be posted on the website.
III-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
Item 14.PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
The following represents fees billed to Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas in 2019
and 2018 by Deloitte & Touche LLP, each company's principal public accountant:
 2019  2018
 (in thousands)
Georgia Power   
Audit Fees (1)$ 3,405 $ 3,605
Audit-Related Fees (2)32 31
Tax Fees — —
All Other Fees (3) 18 8
Total $ 3,455 $ 3,644
Mississippi Power   
Audit Fees (1)$ 1,382 $ 1,371
Audit-Related Fees (2)69 79
Tax Fees — —
All Other Fees (3) 10 —
Total $ 1,461 $ 1,450
Southern Power   
Audit Fees (1)$ 1,828 $ 1,795
Audit-Related Fees(4)1,418 1,017
Tax Fees — —
All Other Fees (3) 16 13
Total $ 3,262 $ 2,825
Southern Company Gas   
Audit Fees (1)(5)$ 4,602 $ 3,622
Audit-Related Fees (6)254 520
Tax Fees — —
All Other Fees (3) 5 7
Total $ 4,861 $ 4,149
(1)Includes services performed in connection with financing transactions.
(2)Represents non-statutory audit services.
(3)Represents registration fees for attendance at Deloitte & Touche LLP-sponsored education seminars.
(4)Represents fees in connection with audits of Southern Power partnerships.
(5)Includes fees in connection with statutory audits of several Southern Company Gas subsidiaries.
(6)Represents fees for non-statutory audit services in 2019 and 2018 and a review report on internal controls in 2018.
The Southern Company Audit Committee (on behalf of Southern Company and its subsidiaries) has a Policy of Engagement of the
Independent Auditor for Audit and Non-Audit Services that includes pre-approval requirements for the audit and non-audit
services provided by Deloitte & Touche LLP. All of the services provided by Deloitte & Touche LLP in fiscal years 2019 and 2018
and related fees were approved in advance by the Southern Company Audit Committee.
III-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
PART IV
Item 15.EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)The following documents are filed as a part of this report on Form 10-K:
(1)Financial Statements and Financial Statement Schedules:
Management's Reports on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting for Southern Company and Subsidiary
Companies, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power and Subsidiary Companies,
and Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies are listed under Item 9A herein.
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on the financial statements for Southern Company
and Subsidiary Companies, Alabama Power Company, Georgia Power Company, Mississippi Power Company,
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies, and Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies
are listed under Item 8 herein.
The financial statements filed as a part of this report for Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies,
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power and Subsidiary Companies, and Southern
Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies are listed under Item 8 herein.
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on the financial statement schedules for Southern
Company and Subsidiary Companies, Alabama Power Company, Georgia Power Company, Mississippi Power
Company, Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies, and Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary
Companies are listed in the Index to the Financial Statement Schedules at page S-1.
The financial statement schedules for Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies, Alabama Power, Georgia
Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power and Subsidiary Companies, and Southern Company Gas and
Subsidiary Companies are listed in the Index to the Financial Statement Schedules at page S-1.
The financial statements of Southern Natural Gas Company, L.L.C. as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 and for
the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 are provided by Southern Company Gas as separate
financial statements of subsidiaries not consolidated pursuant to Rule 3-09 of Regulation S-X, and are
incorporated by reference herein from Exhibit 99(g) hereto.
(2)Exhibits:
Exhibits for Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and
Southern Company Gas are listed in the Exhibit Index at page E-1.
Item 16.FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
IV-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
INDEX TO FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
 Page
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on the Financial Statement Schedules S-2
Schedule II
Valuation and Qualifying Accounts and Reserves 2019, 2018, and 2017
The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies S-8
Alabama Power Company S-9
Georgia Power Company S-10
Mississippi Power Company S-11
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies S-12
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies S-13
Schedules I through V not listed above are omitted as not applicable or not required. Columns omitted from schedules filed have
been omitted because the information is not applicable or not required.
S-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the consolidated financial statements of The Southern Company and subsidiary companies (Southern Company)
as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, and Southern
Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, and have issued our report thereon dated
February 19, 2020; such report is included elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Our audits also included the financial statement schedule
of Southern Company (Page S-8) listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement schedule is the responsibility of Southern
Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits. In our opinion, such financial statement
schedule, when considered in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents fairly, in all material respects, the
information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
S-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Alabama Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the financial statements of Alabama Power Company (Alabama Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The
Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019,
and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2020; such report is included elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Our audits also
included the financial statement schedule of Alabama Power (Page S-9) listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement
schedule is the responsibility of Alabama Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits. In
our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents
fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Birmingham, Alabama
February 19, 2020
S-3
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Georgia Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the financial statements of Georgia Power Company (Georgia Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The
Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019,
and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2020; such report is included elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Our audits also
included the financial statement schedule of Georgia Power (Page S-10) listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement
schedule is the responsibility of Georgia Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits. In
our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents
fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
S-4
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Mississippi Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the financial statements of Mississippi Power Company (Mississippi Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The
Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019,
and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2020; such report is included elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Our audits also
included the financial statement schedule of Mississippi Power (Page S-11) listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement
schedule is the responsibility of Mississippi Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits.
In our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents
fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
S-5
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the consolidated financial statements of Southern Power Company and subsidiary companies (Southern Power) (a
wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2019, and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2020; such report is included elsewhere in
this Form 10-K. Our audits also included the financial statement schedule of Southern Power (Page S-12) listed in the Index at Item
15. This financial statement schedule is the responsibility of Southern Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion based on our audits. In our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered in relation to the financial
statements taken as a whole, presents fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
S-6
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the consolidated financial statements of Southern Company Gas and subsidiary companies (Southern Company
Gas) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2019, and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2020; such report is included
elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Our audits also included the financial statement schedule of Southern Company Gas (Page S-13)
listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement schedule is the responsibility of Southern Company Gas' management. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits. In our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered in
relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2020
S-7
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
THE SOUTHERN COMPANY AND SUBSIDIARY COMPANIES
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019, 2018, AND 2017
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
  Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning of
PeriodCharged to
Income  Charged to
Other
Accounts DeductionsReclassified
to Held for
Sale(c)Balance at
End of
Period
Provision for uncollectible
accounts(a)     
2019 $ 50$ 68 $ — $ 69$ — $ 49
2018 44 69 (1) 61 1 50
2017 43 56 — 55 — 44
Tax valuation allowance (net
state)(b)     
2019 $ 100$ 13 $ — $ — $ — $ 113
2018 148 (38) — 10 — 100
2017 22 126 — — — 148
(a)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
(b)In 2017, Mississippi Power established a valuation allowance for the State of Mississippi net operating loss carryforward expected to expire prior to being fully
utilized. This valuation allowance was reduced in 2018 as a result of higher projected state taxable income. In 2018, Georgia Power established a valuation
allowance for certain Georgia state tax credits expected to expire prior to being fully utilized, as a result of lower projected state taxable income. See Note 10 to
the financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(c)Represents provision for uncollectible accounts at Gulf Power presented on Southern Company's balance sheet at December 31, 2018 as assets held for sale,
current. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company" and "Assets Held for Sale" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
S-8
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
ALABAMA POWER COMPANY
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019, 2018, AND 2017
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
  Additions    
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of PeriodCharged to
Income Charged to
Other
Accounts Deductions(*) Balance at
End of
Period
Provision for uncollectible accounts      
2019 $ 10 $ 24 $ — $ 12 $ 22
2018 9 13 — 12 10
2017 10 10 — 11 9
(*)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
S-9
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
GEORGIA POWER COMPANY
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019, 2018, AND 2017
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
 Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of PeriodCharged to
Income  Charged to
Other
Accounts DeductionsBalance at
End of
Period
Provision for uncollectible accounts(a)    
2019 $ 2 $ 13 $ — $ 13 $ 2
2018 3 11 — 12 2
2017 3 11 — 11 3
Tax valuation allowance (net state)(b)    
2019 $ 33 $ (5) $ — $ — $ 28
2018 — 39 — 6 33
2017 — —  — — —
(a)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
(b)In 2018, Georgia Power established a valuation allowance for certain Georgia state tax credits expected to expire prior to being fully utilized, which was
reduced in 2019 as a result of higher projected state taxable income. See Note 10 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
S-10
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
MISSISSIPPI POWER COMPANY
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019, 2018, AND 2017
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
 Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of PeriodCharged to
IncomeCharged to
Other
Accounts DeductionsBalance at
End of
Period
Provision for uncollectible accounts(a)   
2019 $ 1 $ 2 $ — $ 2 $ 1
2018 1 1 — 1 1
2017 — 2 — 1 1
Tax valuation allowance (net state)(b)   
2019 $ 32 $ — $ — $ — $ 32
2018 124 (92) — — 32
2017 — 124 — — 124
(a)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
(b)In 2017, Mississippi Power established a valuation allowance for the State of Mississippi net operating loss carryforward expected to expire prior to being fully
utilized, which was reduced in 2018 as a result of higher projected state taxable income. See Note 10 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional
information.
S-11
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SOUTHERN POWER COMPANY AND SUBSIDIARY COMPANIES
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019, 2018, AND 2017
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
   Additions     
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of Period Charged to
IncomeCharged to
Other
Accounts Deductions Balance at
End of
Period
Tax valuation allowance (net state)       
2019 $ 22 $ 7 $ — $ — $ 29
2018 10 12 — — 22
2017 — 10 — — 10
S-12
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SOUTHERN COMPANY GAS AND SUBSIDIARY COMPANIES
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019, 2018, AND 2017
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
   Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of Period Charged to
IncomeCharged to
Other
Accounts Deductions Balance at
End of
Period
Provision for uncollectible accounts(a)     
2019 $ 30 $ 29 $ — $ 41 $ 18
2018 28 33 (1) 30 30
2017 27 28 — 27 28
Tax valuation allowance (net state)(b)     
2019 $ 12 $ (8) $ — $ — $ 4
2018 11 1 — — 12
2017 19 — — 8 11
(a)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
(b)In 2019, Southern Company Gas reversed a $13 million valuation allowance for a federal deferred tax asset in connection with the sale of Triton. Additionally,
in 2019, a $5 million valuation allowance was established for a state net operating loss carryforward expected to expire prior to being fully utilized. See Note 10
to the financial statements and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
S-13
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
EXHIBIT INDEX
The exhibits below with an asterisk (*) preceding the exhibit number are filed herewith. The remaining exhibits have previously
been filed with the SEC and are incorporated herein by reference. The exhibits marked with a pound sign (#) are management
contracts or compensatory plans or arrangements required to be identified as such by Item 15 of Form 10-K.
(2) Plan of acquisition, reorganization, arrangement, liquidation or succession
 Southern Company
  (a)
 1 — Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among Southern Company, AMS Corp., and
Southern Company Gas, dated August 23, 2015. (Designated in Form 8-K dated August 23,
2015, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 2.1.)
  (a)
 2 — Stock Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 20, 2018, by and among Southern Company,
700 Universe, LLC, and NextEra Energy and Amendment No. 1 thereto dated as of January
1, 2019. (Designated in Form 8-K dated May 23, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
2(a)1 and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
2(a)3.)
  (a)
 3 — Stock Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 20, 2018, by and among Southern Company
Gas, NUI Corporation, 700 Universe, LLC, and NextEra Energy. (Designated in Form 8-K
dated May 23, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 2(a)2.)
  (a)
 4 — Equity Interest Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 20, 2018, by and among Southern
Power Company, 700 Universe, LLC, and NextEra Energy. (Designated in Form 8-K dated
May 23, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 2(a)3.)
 Southern Power
  (e)
 1 — Equity Interest Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 20, 2018, by and among Southern
Power Company, 700 Universe, LLC, and NextEra Energy. See Exhibit 2(a)4 herein.
  (e)
 2 — Membership Interest Purchase Agreement, dated as of April 17, 2019, by and between
Southern Power and The City of Austin d/b/a Austin Energy. (Designated in Form 8-K
dated June 13, 2019, File No. 001-37803, as Exhibit 2.1.)
  (e)
 3 — Letter Agreement, dated as of May 24, 2019, by and between Southern Power and The City
of Austin d/b/a Austin Energy. (Designated in Form 8-K dated June 13, 2019, File No. 001-
37803, as Exhibit 2.2.)
 Southern Company Gas
  (f)
 1 — Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among Southern Company, AMS Corp., and
Southern Company Gas, dated August 23, 2015. See Exhibit 2(a)1 herein.
  (f)
 2 — Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated as of July 10, 2016, among Kinder Morgan SNG
Operator LLC, Southern Natural Gas Company, L.L.C., and Southern Company.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated August 31, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 2.1a.)
  (f)
 3 — Assignment, Assumption and Novation of Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated as of
August 31, 2016, between Southern Company and Evergreen Enterprise Holdings LLC.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated August 31, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 2.1b.)
    
(3) Articles of Incorporation and By-Laws
 Southern Company
  (a)
 1 — Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Southern Company, dated February 12, 2019.
(Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 3(a)1.)
  (a)
 2 — Amended and Restated By-laws of Southern Company effective December 9, 2019, and as
presently in effect. (Designated in Form 8-K dated December 9, 2019, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 3.1.)
    
E-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 Alabama Power
 (b)
 1
 — Charter of Alabama Power and amendments thereto through September 7, 2017.
(Designated in Registration Nos. 2-59634 as Exhibit 2(b), 2-60209 as Exhibit 2(c), 2-60484
as Exhibit 2(b), 2-70838 as Exhibit 4(a)-2, 2-85987 as Exhibit 4(a)-2, 33-25539 as Exhibit
4(a)-2, 33-43917 as Exhibit 4(a)-2, in Form 8-K dated February 5, 1992, File No. 1-3164,
as Exhibit 4(b)-3, in Form 8-K dated July 8, 1992, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4(b)-3, in
Form 8-K dated October 27, 1993, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibits 4(a) and 4(b), in Form 8-K
dated November 16, 1993, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4(a), in Certificate of Notification,
File No. 70-8191, as Exhibit A, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1997, File
No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 3(b)2, in Form 8-K dated August 10, 1998, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.4, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2000, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 3(b)2, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 3(b)2, in Form 8-K dated February 5, 2003, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.4, in
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, File No 1-3164, as Exhibit 3(b)1, in
Form 8-K dated February 5, 2004, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.4, in Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2006, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 3(b)(1), in Form 8-K dated
December 5, 2006, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated September 12, 2007,
File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.5, in Form 8-K dated October 17, 2007, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.5, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2008, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 3(b)1, and in Form 8-K dated September 5, 2017, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.1.)
 (b)
 2
 — Amended and Restated By-laws of Alabama Power effective February 10, 2014, and as
presently in effect. (Designated in Form 8-K dated February 10, 2014, File No 1-3164, as
Exhibit 3.1.)
 Georgia Power
 (c)
 1
 — Charter of Georgia Power and amendments thereto through October 9, 2007. (Designated
in Registration Nos. 2-63392 as Exhibit 2(a)-2, 2-78913 as Exhibits 4(a)-(2) and 4(a)-(3),
2-93039 as Exhibit 4(a)-(2), 2-96810 as Exhibit 4(a)-2, 33-141 as Exhibit 4(a)-(2), 33-1359
as Exhibit 4(a)(2), 33-5405 as Exhibit 4(b)(2), 33-14367 as Exhibits 4(b)-(2) and 4(b)-(3),
33-22504 as Exhibits 4(b)-(2), 4(b)-(3) and 4(b)-(4), in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1991, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibits 4(a)(2) and 4(a)(3), in Registration
No. 33-48895 as Exhibits 4(b)-(2) and 4(b)-(3), in Form 8-K dated December 10, 1992,
File No. 1-6468 as Exhibit 4(b), in Form 8-K dated June 17, 1993, File No. 1-6468, as
Exhibit 4(b), in Form 8-K dated October 20, 1993, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4(b),
in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1997, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 3(c)2, in
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2000, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 3(c)2, in
Form 8-K dated June 27, 2006, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 3.1, and in Form 8-K dated
October 3, 2007, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.5.)
 (c)
 2
 — By-laws of Georgia Power as amended effective November 9, 2016, and as presently in
effect. (Designated in Form 8-K dated November 9, 2016, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 3.1.)
 Mississippi Power
 (d)
 1
 — Articles of Incorporation of Mississippi Power, articles of merger of Mississippi Power
Company (a Maine corporation) into Mississippi Power and articles of amendment to the
articles of incorporation of Mississippi Power through April 2, 2004. (Designated in
Registration No. 2-71540 as Exhibit 4(a)-1, in Form U5S for 1987, File No. 30-222-2, as
Exhibit B-10, in Registration No. 33-49320 as Exhibit 4(b)-(1), in Form 8-K dated
August 5, 1992, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibits 4(b)-2 and 4(b)-3, in Form 8-K dated
August 4, 1993, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4(b)-3, in Form 8-K dated August 18, 1993,
File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4(b)-3, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
1997, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 3(e)2, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2000, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 3(e)2, and in Form 8-K dated March 3, 2004, File
No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4.6.)
 (d)
 2
 — By-laws of Mississippi Power as amended effective July 23, 2019, and as presently in
effect. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019, File No. 001-11229,
as Exhibit 3(d).)
 Southern Power
 (e)
 1
 — Certificate of Incorporation of Southern Power Company dated January 8, 2001.
(Designated in Registration No. 333-98553 as Exhibit 3.1.)
 (e)
 2
 — By-laws of Southern Power Company effective January 8, 2001. (Designated in
Registration No. 333-98553 as Exhibit 3.2.)
E-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 Southern Company Gas
  (f) 1 — Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of Southern Company Gas dated July 11,
2016. (Designated in Form 8-K dated July 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 3.1.)
  (f) 2 — Amended and Restated By-laws of Southern Company Gas effective October 23, 2018.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019, File No. 1-14174, as
Exhibit 3(e).)
   
(4) Instruments Describing Rights of Security Holders, Including Indentures
 With respect to each of Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power
Company, and Southern Company Gas, such Registrant has excluded certain instruments with respect to long-term
debt that does not exceed 10% of the total assets of such Registrant and its subsidiaries. Each such Registrant
agrees, upon request of the SEC, to furnish copies of any or all such instruments to the SEC.
 Southern Company
  (a) 1 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of January 1, 2007, between Southern Company and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and certain indentures supplemental thereto
through August 17, 2018. (Designated in Form 8-K dated January 11, 2007, File No. 1-
3526, as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated August 21, 2013, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2,
in Form 8-K dated June 9, 2015, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May
19, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-
3526, as Exhibit 4.2(c), in Form 8-K dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
4.2(d), in Form 8-K dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2(e), in Form 8-K
dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2(f), and in Form 8-K dated May 19,
2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2(g).)
  (a) 2 — Subordinated Note Indenture dated as of October 1, 2015, between The Southern Company
and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and indentures supplemental
thereto through January 9, 2020. (Designated in Form 8-K dated October 1, 2015, File No.
1-3526, as Exhibit 4.3, in Form 8-K dated October 1, 2015, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.4,
in Form 8-K dated September 12, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.4, in Form 8-K dated
December 5, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.4, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2017, File No. 1-3526 as Exhibit 4(a)1, in Form 8-K dated November 17, 2017,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.4, in Form 8-K dated August 13, 2019, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 4.4(a), in Form 8-K dated August 13, 2019, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.4(b), and
in Form 8-K dated January 6, 2020, File No. 1-3526 as Exhibit 4.4.)
  (a) 3 — Purchase Contract and Pledge Agreement, dated as of August 16, 2019, between Southern
Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as Purchase Contract Agent, Collateral
Agent, Custodial Agent, and Securities Intermediary. (Designated in Form 8-K dated
August 13, 2019, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.9.)
 *(a) 4 — Description of securities registered pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934, as amended.
 Alabama Power
  (b) 1 — Subordinated Note Indenture dated as of January 1, 1997, between Alabama Power and
Regions Bank, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures supplemental thereto through
October 2, 2002. (Designated in Form 8-K dated January 9, 1997, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibits 4.1, and in Form 8-K dated September 26, 2002, File No. 3164, as Exhibit 4.9-B.)
E-3
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 (b)
 2
 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of December 1, 1997, between Alabama Power and Regions
Bank, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures supplemental thereto through September
17, 2019. (Designated in Form 8-K dated December 4, 1997, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit
4.1, in Form 8-K dated December 6, 2002, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K
dated February 11, 2003, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated March 12,
2003, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 8, 2008, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated February 26, 2009, File No. 1-3164 as Exhibit 4.2, in Form
8-K dated September 27, 2010, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated
March 3, 2011, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 18, 2011, File
No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated May 18, 2011, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated January 10, 2012, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in
Form 8-K dated November 27, 2012, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated
December 3, 2013, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated August 20, 2014,
File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6, in Form 8-K dated March 5, 2015, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.6, in Form 8-K dated April 9, 2015, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6(b), in Form 8-
K dated January 8, 2016, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6, in Form 8-K dated February 27,
2017, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6, in Form 8-K dated November 2, 2017, File No. 1-
3164, as Exhibit 4.6, in Form 8-K dated June 21, 2018, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6, and
in Form 8-K dated September 12, 2019, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6.)
 (b)
 3
 — Amended and Restated Trust Agreement of Alabama Power Capital Trust V dated as of
October 1, 2002. (Designated in Form 8-K dated September 26, 2002, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.12-B.)
 (b)
 4
 — Guarantee Agreement relating to Alabama Power Capital Trust V dated as of October 1,
2002. (Designated in Form 8-K dated September 26, 2002, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit
4.16-B.)
 *(b)
 5
 — Description of securities registered pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934, as amended.
 Georgia Power
 (c)
 1
 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of January 1, 1998, between Georgia Power and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures
supplemental thereto through January 10, 2020. (Designated in Form 8-K dated January 21,
1998, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibits 4.1, in Form 8-K dated April 10, 2003, File No. 1-6468,
as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated March 6, 2007, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form
8-K dated February 4, 2009, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 24,
2010, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated August 26, 2010, File No. 1-6468,
as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated February 29, 2012, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in
Form 8-K dated May 8, 2012, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated March
12, 2013, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated March 2, 2016, File No. 1-
6468, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated March 2, 2016, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit
4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated February 28, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-
K dated February 28, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated August
3, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated September 4, 2019, File No. 1-
6468, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated September 4, 2019, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit
4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated January 8, 2020, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(b), and in Form
8-K dated January 8, 2020, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(c).)
 (c)
 2
 — Subordinated Note Indenture, dated as of September 1, 2017, between Georgia Power and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and First Supplemental Indenture
thereto dated as of September 21, 2017. (Designated in Form 8-K dated September 18,
2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.3, and in Form 8-K dated September 18, 2017, File No.
1-6468, as Exhibit 4.4.)
 (c)
 3
 — Amended and Restated Loan Guarantee Agreement, dated as of March 22, 2019, between
Georgia Power and the DOE. (Designated in Form 8-K dated March 22, 2019, File No. 1-
6468, as Exhibit 4.1.)
 (c)
 4
 — Note Purchase Agreement among Georgia Power, the DOE, and the Federal Financing
Bank dated as of February 20, 2014. (Designated in Form 8-K dated February 20, 2014,
File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2.)
 (c)
 5
 — Future Advance Promissory Note dated February 20, 2014 made by Georgia Power to the
FFB. (Designated in Form 8-K dated February 20, 2014, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.3.)
E-4
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 (c)
 6
 — Amended and Restated Deed to Secure Debt, Security Agreement and Fixture Filing, dated
as of March 22, 2019, by Georgia Power to PNC Bank, National Association, doing
business as Midland Loan Services Inc., a division of PNC Bank, National Association.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated March 22, 2019, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.4.)
 (c)
 7
 — Amended and Restated Owners Consent to Assignment and Direct Agreement and
Amendment to Plant Alvin W. Vogtle Additional Units Ownership Participation Agreement,
dated as of March 22, 2019, among Georgia Power, the other Vogtle Owners, the DOE, and
PNC Bank, National Association, doing business as Midland Loan Services Inc., a division
of PNC Bank, National Association. (Designated in Form 8-K dated March 22, 2019, File
No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.5.)
 (c)
 8
 — Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of March 22, 2019, between Georgia Power, the DOE,
and the FFB. (Designated in Form 8-K dated March 22, 2019, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit
4.2.)
 (c)
 9
 — Promissory Note of Georgia Power, dated as of March 22, 2019. (Designated in Form 8-K
dated March 22, 2019, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.3.)
 *(c)
 10
 — Description of securities registered pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934, as amended.
 Mississippi Power
 (d)
 1
 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of May 1, 1998, between Mississippi Power and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures
supplemental thereto through March 27, 2018. (Designated in Form 8-K dated May 14,
1998, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated October 11, 2011, File
No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated March 5, 2012, File No. 001-11229,
as Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated March 22, 2018, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit
4.2(a) and in Form 8-K dated March 22, 2018, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4.2(b).)
 Southern Power
 (e)
 1
 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of June 1, 2002, between Southern Power Company and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures
supplemental thereto through November 20, 2017. (Designated in Registration No. 333-
98553 as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated September 14, 2011, File No. 333-98553, as
Exhibit 4.4, in Form 8-K dated July 10, 2013, File No. 333-98553, as Exhibit 4.4, in Form
8-K dated May 14, 2015, File No. 333-98553, as Exhibit 4.4(b), in Form 8-K dated
November 12, 2015, File No. 333-98553, as Exhibit 4.4(a), in Form 8-K dated June 13,
2016, File No. 001-37803, as Exhibit 4.4(a), in Form 8-K dated June 13, 2016, File No.
001-37803, as Exhibit 4.4(b), in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2016, File
No. 001-37803, as Exhibit 4(f)1, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2016,
File No. 001-37803, as Exhibit 4(f)2, in Form 8-K dated November 10, 2016, File No. 001-
37803, as Exhibit 4.4(b), in Form 8-K dated November 10, 2016, File No. 001-37803, as
Exhibit 4.4(c), and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017, File No 001-
37803, as Exhibit 4(f)2.)
 *(e)
 2
 — Description of securities registered pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934, as amended. 
 Southern Company Gas
 (f)
 1
 — Indenture dated February 20, 2001 between AGL Capital Corporation, AGL Resources Inc.,
and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Successor Trustee. (Designated in Form S-
3, File No. 333-69500, as Exhibit 4.2.)
 (f)
 2
 — Southern Company Gas Capital Corporation's 6.00% Senior Notes due 2034, Form of
3.50% Senior Notes due 2021, 5.875% Senior Notes due 2041, Form of Series B Senior
Notes due 2018, 4.40% Senior Notes due 2043, 3.875% Senior Notes due 2025, 3.250%
Senior Notes due 2026, Form of 2.450% Senior Note due October 1, 2023, Form of
3.950% Senior Note due October 1, 2046, and Form of Series 2017A 4.400% Senior Note
due May 30, 2047. (Designated in Form 8-K dated September 22, 2004, File No. 1-14174,
as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated September 15, 2011, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1, in
Form 8-K dated March 16, 2011, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated
August 31, 2011, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 13, 2013, File
No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated November 13, 2015, File No. 1-14174, as
Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 13, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-
K dated September 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1(a), in Form 8-K dated
September 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1(b), and in Form 8-K dated May 5,
2017, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1, respectively.)
E-5
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
  (f) 3 — Southern Company Gas' Guarantee related to the 6.00% Senior Notes due 2034, Guarantee
related to the 5.875% Senior Notes due 2041, Form of Guarantee related to the 3.50%
Senior Notes due 2021, Guarantee related to the 4.40% Senior Notes due 2043, Guarantee
related to the 3.875% Senior Notes due 2025, Guarantee related to the 3.250% Senior
Notes due 2026, Form of Guarantee related to the 2.450% Senior Notes due October 1,
2023, Form of Guarantee related to the 3.950% Senior Notes due October 1, 2046, and
Form of Guarantee related to the Series 2017A 4.400% Senior Notes due May 30, 2047.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated September 22, 2004, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3, in
Form 8-K dated March 16, 2011, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated
September 15, 2011, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 13, 2013,
File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3, in Form 8-K dated November 13, 2015, File No. 1-14174,
as Exhibit 4.3, in Form 8-K dated May 13, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3, in Form
8-K dated September 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3(a), in Form 8-K dated
September 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3(b), and in Form 8-K dated May 5,
2017, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3, respectively.)
  (f) 4 — Indenture dated December 1, 1989 of Atlanta Gas Light Company and First Supplemental
Indenture thereto dated March 16, 1992. (Designated in Form S-3, File No. 33-32274, as
Exhibit 4(a) and in Form S-3, File No. 33-46419, as Exhibit 4(a).)
  (f) 5 —Indenture of Commonwealth Edison Company to Continental Illinois National Bank and
Trust Company of Chicago, Trustee, dated as of January 1, 1954, Indenture of Adoption of
Northern Illinois Gas Company to Continental Illinois National Bank and Trust Company
of Chicago, Trustee, dated February 9, 1954, and certain indentures supplemental thereto.
(Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1995, File No. 1-7296, as
Exhibit 4.01, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1995, File No. 1-7296, as
Exhibit 4.02, in Registration No. 2-56578 as Exhibits 2.21 and 2.25, in Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 1996, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.01, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 1997, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.19, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2003, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.09, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2003, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.10, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2003, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.11, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2006, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.11, in Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2008, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.01, in Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2012, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4, in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4(g)6, in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2017, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4(g)6, and in Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2018, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4(g)1.)
 *(f) 6 —Supplemental Indenture dated as of August 14, 2019 of Northern Illinois Gas Company to
The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. under Indenture dated as of January
1, 1954.
    
(10)Material Contracts
 Southern Company
 # (a) 1 — Southern Company 2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan effective May 25, 2011.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated May 25, 2011, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10.1.)
 # (a) 2 — Form of Stock Option Award Agreement for Executive Officers of Southern Company
under the Southern Company Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. (Designated in Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2011, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)3.)
 # (a) 3 — Deferred Compensation Plan for Outside Directors of The Southern Company, Amended
and Restated effective January 1, 2008 and First Amendment thereto effective April 1,
2015. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, File No. 1-3526,
as Exhibit 10(a)3 and in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2015, File No. 1-3526,
as Exhibit 10(a)2.)
 # (a) 4 — Southern Company Deferred Compensation Plan, Amended and Restated as of January 1,
2018, First Amendment thereto dated as of December 7, 2018, and Second Amendment
thereto dated as of January 29, 2019. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2017, File No. 1-3536, as Exhibit 10(a)4, in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2018, File No. 1-3536, as Exhibit 10(a)21, and in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2018, File No. 1-3536, as Exhibit 10(a)22.)
E-6
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 # (a)
 5
 — The Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan, Amended and Restated
effective June 30, 2016, Amendment No. 1 thereto effective January 1, 2017, Amendment
No. 2 thereto effective January 1, 2018, Amendment No. 3 thereto effective April 1, 2018,
Amendment No. 4 thereto effective December 4, 2018, and Amendment No. 5 thereto
effective January 1, 2019. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2016,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)1, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016,
File No. 1-3536, as Exhibit 10(a)18, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)16, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)1, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)23, and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)24.)
 # (a)
 6
 — The Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan, Amended and Restated effective as of
June 30, 2016, Amendment No. 1 thereto effective January 1, 2017, Amendment No. 2
thereto effective January 1, 2018, Amendment No. 3 thereto effective April 1, 2018,
Amendment No. 4 thereto dated December 14, 2018, and Amendment No 5 thereto
effective January 1, 2019. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2016,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)2, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016,
File No. 1-3536, as Exhibit 10(a)19, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)17, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)2, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)25, and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)26.)
 # (a)
 7
 — The Southern Company Change in Control Benefits Protection Plan (an amendment and
restatement of The Southern Company Change in Control Benefit Plan Determination
Policy), effective December 31, 2008 and Amendment No. 1 thereto effective March 1,
2018. (Designated in Form 8-K dated December 31, 2008, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
10.1 and in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
10(a)3.)
 # (a)
 8
 — Deferred Compensation Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its
Subsidiaries, Amended and Restated effective January 1, 2001, between Wells Fargo Bank,
N.A., as successor to Wachovia Bank, N.A., Southern Company, SCS, Alabama Power,
Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Linc, Southern Company Energy Solutions,
LLC, and Southern Nuclear and First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009.
(Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2000, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 10(a)103 and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 1-
3526, as Exhibit 10(a)16.)
 # (a)
 9
 — Deferred Stock Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its Subsidiaries,
Amended and Restated effective January 1, 2000, between Reliance Trust Company,
Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power, First
Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009 and Second Amendment thereto effective
December 29, 2018. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2000, File
No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)104, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File
No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)18, and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)27.)
 # (a)
 10
 — Deferred Cash Compensation Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its
Subsidiaries, Amended and Restated effective September 1, 2001, between Wells Fargo
Bank, N.A., as successor to Wachovia Bank, N.A., Southern Company, Alabama Power,
Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power, First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009,
and Second Amendment thereto effective December 21, 2018. (Designated in Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2001, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)92, in Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)20, and in Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)28.)
 # (a)
 11
 — Southern Company Senior Executive Change in Control Severance Plan, Amended and
Restated effective December 31, 2008, First Amendment thereto effective October 19,
2009, and Second Amendment thereto effective February 22, 2011. (Designated in Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)23, in Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)22, and in
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)16.)
E-7
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 # (a) 12 —
 Southern Company Executive Change in Control Severance Plan, Amended and Restated
effective December 31, 2008 and First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2010.
(Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 10(a)24 and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, File No. 1-3526,
as Exhibit 10(a)24.)
 # (a) 13 —
 Form of Terms for Performance Share Awards granted under the Southern Company 2011
Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)1).
 # (a) 14 —
 Outside Directors Stock Plan for The Southern Company and its Subsidiaries effective June
1, 2015. (Designated in Definitive Proxy Statement filed April 10, 2015, File No. 1-3526,
as Appendix A.)
 # (a) 15 —
 Deferred Compensation Agreement between Southern Company, SCS, Alabama Power,
and Mark A. Crosswhite, effective July 30, 2008. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)17.)
 (a) 16 —
 The Southern Company Employee Savings Plan, Amended and Restated effective January
1, 2018. (Designated in Post-Effective Amendment No. 1 to Form S-8, File No. 333-
212783 as Exhibit 4.3.)
 # (a) 17 —
 Form of Terms for Restricted Stock Unit with Performance Measure Awards granted under
the Southern Company 2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. (Designated in Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)2.)
 # (a) 18 —
 Letter Agreement among Southern Company Gas, Southern Company, and Andrew W.
Evans and Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement, dated September 29, 2016.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 10(a)3.)
 # (a) 19 —
 Form of Time-Vesting Restricted Stock Unit Awards granted under the Southern Company
2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)4.)
 # (a) 20 —
 Performance Stock Units Agreement, dated May 23, 2018, between Southern Company and
Stephen E. Kuczynski. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2019,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)1.)
 # (a) 21 —
 Retention and Restricted Stock Unit Agreement, dated May 23, 2018, between Southern
Company and Stephen E. Kuczynski. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2019, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)2.)
 # (a) 22 —
 Form of Terms for 2019 Equity Awards granted under the Southern Company 2011
Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2019, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)3.)
 #   *(a) 23 —
 Sixth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan effective January
1, 2019.
 #   *(a) 24—
 Sixth Amendment to The Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan
effective January 1, 2019.
 *(a) 25—
 First Amendment to The Southern Company Employee Savings Plan effective January 1,
2018.
 *(a) 26—
 Second Amendment to The Southern Company Employee Savings Plan effective January 1,
2018.
 *(a) 27—
 Third Amendment to The Southern Company Employee Savings Plan effective January 1,
2018.
 Alabama Power
 (b) 1 —
 Intercompany Interchange Contract as revised effective May 1, 2007, among Alabama
Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company, and
SCS and Appendix A thereto dated as of January 1, 2019. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2007, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 10(b)5 and in Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2018, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 10(b)2.)
 # (b) 2 —
 Southern Company 2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan effective May 25, 2011.
See Exhibit 10(a)1 herein.
E-8
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 # (b)
 3
 — Form of Stock Option Award Agreement for Executive Officers of Southern Company
under the Southern Company Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. See Exhibit 10(a)2
herein.
 # (b)
 4
 — Southern Company Deferred Compensation Plan, Amended and Restated as of January 1,
2018, First Amendment thereto dated as of December 7, 2018, and Second Amendment
thereto dated as of January 29, 2019. See Exhibit 10(a)4 herein.
 # (b)
 5
 — The Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan, Amended and Restated
effective June 30, 2016, Amendment No. 1 thereto effective January 1, 2017, Amendment
No. 2 thereto effective January 1, 2018, Amendment No. 3 thereto effective April 1, 2018,
Amendment No. 4 thereto effective December 4, 2018, and Amendment No. 5 thereto
effective January 1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(a)5 herein.
 # (b)
 6
 — The Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan, Amended and Restated effective as of
June 30, 2016, Amendment No. 1 thereto effective January 1, 2017, Amendment No. 2
thereto effective January 1, 2018, Amendment No. 3 thereto effective April 1, 2018,
Amendment No. 4 thereto dated December 14, 2018, and Amendment No 5 thereto
effective January 1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(a)6 herein.
 # (b)
 7
 — Southern Company Executive Change in Control Severance Plan, Amended and Restated
effective December 31, 2008 and First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2010. See
Exhibit 10(a)12 herein.
 # (b)
 8
 — Deferred Compensation Plan for Outside Directors of Alabama Power Company, Amended
and Restated effective January 1, 2008 and First Amendment thereto effective June 1, 2015.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2008, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit
10(b)1 and in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2015, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit
10(b)1.)
 # (b)
 9
 — The Southern Company Change in Control Benefits Protection Plan (an amendment and
restatement of The Southern Company Change in Control Benefit Plan Determination
Policy), effective December 31, 2008. See Exhibit 10(a)7 herein.
 # (b)
 10
 — Deferred Compensation Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its
Subsidiaries, Amended and Restated effective January 1, 2001, between Wells Fargo Bank,
N.A., as successor to Wachovia Bank, N.A., Southern Company, SCS, Alabama Power,
Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Linc, Southern Company Energy Solutions,
LLC, and Southern Nuclear and First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009. See
Exhibit 10(a)8 herein.
 # (b)
 11
 — Deferred Stock Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its Subsidiaries,
Amended and Restated effective January 1, 2000, between Reliance Trust Company,
Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power, First
Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009 and Second Amendment thereto effective
December 29, 2018. See Exhibit 10(a)9 herein.
 # (b)
 12
 — Deferred Cash Compensation Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its
Subsidiaries, Amended and Restated effective September 1, 2001, between Wells Fargo
Bank, N.A., as successor to Wachovia Bank, N.A., Southern Company, Alabama Power,
Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power, First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009,
and Second Amendment thereto effective December 21, 2018. See Exhibit 10(a)10 herein.
 # (b)
 13
 — Southern Company Senior Executive Change in Control Severance Plan, Amended and
Restated effective December 31, 2008, First Amendment thereto effective October 19,
2009, and Second Amendment thereto effective February 22, 2011. See Exhibit 10(a)11
herein.
 # (b)
 14
 — Form of Terms for Performance Share Awards granted under the Southern Company 2011
Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. See Exhibit 10(a)13 herein.
 # (b)
 15
 — Deferred Compensation Agreement between Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia
Power, Mississippi Power, and SCS and Philip C. Raymond dated September 15, 2010.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2010, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 10(b)2.)
 # (b)
 16
 — Deferred Compensation Agreement between Southern Company, SCS, Alabama Power,
and Mark A. Crosswhite, effective July 30, 2008. See Exhibit 10(a)15 herein.
 # (b)
 17
 — Outside Directors Stock Plan for The Southern Company and its Subsidiaries effective June
1, 2015. See Exhibit 10(a)14 herein.
E-9
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 # (b)
 18
 — Form of Terms for Restricted Stock Unit with Performance Measure Awards granted under
the Southern Company 2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. See Exhibit 10(a)17
herein.
 # (b)
 19
 — Form of Time-Vesting Restricted Stock Unit Awards granted under the Southern Company
2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. See Exhibit 10(a)19 herein.
 # (b)
 20
 — Form of Terms for 2019 Equity Awards granted under the Southern Company 2011
Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. See Exhibit 10(a)22 herein.
 # (b)
 21
 — Sixth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan effective January
1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(a)24 herein.
 # (b)
 22
 — Sixth Amendment to The Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan
effective January 1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(a)25 herein.
 Georgia Power
 (c)
 1
 — Intercompany Interchange Contract as revised effective May 1, 2007, among Alabama
Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company, and
SCS and Appendix A thereto dated as of January 1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(b)1 herein.
 (c)
 2
 — Revised and Restated Integrated Transmission System Agreement dated as of
November 12, 1990, between Georgia Power and OPC. (Designated in Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 1990, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(g).)
 (c)
 3
 — Revised and Restated Integrated Transmission System Agreement between Georgia Power
and Dalton dated as of December 7, 1990. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1990, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(gg).)
 (c)
 4
 — Revised and Restated Integrated Transmission System Agreement between Georgia Power
and MEAG Power dated as of December 7, 1990. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 1990, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(hh).)
 (c)
 5
 — Settlement Agreement dated as of June 9, 2017, by and among Georgia Power, OPC,
MEAG Power, Dalton, and Toshiba and Amendment No. 1 thereto dated as of December 8,
2017. (Designated in Form 8-K dated June 16, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10.1 and
in Form 8-K dated December 8, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10.1.)
 (c)
 6
 — Amended and Restated Services Agreement dated as of June 20, 2017, by and among
Georgia Power, for itself and as agent for OPC, MEAG Power, MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC,
MEAG Power SPVM, LLC, MEAG Power SPVP, LLC, and Dalton, and Westinghouse and
WECTEC Global Project Services, Inc. (Georgia Power requested confidential treatment
for certain portions of this document pursuant to an application for confidential treatment
sent to the SEC. Georgia Power omitted such portions from the filing and filed them
separately with the SEC.) (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2017,
File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(c)9.)
 (c)
 7
 — Construction Completion Agreement dated as of October 23, 2017, between Georgia
Power, for itself and as agent for OPC, MEAG Power, MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC, MEAG
Power SPVM, LLC, MEAG Power SPVP, LLC, and Dalton, and Bechtel and Amendment
No. 1 thereto dated as of October 12, 2018. (Georgia Power has requested confidential
treatment for certain portions of these documents pursuant to applications for confidential
treatment sent to the SEC. Georgia Power omitted such portions from the filings and filed
them separately with the SEC.) (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(c)8 and in Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2018, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(c)10.)
 *(c)
 8
 — Amendment No. 2 dated as of November 8, 2019 to Construction Completion Agreement
between Georgia Power, for itself and as agent for OPC, MEAG Power, MEAG Power
SPVJ, LLC, MEAG Power SPVM, LLC, MEAG Power SPVP, LLC, and Dalton, and
Bechtel.
E-10
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
 (c)
 9
 — Plant Alvin W. Vogtle Additional Units Ownership Participation Agreement dated as of
April 21, 2006, among Georgia Power, OPC, MEAG Power, and The City of Dalton,
Georgia, Amendment 1 thereto dated as of April 8, 2008, Amendment 2 thereto dated as of
February 20, 2014, Agreement Regarding Additional Participating Party Rights and
Amendment 3 thereto dated as of November 2, 2017, and First Amendment to Agreement
Regarding Additional Participating Party Rights and Amendment No. 3 to Plant Alvin W.
Vogtle Additional Units Ownership Participation Agreement, dated as of August 31, 2018.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated April 21, 2006, File No. 33-7591, as Exhibit 10.4.4, in
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013, File No. 000-53908, as Exhibit
10.3.2(a), in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013, File No. 000-53908, as
Exhibit 10.3.2(b), in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2017, File No. 000-
53908, as Exhibit 10.1, and in Form 8-K dated August 31, 2018, File No. 1-6468, as
Exhibit 10.1.)
 (c)
 10
 — Global Amendments to Vogtle Additional Units Agreements, dated as of February 18, 2019,
among Georgia Power, OPC, MEAG Power, MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC, MEAG Power
SPVM, LLC, MEAG Power SPVP, LLC, and Dalton. (Designated in Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2018, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(c)12.)
 Mississippi Power
 (d)
 1
 — Intercompany Interchange Contract as revised effective May 1, 2007, among Alabama
Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company, and
SCS and Appendix A thereto dated as of January 1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(b)1 herein.
 (d)
 2
 — Transmission Facilities Agreement dated February 25, 1982, Amendment No. 1 dated
May 12, 1982 and Amendment No. 2 dated December 6, 1983, between Entergy
Corporation (formerly Gulf States) and Mississippi Power. (Designated in Form 10-K for
the year ended December 31, 1981, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 10(f), in Form 10-K for
the year ended December 31, 1982, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 10(f)(2), and in Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 1983, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 10(f)(3).)
 (d)
 3
 — Cooperative Agreement between the DOE and SCS dated as of December 12, 2008.
(Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 001-11229, as
Exhibit 10(e)22.) (Mississippi Power requested confidential treatment for certain portions
of this document pursuant to an application for confidential treatment sent to the SEC.
Mississippi Power omitted such portions from this filing and filed them separately with the
SEC.)
 Southern Power
 (e)
 1
 — Intercompany Interchange Contract as revised effective May 1, 2007, among Alabama
Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company, and
SCS and Appendix A thereto dated as of January 1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(b)1 herein.
 Southern Company Gas
 (f)
 1
 — Final Allocation Agreement dated January 3, 2008. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2007, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 10.15.)
 (f)
 2
 — Asset Purchase Agreement, dated as of October 15, 2017, by and between Pivotal Utility
Holdings, Inc., as Seller, and South Jersey Industries, Inc., as Buyer. (Designated in Form
8-K dated October 15, 2017, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 10.1.)
     
E-11
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
(14)Code of Ethics
 Southern Company
  (a) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 14(a).)
 Alabama Power
  (b) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
 Georgia Power
  (c) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
 Mississippi Power
  (d) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
 Southern Power
  (e) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
 Southern Company Gas
  (f) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
(21)Subsidiaries of Registrants
 Southern Company
 *(a) — Subsidiaries of Registrant.
 Alabama Power
  (b) — Subsidiaries of Registrant. See Exhibit 21(a) herein.
 Georgia Power
  Omitted pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(b) of Form 10-K.
 Mississippi Power
  Omitted pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(b) of Form 10-K.
 Southern Power
  Omitted pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(b) of Form 10-K.
 Southern Company Gas
  Omitted pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(b) of Form 10-K.
   
(23)Consents of Experts and Counsel
 Southern Company
 *(a) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Alabama Power
 *(b) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Georgia Power
 *(c) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Mississippi Power
 *(d) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Southern Power
 *(e) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 *(f) 2— Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP.
 *(f) 3— Consent of BDO USA, LLP.
   
E-12
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
(24)Powers of Attorney and Resolutions
 Southern Company
 *(a) — Power of Attorney and resolution.
 Alabama Power
 *(b) — Power of Attorney and resolution.
 Georgia Power
 *(c) — Power of Attorney and resolution.
 Mississippi Power
 *(d) — Power of Attorney and resolution.
 Southern Power
 *(e) — Power of Attorney and resolution.
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f) — Power of Attorney and resolution.
     
(31)Section 302 Certifications
 Southern Company
 *(a) 1 —
 Certificate of Southern Company's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(a) 2 —
 Certificate of Southern Company's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Alabama Power
 *(b) 1 —
 Certificate of Alabama Power's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(b) 2 —
 Certificate of Alabama Power's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Georgia Power
 *(c) 1 —
 Certificate of Georgia Power's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(c) 2 —
 Certificate of Georgia Power's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Mississippi Power
 *(d) 1 —
 Certificate of Mississippi Power's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(d) 2 —
 Certificate of Mississippi Power's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Southern Power
 *(e) 1 —
 Certificate of Southern Power Company's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(e) 2 —
 Certificate of Southern Power Company's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f) 1 —
 Certificate of Southern Company Gas' Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(f) 2 —
 Certificate of Southern Company Gas' Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
     
E-13
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
(32)Section 906 Certifications
 Southern Company
 *(a)
 —
 Certificate of Southern Company's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Alabama Power
 *(b)
 —
 Certificate of Alabama Power's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Georgia Power
 *(c)
 —
 Certificate of Georgia Power's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Mississippi Power
 *(d)
 —
 Certificate of Mississippi Power's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Southern Power
 *(e)
 —
 Certificate of Southern Power Company's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f)
 —
 Certificate of Southern Company Gas' Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
      
(99)Additional Exhibits
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f)
 —
 The financial statements of Southern Natural Gas Company, L.L.C., pursuant to Rule 3-09
of Regulation S-X.
      
(101)XBRL-Related Documents
 *INS
 —
 XBRL Instance Document – The instance document does not appear in the interactive data
file because its XBRL tags are embedded within the inline XBRL document.
 *SCH — XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
 *CAL — XBRL Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document
 *DEF — XBRL Definition Linkbase Document
 *LAB — XBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document
 *PRE — XBRL Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document
      
(104)Cover Page Interactive Data File
 *
 —
 Formatted as inline XBRL with applicable taxonomy extension information contained in
Exhibits 101.
** Schedules and exhibits have been omitted pursuant to Item 601(a)(5) of Regulation S-K. A copy of any omitted schedule or
exhibit will be furnished supplementally to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.
E-14
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
THE SOUTHERN COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
THE SOUTHERN COMPANY
By:Thomas A. Fanning
 Chairman, President, and
 Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/ Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Thomas A. Fanning
Chairman, President, and
Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)
Andrew W. Evans
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial
Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)
Ann P. Daiss
Comptroller and Chief Accounting Officer
(Principal Accounting Officer)
Directors:
Janaki Akella
Juanita Powell Baranco
Jon A. Boscia
Henry A. Clark III
Anthony F. Earley, Jr.
David J. Grain
Donald M. JamesJohn D. Johns
Dale E. Klein
Ernest J. Moniz
William G. Smith, Jr.
Steven R. Specker
Larry D. Thompson
E. Jenner Wood III
By: /s/ Melissa K. Caen
  (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2020
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
ALABAMA POWER COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
ALABAMA POWER COMPANY
By:Mark A. Crosswhite
 Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/ Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Mark A. Crosswhite  
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)  
Philip C. Raymond  
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and
Treasurer
(Principal Financial Officer)  
Anita Allcorn-Walker  
Vice President and Comptroller
(Principal Accounting Officer)  
Directors:  
Angus R. Cooper, III
O. B. Grayson Hall, Jr.
Anthony A. Joseph
James K. Lowder
Robert D. PowersCatherine J. Randall
C. Dowd Ritter
R. Mitchell Shackleford, III
Phillip M. Webb
 
By: /s/ Melissa K. Caen
  (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2020
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
GEORGIA POWER COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
GEORGIA POWER COMPANY
By:W. Paul Bowers
 Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/ Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
W. Paul Bowers  
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)  
David P. Poroch  
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer, and Comptroller
(Principal Financial and Accounting Officer)  
Directors:  
Mark L. Burns
Shantella E. Cooper
Lawrence L. Gellerstedt III
Douglas J. Hertz
Thomas M. HolderKessel D. Stelling, Jr.
Charles K. Tarbutton
Beverly Daniel Tatum
Clyde C. Tuggle
 
By: /s/ Melissa K. Caen
  (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2020
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
MISSISSIPPI POWER COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
MISSISSIPPI POWER COMPANY
By:Anthony L. Wilson
 Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/ Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Anthony L. Wilson   
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)   
Moses H. Feagin   
Vice President, Treasurer, and
Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)   
Cynthia F. Shaw   
Comptroller
(Principal Accounting Officer)   
Directors:  
Carl J. Chaney
L. Royce Cumbest
Thomas M. Duff
Mark E. KeenumChristine L. Pickering
M.L. Waters
Camille S. Young
 
By: /s/ Melissa K. Caen
  (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2020
Supplemental Information to be Furnished with Reports Filed Pursuant to Section 15(d) of the Act by Registrants Which
Have Not Registered Securities Pursuant to Section 12 of the Act:
Mississippi Power is not required to send an annual report or proxy statement to its sole shareholder and parent company, The
Southern Company, and will not prepare such a report after filing this Annual Report on Form 10-K for fiscal year 2019.
Accordingly, Mississippi Power will not file an annual report with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SOUTHERN POWER COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
SOUTHERN POWER COMPANY
By:Mark S. Lantrip
 Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/ Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Mark S. Lantrip   
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)   
Elliott L. Spencer   
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and
Treasurer
(Principal Financial Officer)   
Jelena Andrin   
Comptroller
(Principal Accounting Officer)   
Directors:  
Stan W. Connally
Andrew W. Evans
Thomas A. FanningKimberly S. Greene
James Y. Kerr, II
Christopher C. Womack  
By: /s/ Melissa K. Caen
  (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2020
    Table of Contents                                Index to Financial Statements
SOUTHERN COMPANY GAS
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
SOUTHERN COMPANY GAS
By:Kimberly S. Greene
 Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/ Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Kimberly S. Greene  
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)  
Daniel S. Tucker  
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
(Principal Financial Officer)  
Grace A. Kolvereid  
Senior Vice President and Comptroller
(Principal Accounting Officer)  
Directors:  
Sandra N. Bane
Thomas D. Bell, Jr.
Charles R. CrispBrenda J. Gaines
John E. Rau
James A. Rubright  
By: /s/ Melissa K. Caen
  (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2020
Supplemental Information to be Furnished with Reports Filed Pursuant to Section 15(d) of the Act by Registrants Which
Have Not Registered Securities Pursuant to Section 12 of the Act:
Southern Company Gas is not required to send an annual report or proxy statement to its sole shareholder and parent company, The
Southern Company, and will not prepare such a report after filing this Annual Report on Form 10-K for fiscal year 2019.
Accordingly, Southern Company Gas will not file an annual report with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
